<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3695</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Skiing: On the wrong side of the mountain - Arnold Wilson
drops down from his habitual Courchevel eyrie and has great fun
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ARNOLD WILSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SOME SKIERS steadfastly refuse to try new resorts: they are perfectly happy
to return to Saas Fee, Soll, Flaine or Zermatt every year (their privilege
of course). There are skiers who have been going to Wengen all their lives
and would be alarmed if they did not know precisely what was round the next
corner of all their favourite runs.
People also have their favourite areas within a resort, particularly in some
of the huge conurbations such as the Trois Vallees, L'Espace Killy and
Portes du Soleil. This can mean missing some extremely good skiing. Does it
matter? I must confess that I sometimes find myself in this camp: during
numerous visits to the Trois Vallees, I have never bothered with Courchevel
1650, which has always seemed to be somewhat out on a limb.
Until last winter I had always been preoccupied with skiing what to my
rather smug way of thinking was the more 'important' area above Courchevel
1850, such as the Jean Blanc and Jockeys runs, or perhaps picking off some
of Courchevel's many skiable couloirs, or slavishly skiing across to Meribel
and Val Thorens because that was the thing to do. Indeed, if you are staying
at 1850, the idea of starting the day by going down to 1650 seemed rather a
wimpish concept.
But when Nick Morgan of Le Ski - which claims to have more chalets in
Courchevel (most of them in 1650) than any other tour operator - suggested a
day's skiing down at 1650 I magnanimously agreed.
The day started in brisk fashion with three of us making a kilometre lancee
style descent to meet him, thinking ourselves rather grand as we hurtled
down from our alpine eyrie to meet the hoi polloi of 1650 which is slightly
isolated on the 'wrong side' of a gorge.
There is nothing quite like the first fast run of the day, when breakfast is
still trying to fuel the system, cobwebs are still clinging to eyelids and
the icy cold blast of alpine air forces its way into your lungs causing a
mixture of shock and delight.
The skiing down from Mont Bel Air is steep motorway - a real scorcher. Eyes
water and the heart pounds and then sings - this is when you remember
exactly why you return to the mountains year after year.
We met Nick and Charlie, the Le Ski guide, just before 10 am for a quick
drink at the Signal bar. Then we started the long ascent. Gradually, taking
lift after lift, we worked our way to the top of the system. Finally, at
Chanrossa, we had run out of uphill transport. It was time to take our skis
off and start climbing. We were heading for a classic, but not terribly
difficult, off piste itinerary: Les Avals.
The climb was quite steep and took us nearly an hour, but in perfect weather
and with inspiring scenery, it was almost a picnic, albeit a strenuous one.
We could have shortened the journey by 20 minutes or so by putting on skins
and walking up on skis. At the top we paused to catch our breath before
starting our descent with a leap off a cornice. Nick had brought some
chocolate and soft drinks so we had a quick fuel intake while we admired the
view. Then, one by one, we dropped off the ridge.
For the next hour or so we were greeted with a gently meandering but quite
steep valley. We were able to cruise comfortably on top of a mixture of corn
snow and wind-packed powder. There was hardly another soul.
The mountain we climbed to get to Les Avals was the Roc Merlet (2,735
metres). The Les Avals is between the Col du Fruit and the Petit Mont Blanc.
A good insiders' route back from 1650 to 1850 is the Telecabine d'Arionaaz
followed by a short ski to the Teleski de la Combe. You can then ski the
long testing red, Combe Roc Mugnier. Then you take the Aiguille du Fruit
four-person detachable chair where there is usually little queueing. For the
final run back to 1850, Morgan prefers the black Suisses run and then the
long green Bellecote.
You do not have to ski Les Avals to enjoy 1650's skiing - indeed it is very
much the minority who do. There is a network of lifts and pistes all the way
up to the Col de Chanrossa which would constitute a reasonable-sized ski
resort on its own if you did not know about the rest of Courchevel and the
three-valley system. The journey from 1850 to 1650, the Les Avals tour and
the long and enjoyable return to 1850 had consumed an entire day. It was an
extraordinarily satisfying day and one that we would never had experienced
had we stuck rigidly to tried and tested terrain. So - for once - let's hear
it for unfashionable 1650, and for trying new areas in general. The snow may
not always be whiter, but it is often rewarding to investigate.
Le Ski is at 25, Holly Terrace, Huddersfield HDI 6JW. Tel: 0484-548996.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3696</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Skiing: Off the piste, Europe's ski slopes turn green - The
campaign to preserve Alpine wilderness and the effect it is having on skiers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DOUG SAGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OFF-PISTE skiers in the Alps are an endangered species. Europe's only
surviving wilderness, the glaciers and peaks, are being fenced in. Skiers,
who thrill to the open spaces and untracked terrain of the high mountains,
are being told they are a threat to the environment.
In the Swiss resort of Verbier, famed for its hard core off-piste skiing,
ugly plastic fences have been erected around the forest under the main
telecabines. Fights between forest rangers and rogue skiers whoinsist on
getting the light, fluffy powder under the protected trees are routine.
The fences replace less obtrusive warning ribbons, which proved inadequate
to keep out skiers on days when heavy snow forced closure of the upper
lifts, as it often does in Verbier, and the trees promised the only good
skiing available on a Pounds 25 per day lift ticket.
Verbier is not unique, except for the rapacious price of its lift ticket.
All across the Alps, posters with cute little rabbits command a halt to
skiing in the forests, an activity which attracts an estimated 10m skiers
each year. In most cases the line between a gentle reminder and the force of
law is not clear.
Helicopter skiing is the environmentalist's biggest bugbear. Helicopter
skiing is banned outright in France, on its last legs in Austria and
restricted to designated sites in Italy and Switzerland. So sensitive is the
issue among the environmentally-aware Swiss, that the national airline,
Swissair, even declines to print photographs of helicopters in its inflight
magazine.
Most skiers are avid outdoors people, and would readily admit that any human
endeavour has an impact on the environment. There is also little argument
that laissez faire development has sometimes gone too far.
Dr Toni Labhart of the Swiss Alpine Club, for example, does not hesitate to
describe the chalet sprawl and creeping lift network of Verbier as, 'a
cancer growing across the four valleys'.
Some resorts have even seized on concern as a marketing point. Switzerland,
where winter tourism is a Pounds 4bn business, advises motorists that salt
on roads has been reduced out of respect for the environment. (There is no
report yet on the accident rate). The Austrian Tourist Office publishes a
chart claiming the highest level of ecologically friendly spending in
Europe.
Out in the clear mountain air swishing through the pristine sparkling snow,
holiday skier may well wonder what all the fuss is about. They may accept
that skiing in the forest frightens wintering animals, possibly to death,
and that ski edges can cut young saplings.
But arguments against snowmaking and piste grooming are less clear.
nowmaking 'wastes' water and electricity. Bullet-like artificial snow
granules, even when not generated by biologically engineered micro-organisms
as they are in North America, are much more resistant to spring melt,
especially when packed down by snow grooming machines. The grass comes later
than 'normal'.
Attitudes differ, and many people are indifferent. In the US I watched a
professor of ecology cut down a young fir on the ski slope for his Christmas
tree. The province of British Columbia politely sacrificed a corner of a
wilderness park when the ski area of Blackcomb wanted to expand. 'What's
wrong with snowmaking?' was the question every American asked with honest
amazement.
Most British holidaymakers react with equal astonishment when informed of
the standard Swiss practice of switching off car engines at red lights.
Inquiries at the Ski Club of Great Britain and the UK headquarters of the
World Wildlife Fund revealed no ground swell of public interest in the
ecology of holiday venues.
To take a skier's view, the most important environmental issue is
overpopulation, leading to lift queues. The calculation of how many people
can pollute a piste before the snow suffers terminal brownout, is a concept
taken seriously in the US. But Lech, in Austria, is the only resort in
Europe to shut the tills at the ticket office once the pistes are full.
I like the Austrian attitude towards the environment. When I once asked the
tourist director of St Anton what his biggest ecological problem was, he
frowned and said: 'Swedish vomit'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3697</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Property: Secondary uses for second homes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AUDREY POWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PEOPLE buying holiday homes in Portugal are looking increasingly for
property that will generate rental income to cover annual outgoings. In the
past, they bought more for their own sole use.
The move towards lettings is just one of the changes in today's
cash-strapped market, says Jennie Pinder, director of Euro Property Advisers
in Salisbury, Wiltshire.
Pinder says the popular price for Britons purchasing second homes is now
between Pounds 80,000 and Pounds 150,000. The person who paid Pounds 200,000
two years ago is unlikely to spend more than Pounds 150,000 now.
Pinder believes people are also more concerned with value for money. Those
buying new want to see exactly what they are getting and may be reluctant to
purchase in advance of a property being completed.
This philosophy is giving a boost to resales, where prices are also lower
and homes often come fully furnished. Many of the homes on the agency's
books are resales, with 80 per cent of the vendors being British.
New homes for sale often find themselves competing with resales at lower
prices on the same site. Agents say property prices on Portugal's Algarve
coast are down 30 per cent on those of 1989.
The choice on Euro Property Advisers' resale list (available from
0722-413636) is, however, wide enough to suit most pockets. It starts at
around Pounds 40,000 for a two-bedroom house on a half-acre plot, 15 minutes
from Faro airport.
Towards the top end of the market is a six-bedroom/six-bathroom villa at
Quinta do Lago for Pounds 680,000. It has a lounge, dining room, games room,
wine cellar, gardener's quarters, swimming pool, double garage and
landscaped grounds.
A number of properties on sale are owned by companies, formed by a
consortium of buyers to purchase as a tax-saving exercise. New buyers could
take over the company.
Many second homes are being sold fully furnished, such as a four-bedroom,
three-bathroom villa near Loule, with summer and winter lounges, pool and
garage, for which Pounds 220,000 is asked.
Where families have decided their second home no longer fits the family
budget, the holiday car may also be thrown in to the bargain for a quick
sale.
A two-bedroom house at Bordeira includes an acre plot, irrigation system,
solar heating, garage, swimming pool, all the furniture and a 1980 mini for
Pounds 130,000.
A three-bedroom villa with a similar amount of land at Almancil, 10 minutes
from the sea, brings with it the furniture and a Renault 5 car for Pounds
165,000. A modern resale villa on an acre of hillside near Loule has four
ensuite bedrooms, lounge-dining room, marble floors, air conditioning, a
heated pool, tennis court, double garage, the furniture and a four-wheel
drive Mercedes wagon for Pounds 410,000.
But a sprinkling of new properties in the Algarve is being offered by
Hamptons (London tel: 071-493-8222).
Work has just begun on the first show house at Vila Sol golf course
development near Vilamoura. The course is completed and hosted this year's
Portuguese Open.
The show property, one of four, will probably sell for about Pounds 400,000.
But plots overlooking the course have already succumbed to the market and
are being offered at reductions of 15 per cent, with the cheapest now about
Pounds 65,000.
Under construction is a five-bedroom crescent-shaped house on an ocean-view
site of nearly two acres at Funchal Ridge near Lagos, priced at Pounds
425,000. Hamptons also has a newly-built five-bedroom property with pool at
Penina golf course, a short drive from the coastal town of Portimao, at
Pounds 290,000.
But Hamptons also has a wide range of resales on offer, albeit pricey ones.
A 20-year old seven-bedroom house in five acres on Funchal Ridge, with
swimming pool and staff cottage, is Pounds 525,000, while Pounds 500,000
would buy a four-bedroom villa with pool on the residential estate of Quinta
das Salinas, or a similar sized house with pool, tennis court and staff
accommodation between Vale do Lobo and Quinta do Lago. Both are about 20
minutes from Faro airport.
Of a style which sets it apart from many of the properties offered is Turtle
Creek, which overlooks the 12th green at Penina golf course.
It was designed to reflect 18th century Portuguese architecture. Two sets of
ornate exterior steps lead to first-floor level terraces. Inside, a circular
marble staircase sweeps around the entrance hall.
It has five bedrooms, swimming pool and an acre of ground. It came on the
market in 1989 at Pounds 750,000 and the asking price is now Pounds 695,000.
Agents tell you that even in the depth of a recession there is a select
circle of buyers who are always able to find the money for something really
special.
And that, says Hamptons' international department manager, Naomi Greatbanks,
is what they will soon have to offer in Sintra, near Lisbon. Hamptons has
been assembling a collection of spectacular properties there - palaces
around the Pounds 2m mark, a royal shooting estate and much more - which it
is soon to put on the market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3698</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Property: Good escudo to buy now. . .
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AUDREY POWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CURRENCY upheavals in other countries sometimes present attractive
opportunities for holiday home buyers.
But it is not often that a purchaser can take advantage of this type of
situation in his own country.
Sharp-witted Portuguese were not slow to spot a benefit to themselves on
their home ground in the recent gyrations of exchange rates.
British developer Bovis Abroad, building in Portugal's Algarve, had been
working out its costings and quoting its new property prices in sterling.
When the exchange rate dropped from a peak of about 247 escudos to the pound
to about 214 escudos, the Portuguese began taking a lot more interest in
these properties themselves.
Bovis has now switched to quoting its Algarve prices in escudos.
(Quoting in sterling had been an anomaly, said Bovis. The two Algarve
developments concerned had been financed in sterling. For a time, the
exchange rate for sterling buyers would be pegged at 250 escudos and would
then revert to current rates.)
Currently on Bovis' Sao Lourenco estate, prices range from about Pounds
100,000 for a studio to Pounds 205,000 for a three-bedroom villa. At
Lakeside village - also an Algarve golf course development - the range is
from Pounds 115,000 for a one-bedroom apartment to Pounds 280,000 for a
four-bedroom villa.
While sales are slow, as almost everywhere, Bovis says German interest is
picking up, with a number of enquiries are also coming from Hong Kong.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3699</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Property: Going it alone in Portugal's villa market - A look
at a scheme for buyers with design ideas of their own
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AUDREY POWELL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUILDING a home to the buyer's personal taste
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
rather than buying a resale or a property on a large development - is a
popular option in many parts of Portugal.
One firm which caters for this market is Portogoa, which is based in Lagos,
in the centre of the western Algarve. It offers a large portfolio of plots
and a comprehensive design and building service. Maintenance and letting can
be arranged through an agent, if required.
The company's three directors are Graham Fone, an English civil engineer
with a consulting background; Paul Loughlin, an Irish civil engineer with a
contracting background (they met while working in Saudi Arabia), and
Francisco da Silva, formerly involved in the property market in the US.
After seven years working in the Middle East, Fone returned to his native
Devon. But 'one wet summer, and that was enough,' he says. Spending a year
touring warmer places, he met da Silva in the Algarve, where they saw an
opening for a company which built villas. Loughlin was brought in and the
company was formed in 1988.
'As a construction company, we offer a complete package,' says Fone. 'We
carry a large portfolio of building plots, a range of villa designs that we
can adjust to suit personal requirements and a professional construction
team that can handle all the building work.'
The plots are mostly in the western Algarve and all have planning
permission. The price of inland sites start at about Pounds 20,000, prices
for plots with sea views start from Pounds 50,000. Depending on size, plot
prices can go up to Pounds 250,000.
The lowest total price for a two-bedroom property with land, which might be
as much as an acre in an inland area such as Silves, could be below Pounds
100,000. But Portogoa tends to cater more for the upper market and top
prices depend on how much house and land the buyer wants and in what
location.
Portogoa has its own architect who works from a series of basic villa
designs on which clients can begin to build their own requirements.
A starting point might be the Casa Monchique design for a large,
four-bedroom villa with multi-level roof. Ground floor rooms open off an
atrium and the dining and living rooms have covered terraces. Three of the
bedrooms with ensuite bathrooms are at this level. The master bedroom, with
its bathroom, study and square open terrace, is on the first floor.
The cost of construction of a design on these lines, excluding land, would
be about Pounds 166,000. A swimming pool would be an additional Pounds
16,000. Building takes eight to 12 months, depending on the size of the
property.
But what advantages are there in buying from companies such as Portogoa,
rather than big developers?
Fone says smaller companies have fewer overheads, a saving they are able to
pass on to customers. Buyers also have a choice of plot, design and
materials and do not face annual management charges that are usually levied
on an estate.
Portogoa (Lagos tel: 082-341035) has agents in nine countries, including
Surrey-based Grainger Properties (0276-855292), which can handle management
and letting for owners.
Fone says that, at present, about 60 per cent of Portogoa's clients are
German, 25 per cent British. Others are Dutch, Swiss and Austrian.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3700</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Turning the tide for the country's lost waterways: David
Bolton says new laws are needed to protect our smaller canals
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BOLTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   THE REOPENING two years ago of the Kennet and Avon canal
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
restoring a long-lost link between the rivers Thames and Severn - was
acclaimed at the time as the peak of success in post-war waterways revival.
Yet, it was by no means the end of the story.
Since the public woke up some 25 years ago to the fact that the canal
network - criss-crossing the country for 2,000 miles - provides an
unrivalled outlet for water-based leisure activities, there has been
increasing pressure to restore those waterways lost already through
dereliction and change of use.
The speed of restoration has increased visibly as government funding in
various forms has replaced, or at least topped-up, previous voluntary
efforts.
Together, there are more than 100 schemes being actively pursued from the
Wey and Arun in Sussex to the Forth and Clyde in Scotland.
The spotlight has moved to the north east, where the recent award of a
Pounds 2.3m derelict land grant to Sowerby Metropolitan District Council
means that the Rochdale canal will be reconnected with the rest of the
system within two years by eliminating a modern car-park which blocks it at
present. The grant brings the total spent on restoring some 20 miles of
canal to about Pounds 17m.
The neighbouring Huddersfield canal has already benefitted from substantial
government funding so that more than half of its 19 miles have been restored
in just 10 years.
It is likely that these trans-Pennine canals can be fully reopened by the
turn of the century, creating a new cruising ring for pleasure boating in
fine mountain scenery.
There is, however, a flaw to this success story. Most of these canals are
administered by British Waterways, a nationalised body established by the
Transport Act 1968, and are described collectively and ignominiously in the
Act as 'the remainder'. None of them are listed by name.
Under the Act, 11 navigations linked with ports of entry, such as the
Caledonian and Gloucester and Sharpness, are classified as commercial
waterways, while 28 canals are defined as cruiseways, acknowledging their
potential for leisure use. A statutory duty to maintain both categories in a
suitable condition was laid on British Waterways by the Act, but the future
of the 'remainder' was left to the mercy of economic and political events.
The Inland Waterways Amenity Advisory Council, also set up by the Act, was
however specifically asked to advise on adding to, or reducing, the list of
cruising waterways.
Although IWAAC did, indeed, make detailed studies of the unclassified canals
early on - and recommended strongly that a number should be accorded the
guarantee of cruiseway status - little has actually been done in the
intervening 24 years, except for the upgrading of some 85 miles 10 years
ago). In its draft Customer Charter, British Waterways has continued to draw
a distinction between the groupings, though an advance has been made in
publishing by name the full list of more than 50 previously unclassified
canals.
Disappointingly, the issue has not been addressed in the private Bill that
British Waterways is hoping to press through the current session of
Parliament in the face of bitter opposition from many representative groups.
After years of decline and neglect, the South Stratford Canal Act became a
famous test case in 1960 when the government agreed, after protracted
negotiations, to allow the National Trust to undertake the first-ever canal
restoration. After three years of extremely hard work by volunteers, the
official reopening took place in 1964. Three years ago, the Trust handed the
canal back to British Waterways, together with a grant of Pounds l5m to
cover a backlog of maintenance.
The longer and more complex Kennet and Avon took 28 years to restore at a
cost of Pounds 2.7m, mostly raised from charitable donations. A further
appeal is being launched for Pounds l8m to tackle the perennial water
shortage.
British Waterways is taking the initiative in starting to restore the
Grantham canal, now no longer threatened with possible subsidence from coal
mining. The Montgomery canal has enjoyed powerful support from the Prince's
Trust and local authorities.
And Britain's longest (three miles) tunnel, Standedge, on the Huddersfield
canal, is expected to be the next target for restoration.
British Waterways now finds itself in an embarrassing position on this
issue. It has co-operated with voluntary societies and local authorities in
facilitating restoration; yet is prevented by the 1968 Act from providing
proper maintenance of these reopened canals unless local authorities
guarantee continuing financial support.
But as still more government and EC funding, together with substantial
private investment in waterside amenities, is poured into the worthy cause
of reviving a wasted environmental asset, the time has come when the
out-dated classification of the 1968 Act should be revoked, and full
recognition and permanent rights accorded to the remaining canals.
Having been brought back into use, our canals now deserve to be assured of a
long lease of life.
David Bolton is the author of Race Against Time: How Britain's Waterways
Were Saved (Methuen/Mandarin).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3701</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / 'No Croats, Albanians or dogs': In Kosovo 93 per cent of the
population is Albanian and 6 per cent Serbian. But the Serbs wield all the
power
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MELANIE MCDONAGH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE COMMONEST sight on the streets of Pristina, the capital of Kosovo, is
urchins selling cigarettes. As I passed the street market the other night, a
couple of them offered me a box. Then, suddenly, they bolted.
I looked round and saw why. An armed policeman was running after one of
them. He brought his truncheon down on the boy and the last I saw of him was
his white face under the policeman's arm as he was dragged off. 'What'll
happen to him?' I said to an Albanian who was with me. 'He'll be taken off
to the barracks and beaten,' he said. 'Then after a day or two his father
will be sent for. It's nothing abnormal here. It's abnormal when it doesn't
happen.'
Indeed, it is unusual to come across a group of Albanians in Kosovo where
no-one has had trouble with the police, been beaten by the police or spent
time in prison. The police underpin the status quo in Kosovo. In a republic
where 93 per cent of the population is Albanian and six per cent is Serbian,
the Serbs have the power, the jobs, the institutions. And, since Slobodan
Milosevic came here in 1988 to claim that Kosovo would always be Serb and
certainly since the constitution of Kosovo was suspended two years ago, the
place has been run from Belgrade for Serbs.
You see it in all sorts of ways. If you go to the discos in Prishtia - there
are four of them - you have got to be a Serb, or at least under the
protection of a Serb. The one I went to was dark and cavernous. There was a
notice on the door showing the things you were not meant to bring in: a gun,
a grenade, a knuckleduster. The young men listening to the band had the
spaced-out look of drug-takers. But the striking thing about it was the
space.
I had been to the mall where the young Albanians go the night before and
there was not room to move. You squashed people with the door whenever you
tried to get into a bar - there are no Albanian places to go dancing. Young
men joke as you sidle your way past them to the drinks. There are no
ostensible differences between them and the young Serbs - both groups are
trendily dressed, educated. But I asked one Albanian, a medical student,
what would happen to him if he went into the Serbian disco. 'I'd be beaten',
he said simply.
It is the same in the Grand Hotel in Pristina. If you cannot speak good
Serbian and pass as a Serb - and the Albanian I was with had spent four
years in Sarajevo - you will not get past the rat-faced flunkey on the door
who questions you about your movements. It is celebrated, the Grand. It is
the place where you get arms dealing late at night, and you can spot the odd
Serbian political bigwig, like one notorious politician who once threatened
to shoot student demonstrators in Belgrade. Until lately it was also
infamous for the notice on the 13th floor: 'No Croats, Albanians or dogs'.
It is hard to find any sort of common ground between Serbian and Albanian
explanations for the situation. I talked to one liberal young Serb, whose
father had been demoted from his job for refusing to sack Albanians and
whose good friend was an Albanian. Yet even he was convinced that Serbs were
a people under threat.
'During the 1980s, Albanians in the villages raped Serbian women, beat
Serbian children and desecrated Serbian graves,' he told me earnestly.
'That's why the police came here a couple of years ago. I know they beat
Albanians, but since then the Serbs have felt safer.' His Albanian friend
shook his head. 'There's just no truth in the stories about Albanians
attacking Serbs. On the television during the eighties you never saw
anything else but beaten Serbian children. But they were not attacked by
Albanians. It was Serbian propaganda. They accused us of doing things -
desecrating graves - that we had never done in our whole history.'
I could believe anything of Belgrade propaganda. One night I heard the
announcer say on television news that the reason Albanian children were not
in schools was that they simply did not want to go. The Albanians I was with
shook their heads resignedly. Albanians schools, using the Albanian language
and teaching an Albanian curriculum, had been banned two years ago. That
afternoon I had visited a primary school, which is used by about 20 Serbian
children during official hours. When they have gone home, the Albanian
children arrive. I saw one music class for the eight year-olds where it was
standing-room only for half the 50 children. The teacher was not paid,
because she was not officially employed.
There are two systems of government at work in health, in education, in
social security. There is the official regime, which has the buildings and
the money. Then there is the underground system run by Albanians. About
25,000 students go to the underground university. It is staffed by the same
professors as in the old days - they are just not paid.
I visited one biology class. A teacher and five students sat around in their
coats on battered garden furniture in a freezing conservatory. There was no
equipment. If the police find them, they are arrested. That is why they move
from house to house. Each week a man comes round to tell them where to go
next time.
'They're good students,' said the professor drily. 'Very disciplined.'
He had been dismissed last year. So, in the last two years, had 100,000
other Albanians. He showed me his letter of dismissal, signed by his Serbian
colleague. 'He had to do it. He had no choice,' he said.
Earlier, he said his office had been smashed and his books burned. We went
and looked at the offices. The windows were smashed and the bookshelves
empty.
Next day, I met Dr Ibrahim Rugova, president of the unacknowledged
parliament of Kosovo. With his scarf permanently wound round his neck and
his lugubrious expression, he looks remarkably like Woody Allen. 'I'm
pessimistic', he said. 'They're trying to make us leave. Hundreds of
thousands of our young people have already left. This is silent ethnic
cleansing.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3702</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Fashion: Long, cold search for the perfect winter coat -
David Sexton tramps the streets of London in search of happiness
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID SEXTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'NOT ONE second passed without his being conscious of the new overcoat on
his shoulders and several times he even smiled from inward pleasure. And
really, the overcoat's advantages were two-fold: firstly, it was warm;
secondly, it made him feel good.'
Thus thinks the clerk Akaky Akakievich in the one day of happy possession
allowed him in Gogol's story, The Overcoat. 'The whole day was like a
triumphant holiday for Akaky Akakievich. He went home in the most jubilant
mood, took off his coat, hung it up very carefully and stood there for some
time admiring the cloth and the lining. Then, to compare the two, he brought
out his old 'dressing-gown', which by now had completely disintegrated. As
he examined it he could not help laughing: what a fantastic difference]'
Buying a new overcoat remains a challenge. It usually seems easier to let
another winter go by without one. I have worn second-hand coats all my life.
At school, we clumped about with great self-satisfaction in second-hand
military greatcoats, looking like the survivors of a retreat from the
Russian front. At university, we preferred shabby, genteel, tweed coats: we
all looked like that picture of Auden and Isherwood about to depart for
China in 1938.
I have accumulated plenty of expensive raincoats (an enveloping one from
Nicole Farhi, an Agnes B version of a real Mackintosh) and even a cotton
summer coat (from Comme des Garcons, like a design for an ideally rational
police force). But no overcoat.
This year I went looking. Since an overcoat has to last more than one
season, perhaps it is an idea to get a classic English number? Austin Reed
in Brompton Road sells the widely available Boss double-breasted coats from
Germany - nice enough, in black, at Pounds 325, but nothing special. Its own
range is mortifyingly boring. A 'hand-tailored Chester Barrie' cashmere grey
double-breasted overcoat, smooth as can be, with flap pockets and buttoned
sleeves, is Pounds 1,050. You would instantly look like the sort of
businessman I take care to avoid.
Marks &amp; Spencer has more to offer. At the Marble Arch store there are two
well-calculated bargains. A single breasted, fitted city coat has a button
flap, flap pockets, and some padding in the shoulders, but is otherwise
plain. Made in Portugal, from 100 per cent wool of some quality, it costs
Pounds 130 and is available in sensible dark grey and navy blue.
For only Pounds 20 more, M &amp; S offers an Italian-made double-breasted coat,
in dark blue and then, bizarrely, in grim green and dull brown ('taupe'). It
has a belt and sleeve straps and a plain jacket style lapel. prominent seams
radiate from the collar, over some shoulder padding. The material is 70 per
cent wool, 20 per cent nylon and 10 per cent cashmere, a blend that gives an
impression of luxury rather than the real thing. No doubt it is durable.
Both of these coats are great value and they look smart in an anonymous way,
particularly if you make sure, as you always should with M &amp; S clothes, to
buy them big. But they are never going to put a swagger in your step.
So perhaps coats do need a designer's touch? In the Issey Miyake shop, there
are a couple of terrific coats. A dark-blue single-breasted coat, with patch
pockets, a jacket-type lapel with a big buttonhole in it, a seam down the
back and a single button on the sleeve, has no padding and is not
particularly long, but it hangs beautifully. It is perfectly simple - but it
is thin, made only of wool with 5 per cent nylon and costs Pounds 950.
Another coat, double-breasted, longer, in black, is even simpler. It feels
great but would not keep you warm and costs Pounds 1,050.
These are not clothes for those who have to work.
If coats are daunting for buyers, they seem equally daunting for many
designers. Joseph stocks only one substantial wool coat - a dull item,
single-breasted in a hard wool, by Cacharel, at Pounds 395. Joseph's own
unstructured black coat in wool jersey is elegant at Pounds 199. It is not a
coat, it is a supreme cardy. Browns, has only two long wool coats in stock,
from Romeo Gigli and Byblos.
Agnes B's coats are all short. You look silly when you stand up. Margaret
Howell was let down by a supplier and has no winter coats for men.
Paul Smith has coats which look alluring on the rack. There is a blue
single-breasted coat in wool and cashmere, at Pounds 495. But on a human
being, it collapses, lacking all articulation. Then there is a long wool
'raincoat' - in a beautiful alpaca, at Pounds 650, in wool Pounds 400. On,
it looks like a blanket tentatively trying to be a coat. On the other hand,
Paul Smith has a single-breasteed city coat, Crombie-esque, in blue cashmere
and wool mix: this is so fitted it constricts you and looks revoltingly
spivvy.
By now, some ideas are beginning to form. Although I want a coat that is as
plain as possible, not excessively interfered with in the cause of fashion,
probably only a very good designer is capable of suppplying this. And
although I want the coat to be luxurious, I do not want a style that strives
to make bankers look established.
I decide to try some emporia. Woodhouse has a good range. Its
double-breasted black coat is a bargain at Pounds 249. It is well cut, with
a belt and straps on the sleeves; it looks good. But, though 100 per cent
wool, it is not nice to touch.
At the top of their range, Woodhouse has 'white label' Giorgio Armani ('Le
Collezioni'). This is what I have been looking for: a double-breasted long
coat, in a dark blue, made of soft wool. It is quite plain: three buttons
either side, no buttons on the sleeves, no belt or straps. There are patch
pockets and undisguised seams, and the quality of manufacture looks
excellent. It costs Pounds 499. Woodhouse does not have my size.
I visit Emporio Armani. Emporio Armani coats, at Pounds 450 for the
single-breasted and Pounds 395 for the double, are only marginally cheaper
than the 'Collezioni' lines but fabric feels much harder, and the cut does
little to rectify that.
In the actual Giorgio Armani shop, there are only a few 'white label' coats.
The 'black label' are made of sumptuous materials (70 per cent wool, 30 per
cent cashmere or 60 per cent wool and 40 per cent angora) and they are
admirably cut, too. But these are much more formal and fitted and cost
Pounds 895 or Pounds 995 or more.
I end up where the more sensible might have begun, in Harrods and Harvey
Nichols. Harrods has quite a small range of coats (unappealing items by
Valentino and Byblos) but it includes Armani Collezioni coats. There is an
excellent dark grey double-breasted version, in a harder, tweedier wool /
cashmere / nylon mix, at Pounds 575. it does not have the soft hang of the
Woodhouse version. There are several other versions - even one in cashmere,
more formally cut, at Pounds 875. But not the coat I want.
The Harvey Nichols basement is surprisingly rewarding. You can see more
designers more quickly here than anywhere else. I try coats by Dolce &amp;
Gabbano (Pounds 725, a lush material absurdly cut into a mock-poor version
of a hand-me-down) by Montana (Pounds 535, all superfluous flaps and
militaristic trimmings, but a stylish swing to it) and Byblos (Pounds 456, a
pastiche army greatcoat, festoooned with brass buttons, again of little
charm for one who wore real army surplus for years.).
Happily, Harvey Nichols stocks a generous range of Armani diffusion coats.
And there is the one I want, in my size, and at Pounds 495 marginally
cheaper than it would be at Woodhouse. How far this can really be considered
an Armani coat, rather than just a standard piece of well-made Italian
tailoring adorned with the great man's label, I do not know. But I do know
that it has had the same effect on me that Akaky Akakievich's had on him. I
hope I can avoid his fate. His coat was stolen on the evening he got it. He
died of chagrin and spent the after life as a ghost, ripping coats from
people's shoulders.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3703</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Fashion: Learning to love older women - A look at a change
in the fashion industry's priorities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LISA ARMSTRONG
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LAST week a colleague at Vogue was getting ready to take to the studio a
rail of flared trousers. 'Now these,' she said, excitedly, 'are going to be
the star of the shoot. Even my mum would love them.' Everyone in the fashion
room promptly placed an order.
There was a time, not so long ago, when finding something in your wardrobe
that your mum or, come to that, your daughter would wear would not be a
source of pride. It probably meant you were either a frump or a piece of
mutton dressing as lamb.
Now, astute designers, retailers and fashion magazines are concentrating on
clothes with cross-generational appeal.
'It gives me a kick to think that my mother's friends wear my clothes. Why
not, if they look great?' says British designer Pascale Smets, who produces
intelligently wearable clothes that combine simplicity with elegance. Smets
is one of a group of designers - such as the New York-based Ralph Lauren,
Donna Karan and Calvin Klein - who believe that so far as clothes are
concerned, age is no longer relevant.
The encouraging thing is that this feeling seems to be percolating down to
all levels of the market. Partly because of a recession in which no business
can afford to alienate customers on such a flimsy pretext as age, and partly
because women increasingly refuse to be segregated by the date on their
birth certificates, market research shows that age is less of an issue in
what we choose to wear than it has been for decades.
'What does count,' says Fiona Harrison, chief executive of Jaeger, a chain
that has broadened its appeal in the last year, 'is attitude. In the past
couple of years we've realised that there are 60-year-olds with great
figures who want to look fashionable and 30-year-olds who want to look smart
and there'll be quite a few of our designs - the jodhpurs, the military
jackets, the pea-coats and the long, slim button-through skirts - that
answer both sets of requirements.'
You can find mothers, daughters and grandmothers browsing in Jigsaw, Jaeger,
Next, Joseph and, if they have the money, the designer shops that line Bond
Street. Of course, it helps that classics - the kind of clothes such as
blazers, twin-sets, long skirts that young women might want to subvert a
little by mixing them with unexpected accessories and older women might
choose to play really straight - are in fashion.
American designer Isaac Mizrahi says: 'It's not that teenagers suddenly want
to look 35 the way they did in the fifties. It's just that it's no longer so
crucial to be seen as young, young, young . . . also there is the immutable
fact that older women tend to have most of the spending power.
The fashion and beauty worlds know this, which is why, although they might
exaggerate their products for the catwalk, pinning the decollete just a
little deeper, pulling the hipsters just a little lower over the model's
stomach, they are taking pains to ensure that by the time they reach the
shop windows, the products strike a chord across the age spectrum. Why else
would Calvin Klein hire 40-something model Lisa Taylor for his autumn
campaign? Why is Lancome paying 40-year-old Isabella Rossellini to continue
as their 'face' and why did Yves Saint-Laurent earlier this year sign
47-year-old Catherine Deneuve to advertise its skin care range?
Naturally, fashion being fashion, the backlash against this age-democracy is
on its way. Adolescent waif-like models - chief among them the British Kate
Moss - have been declared the faces of the moment. The recent spring /
summer collections from Milan, Paris and London showed an alarming
preponderance of droopy, hippy styles while New York's designers, for so
long the fountain-head of practical, wearable clothes rebelled with
something called grunge fashion - layers of gruesomely scruffy clothes that
have to be topped with lank, straggly hair.
But the chances are, that this is just designers being truculent after three
years of coming to terms with recession. By the time these clothes reach the
shops most will have been modified and customers of all ages will find
perfectly wearable clothes, only a little more casual, romantic and floaty
perhaps, than for a few years.
After all, as Karl Lagerfeld, whose four collections this season for Chanel,
Chloe, Fendi and his own label Karl Lagerfeld all contained hippy references
says: 'I don't design specifically for 50-year-olds because the last things
50-year-olds want to look is their age. At the same time 25-year-olds have
to go out and earn a living, often in an office. They can't always live in a
corset and torn jeans. So what do I do? Design a boucle Chanel jacket that
can be worn in completely different ways so that it appeals to both of them.
Today it's about what shape a woman's in and how she feels. Age? It's
totally irrelevant.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3704</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / How To Spend It: For gentlemen who prefer links with
tradition - As an expression of both status and personality, men are
returning to cufflinks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL KEERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CUFFLINKS are among the few items of jewellery that gentlemen can wear, and
men who have rediscovered proper shirts are now exploring the astonishing
range of cufflinks which can accompany them. Bold or discreet, serious or
whimsical, wealthy or restrained, cufflinks say more about character than a
shirt button ever can.
The decision by a Swiss/American collector to sell his collection of more
than 200 antique and contemporary pairs provides an opportunity to see -
and, perhaps, to invest in - the finest cufflinks from Stuart times to the
present day.
The collection, which covers designs from precious stones and metals to
painted crystals, is on display at the Sandra Cronan gallery (18 Burlington
Arcade, London W1), and includes the work of fine jewellers such as Cartier,
Tiffany and Schlumberger. Prices range from around Pounds 300 for modern
enamelled links and Pounds 900 for modest antique pieces, to a pulse-raising
Pounds 8,350 for a pair of panther heads pave set with diamonds. The average
price is around Pounds 1,500 a pair  - and an American architect has
reserved half a dozen, while a pair of scarab beetle links have been presold
to David Rockefeller.
'We've always sold cufflinks,' says Sandra Cronan, 'but over the last three
years we've noticed a lot more men are coming in looking for unique,
expressive cufflinks. They tend,' she thinks, 'to be men who are interested
in dress, rather than jewellery.'
The recession is also forcing the jewellery trade to look for ways to sell
smaller items, and to move outside their traditional, female clientele.
Fortunately, more men are choosing to wear their art on their sleeve.
Now, contemporary designers, antique dealers and the grandest names of
jewellery are all offering cufflinks. Women are buying them as gifts,
dealers are buying them as investments, and men are buying them as one of
the few ways in which they can express their wealth and individuality.
Nearly all of the great names of women's jewellery now offer ranges of men's
cufflinks too. Chaumet (178 New Bond Street) has just commissioned David
Hicks to design a new women's collection (on display from December 2), and
he has added cufflinks - because, he says, 'they are the only jewellery a
man can wear. I believe cufflinks should be simple, understated and
unpretentious.' In coral, turquoise, amethyst and other semi-precious stones
edged in gold, Hicks's cufflinks cost Pounds 350 a pair.
Boucheron, another of the grand names of jewellery, has scored among wrist
watchers with the distinctive design of their Les Pluriels links. The idea
is that you buy the base, the linking bars, in either yellow or white gold
(from Pounds 450), and then collect interchangeable batons, in anything from
rock crystal or onyx to malachite, lapis, coral and other materials (from
Pounds 150 to over Pounds 525 a pair).
Collections can be built to match different outfits, to commemorate annual
occasions or to cover business and evening dress. As Boucheron says: 'Easier
than sewing on a button, and much more fun.' Much more expensive, too.
Interesting cufflinks do not have to be that pricy. Silk knots, in
combinations of colours, are available at all of the Jermyn Street
shirtmakers for as little as Pounds 5.95 a pair. Moss Bros (Covent Garden
and selected branches) has an intriguing selection of links from Pounds
32.95; those based on the porcelain caps from Hot and Cold taps are
particularly witty. And Hackett (Sloane Street, SW1) does several styles,
from miniature silver stirrups and shotgun cartridges to the classic gold or
enamelled chain-linked ovals from Pounds 45 a pair.
In Europe, the traditional, two-ended design has always been the more
popular. Americans prefer the simpler, hinged-back fastening. 'European cuff
links are more intricate,' admits Ralph Destino, of Cartier Inc in New York,
'but some are so hard to get on that you need a valet, a wife, or three
hands.'
Paul Longmire, the St James's jeweller (12 Bury St, London SW1) has an
international reputation for trading in antique links, and always has
several dozen for sale; the vast majority are two-ended. He also engraves
family monograms and crests, and even paints favourite gundogs, on to links.
Nearby, Harry Fane (12 Duke St, London SW1) also keeps tradition alive by
reproducing, using the original designs, materials and workshops, the
cufflinks of the great Edwardian jeweller Falco de verdura. These include
his famous 'Night and Day' cufflinks, designed for Cole Porter - one a globe
in daylight, the other the starry night sky.
Modern jewellery designers are also creating cufflinks in addition to their
women's ranges. Vicky Ambery-Smith, a contemporary jeweller whose work is
sold in the Craft Council shops and the Oxford Gallery (High St, Oxford) has
seen the demand for her cufflinks remain steady, while sales of women's
jewellery has declined. She specialises in reproducing European architecture
as cufflinks, usually in silver and red gold; one series copied the
frontages of Tuscan villas, another the facades of Georgian houses. She also
undertakes private commissions, like the links she made reproducing the
showcase home of post-modern theorist Charles Jencks, as a present from his
wife.
The Electrum Gallery (South Molton St, London W1), which also stocks
Ambery-Smith's work, and Jess James (Newburgh St, London W1) are good places
to find a varied range of contemporary links. The fashion designer Christian
Lacroix is reportedly planning a typically opulent range of cufflinks for
the New Year, based on his personal Arlesian iconography of crosses and
bull's heads.
But however modern the design, there are traditional rules to be observed in
the wearing of links. Beware of those plain barrel shirtcuffs which are
described as 'convertible', and which have a second buttonhole along with
their button. Cuffs cannot be 'converted' from informal to formal; to wear
cufflinks with soft barrel cuffs is a sartorial gaffe comparable to wearing
a tie with a polo shirt. Cufflinks can only properly be worn with formal
turned-back, or 'French', cuffs.
Always try on cufflinks before you buy, to establish two important points.
First, can you pull the cuff back over your watch, or do the links 'pinch'
too tightly? And secondly, are the fittings on the backs of the links
correctly aligned? (Cuff buttonholes are always vertical, but some jewellers
seem to forget this; a link will turn unless its fitting is in line with the
buttonhole.)
Finally, remember that however tempting elaborate and bold links may be,
discretion is the order of the day. It was said in one of Robert Maxwell's
obituaries that 'he took endless trouble to dress as an upper-class
Englishman. Dark Savile Row suits and spotless white shirts were often
ruined, however, by overly large and flashy cufflinks.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3705</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / How To Spend It: To make that party go, just leave it to
Chance - A host with the most
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LUCIA VAN DER POST
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ANDREW Chance has given more parties than anybody else I know. If you have
ever been to any of the grand corporate events in London, then you will
probably have been to one organised by him, for he is the man behind Chance
Entertainment.
Among his accomplishments, he turned part of the Dorchester hotel in Park
Lane into an English country garden for a Saudi Arabian wedding; converted a
Kensington street into an old-fashioned walkway filled with stalls, jugglers
and street cries for the Royal College of Art's 25th birthday celebrations;
painted a dance floor to resemble the Yellow Brick Road for Elton John; and
staged a state banquet for the sultan of Brunei. But if all you want is a
juggler or fortune-teller to liven up a family dinner, a magician for a
children's party, a Madonna lookalike to liven up the guest list or a butler
to help hand round the drinks, he will provide those, too.
Chance started out playing in a five-piece band that became a top attraction
on the society ball and posh private party circuit. From there, he was
placed perfectly to see what made a party go and what made it bomb.
If you can afford him (a smallish private party - say, 80 for dinner with a
disco afterwards - could be done for about Pounds 75 a head although that
would include everything from flowers to tablecloths, food and wine), then
you can rest assured that you are in the hands of a professional. If,
however, that sort of budget is beyond your means, then here are some of his
tips on how to add dash to your own celebrations.
Getting the venue right is most important of all. It should be neither too
big nor too small. 'Nothing,' he says, 'kills an atmosphere more than being
screened off into one portion of a huge ballroom.'
Low-voltage spotlighting is not expensive and can make all the difference to
the atmosphere. At home, there is nothing to beat candlelight - everywhere.
Service, he thinks, is much more important than the food. 'If people feel
very well looked-after, then they feel they have had a good time. Food does
not need to cost a fortune and a lot of fun can be had by, for instance,
colour-matching food to your table.
'For instance,' he recalls, 'we once served a very successful all-pink meal:
pink grapefruit and palma ham, followed by pink tagliatelle with salmon and
tomato, radicchio salad, tomato bread, strawberry mousse, pink champagne,
rose wines and port.'
Those with big gardens or drives might like to line them with flaming
torches which produce a lovely, flickering light. Giant flaming torches can
be placed on either side of the doors for an even more dramatic effect.
Start things off well by greeting guests with something like bellinis
(champagne with fresh, crushed peaches), margheritas or champagne with Eau
de Vie Framboise.
Take trouble over the table settings. One of Chance's favourite colour
combination at the moment is red tartan and dark moss green, but he finds
clients also like burgundy and pink, acid lemon and white. He ties
hand-rolled napkins with generous bows or sailors' knots using strips of
silk, ribbon, taffeta, raffia or twine. Flower heads or tiny posies can also
be tucked into them.
At Christmas, he uses sticks of cinnamon for their spicy aroma (as well as
holly and ivy, of course). He likes to fill the centre of the table with a
mass of differently-sized candles, tall and thin, fat and short. Grouped
close together and lit, the effect is magical. Fresh flower petals and pot
pourri can be scattered around the arrangement.
An edible table centre always looks wonderful. Try a mound of delicious
fruits, possibly frosted with egg white and dusted with icing sugar or
sprayed gold. Alternatively, you could pile up mixed nuts, almond, vanilla
and nutty macaroons. Strawberries and grapes can be dipped in melted
chocolate.
Fun can be had with placement cards. Instead of writing out guests names,
you could cut out from magazines or papers (or hire a caricaturist) to
illustrate some aspect of them. The literary-minded can try writing
appropriate limericks.
If you can afford it, hiring a professional butler and/or serving staff
helps to make guests feel they are being looked after beautifully.
Again, if you can afford it and you are having a real celebration, think
about hiring an entertainer: close-up magicians who go from table to table,
a fortune-teller, caricaturist, graphologist or (for the more adventurous) a
belly dancer, snake handler, sword swallower or contortionist.
Some people prefer music and anything can be hired, from a classical
pianist, guitarist or harpist to a duo, string or jazz trio. The music
colleges often can be a good source of performers; many students are keen to
get experience.
Andrew Chance tel:071-376-5995
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3706</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Fashion: That certain Continental sense of style - New
London branch of Et Vous
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LUCIA VAN DER POST
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT IS no accident that it is in France, where age has never been any barrier
to dressing well, that small designer-led companies manage to produce ranges
of clothing that appeal to customers as widely different in age and
physiognomy as, for instance, Vanessa Paradis and Catherine Deneuve.
Designers such as Agnes B, Sonia Rykiel and Irie seem to know exactly what
pleases a certain sort of stylish, metropolitan woman, who then comes to
trust them for the essentials of her wardrobe. When she needs a new jacket,
an up-to-the-minute shirt, some glitter for the evening or a spankingly
original belt to wind round her jeans, she homes in on her favourite
supplier, confident that there she will find something to give her wardrobe
a lift.
All of which explains the huge success of Agnes B when it opened up in
London several years ago and the decision of the Et Vous chain to follow in
her footsteps. Et Vous is one of those labels that those who shop in
Whistles, Harvey Nichols or Harrods may already know. Sophisticated,
grown-up, stylish yet well-priced, it manages to provide for the working
woman many of the sassy ingredients she needs that are hard to find
elsewhere. Now, Et Vous has opened a shop of its own in Chelsea, where the
whole range and the collection of accessories can be bought.
It manages that very Continental balancing act of being wearable without
being dull, interesting but not eccentric. There are black velvet jeans
(Pounds 70), embroidered cream and off-white shirts in soft viscose twills
(Pounds 80), sweetly coloured tweeds, curvy jackets to fit over stretchy
skirts, easy trouser-suits and great, capacious winter coats.
It is also a good place to search out the season's essential accessory: the
brightly-coloured silk scarf, the striking ear-rings, the necklace that will
fit snugly in a low neckline, the shoes that can make or break an outfit.
Not the place for sock-it-in-the-eye glamour, for those who like to shock or
be in the avant-garde; Et Vous is more likely to become a friend, the sort
of place one will return to for the sort of clothes most of us need to wear
most of the time.
The photograph below conveys something of the Et Vous style - relaxed,
uncomplicated, sophisticated but wearable. Pictured is a long green wool
coat with side splits, capacious enough to team with long skirts, Pounds
323. The check waistcoat is Pounds 86, the taupe wool jacket, Pounds 208 and
the taupe wool trousers, Pounds 98. All from Et Vous, 126 King's Road,
London SW3.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3707</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Fashion: Couture - the very best of British - In spite of
the recession, UK fashion houses are reporting brisk business
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AVRIL GROOM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Duchess of Windsor once remarked to Sir Hardy Amies that 'there is no
point going to a great designer unless he has a brilliant fitter'. She well
understood the investment of time and money and the personal interaction
that both customer and design house makes in each made-to-measure couture
outfit.
Ken Fleetwood, Sir Hardy's design director, says: 'The great luxury of
couture is time - for us to make it and for the client to have it properly
fitted.' But in an era of instant everything and recession, who, one might
ask, has that time, let alone the money and the inclination?
With the venerable house of Hartnell now in administrative receivership and
the spectacular French couture collections recognised as mainly a publicity
exercise to sell perfumes and lipsticks, the omens are bad.
But in Britain a nucleus of old-style couturiers includes, apart from those
mentioned here, Catherine Walker, David Sassoon, Franka and Tomasz
Starzewski. Their business is to sell the designs they create and they are
doing better than expected, perhaps because they advance a cogent argument
for value for money.
The bottom line is now from around Pounds 3,000 for a suit and Pounds 4,000
for an evening dress. But compare that with the Pounds 10,000 Paris minimum
and the Pounds 1,600 you now pay for a top designer off-the-peg suit - and
moreover, at these prices you enter a world where there is no such thing as
stock sizes (a 'wholesaler's convenience', Fleetwood calls them), where up
to three fittings will ensure your garment is perfectly moulded and properly
structured, where the designer will personally oversee the initial concept
and probably at least one fitting, and where that concept may be only the
starting point of your fashion fantasy.
As Fleetwood says: 'In couture, anything is possible. That is why I enjoy
working with mature, assured women who know who they are and what they want.
We develop my suggestions together.'
Alternatively, you may rely totally on the designer's talent. Anouska
Hempel, aka Lady Weinberg, wife of industrialist Sir Mark, is the ultimate
perfectionist who produces the most precise cut and finest finish in London.
'I know exactly which skirt length is right for each client,' she says.
'At present, my line is long but I will do short if the client really wants
it. I alter all the proportions so the whole effect is right.'
But to supply such dreams at a realistic price, overheads must be kept down.
'We can't make money out of couture but we're happy to break even,' says
Fleetwood.
Amies is the only UK house run on vaguely French lines, with its grand
headquarters in Savile Row funded by menswear and accessories licensed
worldwide. The couture remains essential as a prestige headline-maker, and
still has 2000 'in touch' customers, including the Queen, though not all buy
every season.
Hartnell, without such a licensing network, was trying to do the impossible
in keeping a gracious Mayfair house and a top former Paris designer, used to
an expensive lifestyle, only on couture sales. Its ready-to-wear label has
long since been sold off to a licensee.
Smaller couture firms work from less glamorous locations and run a very
tight operation.
Victor Edelstein, who has been in couture for ten years, works from a mews
in Kensington, London. He has about 100 regular clients in the UK, including
the Princess of Wales, another 40 in the US, and finds his dinner dresses
most popular.
'The overriding factor is labour costs,' he says. 'Fabric may be up to
Pounds 100 a metre but it is irrelevant compared with the overall cost of
top fitters, seamstresses and tailors.'
There is no shortage of good craftspeople - Edelstein has already received
calls from members of Hartnell's workroom - but they expect, and get, top
wages. As Lady Weinberg says: 'The team is the heart of the workroom - good
people who work well together.'
Her team includes the wife of a Spanish matador who does rich-textured
embroidery, yet the final effect of her designs is invariably understated,
however dramatic the shape. Despite 800 'irregular' clients, she observes
that 'couture won't make you a fortune'.
This is not surprising when a show costs, says Edelstein, at least Pounds
20,000 a time and far more if you want top models.
For Edelstein, the show, and selling trips to New York (the last netted 41
orders), are essential to maintain the glamorous image. Fleetwood agrees
that 'seeing the clothes on beautiful young models is part of the client's
fantasy, even if she only orders a plain little silk dress'.
To get the best from this fantasy, a client needs to be organised. With an
average wait of six to eight weeks for delivery, she will order after the
shows in January or July and slot fittings into her international schedule.
Edelstein says there are two types of order: 'The seasonal wardrobe of
several outfits round which everything else is planned, and the one-off for
a special event.'
Either is built to last. 'We find ourselves remodelling ten-year-old suits,'
says Edelstein, 'and the dodge with evening dresses is to have several and
alternate the years when you wear them. Memories are very short.'
Lady Weinberg describes her designs as 'classic, with a touch of the
avant-garde. The quality lasts and simplicity can be dressed up or down.
Accessories are what makes them topical'. As Fleetwood says: 'Something you
can only wear once is a bad dress.'
Even in this rarified world, time is getting shorter. 'Some women hate
fittings,' says Edelstein. 'Doing the hem on a big evening dress is slow and
tiring for the client. Some regular customers now expect only one fitting.'
Fleetwood says he now produces a more finished-looking outfit, even for the
first fitting, 'because everyone is now so used to ready-to-wear they are
less able to judge a garment in the early stages'.
Bruce Oldfield, who calls his collection custom-made rather than couture,
finds women prefer fewer fittings and often want an outfit far quicker than
the usual wait. 'We specialise in quick turnarounds,' he says.
His system is different from most in that the sample collection hangs, with
prices writ large, in his Knightsbridge, London, shop for anyone's perusal.
Potential clients then arrange an appointment with him. Best sellers are
interchangeable evening separates that are relatively reasonable, from about
Pounds 1,400.
Oldfield has experienced his bad times. Two years ago, the British backers
making his middle-price diffusion range pulled the plug. 'That range could
not survive in a crowded market without substantial promotion for which
there was no finance,' he says.
Now he is back to what he does best - special orders for 180 customers from
pop singer Betty Boo to Viscountess Astor, 'a lot from north of Watford' and
a foreign contingent mainly from America and the Middle East. He is totally
in control, has doubled his turnover in a year and aims to be self-funding
next year. His charm takes him to the smart events that give him a glamorous
lifestyle without draining resources.
His way points to a viable future for British couture. It is a pity that
such methods could not have been adopted by Hartnell.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3708</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Sport: Pressures that push horses to breaking point -
Equestrian sports
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEITH WHEATLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE equine establishment is caught in a squeeze between the need to attract
television, and consequent sponsorship, to its expensive sport and the
humanitarian pressures from groups such as the League Against Cruel Sports
which fear horses are being driven to cruel and unrealistic performance
levels.
In the spring, the Badminton horse trials were a scene of muddy carnage.
Three horses died at different fences after rain turned the cross-country
course into a gooey brown skidpan. It was a bigger death toll than in the
previous 13 years combined.
In a generation, Badminton has changed from the province of amateur riders
astride game, talented hunters to a focal point of international sport. The
difficulty of the course has increased to match the competitors' skill.
Badminton's unwanted headlines were followed by those during Wembley's
annual Horse of the Year show in October. Sir Arkay, ridden by Swiss
competitor Jurg Friedli, slithered out of control down a controversially
steep 12 ft ramp. A rear leg snapped beneath the distraught horse, which had
to be destroyed.
The show was without a television contract for the second year running and
the organisers faced pressure to make it more visually dramatic. But one
woman who took her children said: 'That bank was just like an ice rink and
the gradient was unbelievable. My daughter said no horse could get down it
(in fact, two did make it before Sir Arkay) and she was physically sick when
the accident happened.'
When the Olympia Horse Show, an annual pre-Christmas treat for thousands of
Londoners, opens on December 16, you can be sure the organisers will have
taken no chances with dangerous jumps or obstacles. Yet, that plays into the
hands of those who say the sport has become processional and
overly-technical; a sport for aficionados rather than a mass audience.
At the Barcelona Olympics, the most terrifying jump on the three-day event
course was 'The cottage.' Blyth Tait, a New Zealand rider, described it as
'leaping on to the roof of a small house, then down on to the top of the
garage before jumping into the fish pond.' Naturally, there were a great
many television and press cameras present in case of a spectacular disaster
 -whether life- or medal-threatening.
The most intriguing comment came from a Dutch show-jumping coach: 'If there
is a big accident and a horse is killed, then the Military (as they call
three-day eventing throughout the Continent) is finished forever. The animal
rights people already say it is too dangerous and many riders agree with
them. Even show-jumping now has its critics. That is why dressage is so
popular in Germany and the Netherlands.'
Fortune smiled that day, helped by the many riders who sacrificed crucial
seconds by opting for the safer, longer route, and there were no fatalities.
Yet, when a Russian horse collapsed with heat exhaustion, it was treated
with great secrecy by an enormous medical team, as if it were a US president
having a heart attack. Clearly, officialdom had said that, with equestrian
events already on the International Olympic Committee's hit list, there must
be no casualties.
After the Sir Arkay catastrophe, it came as no surprise to learn that the
LACS were preparing a dossier on the incident with a view to bringing a
private action. As the hunting fraternity has learned over the past decade,
the LACS are affluent, professional, and prefer cases they can win. The gist
of the league's argument is that unnecessary and unwarranted pain was
inflicted and that someone should pay the price with a humiliating court
appearance and subsequent punishment.
Horse are no longer simply large pampered pets. They are expensive and
occasionally, disposable sporting vehicles as reports from the US
demonstrate. A two-year Federal Bureau of Investigation enquiry into one
Tommy Burns ended when Burns and an accomplice were caught breaking a
horse's leg with a crowbar. Burns confessed to killing, at the instigation
of the owners, show jumpers and racehorses worth millions of dollars. His
fees ranged from Dollars 5,000 to Dollars 35,000.
In 1986, a US tax reform eliminated high-performance horses as a depreciable
asset. Suddenly, all those Santa Barbara cosmetic surgeons no longer wanted
a barn full of temperamental show-jumpers. Mysterious deaths of expensive
horses began to rise.
According to Sports Illustrated magazine, Burns was a well-known figure on
the US show-jumping circuit, where he was nicknamed 'the Sandman.' He
usually killed horses by electrocution, which left little trace. The horses
were assumed to have died of colic. Most of the insurance claims were paid
by Lloyd's of London.
Money lies at the bottom of this whole phenomenon. Sponsorships are large
but hard to find. Only the top-performing horses and riders are able to
attract the funds to stay in the sport. But show-jumping can be lucrative.
John Whitaker rode Milton, sponsored by the Henderson financial services
group, to winnings of Pounds 1m.
'Sponsorships are directly related to a rise in abuses. There is more at
stake,' said a vet with links to the International Equestrian Federation.
In every professional sport, players drive themselves and their equipment to
ever more extreme levels of training, performance and effort in pursuit of
the huge rewards at the peaks of international competition.
Where the equipment consists of boats, cars and bicycles, all well and good.
But the public might not yet be ready for horses to be harnessed to the same
treadmill.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3709</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Sport: Get a good grip on your mind - Golf
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN HOPKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT IS said that the most important inches in golf are those between the
ears, and the more attention paid to the mental side of the game, the
better. Certainly, at 8.30 in the morning, the 30 promising young
professional golfers gathered in an hotel room in southern Spain were intent
on listening to what Alan Fine was saying about mental training.
Fine had already made clear what he thought of some of the well-worn cliches
of golf. 'Practice makes perfect is bullshit,' he said crisply. 'Practice
makes permanent, more like.' Now, he was teaching a couple of simple
exercises to improve concentration.
The golfers were ordered to collect a cotton thread and a safety pin from a
table at the front of the room and attach the thread to the pin. 'Hold up
the thread so the pin is dangling,' said Fine. 'I want you to concentrate on
the safety pin and make it swing like a pendulum towards me.' The room went
silent as the occupants concentrated on their task. Soon, the safety pins
started swinging.
'Good,' said Fine. 'Now, I want you to concentrate on making the pins move
anti-clockwise.' Again a deep silence fell over the room. Moments later, he
said: 'Some of you have it moving clockwise and some of you anti-clockwise.
That is all right. This exercise is an attention-grabber. It shows that
whatever you think about generates a physical response.'
Fine looked around at the surprised faces and smiled. For most of the
golfers, being shown how the mind controlled the body was a new experience.
They were promising professionals selected by Apollo, the golf shaft
manufacturer, to attend this week-long course. For them, playing better golf
was achieved by hitting hundreds of balls on a driving range.
Fine, however, spends his life trying to improve the performances of
athletes and businessmen and, for him, a simple demonstration of mind over
matter such as this was old hat. He trains executives 'to maximise what they
are capable of achieving.'
The bulk of his work is done with companies such as Rockwell, IBM and DuPont
and he spends part of each month in the US. But he is fascinated by the
relationship between sport and business, believing that sport can be a
metaphor for work.
'The value of sport is that, because it simplifies many actions and results,
it is easy to see what has happened and thus to improve,' says Fine. 'Think
of stress in sport. Its symptoms could be the same as stress in business. It
is often caused by a lack of clarity as to what the goals are. Focusing on
clarifying the goals, and the reality of achieving them, can reduce stress.
'Coaching in sport is about helping and empowering people to succeed. It is
the same in business. When the task is greater than the skill available,
then the classic response is to tighten up. You see that in golf and you see
that in business. Top sportsmen use coaches because it helps them perform at
their peak. The best managers coach their employees, too.'
For Fine, the attraction of golf is that it is an excellent teaching and
learning tool. 'Golf points up the results of not using your mind well, much
more than other sports,' he says. 'At its simplest, almost everything we do
is either observing, listening, taking action or thinking. Everybody does
some things that are combinations of these. The combinations may be
different between sport and business, between a gardener and John Major, a
golfer and a musician. But what I am trying to do is to help people get
better at thinking, planning, talking and observing, because then they will
be able to do their jobs better.'
Fine, who does not play the game himself, has worked with Colin Montgomerie
and Howard Clark, the Ryder Cup players, and Bernard Gallacher, the Ryder
Cup captain. He has had the most success, however, with David Feherty, who
was a member of the Ryder Cup team captained by Gallacher in 1991. 'Before I
met Alan, I was like a blind man looking for a black cat in a darkened
room,' says Feherty.
In those days in the mid-'80s, Feherty was a promising player and 15th in
the money list, but he had yet to win a tournament although he and his peers
thought him capable of it. After discussions, the two men decided Feherty
was occasionally being over-cautious in producing a stroke. He would decide
how to play it and then allow doubts to creep into his mind.
Fine thought of a technique that would help. 'How much money would you have
to lose for it to hurt?' he asked Feherty. 'Pounds 500,' said Feherty before
adding, hurriedly: 'No, Pounds 100.' He knew something was up.
'I want you to write a cheque for Pounds 1,000 to your favourite charity and
leave it with me,' said Fine. 'If you hit the ball fearlessly, I will return
it to you. If you do not, I will give it to charity. I am trying to make you
realise that it will hurt you not to commit yourself to every shot.'
Feherty won the next tournament he entered. 'I've won,' he wrote in his
diary. 'Why didn't I do this before?'
The same technique has been used on businessmen. 'I have had men tell me
that they are totally in control of themselves and will definitely do
something and then, along the way, they change their priorities,' says Fine.
'Twice, I have cashed cheques, one for Pounds 50 and one for Dollars
10,000.'
He adds: 'Golf as a culture is more open than many sports. Golfers are more
willing to try anything. Tennis players, by contrast, are more reactive. I
like working with sportsmen. They enjoy a challenge and they respond to
adversity.'
Alan Fine's company is Inside Out. Tel: 071-938-3365.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3710</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Sport: When it comes to the crunch - American Football
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF ANYONE needed reminding that American football is a violent game, the
events of the past week have confirmed that no team sport bears comparison
when it comes to the physical damage inflicted on athletes in the name of
entertainment.
Last Sunday, Dennis Byrd, a 6 ft 5 in (1.96 metre) defensive lineman for the
New York Jets, rammed accidentally into a teammate while trying to flatten
an opposing quarterback. The force of the impact broke Byrd's neck.
As soon as his body hit the ground, it was clear Byrd was in trouble. His
first words were: 'I don't have any feeling in my legs.' As doctors and
teammates crowded anxiously around, he asked: 'Am I going to be paralysed?'
Sadly, the answer, at least for now, is yes. On Wednesday, Byrd had surgery
to stabilise his neck and spinal cord. He has little or no movement in his
arms or legs.
Byrd's tragedy came just a few days after Al Toon, the Jets' best wide
receiver, retired because of injury. A blow to the head in a mid-November
game left him groggy and confused for several weeks.
Although he was expected to recover, doctors told him he had taken too much
punishment to the head over his eight-year career.
Toon is just one of many football players forced into involuntary
retirement. Statistics show that two out of every three players retire from
the National Football League because of permanent injury. Many spend the
rest of their lives in pain because of crippling damage to ankles, knees,
hips, elbows and shoulders.
Although the total of injuries this season is about average, the numbers
still are staggering. In the 12 weeks of NFL play, nearly 500 players have
had to miss at least one game. That is almost 18 for each team.
While life-threatening collisions are, fortunately, quite rare, Byrd broke
his neck almost exactly a year after a Detroit Lions defender was paralysed
permanently by a similar injury. And with footballers getting bigger and
faster, it is obvious that the chances of getting hurt badly are increasing.
Byrd's injury has re-opened the debate about whether American football is
too violent and if the rules should be changed to make it safer. The usual
reaction among players is to say that violence and injuries are a natural
part of the sport.
This is not surprising in a game where only a few players ever touch the
ball and the rest spend their time ramming into each other. The problem with
football, however, is that hitting (as it is known) is not just accepted as
part of the game - it is celebrated. The league itself sells a video showing
frightening collisions between players under the jokey title: 'The NFL's
Greatest Hits.'
It is also common for television producers during a game to replay a
particularly vicious hit several times over, often with the sound turned up
so that viewers can hear the crunch of plastic, muscle and bone.
Given the highly-competitive nature of American sport and the intense
pressure to win at any cost, it is unlikely footballers will lose the
violent intensity they bring to each game, or that the fans will stop
enjoying the simple brutality involved. But there are some things that could
be done to limit injuries.
One is to get rid of artificial turf. While studies may show it causes no
more injuries than real grass, common sense dictates that it is harder on
the human body.
A former Miami Dolphin, Nick Buonoconti, said last week: 'Playing on
artificial turf is like playing on concrete.' There was good reason for
seeking his opinion on injuries: his son was paralysed permanently playing
in a college football game several years ago.
Another beneficial change would be to stop players using their helmets as
weapons. Houston's star quarterback, Warren Moon, had his arm broken three
weeks ago when an onrushing defender speared him with his helmet.
The first thing Moon heard after the hit was a couple of opposing players
screaming: 'Yeah] We got him outta the game]'
Had Byrd led with his shoulder instead of his head, the chances are he would
still be walking. But many defenders are taught to lead with the helmet:
that way, they are more likely to cause an opponent to fumble the ball.
Ultimately, everyone in the game will label his injury a 'freak accident'
and get on with the rest of the season. But was it really that freakish?
After all, it was the result of two huge men, who together weigh 38 1/2
stone (540 lb), trying to knock the stuffing out of a smaller, lighter and
very vulnerable opponent.
As their intended target, Kansas City Chiefs' quarterback Dave Krieg, said
after Sunday's game: 'It could have been me lying there.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3711</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Travel: A guidebook revolution - Practical Traveller
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL THOMPSON-NOEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HERE are three things you may not know about travel in eastern Europe,
writes Michael Thompson-Noel:
1) Tick-borne encephalitis is known to exist in forested areas from the
Austria-Hungary border east to the outskirts of Budapest, so you might want
to get a vaccination. Risk season: March-November.
2) When leaving Warsaw, you will have only yourself to blame if your luggage
doesn't make it onto the aircraft. You have to put it on the correct
conveyor belt yourself.
3) You get what you pay for if you buy 2-cent (30-stotinki) Bulgarian
condoms (aka Medbio Protex). They tend to fall apart as soon as you unroll
them.
These facts, plus thousands more, can be found in On The Loose In Eastern
Europe, one of four new-style budget guidebooks - the Berkeley Guides -
produced by students of the University of California and published by
Fodor's. The other three guides in the series cover Mexico, California, and
the Pacific Northwest and Alaska. In Britain they cost Pounds 8.99
With luck, the Berkeley Guides will detonate a bomb in the fusty old world
of guidebook publishing. True, their political correctness may grate on some
readers: 'We tell you if a place is wheelchair-accessible,' they say, 'let
you know where people of colour may encounter discrimination, provide
resources (information) for gay and lesbian travellers, and recognise the
needs of women . . .' The guides are even printed on recycled paper using
soy-based inks and are tied-in with various ecological action groups.
But they are funky (Time's description), well organised, well written and
packed with insightful and up-to-date information. 'We wrote the books,' say
the editors, 'because the current crop of guidebooks doesn't appeal to
student travellers . . . the competition has been regurgitating the same old
muck for decades. In contrast, the Berkeley Guides are written from scratch.
The information is fresh . . . the destinations covered were slept in, eaten
in, boogied down in, and sized up by our writers. If a place sucks, we tell
you and recommend something else.'
Consider this paragraph from the section on Debrecen, capital city of the
Great Plain of Hungary, near the Romanian border: 'It's not unheard of to
miss the last train back to Debrecen (about 8.15pm) while waiting for the
waiters at the Hortobagyi Csarda to bring the bill. Hitchhiking after
sundown is something of a challenge round here, so you may have to check
into Camping Puszta for a night. This campground just behind the Herdsman
Museum rents bungalows for Dollars 7.70 and tents for Dollars 1.55 per
person. The friendly staff changes money at a decent rate and rents bikes
for Dollars 3.20 a day (the flat countryside is perfect for biking).'
Wrinklies will not get much of a kick from the Berkeley Guides. But they are
not only for students. They pack in so much information, and convey it so
breezily, that they deserve wide readerships. Other guidebook publishers
will just have to catch up.
DID YOU know that Neanderthal is a valley not far from Dusseldorf, in
Nordrhein-Westfalen? Nor me. The valley was a remote place until about 1830,
when quarrying revealed numerous caves, in one of which was discovered the
skeleton of Neanderthal Man.
Today, Neanderthal is a nature preserve with many broad hiking trails.
Families go to picnic there. There is a museum which tells the story of the
discovery and contains a replica of the skeleton (the original skull is in
the Rheinisches Landesmuseum in Bonn). There is an inn and a small hotel.
The museum is open daily except Mondays, but closed in December and January.
I discovered all this from The Scientific Traveller, an unusual guidebook
described as the first-ever guide to Europe's scientific heritage. It offers
plenty of information. But it also describes places and people related to
the history of scientific discovery throughout Europe. The authors, Charles
Tanford and Jacqueline Reynolds, are scientists themselves.
The Scientific Traveller, John Wiley &amp; Sons, Pounds 10.95.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3712</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Travel: Rome, the only speed is slow - Michael Thompson-Noel
steps gingerly from sight to sight
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL THOMPSON-NOEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THURSDAY, 9am. I am about to board a coach for a 3 1/2 -hour tour of central
Roman sights. It should not be over-strenuous: the Trevi fountain, Pantheon,
Piazza Navona, St Peter's and then back across the Tiber to my hotel near
the Villa Medici so I can gather my wits.
I have not been to Rome before, and already I can see that I will not be
disappointed. Rome is almost as I had imagined it, a giant pop-up postcard
crammed with so much stuff - large, important stuff: ancient, medieval,
Baroque and modern - that my head is spinning. Yet it is also strangely
different: more dynamic, but also more intimate; noisier and crowdier in
parts, but also more subdued; messier, nastier traffic, but also less
flamboyance than I had expected.
After a short drive we strike out on foot, and soon reach the Trevi
fountain. I distrust people who are snobbish about sight-seeing, and would
dislike anyone who had a rude word to say about this fountain. It is larger
than I had imagined, and so far over the top that I warm to it at once. On a
bench near the fountain a couple are canoodling. It is only 9.27, yet they
are whispering and licking ears. I borrow a coin, and am about to throw it
into the fountain - backwards, as instructed - when the guide rushes up. He
is not a happy man. He jabs his finger at me. 'You must keep up,' he says.
'If you do not follow me you are certain to get lost.'
We stroll towards the Pantheon. There is something to enjoy, some small or
large delight, at almost every step. I notice that even the smallest cafes
have Caravaggios on the walls and the bones of saints stashed beneath the
floors.
We are approaching St Peter's. On the sidewalk, a tramp shuffles past. A
woman tourist recoils from him in horror. His feelings are badly hurt. 'Go
on,' he shouts. 'Go and look at St Peter's, and then sod off home. Rome
doesn't need tourists like you.'
I spend a miserable 40 minutes in St Peter's Basilica, which depresses and
saddens me. I am intimidated, and know that I am meant to be, for this is
the architecture of totalitarianism. On the other hand, I recall what the
writer Malachi Martin said: that Romans have long memories, and remember the
time when the popes deserted them. Rome became the refuge of robbers preying
on a few farmers, its monuments overgrown, so dank and smelly that it was
known across Europe by the nickname 'Cowpatch.' Romans, says Martin, 'know
with surety Rome will always house the Great Fisherman. Or cease to be
Rome.'
1pm. I am restored to full happiness, for I am now enjoying lunch - an
American Thanksgiving lunch - in the rooftop restaurant of the Hotel
Hassler, one of the best in Rome, which is at the top of the Spanish Steps,
next to the twin-domed Trinita dei Monti Church.
In his latest travel book, The Happy Isles of Oceania, Paul Theroux warns
against the corrupting effect of staying too long in luxury hotels. Their
comfort and solitude, he says, can become an addiction. 'After even a short
experience of luxury, anything less is like punishment.' Theroux is a wise
man. But I am staying at the Hassler for only two nights, so my risk is a
small one. Its location is superb, and the comforts it offers are
complemented, as so often with grand hotels, by a zephyr of eccentricity.
3pm. Siesta.
5pm. I still haven't clapped eyes on the Colosseum, though I am reading a
first-rate book by Roberto Luciani (The Colosseum, Istituto Geografico)
which is telling me many things I did not know about the Flavian
amphitheatre and its circuses. For example: what high-society women most
longed for in ancient Rome was 'a gladiator of the Thracian speciality'
(shield and short sword).
7.30pm. I am half-way down the Spanish Steps, which are crowded with flirts.
There are knots of police, armed to the teeth. At the top of the steps, a
six-strong Peruvian pipe band is playing something mournful from the Andean
charts. The entire scene is heartwarming. Nor is it cold. Although it is
late November, the temperature is 15`C.
Malachi Martin says that May is the time to be in Rome, when the city is
filled with flowers and sparkling fountains and the sky is the one that
Raphael called 'the casement of Heaven.' But perhaps the thinning of the
ozone layer is changing things around. Perhaps, next century, Rome in May
will be as hot as Casablanca now, and tourists will only visit it in
December and January.
9.15pm. Still haven't caught sight of the Colosseum. I am dining at El
Toula, an extremely fine restaurant on Via della Lupa. I am in the company
of three intimidatingly senior UK female travel writers - women who know the
price of everything in 140 currencies and the value, when they encounter it,
of flakes of white truffle sensuously scattered across a plate of risotto.
We just keep on eating; nothing seems to stop us; soon we can hardly move.
Friday, 11am. I have spent the morning pottering, avoiding major sights,
concentrating on small stuff, the infilling of 20 centuries. Now I am in the
Keats-Shelley Memorial House, the Casina Rossa, on Piazza di Spagna, at the
foot of the Spanish Steps, chatting to the curator, Bathsheba Abse. Keats
spent the last three months of his life here, dying, of tuberculosis, on
February 23 1821. He was barely 25.
At Keats' death, the room in which he died was thoroughly disinfected to
comply with papal government regulations. The furniture, including windows
and doors, was burnt in the square. Ms Abse is planning to turn the room
back into a bedroom. You can still see the pale blue rosettes between the
ceiling rafters. There was little else for Keats to stare at. He said the
rosettes gave him the feeling of flowers growing over him.
1pm. Lunch in Piazza Navona. I am amazed, studying my map and glancing
through a guidebook, at the sheer tonnage of Roman sights I have not yet
been near. But you cannot hurry Rome, so what is the point of rushing?
4.30pm. Stretch limo to the airport. The traffic is appalling. Finally, in
the livid twilight, I pass the Colosseum. God, but it's . . . huge.
Michael Thompson-Noel was a guest of the Hotel Hassler, Trinita dei Monti 6,
00187 Rome, minutes from the Via Condotti, tel: 06-6782651, fax: 06-6789991.
Double rooms cost approximately Pounds 300 per night. Various suites cost
from about Pounds 600 to Pounds 1,350 per night. There are said to be
weekend rates, but you have to ask nicely. This month guests can have
double-room accommodation for any three consecutive nights for a bit over
Pounds 100 per person per night, including breakfast, tax and service. You
can also book through Leading Hotels of the World, tel (UK): 0800-181-123,
or (New York City): 212-838-3110. There is a self-catering flat above the
museum in Keats' House. It sleeps four (twin room plus two singles), is let
throughout the year and can be booked up to three years in advance. Details:
Landmark Trust, Shottesbrooke, Maidenhead, Berks SL6 3SW, tel: 0628-825925,
fax: 0628-825417. The trust's handbook costs Pounds 7.50 in the UK (Pounds
10 elsewhere in Europe), including p&amp;p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3713</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Cookery: Pheasant thoughts from the larder
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIPPA DAVENPORT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN I wrote recently about rabbit in preference to pheasant, some strong
letters resulted. 'Pheasant is the only meat this kitchen will see between
now and Christmas,' laments one. 'My larder is a flurry of feathers and the
freezer is full,' writes another.
Now I relent, and I hope that the following recipes may help a little. But
first a suggestion. In some households, there is a rule that whoever shoots
the bird also plucks and draws it. Perhaps the time has come for an
addendum: whoever shoots it plucks, draws, cooks and eats it - and washes up
afterwards.
PHEASANT PASTITSIO
This is a comforting dish for a shooting lunch or a Saturday lunch party at
home, and it is convenient for the cook as it can be prepared ahead and
re-heated for serving.
For six-eight people, take two well hung pheasants and roast or braise them,
depending on age. Take care not to overcook them.
Cut off the legs and save them for another recipe, such as the one given
below. Strip the meat from the other parts and make a rich stock with the
bones.
Chop and fry a couple of onions in a little fat. Add a clove or two of
finely-chopped garlic, 6-8 oz streaky bacon cut into matchsticks, and a few
mushrooms, chopped or sliced. Stir well and pour on a generous glass of red
wine. Let it bubble up and cook until most of the liquid has been driven
off.
Add marjoram, thyme and about 7 1/2 fl oz of pheasant stock and simmer
gently for about 20 minutes to make a rich sauce.
Stir in the pheasant meat cut into chunks. Season, adding a squeeze of lemon
or perhaps a splash of brandy, and set aside.
Boil 9-10 oz of macaroni and arrest cooking by plunging the pasta in cold
water afterwards. Then make a bechamel sauce with 2 oz each of butter and
flour and 1 pt of milk infused with a bay leaf.
Away from the heat, stir in 2 oz grated cheese (preferably a mixture of feta
and Cheddar) followed by  1/4 - 1/2 pt yoghurt and season with salt, pepper
and nutmeg. Mix in the macaroni.
Put half the macaroni into a lasagne dish or similar. Cover with the
pheasant mixture and finish with the remaining macaroni.
To reheat for serving, scatter coarse, slightly stale breadcrumbs all over
the surface and bake at 375``F/190`C (gas mark 5) for 45 minutes or so until
piping hot.
TWO-HANDED PHEASANT SANDWICH
This is good food to slip into the pocket of a Barbour when spending the day
with one of those small syndicate shoots where each gun brings his own
nosebag.
A flask of hot soup, a slice each of fruit cake and cheese, and an apple
would complete the picnic menu nicely.
For each person toast, two thick slices of bread and cool them. Butter one
lavishly and close carpet it with watercress, pressing the greenery down
onto the butter.
Spread the other slice with generous dollops of chutney and pile onto it
plenty of cold, cooked pheasant meat. (Any part of the bird can be used, but
I find this sandwich is a good vehicle for using up the leg meat, stripped
carefully of sinew). Invert the first slice over the second, press firmly
together, and wrap in greaseproof paper and foil for carrying.
MUSHY PEA SOUP
For a portable lunch on a chilly day's shooting, or to put good heart and
good voice into a group of carol singers, this is most satisfying (if
porridgy thick). A thinner version, scattered with croutons of fried bread
or snippets of grilled bacon, is perhaps more suited to serving in the
dining room.
To serve six, soak  3/4 -1 lb marrowfat peas overnight: the larger the
quantity, the thicker the soup.
Choose a heavy pot and warm in it a spoonful or two of fat: goose or duck
fat, melted bacon fat, olive oil or butter. Sweat a large, finely-chopped
onion in the fat.
Stir in the soaked and drained peas. Pour on 2 1/4 pt liquid, ideally a
mixture of leftover gravy and stock.
Cover and simmer gently for 45 minutes until the peas start to collapse to a
mush. Stir now and then to prevent the mixture from sticking.
Process the contents of the pan to a mealy puree, as smooth or as knobbly as
you wish, and season before reheating for serving.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3714</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Food &amp; Drink: To port, with no thought of storms - Jancis
Robinson lets the (female) side down
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANCIS ROBINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
I HAD felt so flattered to be asked to be the first woman to attend, and
speak at, the annual treasurer's dinner at the Factory House in Oporto. The
Factory House is somewhere very special: a handsome, 18th century edifice on
a patch of British soil in the middle of Portugal's second city, a relic of
the days in which British merchants, or factors, needed a place to
congregate and, doubtless, lament the lack of home comforts.
At one time, these factors would have dealt in all sorts of commodities; but
for nearly 200 years the Factory House in Oporto has been the seat of the
Port Wine Trade, defined by its Britishness, love of capital letters, and
its exclusion of women from its British Association and its weekly Wednesday
lunches.
This year, it was the turn of port shipper Taylor to field a treasurer and
his turn, therefore, to choose a speaker for the annual Treasurer's Dinner.
In retrospect, I suspect I was invited because the head of Taylor's,
Alistair Robertson, has no sons but three daughters, and a wife who feels
strongly about women and the Factory House. It was, probably, hoped that I
would behave nicely and demonstrate that no evil would result from giving in
to the inexorable dual-gender sweep of evolution (especially as an
increasing number of women now play a serious part in the port business, the
clever little things).
I certainly intended to behave myself. I purposely left in my wardrobe any
remotely daring female answer to the black tie and, as I mounted the granite
steps to the Factory House's first floor drawing room with its portraits of
Grahams, Sandemans, Crofts, Warres and Symingtons, I was absolutely
determined to be as unembarrassingly unobtrusive as possible.
After rations of white port from golden decanters, 28 descendants of these
Sandemans, Grahams etc and their workmates (some of them actually
Portuguese), the British ambassador, the incumbent of the British Church in
Oporto and I made our way to the dining room. That bit was fine. We chatted
our way through a five-course dinner with a white Portuguese table wine,
Camarate 1991, Ch Beychevelle 1984 ('hope you approve') and a 30-year-old
tawny port.
There was a very slight hiccup as we moved to the same places at the table
in the near-identical dessert room next door, a tradition as old as the long
Georgian tables themselves. Should the lady go first? (No. Frightfully
complicated. We'd never find our places in the candlelight.) It was here,
over fruit and nuts and beautiful decanters in strictly clockwise motion,
that we were to get down to the business of listening to the speeches and
polishing off (11 bottles of) 'proper' port: vintage port, Taylor 1948 no
less - an absolute dream of mellow concentration.
Did I say mellow? Well, the shippers certainly showed signs of concentration
on my speech, but I am not sure that it left them feeling at all mellow. I
had done my research on previous speakers and, realising I could hardly
follow the joky route of Willie Rushton, or the historical tour d'horizon of
an ambassador, decided I had better tell them about one of the few relevant
things I probably knew a bit more about than they did: port and the British
wine market, the one they depend on for sales of better quality ports, and
profits.
I had honestly assumed that, before suggesting a few ways in which they
might improve port's appeal, I would merely be illuminating some of the
darker corners of a not particularly bright picture. After all, they must
have noticed that port shipments to Britain, and to most other major
markets, have been falling. But I felt as though my report on the
portlessness of so much of contemporary British society came as an absolute
bolt from the blue to this coterie of expatriates.
Before flying to Oporto, I had done a certain amount of ringing round to
discover just how much port was served where. To my horror, I heard sharp
intakes of breath as I gave them what were meant to be the heartening
statistics before the dispiriting ones (such as that London's hugely
successful Kensington Place restaurant serves 10,000 meals each month - and
just four bottles of vintage port).
My point was that although port may still be drunk in quantity by shooting
parties and pensioners, it is losing its place rapidly in the modern wine
drinker's life, cellar, habits and heart - witness the collapse of vintage
port prices in the auction rooms as investors offload this unfashionable
commodity, and the availability of vintage port at almost embarrassingly low
prices from such on-the-ball merchants as Oddbins and Farr Vintners.
Most of my friends, I told them heartlessly, love wine and take such
advantage of the hugely improved quality of table wine that they just cannot
afford the time or bloodstream capacity for a super-alcoholic drink at the
end of a meal. And if today's thirty- and forty-somethings aren't drinking
it, who will?
I did go on to outline various ways of galvanising the wine trade and press;
to suggest that they try to promote port with food; and to underline the
increasingly popularity of the much lighter and more versatile tawny port
that, unlike vintage port, needs no decanting and is delicious chilled. But
I am not sure they heard. I suddenly realised that I had probably set back
the prospects for women being allowed into the British Association for
millennia.
I really did think I was being informative and constructive; but I suppose
that, if you are a member of a port shipping family, you do drink a lot of
port and make sure your friends do, too. So, inevitably, you are somewhat
sheltered from the cruel caprices of the marketplace.
You are also - and this surely is the key - much more limited in the quality
and range of wines drunk before the port. Probably the only way to savour
port is to plan ahead for it by deliberate restraint en route.
The way to enjoy vintage port to the full, I suspect, is to stand up the
heavily sedimented bottles for a few days before decanting them, invite
punctual guests, give them a little interesting (rather than stunning) wine
to begin with, and to make the cheese/sweet/dessert section of a dinner its
focal point. I, for one, owe it to my sisters in Oporto to put this into
practice.
Both Oddbins and Majestic offer the already enjoyable Quinta do Noval 1982
(listed by non-rapacious Adnams of Southwold, Suffolk, at Pounds 16.50) at
Pounds 9.99. Whitwhams of Altrincham, Greater Manchester, and Farr Vintners
of London SW1 sells whole dozens of keenly-priced top vintage ports from the
1980s and 1970s. See also Christie's December 10 sale (some VAT-free
parcels) and Sotheby's sale on January 20. Many 1980s and 1970s are
delicious now; 1985 and 1977 are vintages to keep.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3715</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Motoring: Peugeot 106 diesel
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THIS urbane five-door diesel will join the Peugeot 106 range in Britain
early in the new year. Already a firm favourite in France - not least
because of its 59 mpg (4.8l/100km) average fuel consumpion - it is quiet,
rides beautifully and is quite spacious inside, although it is small enough
to tuck into tiny parking spaces. Power-assisted steering, an optional extra
within a year, will make it an ideal urban car with legs long enough to make
light work of motorway journeys. Prices will be slightly higher than for the
three-door, 106 diesels, which start at Pounds 7,142.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3716</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / As They Say in Europe: Jackboot reaction - Germany's image
abroad
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES MORGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE FACT that Germany's most august organ of conservative opinion is now
concerned deeply about the practice of setting fire to foreigners shows
things are getting out of hand. The Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung wrote the
other day: 'The terrorism of the right has now reached the niveau of that of
the left.'
This statement was justified by arguing that the right was now selecting
targets in cold blood, rather than killing people accidentally in the course
of some other, presumably more innocent, endeavour, such as random
fire-bombing.
Generally, though, the latest events have led to more introspection than
ever. Everybody who is anybody is called in to diagnose the latest version
of that popular game show, What's Wrong with Germany.
In the Welt am Sonntag, Dr Gertrud Hohler said: 'We Germans seem helplessly
chained to that fatal mixture of self-admiration and self-contempt.'
Hohler is a kind of renaissance woman - a professor of literature, a
management consultant and a member of the board of Grand Metropolitan.
Although she provided one of those interminable angst-ridden bits of
self-analysis in which the Germans specialise, she also has a way with
words. As she sees it, world opinion will deal with the Germans - 'a people
which cannot get used to showing its strength and cannot combat its
weaknesses without false sentimentality'. She noted that if you cannot deal
with things, you will be dealt with.
Papers run a country-by-country review of Germany's image abroad today. One
had to get to Japan before finding a place where little or no harm had been
done. To the Germans, there is not much virtue in that: they show a certain
ambivalence in how they are viewed by the Japanese - 'the two countries
which started the war and lost it'.
Sometimes, the Germans influence others by the way they observe themselves.
The Frankfurter Allgemeine ran a headline after the deaths of the Turks at
Molln - 'One taboo less' - which became the title for a similar editorial in
NRC-Handelsblad of Rotterdam.
That paper concluded by wondering, as do all of Germany's neighbours, how
German society was going to react to what the FAZ had called 'the removal of
the taboo on national socialist ideology'.
It is difficult to know where the real responsibility for the removal of
this taboo lies. I have, reluctantly, come to the view that is the best
people in Germany who may have played a role.
Unlike, say, a quarter of a century ago, the media maintains an exacting
schedule of comment on every conceivable aspect of the Third Reich. There is
hardly a book review section that does not mention a new tome about a hidden
corner of German society in the '30s and '40s.
Towns, large and small, open museums dedicated to that period. The most
recent was in Dortmund where the full horrors of the Gestapo and the
Holocaust, as they applied to that city, are revealed. Even the 'beating up
chamber' was restored to working order. That, in turn, occasions lengthy
analysis in the papers.
This steady flow of information has led to some kind of normalisation of the
Nazis. Where the 'ghosts of the past' are on everyday view, they cease to be
so spooky.
The Germans have, conscientiously, presented the 'banality of evil' (in
Hanna Arendt's phrase) and thereby put it at the disposal of the most banal
sections of the population: dreary young men who, normally, would be
planning a drunken spree or a bit of car stealing. Those same young men now
fantasise about stepping into the jackboots of their nastier grandfathers.
In Germany, those museums in Dortmund and elsewhere name those grandfathers;
in Britain, the yobs have no such figures to emulate.
It was notable that when the secret files on the occupation of the Channel
Islands were released this week, nearly 50 years late (or 50 years early,
according to British rules), the names of collaborators were erased to
protect the guilty.
It is always worse if it happens in Germany. In France, a boulangere in
Reims shot dead a young Moroccan who, with his friends, got involved in a
row with the woman's uncle, who was running the bakery, over stolen
croissants. The National Front supported the plea of legitimate defence and
she was acquitted of everything two weeks ago.
I imagine that this is the first time you have read about this story, unless
you live in France. But if it had happened in Germany. . .
James Morgan is diplomatic correspondent of the BBC World Service.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3717</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Motoring: A message for the road-racers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STUART MARSHALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FINESSE, not a heavy right foot, is the hallmark of the really good driver.
These are not my words - although I agree with every one of them - but those
of the former world Formula I champion, Jackie Stewart, in the latest
edition of his Principles of Performance Driving (Hazleton Publishing,
Pounds 16.99).
It is a book with a message for all people who think: 'Look at us. . . we
are enthusiastic drivers', as they shoot away from the lights with squealing
tyres, or change down unnecessarily through the gearbox at high revolutions
on the approach to a stop sign or roundabout.
All they are doing, writes Stewart, is notifying others of their impending
arrival. 'The public hear you coming and are just waiting for the accident
or incident. If there is one, even if it is not your fault, they will think
you are to blame because your manner of driving suggests recklessness.'
Stewart makes the point that although race driving and road driving are
totally different, both require finesse and personal sensitivity. On the
circuit, the idea is to use thesequalities to get the maximum performance
out of the car. But, on the road, they should produce a docile ride for
passengers while treating other motorists with consideration.
The book, packed with expert and sensible advice about driving and
roadcraft, is really an autobiography and personal testament combined. I
found it an enjoyable read. So will anyone who can see driving as a craft,
not as a chore or an opportunity to show off.
Road deaths in Britain are surprisingly low - although, of course, still far
too high - at about 5,000 a year. Surprisingly, because there were twice as
many fatalities when only a fraction of today's 27m vehicles used UK roads.
There are many reasons for the decline. Modern cars are so much tougher that
motorists now walk away from accidents that would have killed or maimed them
in the pre-seat belt days of 30 years ago. Motorways and by-passes keep
unwanted through traffic out of towns and villages.
On the down side, standards of driving have deteriorated. Modern cars are so
undemanding that no real skill is needed to drive them. Modern technology -
such as anti-lock brakes and incredibly grippy low-profile tyres - allow the
foolish and wilful to get away with appalling behaviour on the road.
Some manufacturers have done nothing to promote responsible use of their
products. The Automobile Association complained last week that 25 per cent
of all motor advertisements have ignored a resolution passed by European
ministers of transport calling on car-makers to steer clear of promoting
speed, power and acceleration.
A survey had shown AA members ranked performance only 27th in a list of 40
features considered important when choosing a car. Yet, many advertisements
still concentrated on high performance or depicted motoring as a sport.
The AA believes irresponsible advertising has given many younger drivers the
wrong ideas about motoring. It probably has. You can see the effect in the
collapse of prices for second-hand hot hatchbacks, which have been promoted
mainly on their performance potential.
The insurance companies have inflated premiums hugely, especially for those
under 30, in a bid to balance their books. Hot hatchbacks are involved in
more than their fair share of very expensive accidents and are prime targets
for thieves.
The motor trade's bible, Glass's guide to car values, says a one-year-old
Ford Fiesta XR2i was worth 66 per cent of its original price in December
1991. Now, a year-old model is worth only 53 per cent. The story is the same
for all other GTi hatchbacks.
Glass's notes that many young drivers are turning to recreational 4x4s as a
sporty alternative, and adds, darkly: 'It is interesting to consider how
much this sector could be affected if these drivers produce what the
insurance companies consider to be another high percentage of claims.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3718</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Truth of the Matter: An impossible act to follow - We lack
anything today to match Beveridge's vision
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GRAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WRITING IN 1960, in his book The Constitution of Liberty, Friedrich von
Hayek opined: 'Instead of the five giants which the welfare state of the
Beveridge report was designed to combat, we are now raising new giants which
may well prove even greater enemies of a decent way of life.
'Though we may have speeded up a little the conquest of want, disease,
ignorance, squalor and idleness, we may in the future do worse, when the
chief dangers will come from inflation, paralysing taxation, coercive labour
unions, an ever-increasing dominance of government in education, and a
social service bureaucracy with far-reaching arbitrary powers.'
Today, Hayek's assessment of the inheritance of Beveridge seems ungenerous
and doctrinaire. In an imperfect world, the Beveridge reforms achieved a
decency in the quality of ordinary life in Britain that it is not
unreasonable to be nostalgic about.
The acceptance of the Beveridge report by all the major parties embedded in
the post-war political settlement a national consensus on three policies
that was to endure for a generation - the responsibility of government to
maintain full employment, the institution of a national minimum from which
the stigmas of the old Poor Law had been removed, and the provision of good
medical care for all through a National Health Service.
For a quarter of a century after its implementation by the Labour government
in the late 1940s, the Beveridge report was accepted as the basis of a
national settlement which largely succeeded in protecting ordinary people
from the worst insecurities of life.
This was no mean achievement and it is fair to say that, despite the
neo-liberal proposals of the New Right and revisionism about welfare policy
in the Labour Party, we lack today anything that matches the scope and sweep
of Beveridge's vision.
By comparison with our own times, 50 years on, the period of the Beveridge
consensus may well seem a golden age, unscarred by the mass unemployment,
pervasive squalor and rickety health services that are such prominent
features of life in Britain in the 1990s.
But too much has changed irrevocably in British society since the post-war
years, and the seeds of destruction of the Beveridge consensus had already
been planted long before the Thatcher governments of 1979 and after began to
tear it up by the roots.
By the mid-1970s, it had already become clear that post-war macro-economic
policy had resulted in a stubborn stagflation in which full employment
itself could not be sustained.
Beveridge's expectation that the costs of health care would fall as the
nation's health improved had been utterly confounded as new degenerative
diseases replaced the old poverty-related scourges and the medical needs
associated with old age proved to be inherently insatiable.
The emergence of a culture of dependency and its embodiment in an alienated
underclass had revealed the unacceptable face of welfarism in Britain.
Changes in the pattern of family life, and in the position of women in
society, had in any case made welfare policy on the Beveridge model
anachronistic.
It would be a mistake to suppose that Thatcherism embodied any systematic
alternative to the Beveridge inheritance. At the level of theory,
neo-liberal ideologues proposed a variety of hare-brained schemes, which
were wisely ignored by successive Thatcher administrations.
Such schemes presupposed the roll-back of the welfare state as it had
evolved in Britain, not merely since Beveridge, but over the past century,
and its wholesale replacement by measures such as the Friedmanite negative
income tax, insurance-based medical care and voucher schemes in schooling
and welfare.
In political practice, Thatcherite welfare policy was piecemeal and
unsystematic, consisting of a series of ad hoc cuts and the introduction of
internal markets, particularly in the health service. While such a piecemeal
approach is certainly preferable to the madcap schemes of neo-liberal
ideology, it hardly does justice to the seriousness of the crisis that has
overtaken the Beveridge inheritance.
If Labour thinkers are increasingly revising the party's fundamentalist
commitment to universality in welfare benefits, this is mainly from a
realistic acceptance that decent universal benefits are simply not
affordable for the forseeable future, rather than an expression of any
alternative vision.
At the same time, there is a growing sentiment in all political parties that
the squalid and divided society that has followed the collapse of the
Beveridge inheritance is ugly, graceless and potentially unstable. The task
for all parties is that of squaring public discontent with an uncaring
society in which the long-term unemployed eke out a wretched existence on
the dole and the disabled and the chronically sick - the most vulnerable -
are increasingly the victims of spending cuts with the brutal realities of
political competition for scarce resources. Thls is a predicament that
Hayek's pessimism about Beveridge's welfare anticipated but which nothing in
the neo-liberal ideology he inspired helps us to resolve.
If there is any model for the radical reform of the welfare state that is
bound soon to come on our political agenda, it is not America, but rather
New Zealand, which already has had to attempt to reconcile a commitment to a
humane welfare state with falling living standards - the prospect that looms
for Britain. The fact of the matter is that, with the Beveridge inheritance
no longer a feasible option for us, we have yet to come up with a successor
to it.
John Gray, a Fellow of Jesus College, Oxford, is author of Post-Liberalism:
Studies in Political Thought (Routledge 1993).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3719</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Computing: An honest job at a reasonable price - Two
programs that compromise intelligently between professional and private
needs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JEAN MILES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR THE small investor who wants to keep an orderly record of stock market
dealings and to get, in return, a comprehensive view of how his affairs
stand, Meridian Software's Stockmarket 2 and Chart Analyst programs could
scarcely be bettered. They are brisk, straightforward and trustworthy. They
do an honest job for a reasonable price - on yesterday's equipment, if need
be.
Stockmarket 2 is a portfolio management program. Chart Analyst draws a
variety of graphs from share price data. It can use the data files created
by Stockmarket 2 if you have both programs. Stockmarket 2 by itself can plot
a simple linear or logarithmic graph for a single share or index. Between
them, these programs represent an intelligent compromise between the size
and complication of the sort of program a professional might use, and the
needs of a private investor.
Shares are recorded in portfolios of up to 50 companies. It is better, I
think, to keep the portfolios smaller than that. While I was testing the
program, I kept ordinary shares in one portfolio, updated weekly; gilts,
unit trusts and investment trusts in another, updated more rarely. I also
kept a prices-only 'portfolio' of the FT indices and the retail price index.
Stockmarket 2 can record not only share purchases and subsequent price
movements but also dividends received and the state of up to five cash
accounts, if you want to include them. If you also store yields and P/E
ratios, the program will adjust them automatically in accordance with price
changes, so you will need to update them only occasionally. The program will
produce lists of shares held, of transactions, of dividends received, on the
computer screen or a printer. It will also produce a summary of the
portfolio and gives you three choices - 'General', 'Current' and 'Gains' -
which, in fact, differ little from each other.
Graphs are a great feature of the Meridian programs. Each can store prices
at 260 different dates for each share in a portfolio - a year's worth of
daily updates, or five years of once-a-week. When you add the 261st price,
the earliest one disappears.
The programs will draw informative graphs on any equipment. (It seems safe
to assume so, anyway, since they give excellent results on my seven-year-old
computer). They understand dates so that, if you fail to update the prices
for a couple of weeks, the graphs will retain the right proportions. Prices
are adjusted automatically so that share splits and part payments (as for
privatisation shares) do not distort the graphs.
The programs come with sample data on some widely-owned shares, and Meridian
can supply other historic data on disk. The real fun, though, is watching
the graphs of your own shares become progressively more revealing.
Stockmarket 2 will plot simple graphs. Chart Analyst is more sophisticated.
I had thought graphs were only for faddists and speculators. I was wrong. I
especially liked Chart Analyst's 'automatic plot': it produces the graphs
for a whole portfolio, four at a time. I took to running that show every
week after I had updated the prices. It sorts sheep from goats rather
effectively.
Chart Analyst has even fancier tricks than that. It can plot several graphs
on one grid. It can 'rebase' share prices, drawing the graph as if the first
price entered had been 1 or 100, as you choose, with the rest in proportion
(just like graphs in the newspapers). It will plot the graph of one price
divided by another: if the line tends upwards, the first share is doing the
better of the two; if downwards, the second.
This facility can be used to compare a share price to an FT index as easily
as one share to another. The shares, or indices, compared do not have to be
in the same portfolio.
Chart Analyst will put a 'stop loss' line on a graph, at a chosen, fixed
percentage below the highest price. It will draw a 'point and figure'
diagram. An oscillator can show either 'rate of change' or 'momentum.' These
prospects will no doubt seem more attractive to investors who understand
what they mean.
The manual is, however, remarkably simple and clear. I suspect the best way
to learn about oscillators is to let your computer draw you a few. The
manual concludes with a good chapter on how to use graphs.
These programs have limitations, inevitable at the price. Share prices
cannot be updated by modem down a telephone line - you must do it by hand.
If you divide your holdings among several portfolios, as I suggest, there is
no quick and easy way to find out how much you are worth altogether, or what
your annual income from shares is - two rather interesting questions.
A generous, but finite, number of transactions, dividends, and cash entries
can be stored with each portfolio. Eventually, though, you will run out of
space, and if you keep the full, permitted 50 shares in a portfolio, you
will run out of space for more transactions long before you have entered
five years' worth of weekly prices. But these are mere quibbles. Stockmarket
2 (Pounds 49.95) and Chart Analyst (Pounds 79.95) are available from
Meridian Software, Amberley House, The Park, Sidcup, Kent, DA14 6AL;
telephone 081-309-5960. +/-
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3720</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Minding Your Own Business: A musical money-go-round - Joeske
van Walsum, who is instrumental in the success of those he manages
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICK GARNETT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CIRCUS of promoters, managers, agents and commentators which envelops
the boxing ring after a big title fight usually generates a wry smile on the
face of Joeske van Walsum. 'It sometimes makes me cry, too,' says the tall
Dutchman. 'Of course I see a few similarities with what I do.'
On the face of it, van Walsum's business world is far more cerebral and
gentle. From a converted house in the south-west London suburb of Putney,
his company is both agent and manager to 30 instrumental soloists and
concert conductors as well as an organiser of orchestral tours.
'Agents are meant to be leeches on society, but we are not leeches if we are
doing a good job for everyone,' he stresses. 'You can still get into this
kind of agency work, but it is risky and not many people make much money.'
If that is the case, 43-year-old van Walsum is not doing too badly. In the
year to April 1991, van Walsum Management took in Pounds 800,000 in
commissions and other payments, on which it made a profit of Pounds 175,000.
Out of this, the staff of 17 earned more than Pounds 70,000 in
profit-sharing payments.
The more renowned artists the company manages include pianist Mitsuko
Uchida; viola player Yuri Bashmet; and the young Finn, Esa-Pekko Salonen,
conductor and musical director of the Los Angeles Philharmonic.
Van Walsum's parents went to live in Scotland when he was a teenager and he
studied flute at the Royal College of Music in London. Late in the 1960s, he
began freelancing, organising small music groups and making a small profit.
As time went on, he became known as an artists' manager, although he had to
work as a chauffeur in the evenings to earn enough money on which to live.
In 1975, when the company was set up, yearly revenue was just Pounds 1,000
and van Walsum was running the operation from a rented London flat. But he
says: 'I'm very analytical and bureaucratic and have always been well
organised.' He also enjoyed his fair share of luck.
This world is small, but not that small. According to artists' directories,
there are 650 professional orchestras world-wide, 850 conductors and 3,000-
4000 soloists. 'Targets' - industry jargon for the concert promoters and
other people with whom van Walsum books his artists for anything from one
night to perhaps two weeks - number around 750.
While income for solo instrumentalists and conductors is not in the
Pavarotti class, it can be very high. A few earn more than Pounds 500,000 a
year - although these individuals are not on van Walsum's books - while many
earn above Pounds 100,000.
'A young soloist might get Pounds 200 for one night,' he says. 'The highest
for one night I have seen was Pounds 25,000 in Japan. They travel alone and
have to pay their own expenses like flights and hotels. Some will do 120
concerts a year.'
His company, the fourth largest of its type in Britain, charges artists a
commission of 15 to 20 per cent but also uses local agents to help with
organisation, cutting margins to about 12 per cent. 'We have to be available
for these artists every single day of the year if necessary. We arrange
every booking, every rehearsal time, every fee, every contract, collect all
the money and make the travel and hotel arrangements.'
The company and its staff of around eight - nearly all women university
graduates - often are approached by promoters and permanent orchestra
managers seeking soloists and conductors, sometimes at only a day's notice
if someone has dropped out unexpectedly. Part of their job, though, is to
approach promoters and 'offer' artists - in order to give them the right
exposure. Clashes of personality and ego are not unknown.
'Performers must have a lot of inner strength because it is a lonely life
for them,' van Walsum explains. 'There is an element of arrogance, and they
have to be good communicators to reach their audience with their music. They
can be very awkward. We have to be supportive.' He says he can also be
awkward, outspoken and direct when dealing with them.
Any arguments that erupt are usually over money, though. 'We have a scale of
charges for each artist. The worst are the Russians. They can be so stupid.
A successful westerner makes sure the guy he's dealing with is happy.
Russians just want to screw the other person.'
Diplomatically, van Walsum says he has no such problem with the Russians on
his books.
The company has contracts with its artists but either side can back out at a
moment's notice - and sometimes does. Van Walsum says poaching exists,
particularly by US agencies. 'They really stick knives into each other.' But
the 60 members of the British Association of Concert Agents tend not to do
this.
The company's income last financial year was split equally between artists'
management and orchestra touring, although the latter has slid during the
past two years of recession and its margins are under severe pressure. Van
Walsum says pre-tax net profits will be lucky to reach Pounds 50,000 after
profit-sharing. Office costs amount to a hefty Pounds 600,000,
three-quarters of total income. Salaries account for Pounds 300,000 and
travel Pounds 45,000. Much of that involves van Walsum and his managers
visiting promoters and artists around the world. One week last month, he had
to go to six evening concerts.
Finding new 'stars' is one of the thrills of the job, although van Walsum
admits to some 'terrible blunders' - usually, pushing someone too quickly.
'Sitting in the audience, you can sense whether it is going well. It
produces a shiver down your spine and a tear, almost of relief. You can also
sit there so worried that you are virtually wetting yourself.'
Van Walsum Management, 26 Wadham Road, London SW15 2LR. Tel: 081-874-6344.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3721</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family (Briefcase): Liability for CGT
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MY WIFE and I sold our business at the end of 1988. This caused a liability
to CGT, which we paid. We then went abroad for a period.
In 1990, we returned to the UK and bought a property. This has been let
since September 1992.
Because of our investment in this, can we recover the CGT paid earlier?
If so, what liability do we incur for future CGT should we re-sell the
property?
The answer to your first question is no, as you will see from the free
pamphlet CGT11 (CGT and the small business), which is obtainable from your
tax office.
The chargeable gain on the eventual sale of the let property (assuming that
you never live there and also nominate it as your joint main residence) will
be based upon the actual cost, indexed from the month of the purchase
contract to the month of the sale contract (exchange of missives).
Ask your tax office for the free pamphlets CGT14 (capital gains tax - an
introduction) and CGT4 (owner-occupied houses).
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3722</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family (Briefcase): Moving story
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
I AM ENGLISH and a taxpayer in the UK but wish to move to Australia. I am
investing in a personal equity plan with a view to building up an income
stream.
Would this income still be tax-free if brought into Australia?
As soon as you cease to be resident (and ordinarily resident) in the UK for
tax purposes, you must stop putting money into your Pep.
This rule is to be found in regulation 7 of the Personal Equity Plan
Regulations 1989, as amended.
On the other hand, by virtue of regulation 8, you can retain your existing
plan benefits after you cease to be resident in the UK.
Ask your tax office for the free pamphlet IR58 (going to work abroad). You
might also like to ask for booklets IR6 (double taxation relief) and IR20
(residents and non-residents - liability to tax in the UK).
Since our Q&amp;A Briefcase advisory service is limited to the laws of the UK,
we cannot give you any guidance on your prospective tax liability in
Australia.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3723</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family (Briefcase): Wrong line
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
I LIVE in Kent, and work in London. I have a second house in Middlesex,
which I am renting to others. I bought a rail and underground ticket for a
year. This ticket is being used to go to work and pay a weekly visit to the
second house. I want to claim a quarter of the cost of the ticket from the
tax I am due to pay from the house rent. Will the tax office allow this?
If the house is let unfurnished, the answer to question one is no. If the
house is let furnished, the answer is still really no. Although a taxpayer
recently won an appeal before the General Commissioners in respect of the
cost of travelling from Surrey to Manchester, where he let accommodation to
students, it is most unlikely that you would be similarly successful, even
if the commissioners' decision is not disturbed in the high court.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3724</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family (Briefcase): Protected investments
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
IN COMMON with many thousands of self-employed people, we paid single
premium pensions each year to the maximum allowed. These have now been
converted into annuities. In the event of the issuing insurance companies
finding themselves in financial difficulties - not impossible these days -
what would be the position of the annuitants?
Insurance policyholders and annuitants enjoy better protection as a result
of the Policyholder Protection Act 1975 (in most cases, 90 per cent-plus of
their investment guaranteed) than depositors with banks (whose deposits are
protected only up to Pounds 15,000) and users of other financial
institutions.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3725</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family (Briefcase): Double tax
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MY WIFE and I live on a yacht and sailed from the UK in 1990 when I retired
at age 64. We have been accepted as temporary residents of Cyprus, our
cruising base, and are considering applying to pay tax there. We still have
two properties in the UK which are rented out. Can we pay any tax due on
income in Cyprus under the double taxation agreement it has with the UK?
Under article 7 of the Cyrpus-UK double taxation convention, the UK has the
right to levy full income tax on your rental income. Becoming fully liable
for tax in Cyprus will not, therefore, reduce your UK tax bills. Under
article 24(2), you are entitled to relief from Cyprus tax on account of the
tax payable in the UK on income taxable in both countries. Ask your UK tax
office for the free booklet IR20 (residents and non-residents - liability to
tax in the United Kingdom).
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3726</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family (Briefcase): House in Canada
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SOME YEARS ago, I inherited a house in Canada which I am now selling. Since
I am a resident taxpayer in the UK but domiciled in Canada, I understand I
will be liable for capital gains tax there on the sale. Will there also be
tax to pay if I remit the money from the sale to Britain?
First, perhaps we should point out that the Canadian courts decided some
years ago, in Trottier v Rajotte, that it is not possible to be domiciled in
Canada as a unit: each of the provinces is a separate country for the
purposes of the law of domicile in England (and Scotland) as well.
Assuming that you are, in fact, domiciled in one of the provinces of Canada
under English law, then the answer to your question is yes.
Ask your tax office for the free pamphlets CGT14 (capital gains tax - an
introduction) and IR6 (double taxation relief). You might also like to write
to the Inland Revenue Public Enquiry Room, Somerset House, Strand, London
WC2R 1LB, for a copy of SP6/88 (double taxation relief - capital gains tax).
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3727</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family (Briefcase): The right to a pension
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
I WAS TOLD recently that there have been new rulings about employee
pensions.
As I understand it, employees who left their work before retirement age for
another job or other reasons, and consequently lost their pension
entitlement and contributions because they had not reached pensionable age,
are now able to claim a pension proportionate to the length of time and
amount paid in (if the pension fund is still in existence).
Is this correct? If so, where can I get further information in order to make
a claim?
Preservation of pension rights for employees who leave a scheme has been in
force since 1975. This has been modified by a series of social security acts
(notably 1985, 1986 and 1990) which, effectively, confer preservation and
transfer rights after two years' membership, and limited indexation.
If, therefore, you were a member of an occupational scheme and left your
employment before the scheme retirement age, you would have been covered
automatically by this legislation and would in the normal course be notified
of your paid-up rights by your company pension department soon after your
date of leaving. Your pension scheme booklet should set out your entitlement
on leaving service.
If you think that you were a member of the scheme long enough to qualify for
preservation rights, but can find no record of your entitlement, then you
should write to the pension department of your former employer giving as
much information as possible about your period of service and scheme
membership, with any other information that you may have from old pay slips
(eg, payroll number, scheme membership number, etc).
Your rights on redundancy will depend on a number of factors such as length
of service, terms of employment, etc. We suggest that you summarise this
information on a piece of paper and seek advice either from the local office
of your Citizens Advice Bureau or the Department of Social Security.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3728</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: On the right side of the law -
Expatriates
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DONALD ELKIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FEW expatriates doubt the undesirability of falling foul of British tax law.
For most, the certainties end there. But how do you become liable to UK tax
and what are your duties then? What means do the Inland Revenue have to
enforce the law - or as it is more frequently expressed, 'how will they
know?'
People who are neither resident nor domiciled in Britain pay income tax only
on certain types of UK source income, and inheritance tax on UK-based
assets. At the other end of the scale, permanent residents are liable to tax
on world-wide income, gains and assets. In between are various degrees of
liability according to which status of UK resident, ordinarily resident or
domiciled, applies.
The British tax system operates principally on trust. Consequently, if you
are liable to income tax or capital gains tax, you are required respectively
by sections 7 and 11A of the Taxes Management Act 1970 to declare that. When
you do so, you will be issued with a tax return requiring you to certify
that the particular information given is correct and complete. You should
consider these obligations in the light of the dictum that 'ignorance of the
law excuses no-one'.
In most cases, what needs to be declared on your tax return is self evident.
But that is not always so, a fact which caused the Keith Committee report on
the enforcement powers of the Revenue departments to recommend that
taxpayers should be required to give the Inland Revenue details of any item
in respect of which they had 'taken the benefit of any doubt.' While heavy
criticism prevented this particular proposal from being enacted, the fact
remains that great care must be taken in all cases where doubts exist.
When deciding whether or not you need to declare any particular item you
must, of course, have regard to the precise terms of the legislation
concerned. Nor can you ignore the Inland Revenue's stated interpretation of
it - even though this may be disputed by tax practitioners.
Cases involving those who bought offshore personal bonds, and have
subsequently become UK residents, frequently provide examples of both
points.
In the teeth of opposition from many tax advisers, the Inland Revenue claims
it has the power to 'look through' such bonds and assess the individual on
the underlying income, even though in the year concerned he takes no
benefits. In these circumstances, failing to make a declaration would be
unwise.
Nevertheless, some bondholders may be tempted to pursue this course on the
grounds that their circumstances are covered by one of the two exemptions
available. But these exclusions apply only if the board is satisfied.
However, once you have made a complete and correct return, your duties are
at an end. Consequently, if the Inspector of Taxes charges too little tax
or, indeed, fails to assess you at all, the law does not require you to
prompt him. Bear in mind, though, that knowingly to retain an excessive
repayment of tax brought about by an error of fact - ie a mistake in your
sums as opposed to an incorrect application of the law - could be a criminal
offence.
Not surprisingly, the Inland Revenue does not make a point of publicising
its monitoring procedures, although some aspects, for example the reporting
to them of claims made under double taxation treaties or where offshore
settlements are formed for non-UK domiciliaries by British advisers, are
well known. It seems highly unlikely that any attempt is made to monitor
that factor which is so important for the determination of residence status
 -the periods which expatriates spend in the UK.
There can be little doubt that, if expatriates are minded to evade the law,
they are presented with more opportunities to do so without discovery than
UK residents. It must be said, though, that simple failure to appreciate
what the law requires is also likely to be greater.
Declaring what you need to declare and no more is no easy task. On the other
hand, failing to keep within the law of the country where you live or intend
to live has little to recommend it. While the Inland Revenue's powers of
'discovery' in relation to incomplete Returns, or the levying of interest
and penalties in cases of fraudulent or negligent conduct, failures or
errors, will no doubt serve to concentrate the mind, you may think there is
a more important factor: the ability to sleep at night.
Donald Elkin is a director of Wilfred T. Fry Ltd of Worthing, West Sussex.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3729</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Going it alone
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNICE COHEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Bernice Cohen's appearance in the July FT Quarterly Review of Personal
Finance inspired a record correspondence from our readers, who wanted to
know more about her approach to private investment. In this article, she
sets out the ground rules which started her on her course.
I AM a Do-It-Myself investor. But why did I take this route? Coincidentally,
the Weekend FT of July 18 - when the interview with me was published -
provided a compelling reason. It gave the results of four share portfolios
chosen in July 1991 on the basis of directors' share purchases, high-yield
criteria, an experts' panel, and the FT darts team.
Purely pour encourager les autres, no doubt, the experts registered serious
losses. Indeed, all four portfolios revealed how easy it is to lose money
when selecting shares. The experiment suggested that if ever there was an
appropriate time for adopting a 'buy-and-hold' share philosophy, the 1990s
is not it.
Had the experts been allowed to behave like real, ever-anxious investors,
eliminating the worst performers on a six- or even three-monthly review,
they might have improved their results. According to Jessie Livermore, of
1920s' Wall Street fame, retaining a losing investment indefinitely is an
act of blind faith closer to speculation than the sensible preservation of
capital.
So, it appeared I would have to settle for the mocking implications of
staying a DIMI. I was daunted at first, but I stopped flinching when I
recalled some bruising experiences snatching back rapidly dwindling funds
from assorted shock-horror situations. These included unexpected profits
warnings (Control Techniques, March 1991); rumours of fraud or malpractice
(Polly Peck and Caird, 1989); and plummeting shares in a tension-driven
market anticipating a Gulf war in January 1991 (Tomkins, autumn 1990). Of
these, three were broker recommendations.
These traumatic miscalculations convinced me to remain a DIMI, making my own
decisions and trading whenever I believed it necessary. This approach
injects an element of humility and cautions against the hubris lurking to
trap over-confident investors.
But does this mean one should play safe? I think not. The word 'safe' might
simply be the mirage of money illusion. We ignore John Major's robber baron,
inflation, at our peril because, sadly, this persistent villain enjoys
continuous government patronage.
Assuming the consensus post-devaluation rate of 4.5 to 5.5 per cent for
annual price increases, the pound in our building society or bank deposit
accounts will lose half its present purchasing power in 12 years. This
remorseless shrinkage spans the time needed to build a sound business,
support a child through school and college, or prepare for a comfortable
retirement. Savings must grow by 5 per cent merely to stand still. After
this catch-up percentage, the real growth for risk-free deposits is frugal.
It scarcely covers rainy day reserves. So, investing in something riskier
had to be considered, just to provide long-term growth prospects.
This reasoning was not the only spur encouraging me to become a DIMI,
however. I also wanted badly to rebuild our savings, depleted in the 1980s,
so that my husband could retire within five years.
Initially, I spent time considering my investment objectives. What did I
want to achieve? How would I turn the aims into capital? Skimming through
past FT articles on winners and losers, and through unit trust performance
tables in Money Observer, I decided that doubling my initial capital over
five years might be a possible, albeit ambitious, target. I would
concentrate on capital growth but, nearer to retirement, the portfolio
balance would shift gradually from growth towards secure income.
Establishing primary objectives was easy; preparing a disciplined programme
to achieve it took much longer. Steering the programme steadily, but often
erratically, towards the optimistic objective has become a time-consuming
weekly preoccupation.
Six practical steps underpinned the programme:
To read extensively on how to improve my investment skills by building a
library of books on the topic.
To invest in essential research material, including a daily FT and a weekly
Investors Chronicle.
To update the portfolio values every weekend, on the lines of Bearbull in
the Investors Chronicle.
To review mistakes and successes analytically as they happen. This is
occasionally a source of intense aggravation - but there have also been some
exhilarating moments in compensation.
To divide the initial capital into four unequal portions, with cash
predominating at the outset.
To build a reference file of facts, statistics and charts, together with the
relevant FT indices, on companies and markets as future investment
opportunities.
Dividing the initial capital was an intentional precaution while statistics,
market awareness and confidence were accumulating.
Cash remained above 60 per cent, to fund future pension premiums and a
10-year Skandia plan. This versatile savings plan allows unlimited free
switching at bid prices between nearly 300 unit and investment trusts run by
more than 18 fund management groups - just the investment freedom I was
looking for.
The maximum allowance went into two unit trust Peps, with monthly
contributions to average out price fluctuations. The cash fund then declined
further as I opened additional Peps. Initially, both Peps and savings plan
were invested wholly in unit trusts.
In the fourth slice of capital, additional unit and investment trust
selections, plus three direct equity holdings, meant more than 60 per cent
of my equity investments by value were being managed professionally until
such time as I felt confident to manage a larger direct portfolio myself.
Within six months, I had learnt a harsh lesson. Without employing risky put
options, which need considerable expertise, few investments prosper in
falling markets. My early losses had to be recognised as an unavoidable cost
for obtaining hands-on experience. Accepting that one cannot always be right
is an unpalatable truth.
With these six practical steps, I am hopeful that being a DIMI will
eventually improve my investment performance.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3730</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Anger over society's Pounds 4.3m
loss on property - Now investors must wait months for court rulings to
decide the future of Lancashire &amp; Yorkshire Assurance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SEVERAL thousand savers opened their post this week to find that a fund of
gilts and cash deposits in which they had invested had managed to lose
Pounds 4.3m in a property deal.
The savers are with the Lancashire &amp; Yorkshire Assurance friendly society
and, understandably, they are unhappy. But what happens next depends on
decisions by the high court, which could take months. L &amp; Y is closed for
new business until then.
How did it happen?
The losses affect only the society's main Capital Secure fund, which has
about 69,000 policyholders and is valued at more than Pounds 50m, having
grown by only 1.6 per cent in 1991.
All policies written on this fund from December 1981 to January 1987, and
some of the policies between then and October 1988, specifically excluded
property as an investment. This affects around 53 per cent of all L &amp; Y
policies in force at the beginning of this year, or about 36,000 people.
With hindsight, the story of how the fund went off the rails has an almost
tragic inevitability. In 1987, with the property market booming, it seemed
sensible to give Capital Secure the freedom to invest in property. But the
funds which had started when property was endorsed as an investment were not
kept separate.
The fund then spent Pounds 6.8m on a hotel development. But this has now
been valued at Pounds 2.5m - a write-down of Pounds 4.3m. Capital Secure's
unit price fell around 9 per cent as a result.
The present members of the board all have been appointed since June 1990,
and discovered the problem only when holders of maturing policies complained
early this year. After discussions with their regulator, Lautro, and the
Registry of Friendly Societies, it was decided the issues involved were so
complex that they would have to be settled by the high court.
Those holding policies with L &amp; Y's other funds are not necessarily
affected, although Capital Secure is the society's biggest fund and many
people have at least half their money invested in it.
The property loss is the most serious issue facing the society, but it is
also seeking high court guidance on two other problems which may lead to
policyholders losing tax relief.
The first affects those who invested in a tax-exempt fund via a lump sum -
around 9 per cent of all policyholders. Regulations state that payments to
friendly society funds must be in the form of regular premiums, so most
societies organise lump sums by asking policyholders to buy an annuity,
which then pays the premiums. L &amp; Y did not do this, which puts in question
the tax relief.
Those who started a policy between October 1 1990 and December 5 1991 could
be hit by the society's other problem, which is that it issued policies
under a new set of rules, or 'table,' which had not been registered formally
with the registry. While this looks merely a technical matter, it also
requires a court ruling.
The society will continue to take in premiums and pay sums on maturity as
normal while it awaits the decisions. If you are an investor, there is
little or no reason to surrender a policy. In most cases, this would mean
you would get back, at best, only the premiums you had paid.
In any case, the bad news now should be all in the price following the
write-down. The society is invested heavily in cash deposits (missing out on
the strong returns on gilts obtainable recently). Thus, the fund is unlikely
to lose any more money.
Legal costs may be a problem, but the reduced overheads of running the
society when it is closed to new business could offset this.
Whether L &amp; Y can rebuild its business once the court's decisions are known
is another matter, and chances are it will have to merge with one of the few
larger societies. John Reeve, chief executive of Family Assurance, the UK's
largest friendly society, said his society would do anything it could to
help if required provided it was in the interests of family members.
John Ramsden, L &amp; Y's chairman, admitted that one option might be to
transfer all its interests to another friendly society. He added that it was
not clear if compensation should be paid as there was no legal precedent.
Policyholders are furious. Colin Boylett, of Dulwich, said L &amp; Y had
'totally betrayed our trust.'
He asked why it had continued to accept new business until November, and
suggested policyholders should be compensated by an amount equal to the
performance over the period of the average exempt fixed-interest fund.
In the past three years, he added, this would be 36.7 per cent,
offer-to-offer, rather than the 11.8 per cent achieved by the Capital Secure
fund.
No one will have incurred massive losses as the policies involved all are
small; indeed, the loss for each has been estimated at around Pounds 100.
But it is difficult to see where the money for compensation will come from.
Jean Eaglesham, of the Consumers' Association, suggested that the friendly
society movement might try to set up an ex gratia compensation system if the
high court decided investors were not covered by another compensation
scheme.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3731</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Gloom for 200 Tessa holders
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TESSA holders at Birmingham Capital Trust, a banking institution, must feel
disappointed that a promise made to them has not been honoured.
Those who opened tax-exempt special savings accounts when the scheme was
launched in January 1991, were offered a fixed rate of 12 per cent over
fiveyears by Birmingham Capital Trust.
Last week, however, the bank wrote to its 200 Tessa holders to inform them
that due to 'a major erosion of the capital base of the company,' the Tessa
scheme will be shut down on December 31. The bank is recommending that its
customers transfer their Tessas to Dudley building society, also in the West
Midlands. But it only has a variable Tessa offering a much lower rate - 8.5
per cent - than that being paid by Birmingham Capital Trust.
The Bank of England said it could not be responsible for banks promising
high fixed rates but being unable to maintain them. 'The rates banks choose
to offer are a commercial decision and we have no influence over that,' said
the Bank. 'If the circumstances of a bank changes, that becomes part of
general banking business and we would look at it in the context of our
overall supervision.'
It said that the ability to transfer Tessas meant that customers were not
stuck with one institution and would not lose the tax benefit were a bank to
decide to close its Tessa.
However, Chris Eadie, deputy Banking Ombudsman, said he would be concerned
to ensure that that the customer had been treated fairly. 'If an institution
has made a promise and is still in business, it should honour its promise
and arrange the same terms for its customers.' Tessas pay interest gross so
long as the capital is left in the scheme for five years. The maximum
investment allowed over the five year period is Pounds 9,000.
Birmingham Capital Trust is waiving its usual transfer fee of Pounds 25 to
those transferring either to the Dudley or any other banks or building
society. The Dudley, which has about 500 Tessa-holders, said it was
processing transfers within a day, so that those transferring their Tessa
should not losemore than one day's interest.
Although the Dudley launched its Tessa scheme on April 1 1991, those
transferring will be deemed to have opened their Tessa on the date they
opened the scheme at Birmingham Capital Trust.
This is not the first time a bank experiencing financial difficulties has
been offering a high Tessa rate. Deacon Hoare, a small licensed banking
institution in Bristol, went into liquidation in June. It had offered one of
the highest variable interest rates on the market to its Tessa holders.
However, those who chose Birmingham Trust would have been attracted more by
the stability of the Tessa rate than its size. Many banks and building
societies were offering rates of 14 per cent at the beginning of last year,
so the fixed rate of 12 per cent would not have looked particularly
alluring. But the promise to guarantee that rate for five years would have
made it a good deal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3732</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Keep a sharp eye on your pay slip
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EMPLOYEES should keep their eyes on their pay slips following evidence this
week that some employers are taxing them too much on their wages under the
pay-as-you-earn system.
Accountants Touche Ross have warned of a survey by tax inspectors in
Bournemouth and Poole which disclosed that up to 10,000 people were paying
too much tax.
The error is that payroll departments have failed to take into account the
20 per cent lower rate tax band for income up to Pounds 2,000, which was
introduced in the budget last April.
The bottom slice was being taxed at 25 per cent rather than 20 per cent,
meaning that employees were overpaying tax of Pounds 1.92 per week.
This has been caused, particularly in small businesses, by a failure by the
payroll department to use the government's tax tables correctly. The Inland
Revenue has confirmed the findings of the survey, but says there is no
evidence of similar errors elsewhere.
But Maurice Parry-Wingfield, technical tax partner at Touche Ross,
recommends that anyone who thinks they may be over paying should see their
wages clerk.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3733</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Directors' Transactions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS MACDONALD, Directus Ltd
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WITH the market reaching new peaks, one might have expected the volume of
directors' purchases to have eased. On the contrary, purchases are
increasing, with some deals being of a significant size.
Recent interim results from Cable &amp; Wireless revealed it is still able to
produce earnings growth even under the most difficult conditions. Brian
Pemberton, a director of Cable &amp; Wireless, exercised an option over 196,932
shares and subsequently sold the lot at 646p. At the same time, he sold
another 42,579 shares at 650p, leaving him with 50,000 shares. Since the
sale, Cable &amp; Wireless shares have fallen sharply in the wake of mounting
concern in Hong Kong about the prospect of a clash between China and Britain
over the proposed political reforms.
The separation of Claremont Garments from Alexon has proved one of the more
successful retail developments of the last two years. David McGarvey sold
20,000 shares at 263p leaving him with 50,000 shares. The share price has
outperformed the market by 18 per cent over the last year and brokers expect
further growth this year and next.
Michael Swan, deputy chairman of Merchant Retail Group, attracted attention
12 months ago when he sold 500,000 shares at 34p, buying 1m shares at 14.5p
five months later. Philip Newton has now bought 750,000 shares at 15.5p.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
DIRECTORS' SHARE TRANSACTIONS IN THEIR OWN COMPANIES (LISTED &amp; USM)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                 No of
Company               Sector    Shares  Value  directors
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
SALES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Abbey National          Bank     4,592     16      1
Cable &amp; Wireless        Tele    42,579    277      1
Claremont Garments      Text    20,000     53      1
Dalgety                 FdMa    11,258     54      1*
Enterprise Oil          O&amp;G      4,100     19      1
Johnston Press          Med      4,600     17      1
Liberty n/v             Stor    25,000     84      2*
Next                    Stor     8,755     11      1
Portmeirion Potter      Misc     5,300     12      1
Reed International      Med     37,600    220      1*
Smith (WH) A shares     Stor     4,706     22      1
Town Centre Secs        Prop    30,000     22      1
Unilever                FdMa    88,967    923      2*
Vodafone                Tele    53,500    212      1*
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
PURCHASES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Castle Comms            H&amp;L     45,000     59      1
City Merchants H Yd     InTr    25,000     23      1
Cornwell Parker Ord     Misc     7,000     20      2
Fairhaven Intl          O&amp;G     95,000     14      1
Filofax                 Pack    15,000     10      3
Gardiner Group          BuSe   250,000     24      2
Greggs                  FdRe     3,040     12      1
Hardy Oil &amp; Gas         O&amp;G     15,000     18      1
Hewetson                BdMa   120,000     31      1
Holmes Protection       BuSe    32,500     18      1
Merchant Retail         FdRe   750,000    116      1
Mercury Asset Man       OthF    20,000     70      1
Micro Focus             Elec     2,000     49      1
Ramsdens (Harry) B      H&amp;L     50,000     50      1
Reuters                 Med      2,000     26      1
Vickers                 EngG    15,500     13      3
Wills Group             BuSe   100,000     13      1
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Value expressed in Pounds 000s. Companies must notify the Stock Exchange
within 5 working days of a share transaction by a director. This list
contains all transactions, including the exercise of options (*) if 100%
subsequently sold, with a value over 10,000. Information released by the
Stock Exchange 23-27 November 1992.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Directus Ltd, Edinburgh
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3734</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Easing yourself little by little
into retirement - Planning your Pension
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
STAGGERED vesting is one of the pensions industry's least appealing items of
jargon, summoning images of an athlete's desperate lunge at the finish line.
In fact, it could offer those with personal pension funds a way to wrest
from the life offices some limited control over their retirement income. If
it can be done without too many administration costs, it could be the best
way for many to take their pension.
Vesting refers to taking the pension fund which has accrued for you and
converting it into an annuity (where a life company undertakes to pay you a
fixed annual sum until your death, whenever it occurs), plus a cash sum.
Previous practice has been to do this all at once at the state retirement
age (60 for women and 65 for men).
However, there is no legal requirement for this. Since the introduction of
personal pensions, the age range over which a pension fund can be converted
into income is from 50 to 75. The bulk of the fund must be used to buy an
annuity, but you also receive a sum of tax-free cash. For old-style
retirement annuity contracts you receive a sum equal to three times the
annuity you could buy with the entire fund. Personal pensions allow you to
take 25 per cent of the fund.
Annuity rates are greater the older you are when you vest your pension, so
converting all of a pension fund at 55 begins to look unattractive,
particularly if you do not need that much income immediately. Annuity rates
also vary with gilt yields, so if you happen to retire at a point when gilts
are expensive, your entire pension can be lower as a result.
Instead, you can opt to vest only part of your pension fund, leaving the
rest to grow for a little longer before buying another annuity. This should
allow you a greater, more flexible income. You start with smaller income
from the annuity, but can use the cash for income. You are also liberated
from using only one insurance company for your annuity, so each year you can
shop around for the best rate.
There are other ways in which the dilemmas of taking an annuity in one fell
swoop are eased:
The problem of working out whether to accept a lower initial income in
return for index-linking (protection against inflation) is eased. Buying an
annuity to escalate by five per cent each year means a reduction of 30 per
cent in your initial income payment, according to Sun Life. You can buy a
different form of annuity later. Deciding on a widow's pension is also
easier. Married people will want to take an annuity which will carry on
paying an income after the death of one partner. However, this means a
reduced annuity - according to Towry Law, providing a widow's pension
reduces annuity payments by 20 per cent. The payments will stay this low
even if you turn out to be the longer-lived of the couple. With staggered
vesting, you can blithely take out an annuity on your life only, knowing
that your widow will receive the balance of the pension fund if you die
early.
Inheritance tax planning is easier. The balance of your pension fund belongs
to the life company after your death, if it has been vested and used to buy
a pension. But if you have not vested it before reaching the age of 75, the
money goes to your heirs, tax-free.
However, there are several problems. The most pressing is that the bulk of
pension contracts now in existence were not designed with staggered vesting
in mind.
The systems which administer them had not split them into 'segments', and so
the pension providers simply will not be able to allow you to take the
pension in stages.
The way around this is to transfer into a policy which allows segmentation.
Provident Life and Sun Life have taken a lead in producing transfer plans to
do this, while others, such as Prudential, plan products for the market.
But transferring can cost money, particularly in the case of with-profits
contracts which have not yet matured, or company final-salary schemes - you
could be offered far less than the accumulated value of your fund as a
transfer value.
You must check whether your current scheme allows staggered vesting, and
what penalties there would be for transferring out. If you would sacrifice
too large a chunk of your fund, it is best to forget the idea of staggered
vesting. In general, it will be easiest for those with individual or
executive pension plans, and hardest for those in company schemes. Providers
admit that there is little point in trying to use staggered vesting unless
you have a fund of at least Pounds 100,000.
For those starting to save for their pension now, the possibility of
staggered vesting suggests the use of a series of single-premium policies,
rather than a regular premium policy, making it easier to vest some funds,
while allowing others to continue. Administrative costs on single-premium
plans should also usually be lower.
Actuaries Mercer Fraser point out that much of the tax-free cash is used for
income under staggered vesting - so 'round the world trips' with a large
lump sum will be harder to fund.
Then there are the possible costs of administration. You may find yourself
paying more in fees or commission by taking this approach, which will create
extra work for both intermediaries and providers. Some of these costs might
be worth bearing, as staggered vesting makes administration for the
individual more difficult, but it is important to shop around accountants
and financial advisers to ensure that you do not pay too much.
Finally, there is the risk that your pension fund might be poorly managed,
or that annuity rates will worsen as you grow older. Both should be unlikely
but could happen.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3735</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: An uncertain outlook for dividends -
Investment in UK equity income unit trusts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UK EQUITY income funds seemed at one point to offer a one-way bet. As their
name suggests, they offered a higher income than rival equity trusts aiming
for capital growth. But statistics showed that, if income from these trusts
was re-invested, they would grow more than growth funds.
Over long terms, this relationship still holds good, but over shorter
periods, the returns from the two sectors are closer. According to Micropal,
the average UK equity income unit trust has increased by 370.48 per cent
over 10 years to December 1, while the average growth unit trust has grown
268.54 per cent.
But taken over three years, growth funds show 6.26 per cent growth, while
income funds show growth of 6.33 per cent. Over one year, the figures are
2.93 per cent and 3.02 per cent respectively.
The reason for this is the 'yield effect'. Income funds, aiming for a high
distribution to unit holders, select companies with a high yield - where
their dividend represents a relatively high proportion of the share price.
Such companies are often small, and the share prices of small companies,
during the 1980s' bull market, tended to out-perform. Income funds
outperformed with them.
However, high-yielding companies are also more speculative. The yield is
high because the price is depressed as traders tend to be more wary about
the company's prospects. Those who buy high-yielders are thus betting that
traders are wrong.
Income funds thus became 'bull market' plays. While the economy boomed and
companies were producing better-than-expected profits, they out-performed.
When the economy slowed, income funds were badly affected.
The recession has caused many UK companies to cut their dividend payments,
and this has had a knock-on effect on income funds. According to Income Fund
Analysis, of Llandudno, Gwent, 16 of 27 income funds monitored reduced their
distribution last month, while one remained unchanged and ten increased.
This may diminish the appeal of the funds just when the difficulty of
getting a worthwhile yield from cash deposits might tempt investors back
into equities. According to Nigel Legge of James Capel: 'If the economic
recovery takes hold, recovery in dividends will be slower than the recovery
in profits because companies want to rebuild their dividend cover.'
However, the advent of personal equity plans, which allow income funds to
pay distributions free of income tax, means many funds may still look
attractive. Investors should not get too excited, but the tax-free yields of
six per cent or more on offer from income unit trust Peps would be hard for
top-rate taxpayers to match in deposit accounts.
The target yields of income unit trusts vary. Some, such as James Capel
Income, have very precise targets for their yield (125 per cent of the yield
on the FT-A All-Share index), which preclude them from trying any broader
strategies aimed at capital growth. Others have a less precise yield target,
and effectively aim for total return (capital gain plus income).
Those who are investing just for income should be aware of this. According
to Micropal, six 'income' funds are yielding less than four per cent, with
Gartmore UK Equity Income the lowest at 3.18 per cent. The FT-SE 100 Index
is presently yielding around 4.38 per cent.
Most funds have yields greater than the index. The highest, 11.96 per cent,
is Exeter's high income fund. This invests in the income shares of
split-capital investment trusts, and is technically a different proposition
from conventional trusts. The chances of capital growth are slim compared
with other income funds.
Indeed, capital growth might well be a problem across the sector. The ground
rules for investing for income have changed since the end of the 1980s bull
market.
Jonathan Powell, manager of Newton Income, the top performer over five
years, says: 'There are two schools of thought. One is that we must ensure
that the dividend stream grows over the years by investing in high-yielding
stocks. There's a second school of thought which says the only way in the
medium term to safeguard your income in real terms is to guard your capital
base. We strongly adhere to the second school.'
At present, Newton Income is heavily invested in convertibles, utilities and
overseas earners. Buckmaster Income, second in the sector over five years
with growth of 94.43 per cent, has a similar approach. According to Tim
Gregory, the fund's manager, this was achieved by taking a very defensive
position after the Gulf war and buying fixed-interest convertibles.
This has given them the strength to buy stock in companies which have
already cut their dividends, but remain on a high yield - Gregory cites BPB.
Out-performance is possible, but the winning strategy appears to be
defensive.
N&amp;P UK Income and Capability Income &amp; Growth, both managed by Capel-Cure
Myers, are first and second in the sector over 10 years, with increases of
609.5 per cent, and 525.69 per cent. But over five years they stand 63rd and
22nd. This is the classic 'high-yield' approach.
Fund manager Leonard Klahr says: 'In the case of N&amp;P, we were very much in
smaller companies in the early '80s, and then got slightly stuck in the late
'80s with too high a small company weighting.' He says they have tried to
avoid 'recovery'-style stocks, which has denied them the recent 'bounce'
which some funds have achieved.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3736</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: The Week Ahead
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Pilkington, the glass maker, reports interim results on Thursday and is
expected to see profits fall once more. A cut in the dividend is likely
after the reduction in the year-end dividend in June.
There is a wide range of estimates, with the pessimists expecting pre-tax
profits of Pounds 10m or less, against Pounds 50.6m, after more exceptional
costs. There is the chance, though, that Mr Roger Leverton, the new chief
executive, will take the opportunity to announce substantial redundancies,
and make provisions which could push the group into losses.
Interim results from Scottish &amp; Newcastle on Monday are expected to reflect
tougher trading conditions in the beer market and two disappointing summer
months for its UK holiday operations. A five per cent decline in interim
pre-tax profits to about Pounds 110m is forecast.
Siebe, the engineering systems and controls group, looks set to continue its
solid performance since its Pounds 357m acquisition in 1990 of US group
Foxboro.
Analysts forecast a modest improvement in pre-tax profit to Pounds 76.5m
(Pounds 75.2m) for the six months to September, when results are published
next week. The interim dividend is likely to be increased marginally, to
3.3p - last year's payout was 6.05p but there was a one-for-one
capitalisation issue in September.
Airtours, the UK's third largest package holiday company, is expected to
report on Monday pre-tax profits of between Pounds 34m and Pounds 36m for
the year to September, against Pounds 27.5m last time. The collapse of some
smaller travel companies will probably have offset some of the summer
discounting and a strong end to the year (since July) is expected.
Also reporting on Monday is Westland, the helicopter group. Profits are
expected to edge up from last time's Pounds 23.7m to about Pounds 24m or
Pounds 24.5m. The group's order gap could continue until after 1994, in
which it is possible there will be no helicopter deliveries. Profits could
stay at the current level for the next couple of years.
Carlton Communications, the television and video group, is likely to report
on Tuesday a rise of some 15 per cent in pre-tax profits for the year ended
September to around Pounds 102m.
Expectations are that Thursday's interim pre-tax profit at Great Universal
Stores, the retailer, should be slightly ahead at about Pounds 193m (Pounds
187m).
Compass Group, the catering and hospitals concern that recently bought the
Travellers Fare snack shops business, is expected to report a rise of about
Pounds 3m in annual pre-tax profit to Pounds 35m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3737</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Understanding your council tax bill
 -New burden for householders
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE POLL tax will finally die on March 31 next year and will be replaced by
the new council tax from April 1.
The new tax aims to be fairer than the unpopular poll tax by taking into
account the value of the property in which householders live. It will no
longer be levied on the number of people living within one home but on each
'dwelling', so each household will receive only one bill.
How is the bill worked out?
The estimates of property values have been carried out by the Valuation
Office Agency, part of the Inland Revenue. There are eight valuation bands,
which differ for England, Scotland and Wales, and are shown in the table.
The value is based on the amount the property would have fetched had it been
sold on April 1, 1991.
The government this week sent lists of the draft valuation banding for each
house to all local authorities.
Householders can contact their local authority, to discover the band their
home falls into, though some may be slower than others in delivering this
information. However, householders will not know for sure how much they will
be paying until March next year, when local authorities set their budgets.
This is because it is up to individual councils to set the level of charge
for each household, and that will be influenced by their own spending.
Grounds for appeal
Michael Howard, the environment secretary, said this week that the
government is expecting almost one million people to appeal against the
level of their council tax bill.
Many people are likely to disagree with the valuation given to their home,
particularly if it falls at the edges of a band because of the fall in
property prices since last year. But the Department of the Environment will
not regard this as grounds for appeal. It says that even though the
valuation is based on the market price of the home in April 1991, 'a general
fall or rise in house prices will not in itself give grounds for appeal.'
The main grounds for appeal are:
if your bill is evidently wrong. For example, your house may be worth less
than Pounds 40,000, yet you find you have been put into band G;
your home decreases in value because part of it has been demolished;
the house has been adapted for a disabled person;
the property has been divided into separate dwellings since the valuation
was carried out and this has escaped the government's notice.
if you stop or start using part of your home for business purposes.
Exemptions
The council tax bill assumes that two adults live in each home. If you are a
single person, you will be eligible for a discount of 25 per cent. If you
own two homes, the council tax on your second home is halved.
Those who are completely exempt from the council tax include:
full-time students;
resident hospital patients;
people who are severly mentally impaired;
careworkers on low pay working usually for charities
18 and 19 year olds who are at, or have just left, school.
If you are sharing your home with someone who falls into the exempt
category, your council tax bill will be reduced by 25 per cent - the size of
the single person's discount.
Households which include a disabled person will normally fall into a band
below that of their valuation.
How to appeal
You cannot appeal against the council tax bill until April 1 1993, and the
deadline is November 30 1993.
If you think your house has been put into the wrong valuation band, write to
the Listing Officer at the local office of the Valuation Office Agency. The
Department of the Environment says it expects most appeals to be sorted out
quickly but if agreement is not reached within six months, the case will be
referred to a valuation tribunal.
You will not be liable for these costs but you will have to bear the costs
of supporting your case, such as getting an independent valuation for your
home. In some cases, the cost of the valuation might be more than the
difference in council tax payments of dropping to a lower band.
If you think you are entitled to a discount or are receiving bills which
should be directed to someone else, write to your council. It should give a
decision within two months and if, you disagree, or there is a longer delay,
you can appeal to a valuation tribunal.
The government says you should pay the council tax bill you are challenging
and if you win an appeal, the local authority will rebate the amount owed to
you.
There are three free pamphlets on the Council Tax: A Guide to the Tax;
Valuation and Banding; Liability, Discounts and Exemptions. Write to Council
Tax Publicity Material, PO Box 506, London SE99 7UY. A separate pamphlet -
How to Appeal - will be issued later this month.
 ------------------------------------------------------
VALUATION BANDS FOR COUNCIL TAX
 ------------------------------------------------------
Band          England         Scotland            Wales
 ------------------------------------------------------
A        under 40,000     under 27,000     under 30,000
B           40-52,000        27-35,000        30-39,000
C           52-68,000        35-45,000        39-51,000
D           68-88,000        45-58,000        51-66,000
E          88-120,000        58-80,000        66-90,000
F         120-160,000       80-106,000       90-120,000
G         160-320,000      106-212,000      120-240,000
H        320,000 plus     212,000 plus     240,000 plus
 ------------------------------------------------------
Source: Valuation Office Agency
 ------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3738</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Why savers are now facing a zero
return - A look at the returns you are getting from building society
accounts in the light of base rate cuts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SAVERS with cash in the building society used to have a rule of thumb to
calculate their annual interest payments by dividing their deposit by 10.
The frequency of base rate cuts will have escaped few investors. But the
degree to which new rates have eroded savings rates is taking longer to
register.
The tables show what the top ten building societies, which most savers use,
are paying at the moment. Those who depend on building society deposits for
income may well have seen their returns cut by half over the past two years.
A survey carried out by Save &amp; Prosper last month, before the last base rate
cut to 7 per cent, showed that 37 per cent of those with an instant access
account believed the rate of interest they were earning was between 7 to 9
per cent net, when the true rate was between 4 to 5 per cent net.
Halifax's main instant access account shows three phases of double digit
gross investment rates during the 1980s. These were from July 1978 to
November 1982, from February 1985 to November 1987 and from September 1988
to October 1991.
The real return to the investor differed enormously during the three periods
because of the rate of inflation.
The graph shows the real, and after tax, returns on Pounds 10,000 invested
in a Halifax instant access account since January 1 1978. For most of the
first phase of double digit investment rates, the real return to basic rate
and higher rate taxpayers was negative.
The annual inflation rate was 13 per cent for 1979, 18 per cent for 1980 and
11 per cent in 1981; the highest investment rate reached during the period
was 15 per cent.
During the second phase, from February 1985 to November 1987, however,
inflation rates were low. Annual inflation rates were 6 per cent in 1985,
3.4 per cent in 1986 and 4.1 per cent in 1987.
The combination of these relatively low rates of inflation with high base
rates (between 14 per cent and 9 per cent during the same period) allowed
basic rate taxpayers, in particular, to earn an average real rate of 4 per
cent on their building society deposits during that period. Higher-rate
taxpayers fared less well, earning real returns of 1.2 per cent during the
period of positive returns from February 1986 to June 1987.
Relatively high rates of inflation of 7.8 per cent and 9.5 per cent in 1989
and 1990 again dented real returns during the third phase from September
1988 to October 1991, in spite of base rates being well over 10 per cent for
most of the period. The average real return to basic rate taxpayers was 1.4
per cent during the period. Higher rate taxpayers mostly received negative
returns.
Indeed, the graph shows that, on Pounds 10,000 at least, a building society
instant access is rarely a good investment for higher-rate taxpayers in real
terms. Higher-rate taxpayers received an average real return in only four
years since 1978 - in 1986, 1988, 1991 and 1992.
This shows the importance of taking inflation into account when looking for
returns. Base rates are expected by some analysts to fall by another
percentage point in the near future. Building societies would then once
again drop rates for savers. While the housing market is weak, building
societies have been keener to pass on the benefits of lower base rates to
borrowers rather than savers.
But the balance may soon be tipping, particularly if there is a revival in
the housing market and demand for mortgages rises. 'If there is another base
rate cut, the lenders may not follow it right down because of their savers,'
said Gill Colver of Cheltenham &amp; Gloucester.
The tables show current savings rates on both instant access accounts and
90-day notice accounts at the top 10 building societies which together hold
more than 80 per cent of total building society savings.
Some of the smaller building societies may also be offering higher rates but
the tables show that there is a considerable difference in the returns
offered within the top 10 itself. This is partly because of the wide
difference in size, assets and branch presence between the top 10.
Halifax, the largest building society, held Pounds 58.7bn of assets at the
end of 1991 and had 8.7m shareholders, while Bristol &amp; West, the tenth
largest society, had Pounds 7.1bn of assets and just over 1m shareholders.
These differences influence the lending and savings culture of the
institutions. For example, the top five building societies with their large
high street presence do not have postal accounts, while Cheltenham &amp;
Gloucester, Bradford &amp; Bingley, Britannia and Bristol &amp; West all have postal
accounts offering highly competitive rates of interest.
Bristol &amp; West's Balmoral postal account, pays the highest rate on an
instant access account and also beats most of the 90 day accounts, though
its rates are under review. It is paying 9.10 per cent gross on Pounds 5,000
in an instant access account compared to 4.8 per cent gross on Woolwich's
Prime Gold account.
If inflation continues to fall, and investment rates are not cut unduly,
savers may not see much of a difference to their returns in real terms. This
is of little comfort to retired savers who will see nominal incomes fall
while prices rise.
In any case, the graph shows that real returns for basic rate taxpayers are
much lower than the 1986 peak and on the verge of becoming negative again
for higher-rate taxpayers.
Low real interest rates at the building society indicate it is time to
diversify by using other investments, such as index-linked gilts and
equities to protect against inflation.
Statistical research for graph by Ewan MacDonald
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3739</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Banking complaints soar - The
ombudsman's 1992 report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LAURENCE Shurman, the banking ombudsman, was deluged by more than 10,000
complaints in the year to September 1992 - a 62 per cent increase on 1991,
which itself was up 60 per cent on the previous year.
Shurman said the rise was due to the effect of the recession on customers as
well as greater awareness of the ombudsman scheme.
Banks recently have faced criticism for failing to pass on fully the
benefits of interest rate cuts, and for charging small businesses too much -
and complaints about charges headed the 1992 list, accounting for 19.2 per
cent of the total.
In his report, though, Shurman said customers' expectations were too high.
'Free banking services are no more possible than free lunches,' he declared.
'At the end of the day, the banks have to generate more income than
expenditure in order to survive.'
Many complaints were from those annoyed they had been left in accounts no
longer open to new business, or had not been told they would earn a higher
rate of interest in a different account. But Shurman said banks were not
usually under an obligation to advise their clients to do this.
Instead, the investor 'has a responsibility to be vigilant to ensure that
his or her investment remains competitive, both in relation to what is on
offer elsewhere from other banks and institutions and in relation to other
accounts available at the investor's own bank.'
He added, however, that if the bank could be found to have breached its own
conditions or to have made a mistake, a complaint could be upheld.
He cited a case where a bank issued a customer with a gold card, entitling
him to an overdraft of Pounds 6,000 at not more than an annual 2.5 per cent
above the bank's base rate. When he took up the overdraft, he found he had
been charged at the bank's higher managed rate.
The ombudsman found that although the bank had the right to vary its base
rate, it was not entitled to replace this with the managed rate. The bank
was obliged to refund the excess above 2.5 per cent to the customer.
Lending policy accounted for 14.2 per cent of the complaints and automatic
teller machines for another 8.7 per cent.
Many of the ATM complaints were about 'phantom withdrawals' where the
customer finds money removed through the cash point machine but does not
remember doing so himself. On this, Shurman commented: 'There has been a lot
of talk about ghost withdrawals, but we have not found any evidence.
'What we have found is a great deal of fraud, often by someone known to the
complainant - a friend, family member or workmate.'
The increase in plastic card fraud, which cost banks at least Pounds 166m
last year, is a growing problem and Shurman suggested the banks could do
more to combat this by introducing photographs on cards and installing
videos at cash machines. But he expected the number of complaints about ATMs
to fall with the new Pounds 50 limit - introduced by the code of banking
practice - on a customer's liability in cases of stolen cash cards.
Although only 956 of the 10,109 preliminary complaints were investigated,
this was an increase of 28 per cent on the 746 cases examined the year
before. Shurman said he had needed to examine proportionately fewer cases
because the banks were themselves becoming more successful at settling
complaints.
Of the fully investigated complaints, 36 per cent were about ATMs, followed
by cheque guarantee cards (10 per cent).
More than a third of the 772 fully investigated cases resulted in
compensation for the customer. This ranged from Pounds 100 to Pounds 10,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3740</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Savings products
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE NEW range of National Savings products goes on sale on Monday. Although
rates have fallen, investors may still find some of the offers attractive.
The 6th issue of index-linked certificates offers a lower level of inflation
protection over five years than the 5th issue - 3.25 per cent per annum over
the RPI tax-free, against 4.5 per cent.
However, the 6th issue does offer better indexation in the early years.
Certificates sold after one year, for example, will receive the rise in the
RPI plus 1.5 per cent tax-free. The old 5th issue paid just the rise in the
RPI.
If one were to assume that inflation continues at its current rate of 3.6
per cent for the next year, then the certificates would pay 5.1 per cent.
That equates to 6.8 per cent for the basic rate taxpayer, or 8.5 per cent
for a top rate payer. As Scheherezade Daneshkhu's article above shows, those
returns would be better than many on offer from the top building societies.
In the second year, the 6th issue pays inflation plus 2 per cent; year
three, inflation plus 2.75 per cent; year four, inflation plus 3.75 per
cent; and in the final year, inflation plus 6.32 per cent.
The other new products on offer are: the 40th issue of fixed interest
certificates, which pay a tax-free 5.75 per cent per annum compound if held
for five years; series G capital bonds which pay a taxable 7.75 per cent
also for five years; and issue E of children's bonus bonds, which pay a
tax-free 7.85 per cent, again if held for the full five years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3741</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Markets: Now it's over to the shareholders - The Bottom Line
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A CHALLENGE was thrown out to shareholders this week with the launch, to
much City fanfare, of the final report of the committee on the financial
aspects of corporate governance, chaired by Sir Adrian Cadbury. Some of its
recommendations for improved standards in the boardroom might seem remote
and irrelevant to private investors. But Cadbury places great importance on
their role and says the report sends them 'a message of encouragement.'
At its heart is a code of best practice which calls for strong, independent,
non-executive directors; the existence of audit and remuneration committees;
effective internal controls; and a statement that the company is a going
concern. Shareholders will be able to assess how well companies comply
because, from June, all will be required by the Stock Exchange to produce a
statement in their annual report. They must say if they conform with the
code and detail any divergences.
Parts of the code also will be verified by the company's auditors. Other
parts, and a series of good practice guidelines, will not be scrutinised but
will provide a check-list for progressive governance. These include
suggestions that there should be at least three non-executives on every
board; that non-executive directors should dominate the audit committee; and
that the chairman of the remuneration committee should be available at the
AGM to answer questions.
The planks on which the report is based are to provide sufficient
disclosure, so that all those with a legitimate interest in a company have
the information they need to exercise their rights and responsibilities
while providing checks and balances to prevent undue concentrations of power
in the boardroom.
Shareholders might question what significance this all has for them. The
link between corporate governance and corporate performance is far from
clear-cut. Some of Britain's more successful companies have been driven by a
dominant chief executive. Others have failed while, on paper, appearing to
comply with the letter of the code.
Cadbury believes, however, there is a strong economic incentive to get
involved. 'I'm sure it will have an impact on the share price,' he says. If
nothing else, this will come from the emphasis in the code on effective
internal controls - something which, he says, the committee found lacking in
many companies.
There is also a more direct impact. The code calls for changes to directors'
pay. It says there should be greater disclosure, and that increases should
be approved by a remuneration committee composed mainly of non-executive
directors. There is also a moral justification for taking governance issues
seriously, of course: that shareholders have wider responsibilities as
owners of the company by law. As a result, they should consider issues other
than simply capital growth and dividends, such as the treatment of employees
and pensioners.
The passive response to the code by investors would be to ensure compliance
before buying a company's shares, or to sell existing holdings if there was
no sign of improvements being made to meet its requirements. Cadbury would
prefer a more active response, with shareholders - most notably the
institutions - agitating for change. He suggests tactics such as letters to
the chairman, and questions at the annual general meeting.
But he is more bullish. 'Individual shareholders have more ability to
influence than they perhaps think,' he says. 'If they have a sensible point
to make, nobody likes to be in a position to have done nothing about it.
Intelligent intervention will have an effect. The code provides you with an
agenda. Make use of it and raise the points in it. These are tests against
which you can measure an effective business.'
Whatever the reasons, successful implementation of the code depends entirely
on investors. 'We are relying on market forces to turn our recommendations
into action,' Cadbury says. If, when the committee reconvenes in two years,
the market is judged to have failed, statutory regulation might be the only
alternative.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3742</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Cheer for smaller companies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Hoare Govett smaller companies index (capital gains version) was up 1.15
per cent at 1122.54, and the County NatWest smaller companies index up by
0.97 per cent at 866.01 on Thursday. But John Houlihan, of Hoare Govett,
still cautions against over-confidence. He says: 'Each recession grows its
crop of corporate zombies and the current one is set to be more fruitful in
that regard than most.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3743</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Irish Life's third growth issue
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Irish Life has launched a third issue of its guaranteed growth account. For
those investing between Pounds 2,000 and Pounds 24,999, this guarantees to
return a minimum 108 per cent of the original investment after five years;
anyone investing over Pounds 25,000 gets a pledge of a minimum 112 per cent.
The money goes into the company's managed fund and performance will depend
on the success of Irish Life's managers; there is no linking to a particular
stock market index. Withdrawals can be made during the five-year period but
the guarantee will not apply to funds withdrawn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3744</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Capital bond remains open
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Scottish Amicable's Capital Guarantee Bond remains open until December 14.
This represents a step forward for guaranteed products, since it offers
income reinvestment, rather than simple growth. Investors are guaranteed,
over five years, either the growth in the FT-SE 100 Index (including
dividend income) or their money back over five years.
However, the indexation applies to the bid value of the units and there is a
bid-offer spread of 5 per cent. The allocation rate is 96 per cent, although
this can be enhanced to up to 98 per cent by investing greater sums. As a
consequence, the amount of your sum which is indexed could be as low as 91
per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3745</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Hong Kong bargain hunters out
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Investors in Hong Kong could be forgiven if they lack democratic fervour.
Governor Chris Patten's plans to forge on with democratisation, and the
resulting war of words with Beijing, have exerted a heavy toll on share
prices in Hong Kong and the rest of the Far East.
On Tuesday the Hang Seng fell 5 per cent - its worst since August 1991  -
following a drop of 3 per cent on the previous day. Then on Thursday it fell
another 8 per cent, its worst day since the Tiananmen square massacre in
1989. But yesterday the bargain hunters emerged, and share prices rose 5.8
per cent - the largest single day gain for more than a month.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3746</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Housing prices distorted by stamp
duty holiday
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Building societies produced conflicting indicators on house prices last
month. According to Halifax, UK house prices rose by 0.1 per cent in
November, while Nationwide had prices falling by 2.0 per cent in the same
period.
Both agreed that the artifical boost to transactions in August caused by the
stamp duty holiday had distorted the market. Halifax sees housing prices
remaining stable during 1993 with possible rises at the end of the year,
providing there are clear signs of a general economic recovery.
Nationwide concurs, saying: 'In these circumstances a stabilisation of house
prices seems very likely; increased confidence in the economy would help
sustain a return to more normal patterns of activity.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3747</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Markets: Societies head for minefield on rates - Serious
Money
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HOW WOULD you like your building society to judge your life style? That
became a real possibility this week as the Bristol &amp; West revealed it was
considering plans to charge different rates for new mortgages depending on
the applicant's age and family status. This could make a difference of up to
4 percentage points in the mortgage rate paid by borrowers.
In a move that might have been designed by Vice-President Dan Quayle,
Bristol &amp; West's criteria are likely to favour the traditional nuclear
family with two children over young, unmarried adults.
The reason behind the possible change is the society's bad debt problem. B &amp;
W has found that unmarried couples are 50 per cent more likely to fall in
arrears than married ones. Couples without children are a future risk
because their finances deteriorate quickly once they start a family.
Older people are thought to be a better risk because they have had time to
demonstrate a sound repayment record and also, perhaps, because their
attitude differs from the young - of whom B &amp; W's chief executive, Tony
FitzSimons, says: 'There is a generation that does not have the thrift
mentality and does not fear losing their homes.'
There is already some differential pricing in the mortgage market. Some
societies offer lower rates to those borrowing over a certain amount; others
restrict special offers to loans representing less than a given percentage
(say 80 per cent) of a house's value. The amount you can borrow is, of
course, linked to your income level.
Such 'social' discrimination that has occurred to date has been only to
exclude certain borrowers (those with a poor credit record, or lack of a
steady job) rather than to charge differential rates.
The principle is commonplace in the small business market, though. Other
things being equal, a bank would much rather lend money to Tesco than to
Fred the Grocer.
Fred has to pay a higher interest rate to the bank to compensate for the
greater risk involved in lending to a small business.
And, in a free market, it might seem entirely reasonable for B &amp; W to adopt
whatever lawful lending practices it desires. Indeed, it has a
responsibility to its members to lend money prudently so that the rates paid
to savers are not depressed unduly.
It also sounds reasonable that those borrowers who do pay promptly and
regularly should not be forced to subsidise those who are not so reliable.
But these are murky waters.
Discriminating between the married and the unmarried is one thing - but what
if analysis of lending patterns were to show that Baptists were poorer risks
than Anglicans? Or if one national group (let us say, Andorrans, to reduce
the potential for hate mail) were found to be poorer payers than another?
Would building societies then charge a higher rate on the basis of religious
preference or geographical origin?
Good free-market principles would state that lenders ought to be able to
charge what they like. But the law would simply prevent any building society
from discriminating on these grounds. So, we can dismiss the free market
argument; it does not really exist in this area.
Instead, we should consider whether a system such as that proposed by B &amp; W
would, in fact, be discriminating against groups which the law does not
protect.
One obvious example is homosexuals. B &amp; W's references to young, unmarried
adults sounds suspiciously, to an outsider, as code for this group.
The society says it has no such intention and that, whatever scheme it
eventually devises, it would have to be 'broadly acceptable in the mortgage
marketplace.'
It is, however, easy to see how apparently pure financial criteria could
have discriminatory overtones. If, for example, single-parent families were
to have poor repayment records (for understandable reasons), a lender might
feel justified in charging such people more. But more women fit into this
category, so such a policy would have the effect of discriminating on
grounds of sex.
This might not be too serious if B &amp; W were the only lender operating this
system; those who felt excluded could simply move to another building
society. But if differential pricing were to spread across the mortgage
market, this could create a significant civil liberty issue.
John Wriglesworth, building society analyst at UBS Phillips &amp; Drew, feels
that some form of differential mortgage pricing will appear in the 1990s.
Building societies have had so many problems with bad debts that it is the
logical course.
'I will forecast, quite confidently, that discounts for larger loans will
vanish within a year because they have proved more risky,' he says.
The societies will need to be very careful, however. Pricing a loan on the
basis of a customer's credit record is fair enough; pricing on the basis of
social stereotypes drawn from generalised statistical analysis is another
matter, with many disturbing moral and legal implications.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3748</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Markets: Brokers eye recovery with suspicion - Wall Street
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
LIKE a thrifty car buyer cautiously eyeing a second-hand model with
suspiciously few miles on its clock, the US stock market is in no hurry to
buy the latest economic recovery.
In normal times, yesterday's November employment report showing a big rise
in non-farm jobs and a handy decline in the national unemployment rate would
be a cause for celebration among equity investors.
What could be more pleasing than the sight of an economy building up a head
of steam, just in time for the arrival of a new president who has pledged to
correct long-term structural weaknesses in the economy with a healthy dose
of public spending?
This market, however, is reluctant to herald the new economic dawn, having
made the mistake of proclaiming a recovery when the Gulf war ended in the
spring of 1991 only to see it disappear like a desert mirage a few months
later.
Admittedly, there has been some strong buying of secondary stocks - the
Nasdaq composite index has risen 9 per cent since election day to a
succession of record highs.
Yet, over the same period the Dow Jones Industrial Average has hardly
budged, and although the Standard &amp; Poor's 500 has broken through to an
all-time high, during the past month it has gained only 3 per cent.
Yesterday morning's market performance typified the pattern of the past
month. The Nasdaq continued to strengthen as investors sought out growth
stocks, the S &amp; P 500 posted only a modest advance, while the Dow barely
moved. This in spite of news of a 105,000 increase in November non-farm
payrolls and a 0.2 percentage point drop in the unemployment rate to 7.2 per
cent. Both figures were considerably more bullish about labour market
conditions than analysts had expected.
In some respects, equity investors are behaving more like bond investors.
Their cautious embrace of the recovery reflects a concern that the
combination of a reviving business cycle and fiscal stimuli from a new
government could quickly lead to an overheated economy, one replete with
rising inflation and rising interest rates.
To make matters more confusing, the long end of the bond market rose
yesterday following the jobs data, defying conventional wisdom that good
economic news is bad news for long-term Treasury investors. Bond prices
firmed because investors believe the strengthening economy will persuade
President-elect Bill Clinton that his aggressive stimulus package of public
spending and middle-class tax cuts is no longer needed, at least not on the
scale originally envisaged.
Much depends on how Clinton responds to yesterday's job figures. Until now,
he has welcomed each sign of economic recovery, but also warned that
structural deficiencies in the economy still need to be addressed.
At the same time, however, sources in the Clinton camp have privately
admitted that the incoming Democratic administration may tone down some of
its more ambitious spending plans if the recovery maintains its current
pace. If the new President does eventually decide to keep his foot off the
fiscal accelerator next year, the stock market may then get what it most
wants - relatively inflation-free economic growth.
On the corporate front, one company finally facing up to its own structural
deficiencies is General Motors. As part of a programme aimed at shrinking
capacity to fit declining domestic demand, the car maker announced on
Thursday plans to close nine more north American plants that employ 18,000
staff, and dispose of 14 per cent of its car components operations.
GM unveiled its cost-cutting plans on the same day that official data showed
that car sales are at their highest in nearly two years, but that GM's share
of the US market is shrinking. In spite of the figures, investors seem to
welcome GM's long-awaited restructuring, and the company's stock rose more
than 4 per cent over the week to Dollars 33 5/8 .
The large regional bank NationsBank was the subject of extraordinary trading
activity this week when 28m shares changed hands in just one day. The huge
volume was related to NationsBank's decision to offer shareholders the
option to receive stock at a 5 per cent discount instead of a cash dividend
on their shares.
The market's biggest trading houses swarmed around NationsBank's stock like
sharks at a feeding frenzy, because by using complex arbitrage strategies
they could profit handsomely from the dividend reinvestment programme. Thus
a policy aimed at encouraging the little fish to invest more in a company
only served to leave the big fish a little fatter.
 ------------------------------------
Monday        3305.16  +  22.96
Tuesday       3294.36  -  10.8
Wednesday     3286.25  -   8.11
Thursday      3276.53  -   9.75
Friday        3288.68  +  12.15
 ------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3749</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Markets: Watching the Weinstock indicator - London Markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARTIN, Financial Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THREE THINGS became clear this week. The US economy is now clearly
recovering. The German economy is unambiguously in recession. And the UK
economy is - finally - off the bottom.
Each of these developments has important implications for the London
markets. The recovery in the US, indicated by a steady flow of economic
statistics over the past week, tells us that fears of a world depression are
misplaced, since you can't have such a party if the Americans wwill not
come.
Just as important, fears that the huge mountain of US debt would
indefinitely muffle the impact of lower interest rates can now be seen as
over-pessimistic - a conclusion that can probably be applied to the UK as
well. If you cut interest rates enough, for long enough, the economy will
eventually recover.
But have Britain's interest rate cuts gone far enough? Real interest rates
in the UK, after all, are still positive. Base rates are three percentage
points higher than the inflation rate; in the US, it took real interest
rates of below 1 per cent for the best part of 1992 to produce these latest
signs of economic health.
That is where Germany comes in. Thursday's economic statistics - a 1 1/2 per
cent fall in west German gnp in the third quarter, and the forecast of a 3
per cent drop in industrial output next year - make it clear that the
Bundesbank will soon have no choice but to cut short-term interest rates. A
three per cent pay deal for the next 18 months, agreed by the steel workers'
union late on Wednesday, will speed the decision, allowing British interest
rates to fall further.
The debate inside the UK government was summed up by one fund manager this
week: 'The Treasury experts think there is going to be a sufficiently large
boost to the economy from devaluation and the cuts in interest rates we've
seen already. But the man in the street does not see it yet, and the
politicians are listening to the man in the street - especially if he's a
back-bencher.' That means, he thinks, that the one-point cut in interest
rates that might be prudent could well turn into a two-point cut before the
man in the street has been fully assuaged.
Cheaper money in the UK will nourish the hesitant upturn now just getting
under way. Green shoots of recovery are examined elsewhere in this issue of
the FT; the chart shows one snapshot, the trend of car sales. Just as
significant an indicator, said one FT-SE company chairman this week, was the
tone of the statement that accompanied GEC's interim results on Wednesday:
if Arnold Weinstock, GEC's deeply cautious boss, is talking so positively of
growth and stimulus, perhaps the worst is really over.
This is the background against which the FT-SE 100 index rose to within six
points of the 2,800 level on Tuesday, closing the day at a new high of
2,792.0. By Friday, there had been some weakening, and the FT-SE 100 closed
at 2,759.4, down 0.7 points on the week.
The performance of these big, internationally-oriented blue-chip stocks is
not necessarily representative of the market as a whole, however: the
FT-Actuaries All-Share index, which contains 651 stocks, is still 1 per cent
or so below its high of 1326.36, reached in May this year.
You can see the pattern clearly in the daily movements of the FT-SE Mid 250,
the 250 shares that lie just below the FT-SE 100 index in size. Between
Monday's open and Tuesday's close, the FT-SE 100 rose by just over 30
points; but the Mid 250 rose only half as much.
That leaves the optimists to think that, although the UK market is no longer
looking particularly cheap on most measures of value, there is still scope
for more unwinding of the pessimism that dominated much of the year. That
sentiment may already have vanished as far as blue-chip companies are
concerned; but firm confirmation of economic growth may breathe a little
more life into the second-tier stocks.
After all, even among big companies there is still plenty of bad news
around. This week saw discouraging results from Hanson, Grand Metropolitan
and Bass, and receivership for Rosehaugh, the property developer. There is
scope, in the optimists' view, for a further run-up in share prices as
company chairmen finally start to become more cheerful.
As long as the market doesn't come a cropper on next year's government
deficit, say the pessimists. The need for the government to borrow Pounds
50bn or so in the next financial year will test the limits of the
institutions' cashflow; gilt yields will consequently stay high even if
short-term interest rates stay low.
That will hold down the equity market, since it will make gilt yields more
attractive than those on shares. Heavy government borrowing, and perhaps a
new spate of rights issues, will soak up cash that might otherwise have gone
into equities. Fund managers have little money in reserve: institutional
liquidity in the third quarter was down to 3 per cent, compared with a
long-term average of 5 per cent and a figure of 9 per cent a few years ago.
This debate is leading to estimates for the FT-SE in the early part of next
year that range from 2,700 - implying that the market is now heading down -
to 3,250, a rise of nearly a fifth.
The merits of individual shares play little part in this elaborate calculus,
something that must be giving Alan Sugar, the chief executive of Amstrad,
food for thought this weekend. Since September 23, when Sugar first
mentioned the price he would be prepared to pay for the shares in Amstrad
that he did not already own - 30p - the FT-SE has risen 7 per cent.
Perhaps not surprisingly, the early results of the shareholders' ballot
indicate that Sugar is having difficulty in getting the votes he needs to
achieve the deal. He is hoping for a late flood of support.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3750</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / The Long View: Damaging your wealth
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARRY RILEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INVESTMENT regulation is having a hard time. This week's latest problems
included attacks by big pension schemes on the compensation proposals of the
National Association of Pension Funds; and protests by small investors in
Lancashire &amp; Yorkshire Assurance, a friendly society in a mess.
The bigger picture is that attempts by retail investment institutions and
brokers to restructure their regulatory organisations into a single body,
called the Personal Investment Authority, are quite likely to prove
abortive. Senior industry figures are calling for a tougher statutory
framework, cutting back on the self-regulatory approach.
The new investor protection framework, embodied in the Financial Services
Act 1986, began as a simple way of looking after private investors following
small scandals such as the Norton Warburg collapse of 1981. But it soon
became complicated as the government became concerned about the Big Bang
stock market restructuring, and the legislation was extended to take in
professional wholesale markets as well as investment retailing. Ironically,
the wholesale side works quite well, but retail regulation is a minefield.
Hard cases make bad law, and investor protection legislation is too often
driven by the reflex reactions of politicians to queues of impoverished
demonstrators outside the houses of parliament. Whether Barlow Clowes
investors or Maxwell pension scheme members or BCCI depositors or Lloyd's
Names, they will have hired the best lawyers and some pushy public relations
advisers. The short-termist solution is always to give them the money. But,
inevitably, there will be another queue along soon.
Somebody must accept the risk within the system. Investors who seek
above-average returns must understand that they accept above-average risks.
Any regulator, meanwhile, must make it crystal-clear where the limits of his
responsibility lie. But there is much ignorance here. The public cannot
really understand the difference between regulation and providing a
guarantee. The Bank of England, for instance, operates a statutory
regulation framework which assists honestly-run banks to operate more safely
because they must observe certain prudential ratios and rules. On the other
hand, dishonest banks can fool regulators with phoney figures, as BCCI did.
To protect the public against fraud, however, is vastly more ambitious. In
the end, it can be achieved only by the imposition of a draconian rulebook;
the risks will have been nationalised. To a large extent this has happened
already because it is inconceivable that a major British bank would be
allowed to fail.
This argument over compensation is now causing turmoil among occupational
pension schemes. There is a recognition by the pensions industry that, in
the wake of the Maxwell disaster, there should be a pre-emptive response to
the politicians. The NAPF has sent a discussion document to members. The
immediate question is: why should sound schemes bail out those that are run
badly? The answer is that even good schemes will depend for their continued
existence upon minimum levels of security; otherwise, they may soon have few
members left.
The greatest internal protest, however, has been generated by the suggestion
from the NAPF's council that there should be compensation for bad investment
performance as well as fraud. There is an obvious concern that unscrupulous
employers would be encouraged to adopt highly risky investment strategies.
Compensation rows are also at the heart of the financial difficulties of
Fimbra, the regulator of independent financial advisers. Fimbra members have
imposed a disproportionate burden on the Investors' Compensation Scheme, the
industry-wide arrangement which also covers life company salesmen and stock
exchange firms. Again, a subtle shift in the basis for compensation has
taken place. Early claims on the scheme were dominated by the misdeeds of
crooks like the jailed Robert Miller, whose victims at Dunsdale Securities
received Pounds 5m. But now the emphasis is on the victims of salesmen of
home equity plans, schemes which were designed to convert pensioners' house
values safely into extra income during their remaining lifetimes but which,
in thousands of cases went horribly wrong, putting their homes at risk.
Nobody exactly ran off with their money, but the pensioners argue that they
were sold unsuitable plans and should be compensated. If this principle is
accepted widely by the courts, the cost could be vast.
Ultimately, this unwillingness by individuals to accept responsibility for
their investment decisions could force a restructuring of the whole
investment industry. Until now, the UK has been notable for the large number
of its investment institutions and the rapid rate of innovation of products.
But the logic now is that we will move in the direction of the German
framework, in which a comparatively small number of giant institutions are
dominant. Product innovation and new companies are generally frowned upon
(Germany has tried to insist upon very large minimum capital requirements
during the negotiations over the EC's Investment Services Directive). In
these circumstances, investment clients gain great security but get poor
choice and value for their money.
If we are not to go in this direction, the public must receive an education
in risk. This will hardly be welcomed by the investment industry. Your shiny
new car does not come with a breakdown warning. Financial health warnings
are not regarded positively by life insurance marketing men. But they may
provide the only way out.
In the end, we all have to accept part of the risks ourselves. To cope with
them, we will have to modify our behaviour. To give you an example which the
members of the NAPF will hate, it might be prudent to be a member of two or
three pension schemes rather than one. Just in case.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3751</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / An EC cuckoo in the Swiss clock: Fears of national
vulnerability expressed as Switzerland goes to the polls tomorrow in a
referendum on Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS WOODSWORTH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR THE traveller newly arrived from any of the grimmer cities of the real
world, Switzerland offers a delightful prospect - escape into the unreal
world of the picture postcard. Other places may need the skilled deceptions
of the photographer to remake them. Switzerland requires no such artifice;
wherever you look, it is a picture postcard.
There is something of the toy town, of the table-top maquette about the
entire country. There are dolls' houses with gingerbread facades, miniature
cog-wheel trains that trundle up alpine slopes as smooth as croquet lawns,
petrol stations that look more like flower shows, medieval clock towers
where outsize wind-up machinery ticks and whirrs and rings by the hour.
Everything is clean, well-kept and neat. What happens to the sweet wrappers
and empty cigarette packets that blow through the rest of the world's
streets? It is a mystery. In Switzerland, they seem simply not to exist.
Wander about for a few days and you might begin to think that Switzerland
exists serenely detached from the rest of the world, a Shangri-La unaffected
by disturbances emanating from beyond the Alps. But this is the greatest
artifice of all. Howling over the summits and passes every day now are the
winds of European change - political experiment, economic adjustment, social
dislocation and international realignment.
Like the celluloid veneer of a postcard photo, Switzerland's reassuring
visual allure is thin. It papers over a growing Swiss anxiety and national
debate about new ideals of continental integration, and about how far
Switzerland should go in accepting or rejecting them. Nor is the debate a
theoretical one concerned with some vague future - instability, recession
and change in the outside world have already brought Switzerland, long
Europe's most self-satisfied nation, troubles undreamed of since the second
world war.
In the last 18 months, real growth in Switzerland has been measured in
negative terms. Domestic consumption has also shrunk. Mortgage and lending
rates, traditionally low, have risen dramatically. House prices have dropped
by up to 40 per cent. Switzerland used to have the lowest inflation rate of
the 25 Organisation for Economic Cooperation Development countries; it
currently has the sixth highest. Unemployment was non-existent two years
ago; today, along with a hard drug problem, it is a major social concern.
For the Swiss, the unimaginable has happened - what used to be merely other
countries' problems are now becoming Switzerland's problems. Some see this
only as the coming of the inevitable. 'Like it or not,' says Beat Arnet,
assistant vice-president of the Union Bank of Switzerland, 'we are already
integrated with Europe'. He points out that Switzerland, without resources
of its own, is wholly dependent on value-added exports for its survival;
almost two-thirds of Swiss exports go to the EC, more than three-quarters of
imports come from the EC.
Trading with the continent that surrounds you is hard to avoid. But Arnet
also notes a fundamental contradiction in the Swiss character. 'It is very
difficult to make the Swiss understand that our country is not an island. We
think of ourselves as special. We have our own institutions, habits, and way
of looking at the world. We want the advantages of trade with the rest of
Europe, but really we would rather have nothing to do with it at all.'
Switzerland's future direction now presents itself as concrete choice. In a
referendum tomorrow, the Swiss will vote on a proposal for the creation of a
European Economic Area, an act that would liberalise trade between the seven
member-states of EFTA - the European Free Trade Association, of which
Switzerland is a member - and the EC. Most Swiss, though, see the
arrangement as more than mere market rationalisation - they believe it a
first step towards full EC membership and all it implies.
Should the Swiss play the economically rational card, concede to the
political norms demanded by a unified Europe, and take advantage of the
undoubted benefits of doing business in a community of 380m consumers? Or
should they ignore sensible economics and - at the cost of exclusion from a
continental economy - maintain a long-held tradition of political isolation,
neutrality and grass-roots democracy found nowhere else? It is an issue on
which the Swiss are, untypically, both passionate and deeply divided.
There are many arguments suggesting that only a freer exchange of goods,
services, and labour can restore Switzerland's health. These arguments are
pragmatic and expressed in economic terms. They are propounded by big
business, industry, the banks, government, and minority communities like the
Swiss-French who, living on the outward-looking peripheries of the country,
stand to benefit from stronger ties with the outside world. Their underlying
thesis is clear enough: in a fast-changing world unchanging formulas of
Swiss success, so long cherished, are becoming obsolete.
'Switzerland is an artificial creation, vulnerable from the outside and held
together inside only by a near-sacred principle of consensus,' says Antoine
Maurice, foreign editor of the pro-European Journal de Geneve. 'External
changes have put heavy strains on our economy, and threatened Swiss
consensus and security. For the first time in 40 years, the Swiss are
questioning the instruments that brought them success.'
Such questions are being asked in every sphere of Swiss life. When
Switzerland emerged from the last world war with its economy unscathed, its
tradition of value-added, high-tech export gave Swiss industry enormous
competitive advantage over other war-torn economies. In today's
post-industrial world, of course, competitive high-technology production is
found around the globe. Foreign gains have become Swiss losses.
Similarly, initial post-war prosperity and stability made Switzerland the
international banking and investment centre of choice, and it remained so
for decades. But many developments - the growth of other financial centres
equally stable and profitable, revolutions such as London's 'Big Bang',
offshore banking and easy access to world-wide markets and services - have
all reduced Switzerland's unique appeal.
In international relations, Switzerland's primary role as a strictly neutral
mediator between cold war adversaries has collapsed. If the US and the
Soviet Union were once a mother and father that nourished Switzerland in a
global role, they have left it an orphan. It now struggles with other
international conference centres offering cheaper facilities.
Domestically, too, Swiss institutions are failing to meet modern needs. In
the past, a strong sense of civic responsibility made the Swiss process of
government by consensus responsive and workable. Local, cantonal and
national decision-making though consensus, through committee and through a
highly evolved system of referenda made every Swiss - or at least every
Swiss male - a true democrat. Today, partly because of growing cynicism over
a number of government scandals, only 30 to 40 per cent of Swiss regularly
bother to vote.
Nor does the system respond efficiently to the speed of change Europe is
seeing today - tiny minorities entitled to call a referendum can block the
political process; politicians in Switzerland are still part-time and cannot
devote their full energies to office; and the exhaustive popular
consultative process that underlies legislation is too slow and drawn out to
be effective. Both economically and politically, Switzerland's clockwork is
ever more out of kilter with the world around it.
Synchronisation would return, say more outward-looking Swiss, if Switzerland
threw in its lot with the rest of Europe. But arguments based on economic
rationality make few inroads in Inner Switzerland, the conservative and
isolationist Swiss-German heart of the country.
In its farmyards, small businesses and rural communities Brussels, unwelcome
as it is foreign, is seen as a distant, imperial enemy whose bureaucratic
decrees would destroy local decision-making and the Swiss way of life. The
Swiss here see not only their jealously guarded institutions under threat,
but their livelihood as well: they are afraid that EC controls on
agricultural subsidies would eliminate age-old but now uneconomic and
heavily protected small-scale farming.
The ideological differences separating traditional Switzerland from the
Switzerland of the pro-European periphery are large and growing. There are
now fears for the future unity of the Swiss Confederation.
'If the results of the December 6 referendum are split along French and
German ethnic lines, we will have tension and possibly a separatist movement
to contend with', predicts Roger de Weck, editor of the Tages Anzeiger,
Switzerland's largest German-language newspaper. 'We are not a liberal
country, but a radical country. We have imposed order and compromise because
we have had a bloody history. Tensions which are now under control could
explode.'
It is in such references to history as Roger de Weck's that the most
profound responses to European integration lie. Officially, political debate
over future relations with Brussels is couched in the language of logic and
reason. But lying behind these arguments are illogical, instinctive
attachments to race, culture, nation and to the inbred traditions of
history.
It is the battle between market logic and these powerful atavistic forces
that give such unpredictable direction to European unification efforts. The
struggle in Switzerland between head and heart, between economic opportunity
and separate political identity is particularly poignant because until now
no such choice has been necessary - in the past these have not been
contradictory ideals. On the contrary, they underlay the Swiss view of the
world.
Self-reliance and suspicion of outsiders is the hallmark of mountain people
everywhere; an unforgiving environment leaves no room for chance or
risk-taking. In the case of Switzerland, a tiny state without natural
frontiers, the hostile designs of powerful foreign neighbours - the Habsburg
empire, royalist France, Napoleonic France, and Nazi Germany were but a few
 -have added to native conservatism a deep-seated sense of national
vulnerability.
The internal ethnic and religious disputes, often bloody, that have emerged
time and again between Swiss of German, French and Italian culture over its
700-year history have only added to Switzerland's sense of its own
fragility. Swiss folk heroes like William Tell are not bold, aggressive
conquerors; they struggle for a Switzerland that is peaceful, self-reliant,
and above all, free of foreign entanglements.
It was this mental make-up of vulnerability that gave birth to many of the
country's unique political views and institutions - its reluctance to
resolve problems through direct confrontation; its mistrust of central
authority, extremism and heavy-handed leadership; its intentionally weak
federal government; its local decision-making and popular voting system.
At the same time, however, Switzerland has been forced to go to the outside
world to make its living. Landlocked and with no natural resources of its
own, fearful for its fragile, institutions, Switzerland adopted a policy of
strict neutrality, killing two birds with one stone: political isolation
gave it the right to trade with any nation, but no nation the right to
intrude in Swiss affairs.
For much of its history Switzerland profitably marketed to all and sundry
the only commodity it possessed - high quality professional mercenaries.
Neutrality giving it the peace it needed to enjoy the fruits of war,
Switzerland participated impartially in almost every European conflict for
several centuries. Precision machinery, pharmaceuticals and luxury goods
replaced mercenaries in the 19th century, but the strategy remained the
same.
Given its historical duality, is it any wonder that the Swiss are having
difficulty in finding their place in the new Europe? In the past,
reconciling inward-looking politics and an outward-looking economy presented
no problem. Today it does, and the future of Switzerland depends on the
resolution of a profound ambivalence.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3752</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Somalia firefight a deadly omen for US troops
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JULIAN OZANNE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOGADISHU
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A FATAL firefight erupted yesterday between United Nations troops and a band
of gunmen at the international airport in Mogadishu in a foretaste of the
anarchic violence that US troops will have to face when they intervene in
Somalia.
Pakistani troops in UN blue helmets let off bursts of machine gunfire at
gunmen in a 'Mad Max' customised truck which careered across the runway,
disrupting the airport's operation. One Somali gunman was killed in the
incident.
Securing the airport will be the first military objective of the
1,800-strong advance party of US Marines waiting offshore to advance into
the war-blasted capital to begin one of the biggest military interventions
undertaken in Africa and the biggest humanitarian operation launched since
the Iraqi-Kurdish initiative. There are an estimated 1.5 million Somalis
facing death from starvation.
The Marine operation will begin with a helicopter and amphibious landing in
Mogadishu from a US flotilla which was sighted for the first time yesterday
off the Somali coast.
The first Marine landing is expected early next week, preparing the way for
a much larger force. US military officials now concede it could grow to
between 28,000 and 35,000 soldiers and support staff because of Somalia's
nightmarish logistics.
Sporadic shots rang out across the rubble-strewn capital last night but
observers say heavy fighting has stopped as the anxious Somali nation awaits
the US intervention with a mixture of resignation and relief.
Even excitement was apparent among some Somalis, who believe that there are
large sums of money to be extracted from the US operation. Aid workers and
others in Mogadishu yesterday continued to express deep reservation about
the optimistic assessments of US officials about the speed with which they
expect to secure the airport and port and establish safe corridors for food
aid.
'If the Yanks think they can dash in here like the cavalry and clean this
mess up in a matter of weeks, we are all in for deep trouble,' said a
long-serving UN officer. Experts say that, even without any large-scale
military resistance, getting food to the worst-affected areas of the Jubba
Valley and the towns of Bardera and Baidoa is going to require a big
logistics operation and a long-term commitment.
General Mohamed Aideed, Somalia's fiercest warlord, was still said to be
massing an assortment of vehicles and a ragtag army of gunmen in Baidoa
yesterday to launch an offensive aimed at retaking Bardera which he lost to
forces loyal to former President Siad Barre.
Many Somalis believe the general is desperate to seize the town before US
troops arrive.
A final foreign fray, Page 7 Bush orders troops in, Page 22
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3753</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / UK snubbed over plan to end EC deadlock
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL and LIONEL BARBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN, BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN is hoping that Franco-German diplomatic efforts to break the
deadlock over the European Community budget will pave the way for an
agreement at next week's Edinburgh summit.
But fresh doubts arose last night about prospects for resolving other issues
at the summit after five Christian Democratic leaders in Europe, including
Chancellor Helmut Kohl of Germany, declared that a British compromise to
meet Danish demands for exemptions from the Maastricht Treaty was not
acceptable.
The hard line signalled tough bargaining between Denmark and its European
partners over the next few days. Without a resolution of the Danish
question, senior diplomats predicted the summit would end in failure.
Earlier in talks that took place in Bonn, Mr Kohl and French president
Francois Mitterrand threw their weight behind the British presidency's
urgent efforts to negotiate a complex deal to ensure a successful summit.
This includes extra EC finances and a rapid start to talks with new member
states.
'The fundamental idea must be that this is a Community of solidarity,' said
Mr Kohl. That meant not just solidarity between the northern states and the
Mediterranean countries, but equally with the new applicants in northern
Europe and with the emerging democracies of eastern Europe.
Mr Kohl said a deal on future financing was essential for overall agreement
in Edinburgh, and hinted strongly at a willingness to move towards Spanish
demands for generous funds to help the weaker economies.
Spain has led a loose coalition of poorer EC countries such as Ireland and
Portugal in a protest against UK proposals to limit future EC financing and
scale back 'cohesion' funds agreed under the Maastricht treaty.
A senior UK official in Brussels last night described Spain's position as
crucial for a budget compromise. 'Their position is important and absolutely
understandable,' the official said.
Spain yesterday gave a lukewarm reception to Britain's proposals for solving
the Danish problem. 'We are reserving our opinion at least until the foreign
ministers' 'conclave' on December 8,' said a Foreign Affairs ministry
spokeswoman.
Madrid has expressed anger at Britain's reduction in proposed cohesion funds
which were a central part of the Maastricht treaty.
But the UK continued to stress that it would not agree to a reduction in the
British rebate, worth about Pounds 3bn a year - despite a chorus of
opposition from other EC member states.
Christian Democrats attack Maastricht compromise, Page 2
Hopes for trade accord, Page 3
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3754</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Bush orders 28,000 troops into Somalia to aid relief
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT George Bush yesterday ordered 28,000 US troops into Somalia to
bring relief to the country's starving population in an operation dubbed
Restore Hope.
Marines will fly in early next week, securing the capital, Mogadishu, and an
inland airfield for a massive UN military airlift to the country, said Mr
Dick Cheney, defence secretary.
'We are prepared for hostilities should they occur . . . and if necessary to
take pre-emptive action,' he said.
In a televised address, Mr Bush said he wanted to create a secure
environment and open the supply routes so food could be moved into the areas
of Somalia worst hit by famine.
Once that was accomplished the US would withdraw its own troops and hand
over the security operation to a UN peacekeeping force, Mr Bush said. 'Make
no mistake about it, we and our allies will make sure that aid goes
through.'
On Thursday evening the US was given the go-ahead by a unanimous UN Security
Council vote authorising the use of a multinational force composed mainly of
US troops to protect the distribution of aid in Somalia.
French president Francois Mitterrand said yesterday that France would send
1,500-2,000 troops. An Italian contingent, estimated by newspapers at 2,000,
would join the force, said Italy's foreign minister, Mr Emilio Colombo.
Belgium will send 550 paratroopers and Canada 900 troops. Pakistani prime
minister Nawaz Sharif said Islamabad was willing to send more troops to join
the 500 already there.
Britain is likely to offer the use of transport aeroplanes, the Defence
Ministry said.
The operation may open a new chapter both for UN intervention in the
internal affairs of member nations and for the US in its role as the world's
sole remaining superpower.
The humanitarian operation to help the Kurds in Iraq after the Gulf war
provides some precedent for a US military relief operation. American troops,
however, have not been deployed in such numbers before without any reference
to national security interests.
President-elect Bill Clinton had earlier called the UN approval of a US-led
force an 'historic and welcome step', and commended Mr Bush for 'taking the
lead in this important humanitarian effort'.
Some Clinton advisers, however, appeared concerned that the operation would
not be over by the time he takes office on January 20, and that his
administration would be left to extricate the US from Somalia.
Although Mr Bush would prefer to have US troops home before he hands over to
Mr Clinton, Pentagon officials said they were more likely to stay two to
three months. Some congressmen, from both parties, are also worried that the
US's commitment could turn out to be too broad and ill-defined.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3755</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Channel 5 TV consortium meets deadline on funding
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A NEW national television channel looked increasingly likely last night
after Channel Five Holdings, the only bidder for the franchise, met a
critical deadline on funding.
The Independent Television Commission confirmed that documents showing at
least 70 per cent of the project was financed had been delivered at 5.30pm.
A decision on whether or not to award the franchise will be taken by the ITC
on December 17.
It is believed that in addition to Thames Television, the main driving force
behind Channel Five Holdings, the project has the backing of Time Warner,
the world's largest media group. Pearson, owner of the Financial Times, has
also written to the ITC saying that it would like to invest in Channel 5.
The new channel will be capable of reaching up to 70 per cent of the UK
population, but before it goes on air millions of video recorders have to be
retuned. Many are tuned to the frequency that Channel 5 will use and will
suffer interference.
Channel Five Holdings was the only bidder for the franchise, and was thus
able to bid the minimum Pounds 1,000 a year. Unlike most ITV companies it
will not have to pay an additional levy on advertising revenues.
The consortium, which needs to raise about Pounds 150m, plans to launch a
series of city-based stations starting with London as early as next July.
The format will be influenced by Toronto's City-TV channel, with emphasis on
local news, films and music.
If the ITC gives the go ahead, ITV's London companies Carlton Television and
London Weekend Television will be the first to face competition for
advertising revenues. However it will need to be convinced that the retuning
can be successfully carried out before deciding to award the franchise.
Developments in the method of broadcasting, which it is claimed will greatly
reduce the need for new aerials, have increased confidence in the new
channel.
Channel Five Holdings hopes to take the concept of City-TV to other UK
cities such as Manchester, Birmingham and Glasgow throughout the decade in
co-operation with local partners. The channel would also be broadcast by the
Astra satellite, giving immediate access to 3m homes.
ITV in competition row, Page 4
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3756</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Amstrad
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Alan Sugar looks likely to get a well-deserved bloody nose. He can hardly
be surprised. His offer for Amstrad combines the worst features of a
management buy-out with a disclosure level inadequate even in less
compromising situations. Shareholders can congratulate themselves on
striking a blow for corporate governance. But after that, what next? There
is not much hope of a higher offer. Outside directors might prevent further
embarrassment. They could not be expected to wring full value from the
assets. One has to hope Mr Sugar will do that job himself. Judging by the
rock-solid share price, he has convinced the market that Amstrad is worth
more than just principles.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3757</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Wassall/Evode
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The 40 per cent jump in Evode's profits raises the suspicion that it must
have pulled out all the stops to fend off Wassall's bid. But since the
annual results were set in ink before the predator even surfaced the more
reasonable impression is that of the real recovery among some of its
businesses.
This may make the takeover battle more bruising than was at first imagined,
although it is unlikely to preserve Evode's independence. The company's
insipid trading record and precarious debt structure have left it with few
friends in the City. And with the shares unchanged at 91p yesterday, the
market seemed to keep the invitation open to Wassall  - especially if it
digs deeper into its pockets and lifts its 80p bid.
Evode's best hope of escaping Wassall's clutches must surely lie in a white
knight. Logic - and the curious emergence of Wasserstein Perella on the
defence team - suggests that one could come from the US, where low borrowing
costs and the high dollar would add to the attractions of such a deal.
Whichever way, Evode's shareholders would not lose. Rather than overpay,
Wassall could walk away to stalk another prey. How Hanson must yearn for
those early years when its shares were as highly rated as Wassall's and the
range of targets was as great.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3758</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Abbey National
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Abbey National did the decent thing by waiting until its downgrading had
been announced by Moody's before launching yesterday's Pounds 103m share
placement. Just the same it has netted a handsome price. Its shares have
risen more than 40 per cent since September's devaluation, which makes one
wonder whether, like HSBC last month, it has chosen a high point on which to
raise some cash.
Though falling interest rates have made for a wider retail margin, this may
not be so easy to maintain once interest rates have stopped declining. And
the overall group margin will fall this year, thanks to the Abbey's
increasing involvement in treasury business and the effect of lower interest
rates on its free capital. Falling house prices mean second-half provisions
will be higher than the first half's Pounds 138m. They could still be high
next year as rising unemployment continues to depress the housing market.
All of which limits Abbey's growth prospects, in spite of its undoubted
basic strength.
On a historic multiple around 13, Abbey is still trading at a discount to
the market, but the yield of 3.8 per cent looks skimpy. As for the the
proceeds of yesterday's issue, the new accounting rules may mean the profit
has to be taken above the line, but the longer-term benefit to earnings will
still be marginal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3759</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: A sterling shine
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Sterling's recovery this week is one of those developments which has the
markets scrabbling for justification after the event. It may be that much of
the gain - the currency briefly hit DM2.50 yesterday - simply reflects
short-covering ahead of the year-end. But one cannot ignore the less
technical explanations. With the German economy weakening fast and strains
within the ERM continuing, there is some prospect of lower interest rates in
Europe before too long. In that case, sterling's interest rate disadvantage
could be set to dwindle.
Narrow money supply growth is accelerating and there is tentative evidence -
fuelled yesterday by November's higher new car sales - that the economic
situation is not as hopeless as it seemed a month ago. Against that
backdrop, the argument for further sharp base rate cuts, perhaps to 5 per
cent, is losing force. True, there may be room for another cut in the new
year. But whereas the exchange rate no longer restricts monetary policy,
domestic constraints are becoming more apparent.
This is a mixed blessing for financial markets. Gilts were buoyed yesterday
by sterling's strength, but low yields and a currency at the top of its
range are hardly a good starting point for funding next year's borrowing
requirement. Equities at least have the recovery story to play with.
Significantly, though, companies reporting this week - from Bass to Hanson
and Royal Bank of Scotland - were cautious on the UK outlook. The recovery
thus looks weak and patchy. Equities may not have much headroom left.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3760</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Dow advances on positive jobs
data
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
US share prices edged higher across the board following the publication of
jobs data that provided more positive news on the economy, writes Patrick
Harverson in New York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was up 12.15 at 3,288.68, more
than 10 points below its highs for the day. The more broadly based Standard
&amp; Poor's 500 also ended firmer, up 2.17 at 432.08, an all-time high, while
the Amex composite added 1.27 to 394.95 and the Nasdaq composite put on 5.24
to 661.60, another new record close. Turnover on the NYSE was 228m shares,
and rises outpaced declines by 991 to 759.
The November employment report proved better than expected, with the labor
department announcing that non-farm payrolls climbed 105,000 last month and
that the national unemployment rate dropped from 7.4 per cent to 7.2 per
cent. Although the figures came with some qualifications - non-farm
payrolls, for example, were boosted by 45,000 temporary government jobs
related to the election - the underlying employment picture shows that
labour market conditions are improving.
Investors were initially reluctant to embrace the data wholeheartedly,
primarily because of concerns that the combination of a reviving business
cycle and aggressive fiscal stimuli from President-elect Bill Clinton could
lead to an overheated economy, rising inflation and high interest rates.
Consequently, buying was restricted to growth stocks in the secondary
market. By early afternoon, however, demand for blue chips had begun to pick
up, with sentiment aided by a surprisingly positive reaction to the economic
news from the Treasury market, where bond prices rose.
Among individual stocks, General Motors climbed Dollars 1 1/8 to Dollars 33
7/8 in turnover of 3.7m shares as investors continued to welcome its
cost-cutting measures and massive corporate restructuring. GM announced
plans to close nine plants on Thursday and cut 18,000 jobs, news which
overshadowed the day's car sales data which showed GM's market share
slipping. The rest of the sector was also firmer, with Chrysler up Dollars 1
1/4 at Dollars 31 5/8 and Ford Dollars 1 higher at Dollars 43.
Dayton Hudson dropped Dollars 1 7/8 to Dollars 75 1/4 as selling continued
in the wake of the retailer's recent poor November same-store sales figures.
Other retailers were in mixed form because of the sales data, with Gap
Stores down Dollars 1 3/8 at Dollars 33 7/8 , Kmart up Dollars  3/8 at
Dollars 26 1/4 and Woolworth up Dollars  1/2 to Dollars 33.
On the Nasdaq market, Intelligent Electronics jumped Dollars 1 3/4 to
Dollars 11 5/8 on the news that a unit of K Mart is to buy the company's
Bizmart subsidiary for Dollars 270m.
Canada
TORONTO share prices ended the week on a winning note, posting a solid gain
in yet another day of extremely active trading.
According to preliminary data, the TSE-300 composite index was up 24.51
points, or 0.75 per cent, to 3289.42, for a gain on the week of about 12
points.
Advancing issues led declines 322 to 258.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3761</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
GOLD shares eased after Thursday's gains. The index fell 20 to 885 with De
Beers down 75 cents to R57.25. A firmer financial rand weighed on some
shares and the overall index lost 15 to 3,241. Industrials rose 10 to 4,268.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3762</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Bourses ease back after an
eventful week
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BOURSES were mostly easier after an eventful week, writes Our Markets Staff.
FRANKFURT fell on the publication of bad west German industrial orders data
which showed a fall for the eighth consecutive month. The DAX index, which
closed down 10.34 at 1,522.16, was barely changed on the week following a
good performance on Monday. Turnover dropped slightly to DM4.4bn from
DM4.7bn.
The industrial orders figures, down some 9 per cent from a year earlier,
re-emphasised the parlous state of the economy and gave further support to
those calling for an early easing in interest rates.
Stocks were broadly weaker on this news while special features affected
others. Volkswagen slipped a further DM3.80 to DM249.50, for a fall of 6.5
per cent on the week, after the group said that it would be holding a
extraordinary supervisory board meeting next month. Some analysts believe
that the vehicle manufacturer will be forced to implement drastic
rationalisation measures since it faces a sharp deterioration in earnings.
Deutsche Bank, expected to report 10-month figures on Tuesday, weakened DM4
to DM665. An analyst at Robert Fleming in London expects Deutsche to report
the worst results of the big three banks in spite of curbing its lending
growth. Dresdner Bank lost DM1.50 to DM352.50 ahead of its results, due on
Monday.
PARIS eased as several leading stocks came under pressure. The CAC-40 index
ended 17.75 down at 1,781.68 but was 1.8 per cent higher on the week.
Turnover slipped back to FFr2.2bn.
Carrefour ended FFr135 or 5.5 per cent lower at FFr2,303 after the
supermarket group announced a fall in November sales which put its full-year
forecasts into doubt.
LVMH dropped FFr119 or 3.1 per cent to FFr3,690 on reports that a London
broker had downgraded its forecast for Guinness, with which it has a
cross-shareholding.
Lafarge fell as low as FFr309.10 on rumours, later denied by the company,
that it was considering an issue of dollar-denominated convertible bonds.
The shares recovered to close down FFr9 at FFr317.
Elsewhere, Peugeot was knocked back in late trading to close FFr15 or 2.8
per cent down at FFr523.
MILAN fell on position-squaring ahead of the long weekend. The market is
closed on Tuesday for a national holiday and although it is open on Monday,
many players are expected to be absent. The Comit index fell 2.91 to 423.55,
down 4.3 per cent on the week, in turnover estimated at less than Thursday's
L252.7bn.
A resurgence of rumours that it was to be sold spurred Rinascente up by L453
or 6.7 per cent to L7,185. Trading in the privatisation stock Credito
Italiano was also lively, adding L42 or 1.5 per cent to L2,770.
The hotel group Ciga rebounded by L122 or 13.6 per cent to L1,020 after its
sharp fall earlier this week. But Ciga's majority shareholder, Fimpar, owned
by the Aga Khan, finally settled at L455, down L93 or 17 per cent, after
being delayed from trading because of excessive declines.
Generali, which announced that premium income rose 13.4 per cent in the
first nine months of 1992, fell L280 to L27,460.
AMSTERDAM's CBS Tendency index closed unchanged at 105.6 but was down 2.3
per cent on the week.
Daf remained in the limelight after Thursday's news of further restructuring
measures, but its shares were unchanged at Fl 6.20 as analysts took the view
that the group's fight for survival was still in the balance.
Amev and ING lost Fl 1.90 and 20 cents respectively to Fl 60.40 and Fl 49.40
after publication of their nine-month results on Thursday.
MADRID firmed slightly ahead of the weekend as the general index gained 0.74
to 212.14, a rise of 1.4 per cent on the week. News that Grupo Torras, the
Spanish holding company of the KIO, was filing for receivership weighed on
affiliated industrial companies, including Ebro which shed Pta105 or 10 per
cent to Pta860.
Repsol firmed Pta50 at Pta2,625 as investors decided that it might not be
liable for clean-up costs linked to the spillage of crude oil into the sea
off northern Spain after a tanker it had chartered ran aground on Thursday.
STOCKHOLM dropped 2.1 per cent in a continued downward correction to its
post-devaluation rally. The Affarsvarlden general index ended 18.2 lower at
864.4, down 2.3 per cent on the week, in turnover of SKr727m.
Trading focused on the ball-bearings group SKF after rumours that Incentive
would acquire SKF. Turnover in SKF shares was usually heavy at SKr102m with
the B shares closing unchanged at SKr80.
ZURICH firmed slightly ahead of Sunday's referendum on Switzerland's
membership of the EEA. The SMI index added 6.4 to 1,935.0, up 1.1 per cent
on the week.
ISTANBUL's 75-share index closed down 30.33 at 3,891.55 despite a decline in
November inflation.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE ACTUARIES SHARE INDICES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
December 4                                         THE EUROPEAN SERIES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                            Open       10.30      11.00      12.00
FT-SE Eurotrack 100      1051.92     1051.66    1051.37    1050.98
                           13.00       14.00      15.00      Close
FT-SE Eurotrack 100      1051.65     1051.97    1052.54    1052.78
                            Open       10.30      11.00      12.00
FT-SE Eurotrack 200      1133.29     1134.83    1135.64    1135.02
                           13.00       14.00      15.00      Close
FT-SE Eurotrack 200      1134.17     1134.27    1133.48    1133.53
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                        Dec 3     Dec 2     Dec 1    Nov 30    Nov 27
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100   1055.11   1052.11   1056.79   1057.75   1049.92
FT-SE Eurotrack 200   1136.09   1130.96   1135.62   1132.14   1122.37
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value 1000 (26/10/90) High/day: 100 - 1053.13; 200 - 1136.98
Low/day: 100 - 1050.54  200 - 1131.05
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3763</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets: Australian bulls pay for misplaced
hopes - The economy let them down
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
It has not been a good year for bulls in Australia. Time and again, brokers
have forecast a sustained rally, only to retreat hurriedly as the All
Ordinaries index resumed its downward trend.
At yesterday's close of 1,435.2, the index was 13.1 per cent lower than at
the end of last year, and down more than 37 per cent since the all-time high
of 2,300 in October 1987.
The bulls have reason to feel hard done by. Most of the misplaced optimism
was based on slowly improving economic fundamentals following Australia's
emergence from recession in the last quarter of 1991.
As the federal government keeps pointing out, Australia's economic cycle is
ahead of most of the rest of the world, and its annualised GDP growth rate
of 2.1 per cent is now one of the fastest in the OECD.
But the market has remained stubbornly unmoved, in spite of three cuts in
official interest rates and a substantial fiscal boost delivered in two
expansionary economic statements earlier this year.
With the benefit of hindsight, the lack of response suggests that the market
had fully discounted the prospects of a return to economic growth by the end
of last year.
Investors may have been disappointed by the slower-than-forecast pace of
recovery, and disturbed by the signs of impending currency and current
account difficulties which have accompanied it.
They may also have been put off by the sea of red ink which has spilled from
the books of most of Australia's big companies as the impact of the 18-month
recession works its way through the accounts.
Hardly a corner of the economy has emerged unscathed. Of the 24 sectoral
indices quoted by the Australian Stock Exchange, only three are higher than
at the end of last year. And two of those - chemicals and property trusts -
have barely moved.
The only real success story has been the media index, which is up more than
50 per cent, mainly because of a spectacular improvement in the share price
of News Corporation, Mr Rupert Murdoch's newspapers, film and broadcasting
group.
The media index has also been helped by the performance of John Fairfax, the
newspaper group controlled by Mr Conrad Black's Daily Telegraph group, and
Nine Network, the television group controlled by Mr Kerry Packer.
Significantly all three groups are recovering from earlier reverses.
However, the media index makes up only about 9 per cent of the All
Ordinaries index, and its performance has been overshadowed by the collapse
elsewhere in the market.
The gold index is down more than 11 per cent, diversified resources 26 per
cent, developers and contractors 26 per cent, building materials 23 per
cent, transport 23 per cent, banking and finance 25 per cent, and alcohol
and tobacco 37 per cent.
There are some hopeful signs for the future. The Australian dollar has
declined by more than 13 per cent this year on a trade weighted basis, which
makes local stocks cheaper for overseas buyers.
Corporate net profits increased by 26 per cent in the three months to the
end of September, to a level 37 per cent above the low point of the
recession in mid-1990.
However, earnings before interest, tax and depreciation rose by only 6.4 per
cent, suggesting that most of the improvement in net profits flowed from
lower interest rates and cost cutting, rather than higher sales or margins.
Apart from the media groups, few major companies made an unambiguous return
to the good financial health in the full-year reporting season which ended
last month.
Exceptions included Broken Hill Proprietary, Australia's biggest company;
Amcor, the packaging and paper group; CSR, the sugar and building materials
producer; and Mayne Nickless, the transport, security and health group.
But many big companies continued to disappoint, including TNT and Brambles,
the transport groups; the miners CRA and North Broken Hill Peko; Goodman
Fielder Wattie, Australasia's largest food producer; and Pacific Dunlop, the
diversified manufacturer.
Worst of all, the banking sector is still showing the strains of recession
and falling property prices. The conservatively-managed National Australia
Bank produced an improvement, but Commonwealth, Westpac and ANZ all reported
disappointing or disastrous results.
The market was also badly hit in October by Westpac's ADollars 1.2bn
fully-underwritten rights issue, which closed 72 per cent undersubscribed,
leaving millions of unwanted shares overhanging the market.
In the absence of an unexpected acceleration of economic recovery, the
market is likely to mark time over the next few months in the hope of
improved results in the interim reporting season beginning in February.
The more optimistic bulls are still forecasting the long-delayed rally,
which some claim could take the index to 1,800 by the middle of next year.
But nervous investors should be aware that bears are tipping a floor of
1,250 before a sustained recovery begins.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3764</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Hong Kong rebounds by 5
per cent
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SHARE prices rose marginally in low volume as reports of negative third
quarter GNP growth dampened activity ahead of the weekend, writes Emiko
Terazono in Tokyo.
The Nikkei average closed up 35.61 to 17,265.69, a 1.1 per cent gain on the
week, after fluctuating within a narrow band of 17,186.86 and 17,301.10 on
small-lot profit-taking and light buying by public funds.
Volume fell to 180m shares from 242m, dropping below 200m shares for the
first time since November 24 as dealers refrained from trading. Some
observers attributed the lack of activity to a mandatory exam for brokers
this weekend, set by the Japan Securities Dealers Association. Some 30,000
brokerage employees will be tested on the rules and laws governing the
securities business.
Declines outpaced advances by 541 to 398 with 190 issues unchanged. The
Topix index of all first section stocks fell 1.23 to 1,302.85 and in London,
the ISE/Nikkei 50 index added 0.74 to 1,050.81.
Investors failed to react to lower money market rates, due to worries over
deteriorating domestic economic conditions. Although negative growth in GNP
has raised hopes of an imminent cut in the official discount rate, traders
said that investors will wait for the Bank of Japan's quarterly survey of
business sentiment, out next week, before making any decisions.
A cut in the short-term prime rate by Sanwa Bank and hopes of lower interest
rates helped interest-rate sensitive stocks. Nippon Steel was the day's most
active issue, rising Y2 to Y295, while NKK advanced Y4 to Y256.
High-technology shares were lower on profit-taking, with NEC down Y9 to Y650
and Sony retreating Y50 to Y4,050.
Dealers flocked to stocks related to MRSA, a new virus contracted mainly in
hospitals. Morinaga Milk Industry, which surged on Thursday on reports of
research into a steriliser against MRSA, was traded actively but closed Y9
lower at Y691 on profit-taking.
In Osaka, the OSE average fell 48.53 to 18,670.07 in volume of 22.5m shares.
Profit-taking depressed Shimano, the bicycle parts maker, Y40 to Y1,830, and
Nintendo lost Y100 to Y11,000.
Roundup
HONG KONG recovered some of the week's losses but analysts warned that the
market was still very nervous. Manila was closed for a public holiday.
HONG KONG leapt 5 per cent at the opening in a technical reaction to
Thursday's steep fall, but activity levelled off by midsession with the Hang
Seng index closing 289.89 higher at 5,268.10. The market has lost some 12
per cent on the week following tension between China and Britain over the
future of democracy in the colony.
Among the most actives, HSBC rose HKDollars 4 to HKDollars 55, Cheung Kong
added 60 cents to HKDollars 18.60 and Hang Seng Bank was up HKDollars 3.75
at HKDollars 47.50.
BANGKOK weakened on rumours, later denied, that two major property groups
were facing bankruptcy charges in Hong Kong. The SET index fell 8.26 to
860.33, a 1 per cent decline on the week, in turnover of Bt4bn.
The rumours caused sales of Bangkok Land, down Bt3 at Bt95, and Tanayong
which fell by its 10 per cent limit to Bt72 before ending down Bt4.50 at
Bt75.
SINGAPORE eased in late profit-taking as investors switched their attention
to Hong Kong. The Straits Times industrial index lost 5.64 to 1,442.70,
barely changed on the week, as volume declined to 74m shares from 86.6m.
SEOUL fell for the fourth consecutive day as investors remained nervous
about the forthcoming presidential elections. The composite index shed 3.65
to 635.28, a 2.4 per cent fall on the week.
TAIWAN rose on bargain-hunting and the weighted index rose 37.31 to
3,651.39, up 0.8 per cent on the week, in turnover of TDollars 5.8bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3765</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity Futures and Options Trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ACTIVITY in derivatives markets died away somewhat yesterday, although
traders in stock index futures reported continued rolling-over of positions
in the FT-SE futures from the December to the March contract, writes Terry
Byland.
Some interest from US sources was identified in the index futures but this
was not enough to counter-balance profit-taking pressures from UK market
specialists. At the official close of the session, December showed only the
barest premium against the cash market and later dealings saw only a modest
increase in the premium. However, strategists expressed satisfaction with
the outcome of the day's trading which was regarded as a pause for
profit-taking.
Similar trends were evident in traded options, where overall volume dipped
from 32,955 contracts to 23,446 but business in the FT-SE contract increased
 -11,584 contracts against 10,374.
Hanson headed the stocks list with 1,684 contracts trading as investors took
a fresh look at the profit figures.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3766</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equities unruffled by profit-takers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PROFIT-TAKERS were that little more forceful in the UK stock market
yesterday as the first leg of the trading account came to a close. Some
sizeable lines of stock came on offer and the fall of 11.6 on the FT-SE
Index would have been around seven points greater had it not been for a
strong performance from Glaxo as the shares celebrated approval from the US
authorities of Imigran, its migraine treatment.
Traders sounded undismayed, however, pointing out that most of the selling
came in stocks such as ICI, Hanson and Reuters where investors have
significant profits to take. Stock index futures gave a less positive guide
but traders continued to roll positions over into the March contract which
becomes the market leader at the end of this month.
Economic news during the day was relatively positive, with new car sales in
the UK higher in November and the latest employment data from the US bearing
out the recent indications of improved manufacturing activity. It was also
disclosed that the US and the European Community had signed agreements on
farm trade. But the UK stock market was preoccupied with its own concerns,
paying little attention to the continued firmness in sterling.
Government bonds rallied from early falls to close only a shade off.
Equities opened firmer, largely reflecting the predicted rally in Hong Kong,
but soon turned down as two selling programmes appeared on the trading
screens. The market quickly dipped by 14.8 to FT-SE 2,756.2, but this proved
the low of the day.
Shares hung fire for the rest of the day drawing little inspiration from a
slow start on Wall Street where the Dow gained only 4 points in UK hours.
The final reading showed the FT-SE Index at 2,759.4 for a net fall of 11.6,
making a loss of less than one Footsie point over the week. Interest in
second line issues re-appeared yesterday, lifting the FT-SE Mid 250 Index by
6.3 points.
Lines of shares offered found a ready reception among marketmakers anxious
to attract some stock.
Seaq-reported trading volume remained fairly at 676.1m shares compared with
669.5m in the previous session. Thursday's retail business increased to a
worth of Pounds 1.49bn, one of the best daily totals since the present
advance in the market commenced in mid-September when sterling made its
hasty exit from the European exchange rate system.
Retail turnover has remained above last year's daily averages, in spite of
the apparent slowdown in the stock market this week.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3767</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: Second view on Hanson
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER JOHN and JOEL KIBAZO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FURTHER consideration of Hanson's results prompted a slide in the stock,
finally 8 1/2 off at 227 1/2 p on very heavy turnover of 24m. The slide in
London followed exceptionally heavy trade in the US overnight.
Initial reaction to the full-year profits on Thursday was that the figures
were less disappointing than expected. However, the meeting with analysts,
which ended too late to affect Thursday's share prices, raised questions
about the high level of provisions and the revaluation of Hanson's UK
aggregates business. As City analysts circulated their research views to
clients yesterday, both SG Warburg and BZW were believed to be expressing
reservations about the results.
Meanwhile, Hanson's broker, Hoare Govett, cut its 1993 profit forecast by
Pounds 25m to Pounds 1100m 'in the light of pressure on UK margins.' The new
figures are at the low end of the market's range of estimates.
Glaxo strong
The share price of Glaxo rose sharply ahead of the official opening of
trading in London yesterday after the drugs group disclosed late on Thursday
that the US Food and Drug Administration (FDA) had issued an 'approvable'
letter for Glaxo's Imigran migraine treatment, known in the US as Imitrex.
There was also positive recommendation from US analysts.
Glaxo was the most heavily traded stock in early dealing and closed 36
higher at 823p on final turnover of 7.6m shares. Had it not been for Glaxo's
strong performance the FT-SE 100 index would have been 18 points off on the
day.
The FDA is expected to grant final approval for injectable Imigran once
certain conditions are satisfied. Approval for the more lucrative tablet
version would probably follow shortly afterwards. Predictions for the profit
likely to be generated vary widely but UBS Phillip &amp; Drew has argued that
Imigran will achieve US sales of Pounds 550m by 1996.
Analysts said the announcement, though expected was nevertheless 'very good
news' and opened the door for further long-awaited approvals. Dealers added
that Smith Barney, the US house traditionally positive on Glaxo, was
reiterating its stance, arguing that there was Dollars 5 of upside in shares
traded in American Depositary Receipts form. However, Morgan Stanley lowered
its stance and the shares were weaker in New York after London closed last
night.
Bank stock placed
Shares in Abbey National were the most heavily traded in London yesterday as
two brokers placed nearly 29m Abbey shares at 360p each, raising Pounds 103m
for the bank.
Kleinwort Benson Securities which sold the shares with SG Warburg to a
number of institutions said the placing was carried out very quickly. The
underlying share price held up well in spite of a downgrading earlier in the
week from US credit rating agency Moody's. The stock represented part of the
shares not taken up after the company's flotation in 1989.
Further revision of the outlook for household products group Reckitt &amp;
Colman prompted the shares to fall 16 to 606p with 1.1m traded, heavy for
this stock.
Credit Lyonnais Laing brought its current-year forecast down to around
Pounds 245m, some Pounds 10m below the current range of estimates. Most
analysts have been gradually reducing their estimates as they perceive that
margins will remain restricted. Laing's pharmaceuticals analyst, Mr Mark
Brewer, said: 'There is no real fundamental problem with the company but
they don't see any sign of economic pick-up and are committed to spending in
order to build market share.'
A change of recommendation from US investment bank Lehman Brothers hit Grand
Metropolitan in the wake of the food and drinks group's announcement on
Thursday of disappointing full-year figures.
At worst, the shares were down 11 but bargain hunters helped bring a modest
rally and they closed 8 off at 420p. Lehman moved the stock from a buy to a
hold.
Water shares picked up after recent falls, helped by mildly encouraging
half-year results from Severn Trent. Severn rose 4 1/2 to 449 1/2 p and
Thames added 2 at 483p.
Food manufacturer Unilever was held back at first by reports of a line of
stock on the books of Kleinwort Benson Securities. The line was cleared
later in the day but the poor economic outlook throughout Europe continued
to weaken the shares, which fell 14 to 1052p.
The same economic worries prompted weakness in Cadbury Schweppes which eased
10 to 459p.
Several food retailers continued to rise on hopes of benefit from food price
rises. Traders also talked of stock shortage in the sector. Argyll added 5
to 393p, while Asda firmed 2 3/4 to 53 1/4 p. Kwik Save gained 9 to 751p,
and J. Sainsbury closed 7 ahead at 535p.
UBS Phillips &amp; Drew were reported to have been the day's main sellers of
Guinness and the shares gave up 9 to 525p, in trade of 2.2m. Wolverhampton &amp;
Dudley jumped 10 to 536p, after reporting a 6.6 per cent profits increase
and an 11 per cent improvement in the dividend.
Retailer Sears eased a penny to 96p on turnover of 6m shares after Nomura
cut its profits estimate for the group by Pounds 7.5m to Pounds 92.5m for
the current year, and by Pounds 9m to Pounds 116m for the following year.
The securities house said current trading was weaker than expected and
pointed out that the interest rate charge at Sears will rise as base rates
fall because of its a high proportion of fixed rate debt.
Suggestions of a better trading outlook helped Dixons buck the market trend
and gain 5 to 267p. The market appreciated the news that John Menzies had
decided to close its Early Learning operation in the US. The shares jumped
15 to 459p.
United Newspapers, which has risen in a straight line over the past two
weeks, gained 7 to 494p. SG Warburg has been pointing out the potential
impact on earnings per share from the redemption of a Pounds 105m Eurobond
issue. Redemption is expected before Christmas and Warburg says it will
boost share earnings by 22 per cent.
Stake building talk returned to Lonrho. The shares firmed 5 to 74p.
Reports of improved car sales benefited stocks in the motors sector,
including Lex Service which jumped 12 to 253p, and T &amp; N, up 7 at 155p.
Profit-taking in Siebe left the shares 11 down at 379p, on turnover of 2.2m.
The company reports interim figures on Tuesday and County NatWest predicts
profits of Pounds 85.5m against last year's Pounds 75.2m. British Aerospace
fell 8 to 134p, also on of profit-taking.
ICI suffered as UBS Phillips &amp; Drew brought back its forecasts in line with
the market and shifted its recommendation from buy to hold. UBS is looking
for Pounds 580m for this year and Pounds 700m for 1993 but still believes
the company will maintain its dividend next year. ICI fell 12 to 1036p.
In the transport sector, profit-taking and fears of write-downs in its
property subsidiary weakened P&amp;O, the shares falling 18 to 460p.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1992
NEW HIGHS (49).
BRITISH FUNDS (1) Treas. 8pc 2003, BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (1) Bulmer (HP),
BUILDING MATERIALS (1) Anglian, BUSINESS SERVICES (3) British Data Mngemt.,
Hays, Serco, CHEMICALS (1) Croda, CONGLOMERATES (1) Wassall, ELECTRICALS (1)
Volex, ELECTRONICS (1) Electrocomps, ENGINEERING AEROSPACE (1) Smith Inds.,
FOOD MANUFACTURING (1) Acatos &amp; Hutcheson, FOOD RETAILING (5) Argyll,
Iceland Frozen, Morrison (Wm), Do 5 1/4 pc Pf., Sainsbury, HEALTH &amp;
HOUSEHOLD (1) Huntleigh, HOTELS &amp; LEISURE (1) Manchester Utd., INSURANCE
LIFE (1) Transatlantic, INVESTMENT TRUSTS (9) Acorn, First Philippine,
Foreign &amp; Col. Enterprise, GT Venture, Gartmore Value Zero Pf., Mezzanine,
Murray Inc., Select Assets ULS '13, Do Series II, MEDIA (3) Central ITV,
Reuters, Utd. News., MISCELLANEOUS (3) Danka, Frost, Plantsbrook, OTHER
FINANCIAL (5) Caledonia Invs., Govett, Perpetual, S &amp; U, Smith New Court
Prf, OTHER INDUSTRIAL MATERIALS (1) McKechnie, PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING
(3) Dorling Kindersley, Elswick, Portals, STORES (1) Menzies (J), TEXTILES
(1) Stirling, TRANSPORT (3) BAA, Mersey Docks, Tibbett &amp; Britten.
NEW LOWS (33). AMERICANS (1) Amdahl, BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (1) Macdonald
Martin A, BUSINESS SERVICES (1) CRT, CHEMICALS (1) Caird 7p Cv. Pf. '09,
CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (1) Melville, ELECTRONICS (3) Graseby, P-E Intl.,
Prestwick, ENGINEERING GENERAL (4) Beauford, EIS, Hopkinsons, Wilkes (J),
FOOD MANUFACTURING (1) Sentry Farming, HOTELS &amp; LEISURE (3) Euro Disney,
Hi-Tec, Resort, INVESTMENT TRUSTS (3) Lon. &amp; Strathclyde, Jersey Phoenix
Wts., Murray European Wts., MEDIA (1) Osprey Comms., MISCELLANEOUS (1)
Nu-Swift, OIL &amp; GAS (1) Ranger, OTHER FINANCIAL (2) BWD, Baltic, OTHER
INDUSTRIAL MATERIALS (1) Baynes (C), PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING (1)
Stat-Plus, PROPERTY (3) Derwent Valley, High-Point, Prop. Partnership,
TEXTILES (1) Foster (J), MINES (3) Northam Platinum, Rand Mines, Renison.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3768</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Commodities (Week in the Markets): Oil slide worries Opec
ministers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD MOONEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE EXTENT of oil traders' disappointment with the production agreement
reached at the recent meeting of the Organisation of Petroleum Exporting
Country's in Vienna became clear this week as the slide in crude prices
accelerated.
The March delivery crude oil futures contract at London's International
Petroleum Exchange, which fell 41 US cents a barrel while the Opec meeting
was being held last week, slipped another 81 cents to Dollars 18.10 a barrel
at Thursday's close before steadying yesterday.
In view of the underlying weakness of the market traders had been hoping
that Opec ministers would agree a much bigger cut in pumping levels than the
effective 100,00 barrels a day reduction that emerged from last week's
meeting.
Alarmed at the continuing price fall Opec ministers tried to talk the market
up on Thursday, stressing that the 24.58m b/d supply level they had agreed
covered overall sales to the market and not just well-head production -
indicating that stocks would not be released if supply became tight this
winter. Their assurances achieved only a brief pause in the price slide,
however.
Traders said yesterday's steadier tone represented an end-of-week reaction
against the earlier steep fall.
At the London Metal Exchange base metals relinquished most of last week's
gains.
Copper traders tried to keep the rally going on Monday, but when that move
faltered the sellers quickly got the upper hand and the three months
position closed yesterday at Pounds 1,423.75 a tonne, down Pounds 50.50 on
the week. About Pounds 45 of the fall was a reflection of sterling's
strength against the dollar, however.
The currency factor was also a major contributor to weakness in the lead
market, the LME's other sterling-denominated contract. Three months lead
closed at Pounds 305.25 a tonne, down on the week by Pounds 16.25 or Dollars
10.50.
A sharp fall in nickel prices was in defiance of news of significant output
cuts by two major producers. On Monday Falconbridge, jointly owned by
Noranda of Canada and Trelleborg of Sweden, announced cuts in production
from its operations at Sudbury, Ontario, Norway and the Dominican Republic
that would reduce supply by 11,700 tonnes in 1993. That was on top of 7,000
tonnes of cuts announced last month. The scale of the cuts caught the market
unawares but was not sufficient to reverse the retracement from last week's
Dollars 600-a-tonne rise that was already under way. Neither were the bears
deflected from their purpose by Wednesday's news that Western Mining
Corporation of Australia was cutting nickel output by an estimated 2,000
tonnes in the year to the end of June.
With LME warehouse stocks of nickel remaining uncomfortably high and CIS
supplies continuing to flood into the western market traders believe nothing
short of a strong revival in demand from the stainless steel sector, the
biggest user of nickel, can bring a substantial revival in nickel prices -
and there is as yet no sign of that.
At yesterday's close the three months nickel price on the LME was quoted at
Dollars 5,630 a tonne, down Dollars 57.50 on the day and Dollars 380 on the
week.
The aluminium market proved more responsive to bullish production news when
Pechiney of France announced on Monday that it was closing permanently its
high-cost, 31,000-tonnes-a-year smelter at Venthon and reducing production
by 20 per cent at other operations - resulting in an overall cut in annual
output of 79,000 tonnes.
That pushed prices higher initially but was not enough to keep at bay the
selling that was afflicting other LME markets. Nevertheless aluminium got
off comparatively lightly with an Dollars 18 fall on the week to Dollars
1,201.50 a tonne for three months metal.
At the London Futures and Options Exchange robusta coffee prices benefited
from the strength of the New York arabica market and concern about technical
tightness developing around the March position, which closed at Dollars
1,010 a tonne, up Dollars 5 on the day and Dollars 34 on the week. The price
had reached a 10-month high of Dollars 1,014 a tonne earlier in the day.
International Coffee Organisation talks in London ended on Tuesday with the
extension of the deadline for renegotiating the International Coffee
Agreement for three months as the only definite development. But that came
as no surprise and did not dampen the more bullish mood that has
characterised the market recently.
 --------------------------------------
LME WAREHOUSE STOCKS
(As at Thursday's close)
 --------------------------------------
tonnes
Aluminium  +3,375 to 1,483,725
Copper       +425 to   327,375
Lead       +1,750 to   201,650
Nickel       +456 to    64,182
Zinc       -1,125 to   379,050
Tin           -55 to    14,435
 --------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3769</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Foreign Exchanges: Dollar surges in late trade
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE dollar surged in London late yesterday after initially showing great
restraint in the face of better than expected unemployment figures, writes
Peggy Hollinger.
The US currency - which has been remarkably blase all week, in spite of a
string of encouraging statistics - made little effort to react to news that
non-farm payrolls rose by 105,000 in November, far greater than economists'
forecasts of 55,000. Although the currency was marked up slightly, little
actual trading appeared to have been done after the announcement.
Traders said the dollar had been partially dragged down by the discovery
that the figures included 45,000 temporary workers roped in for the
presidential election campaigns.
Within an hour, however, dealers had digested the details showing a drop in
the umemployment rate from 7.4 per cent to 7.2 per cent, and a rise in
manufacturing output, hourly wages and the working week.
The dollar then managed to break decisively through the DM1.58 barrier, to
close at DM1.5970, against DM1.5805 on Thursday.
The US currency also climbed against the Swiss franc, from SFr1.4135 to
SFr1.4317, helped in part by market caution over Sunday's referendum in
Switzerland.
The dollar's gains against the D-Mark were also put down to growing
pessimism over the German economy.
The sharper than expected 5.1 per cent decline in industrial orders during
October, against a forecast drop of just 0.4 per cent, offered solace to
most of the D-Mark's fellow European currencies.
The French franc was steady against the D-Mark, closing at FFr3.39, almost
the same levels it held at the start of the week. French Finance Minister
Michel Sapin and German Finance Minster Theo Waigel reiterated their support
for the parity between the two currencies within the exchange rate
mechanism, further bolstering the franc.
Sterling continued its strong showing with a sharp jump in the early hours
of the morning to DM2.4966 from Thursday's close of DM2.4750.
Dealers and economists suggested a variety of reasons for the rise. Some
speculated that UK institutions, underweight in sterling, were repositioning
ahead of the year-end. Other analysts said that US institutions had been
buying sterling for the same reasons.
The rumour which fuelled the market for most of the day - that Hong Kong
investors were shifting into sterling - was dismissed by a Far East currency
analyst.
Sterling finished the week in London almost 8 pfennigs higher at DM2.4875.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3770</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Money Markets: Futures edge down
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
After a turbulent start to the week, the money markets coasted through
yesterday with an unusual degree of calm, writes Peggy Hollinger.
The strong jump in the pound early in the day helped briefly to lift short
sterling futures. However, by the end of the day the March contract had
settled back to close six points down at 93.50. December short sterling
finished flat at 92.83.
The futures market seemed to ignore the strength of the sterling on the
trade-weighted index yesterday, which hit its highest level in almost two
months at 81.3. The index closed easier at 80.7.
Dealers and economists suggested this was because the market had begun to
discern a tinge of recovery in the UK economy, making it less likely that
the government would move to cut base rates before the new year.
'People have gone from the idea of expecting a 6.5 per cent rate before
Christmas to consolidating around the 7 per cent base rate level,' said Dr
Mark Austin, an economist with Hongkong and Shanghai Bank. Some traders also
suggested there had been an element of profit-taking in the futures markets,
which helped to depress rates.
Overall trading had been largely technical, however, with dealers' thoughts
more on the forthcoming weekend and Christmas holidays.
Their reveries were briefly disturbed in the afternoon, when the Bank of
England substantially revised its initial forecast shortage from Pounds 550m
to a flat balance.
The original squeeze had been calculated on the basis of a Pounds 383m drain
from treasury bills and maturing assistance, and a Pounds 755m rise in note
circulation. This was expected to have been partially offset by a Pounds
595m injection from exchequer transactions.
It is most probable that the exchequer miscalculated the amount of receipts,
thus forcing the Bank to make the larger than usual revision.
The revision left overnight rates very soft, at one point hitting 3 per
cent. However, by the end of the day, they had recovered to hover at the 6.5
per cent level.
In Germany, call rates finished unchanged at 8.85 per cent. Dealers were not
expecting a rate cut at the Bundesbank meeting on Thursday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3771</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / International Company News: Rhone Poulenc share sale
postponed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE French government yesterday postponed its plans to sell a substantial
minority stake in Rhone-Poulenc, France's flagship chemicals group, because
of the erratic state of the stock market.
The postponment of the Rhone-Poulenc issue is a setback for France's partial
privatisation programme which is scheduled to include similar sales of
minority stakes in a number of state-controlled companies in both the
financial and industrial sectors.
The government had planned to float at least 6m shares in Rhone-Poulenc,
roughly 10.6 per cent of its equity, by the end of next month.
However, it has long stressed that it would only proceed with the sale
provided that market conditions were correct.
The Paris stock market has fluctuated in recent weeks on concern about the
threat of a devaluation of the French franc and the implications of France's
opposition to the new farm trading deal between the European Community and
the US.
Yesterday, the CAC 40 Index fell by nearly 1 per cent to 1,781.68 in a bout
of profit-taking.
The index, which has performed poorly since reaching its 1992 peak in May,
rose by 1.83 per cent last week. But Rhone-Poulenc's investment certificates
have under-performed the market, falling for the past five successive days.
This fall has triggered intense speculation about the prospects for the
Rhone-Poulenc sale, which would have been the first in which the
government's holding in a state-controlled company would have fallen below
50 per cent.
The combination of the flotation and the accompanying enfranchisement of
Rhone-Poulenc's non-voting shares would reduce the state's holding from 77.5
per cent to 45 per cent.
However, the finance ministry yesterday evening announced that the sale
could not proceed in current conditions.
This time last year a similar slowdown in the stock market prompted the
French government to delay the proposed flotation of a minority stake in Elf
Aquitaine, the oil group. The Elf sale eventually went ahead in March,
resulting in a successful, and over-subscribed, issue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3772</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / International Company News: Hudson's Bay improves 47%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
HUDSON'S BAY, Canada's largest retail group, has reported a 47 per cent gain
in earnings for the third quarter ended October 31. It was helped by a
strong performance from its Zellers discount store chain.
Net profit was CDollars 21.7m (USDollars 16.9m) or 44 cents a share, up from
CDollars 14.8m or 29 cents a year earlier.
Zellers posted a sales gain of 8 per cent, bringing the Bay's total revenues
to CDollars 1.26bn against CDollars 1.22bn.
Nine-month profit was CDollars 24.5m or 49 cents a share against CDollars
12.3m or 18 cents on sales of CDollars 3.43bn against CDollars 3.44bn.
Hudson's Bay is 25 per cent owned by the Kenneth Thomson family.
Mr Rolph Huband, vice-president, said Zellers continued to gain market share
steadily, while heavy cost cutting improved performance at the department
store chains. The Bay closed down three distribution centres earlier this
year.
A committee representing CDollars 525m of Bramalea senior debentures has
agreed to the property group's plan to restructure its CDollars 4.8bn debt.
They will exchange 30 per cent of their debt for new convertible notes and
the rest for equity.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3773</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / World Commodities Prices: Spices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The weaker price trend in pepper which started to develop slowly during last
month accelerated during the past fortnight, reports Man Producten. More
selling pressure became noticeable in countries like Malaysia and Brazil. On
the other hand most consuming markets reported a rather slow offtake, with
traders adopting a 'wait and see' attitude. Muntok white was available at
USDollars 1,500 a tonne on the spot market and at Dollars 1,450 a tonne,
cif, for prompt shipment. Spot black pepper was quoted at Dollars 1,250 a
tonne and prompt shipment suplies were on offer at Dollars 1,175 a tonne,
cif.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3774</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / International Company News: Philips to sell 12.5% of
property space
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMSTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PHILIPS, the Dutch electronics group, aims to sell more than 12.5 per cent
of its buildings and office space in the next three years under a new asset
management programme.
Mr Willem de Kleuver, chairman of the components division, told an in-house
magazine that 25 per cent of Philips's office and building space was surplus
to its needs and that the company expected to sell more than half of this
amount over the next three years.
In July, Philips said it planned to reduce working capital by cutting the
amount of money tied up in inventories and receivables and that it would be
pruning the size of its property portfolio.
Both moves would raise 'several billions of guilders'. Philips's fixed
assets of land and buildings total some Fl 6bn (Dollars 3.33bn).
Mr de Kleuver, identified in the article as the head of Philips's property
task force, said proceeds raised from the sale of property must be put back
into the business and not be diverted in large quantities to pay for moving
staff or amalgamating offices.
He said Philips aimed to achieve both real estate reduction - the sale of
office buildings - and real estate management, which he described as making
efficient use of property in terms of costs and effectiveness.
'Our core business is the development, production and marketing of
electronic products. That's where we should be putting our money, not in
concrete and cement,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3775</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / International Company News: Porsche cuts preference payout
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PORSCHE, the loss-making German sports-car manufacturer, is to pay a DM2.50
per share dividend on its preference shares, down from DM10 in the previous
year.
The group is not making any payment on its ordinary shares, owned
exclusively by the Porsche and Piech families and on which the dividend was
DM9 in 1990-91.
The founding families own what is reported to be 40 per cent of the
preference shares. The rest are owned by the general public and
institutional investors. There had been fears that the payout would have
been missed because of the company's worsening business difficulties.
To counter the business problems, the company has plans to cut 1,850 jobs in
the course of this year, almost a quarter of the workforce.
As it is unusual to put the interests of shareholders ahead of those of the
workforce, it was thought possible that the company would reduce the
dividend at a time when the workforce has been cut back.
However, another factor is that if the dividend on the non-voting preference
share is missed for two years in a row, the preference shares convert into
ordinary voting shares.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3776</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / International Company News: KIO Spanish arm calls in
receivers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER BRUCE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MADRID
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GRUPO TORRAS, the Spanish investment arm of the Kuwait Investment Office,
filed for receivership in Madrid yesterday, bringing to an end a six-year
investment spree in Spain which the KIO's newly installed management claims
has left it with losses of Dollars 4bn.
Mr Mahmoud al-Nouri, who was appointed chairman of Torras in June, said the
results of an investigation into the past management of the group were much
worse than expected and had shattered the KIO's plans to revive Torras,
'regrettably forcing us to change our strategy'.
The receivership affects only Torras and not its surviving industrial
affiliates.
Two partners in KPMG Peat Marwick, which audits some KIO funds and which led
the investigation, were appointed special representatives at Torras.
A Madrid court will name receivers.
Mr al-Nouri would not say what Torras's liabilities were but confirmed that
the KIO had outstanding credits worth between Dollars 1.5bn and Dollars
2.5bn with Torras, making it the group's biggest creditor.
A statement circulated at a press conference blamed the former management of
the KIO and Torras for 'mismanagement on a massive scale' and of 'apparent
misappropriation' of funds.
Mr John Fordham, a partner in Stephenson Harwood, the KIO legal advisers,
claimed the office had lost Dollars 2bn in Spain in share dealing, Dollars
700m in share support schemes and Dollars 600m in short-term financing. He
would not say how.
The Dollars 2bn share losses may simply be the difference between the price
of shares Torras bought in industrial companies and their lower prices now.
Mr Jose Maria Stampa Braun, a trial lawyer contracted to design charges
against the former Torras board, told the press conference he was still not
sure who would be charged or what charges would be made.
Mr Javier de la Rosa, the Catalan financier who ran Torras for the KIO until
last May and who the new management alleges is responsible for problems at
Torras, said later that the KIO was running away from its responsibilities
in Spain.
'I can prove that the only beneficiary (of the money spent in Spain) is the
KIO itself.'
The KIO's 'auditors, advisers, the KIO and Kuwait itself will learn that the
people involved in irregularities, illegalities and suspicious activities
are themselves and not the old board of Torras', Mr de la Rosa said.
The Spanish government has strongly opposed receivership at Torras and there
was still a measure of doubt yesterday as to whether a court will actually
approve the receivership.
Some legal observers argue that since Torras is wholly-owned by the office
it is a sovereign agency and as such is capable of meeting its financial
obligations in Spain.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3777</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / International Company News: Banque Worms chairman quits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Jean-Michel Bloch-Laine yesterday resigned as chairman of Banque Worms,
the Paris-based bank, only three days after Union des Assurances de Paris
(UAP), its parent company, announced an emergency FFr1.4bn (Dollars 258m)
recapitalisation plan triggered by the bank's property losses.
The news of Mr Bloch-Laine's departure comes at a critical time for Banque
Worms, which is struggling to recover from heavy losses on property
interests. The timing is equally sensitive for UAP, France's largest
insurance company, embroiled in a bitter battle against the Suez industrial
group over plans to expand into Germany.
Banque Worms, like other French financial institutions, has been badly
affected by the economic slowdown on the value of its property portfolio,
particularly in the Paris area.
The bank lost FFr350m in the first half of 1992 when its poor performance
was one of the main reasons for the fall in UAP's interim profits from
FFr2.34bn in the first six months of 1991 to FFr948m in the same period this
year.
However, Banque Worms' second-half losses are expected to be even higher. Mr
Michael Huttner, European insurance analyst at Banque Nationale de Paris,
forecast overall losses of about FFr1bn for Banque Worms in 1992 with a fall
in full-year net profits for UAP to FFr1.4bn this year from FFr3.77bn in
1991.
UAP earlier this autumn announced that it would have to recapitalise Banque
Worms, but the final figure of FFr1.4bn was far higher than the FFr1bn
originally expected.
Mr Bloch-Laine is the second Banque Worms executive to have left recently.
Mr Didier Renaudin resigned as managing director a few months ago.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3778</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / International Company News: Eyebrows raised as Canal Plus
bids to join film club
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SINCE its launch in 1984 Canal Plus, the French pay-TV station, has emerged
as one of Europe's most dynamic media groups and one of the most successful
players on the French corporate scene.
Canal Plus is pursuing a long-term strategy of diversifying to turn itself
into a broadly-based entertainment group. It is approaching a critical
period when it must prove that those investments have been worthwhile.
Mr Andre Rousselet, Canal Plus's septuagenarian chairman, a socialist of the
same generation as President Mitterrand, with whom he plays regular games of
golf, is sanguine about his company's prospects.
From his office at the top of Canal Plus's shiny white, state-of-the-art
headquarters on the banks of the River Seine he says: 'We have stuck to
businesses that we know and that are compatible with our core interests.
Within the next five years we should achieve our goal of making 50 per cent
of our profits outside France.'
Canal Plus depends on its original pay-TV station for all net profits -
FFr1.08bn (Dollars 199m) on revenue of FFr6.99bn last year - and investment
in new ventures.
The station shows no sign of faltering. It was launched eight years ago at a
time when French TV was struggling to throw off the shackles of state
control and still trapped in its traditional programming formula of games
shows and dated Hollywood movies.
Canal Plus offered a different mix of new films and sport. 'All we did was
give the French audience what it wanted,' says Mr Rousselet.
Canal Plus needed 1m subscribers to break even. It achieved that target in
1986 and has 3.5m subscribers with a reassuringly low churn, or
cancellation, rate of just 5 per cent. But the scope for growth is limited.
Mr Claude Ravilly, finance director, reckons that its subscriber base should
continue to grow by 7.5 per cent a year for the next five years, when it
will have reached its optimum 5m homes.
It is this prospect that has prompted Canal Plus to diversify. The hitch is
that, so far, its new businesses have not proved as successful as the
original pay-TV service.
Mr Rousselet insists it is too soon to judge the success of Canal Plus's
diversification. The new pay-TV channels, he says, are making progress. All
are still in the red. But Spain, after a slow start, has 550,000 subscribers
and should attract the 600,000 it needs to break even by the end of this
year. Belgium is on course for break even in early 1993. Germany, which has
460,000 subscribers against the 1.2m needed for break-even, will be 'more
difficult because of the level of competition'.
Canal Plus has had a rocky ride in film finance. It has had some successes,
such as the Oliver Stone film JFK. But 1992 has been an erratic year and Mr
Rousselet is resigned to waiting until 1994 for the real benefits to emerge.
'It will work out. Not everyone gets burnt in the film business.'
It is Canal Plus's investment in satellite television that has given
analysts most cause for concern. The recent agreement with Mr Rupert
Murdoch's News Corporation to co-operate on technology - which involves
constructive consultation, as Mr Rousselet delicately puts it, between the
two companies on their expansion plans - should at least allay the risk of a
hardware war.
However, some analysts suspect Canal Plus could lose up to FFr400m on
satellite over the next four years. The satellite losses have prompted Ms
Rebecca Winnington-Ingram, European media analyst at Morgan Stanley in
London, to trim her forecasts for Canal Plus to static profits in 1992 and a
slight fall in 1993.
She sees Canal Plus as 'fundamentally a very good business, with a question
mark over diversification'. Mr Rousselet now faces the challenge of erasing
that question mark.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3779</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Economic Diary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
TOMORROW: Swiss referendum on joining European Economic Area.
MONDAY: Central Statistical Office issues figures for credit business
(October). US consumer credit (October). European Community foreign
ministers meet in Brussels for more discussions on the forthcoming Edinburgh
summit. European Community transport council meets in Brussels (until
Tuesday). Mr John Major, prime minister, has talks with Mr Albert Reynolds,
Irish premier, in Dublin. Mr Hans Tietmayer, deputy governor of the
Bundesbank, speaks in Zurich on 'Europe on the way to monetary integration'.
The Economist holds conference on 'The future of the UK passenger railway'
in London.
TUESDAY: Day of action against planned cuts in 999 emergency telephone
service. Start of two-day Financial Times conference on 'The petrochemical
industry - strategies for survival' at Hotel Inter-Continental in London.
WEDNESDAY: US wholesale sales (October). Portuguese parliament is expected
to debate and ratify Maastricht Treaty on closer European union (until
December 10).
THURSDAY: Bundesbank council meeting. US producer price index (November);
jobless claims; housing completions (October); money supply (November).
FRIDAY: US retail sales (November); consumer prices and real earnings.
European Community holds summit meeting in Edinburgh, marking the conclusion
of the UK presidency of the EC (until December 12). British Steel/BISPA
publish figures for usable steel production (November). Construction output
(third quarter-provisional) from the Department of the Environment. Central
Statistical office issues retail prices index and tax and price index
(November). Bank of England publishes figures for capital issues and
redemptions (November).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3780</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Evode surges 40% to Pounds 10.2m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EVODE, the chemical and plastics group fighting a Pounds 94.3m hostile bid
from Wassall, the mini-conglomerate, yesterday reported a 40 per cent
increase in pre-tax profits for the 53 weeks to October 3.
Mr Andrew Simon, chairman, said the profits increase, from Pounds 7.3m to
Pounds 10.2m, underlined the group's argument that Wassall's 80p a share
offer undervalued the company.
Sales of continuing activities increased to Pounds 239.9m (Pounds 228m).
However, the results were overshadowed by Evode's admission that it had been
in breach of its interest covenants relating to the Dollars 43m (Pounds 28m)
unlisted US redeemable shares since March 1991.
This information was not contained in the group's defence document sent to
shareholders.
Evode said the breach was not important since its two US preference
shareholders, US West, one of the US 'baby Bell' telecommunications
companies, and GE Capital had waived their rights from the breach of
covenants to appoint a director to Evode's board.
Mr Christopher Miller, chief executive of Wassall, said 'Evode should
explain the breach to their shareholders. I think it is quite extraordinary
that it was not mentioned in the defence document.'
Divestments and a 17 per cent reduction in working capital reduced Evode's
net borrowings from Pounds 46.1m to Pounds 28.5m, giving gearing of 50 per
cent. The group also generated cash of Pounds 26.2m (Pounds 16.4m).
Mr Simon said the group had rebutted Wassall's claims that Evode could not
generate enough cash to finance its commitments while reducing borrowings.
However, Mr Miller said the net debt figure excluded Pounds 40.7m of
convertible preference shares and the US redeemable shares, which he argues
should be included in the final debt figure.
Mr David Winterbottom, Evode's chief executive, admitted that 'fashion has
turned against the group' over whether the redeemable shares should or
should not be included as debt.
There was an extraordinary debit of Pounds 17m, being mainly the write-back
of goodwill which had been charged through reserves in 1989.
Operating profits for Evode's divisions comprised: adhesives and sealants
Pounds 2.9m (Pounds 2.2m); polymer products unchanged at Pounds 4.2m; North
America Pounds 7.9m (Pounds 5.5m); industrial coatings Pounds 300,000 loss
(break-even); other products Pounds 100,000 loss (Pounds 200,000 profit).
Earnings per share increased to 5.7p (3.8p). The final dividend is held at
1.8p making an unchanged total of 3.58p.
See Lex
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3781</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / UK Company News: BA is to decide on Qantas stake
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH AIRWAYS is to decide during the next few days whether to bid for a
large minority stake in Qantas, the Australian state-owned carrier due to be
privatised next year.
The BA board yesterday discussed a possible bid for part of Qantas but
postponed a decision to verify a few outstanding issues, the company said.
The UK carrier has until next Wednesday to make up its mind to meet the
Australian government's deadline for bids. The Australian authorities want
to sell 49 per cent of Qantas to institutions and companies, including
foreign investors, and float the remaining 51 per cent to the public.
BA has for some time been interested in forging a partnership with a carrier
in the Asia-Pacific region as part of its strategy to become a global
airline.
It has been considering putting together a consortium to bid for 49 per cent
of Qantas with BA taking a 25 per cent stake itself. This is the maximum
allowed for a foreign company under the Australian government's tender
rules.
BA, however, is expected to face competition from other foreign bidders
including Singapore Airlines and Air New Zealand which are both interested
in an equity partnership with Qantas.
A Qantas bid would come hot on the heels of BA's efforts to link up with
USAir, the sixth largest US carrier in which BA is proposing to acquire a 44
per cent stake for Dollars 750m (Pounds 493m).
Talks in Washington this week between Mr John MacGregor, the UK transport
secretary, and Mr Andrew Card, his US counterpart, failed to produce any
substantial progress in the long drawn out attempts to negotiate a more
liberal aviation agreement between the two countries.
The US has sought greater access into London for its airlines in exchange
for approving the BA-USAir deal. Mr Card has also said he would make a
decision whether to allow BA to acquire a 44 per cent stake in USAir by
December 24.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3782</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Wolverhampton &amp; Dudley 7% ahead
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WOLVERHAMPTON &amp; Dudley Breweries increased pre-tax profits by 6.6 per cent
and boosted its dividend 11 per cent in spite of a slower-than-expected
integration of JW Cameron bought from Brent Walker in January.
Mr David Thompson, managing director, said he remained cautious about
recovery in the West Midlands. This year's outlook remained bleak with
reduced opportunities to raise margins through cost cutting and higher
prices.
Pre-tax profits in the year to September 27 rose from Pounds 33m to Pounds
35.2m on sales up 12 per cent at Pounds 209.6m. Earnings per share rose to
37.4p (36p) and a 7.1p final dividend is proposed for a total of 11.4p.
Stripping out the effects of the Cameron acquisition and a Pounds 1.6m
write-off in 1991, relating to closure of the Dudley Brewery, which
depressed 1991 profits, the company marginally increased sales and trading
profit, in spite of recession in its region.
The renamed Camerons Brewery diluted earnings by 3.5 per cent, as the
re-launch of the Strongarm brand and the pub refurbishment programme fell
behind schedule.
New pubs performed better than expected but profits from the '1960s
(housing) estate boozers' continued to fall. The group's Crown &amp; Raven
Hotels also had a quiet period.
The directors have devalued property values by 3.5 per cent compared with
the last valuation in September 1991.
Net debt rose from Pounds 45m to Pounds 65m after the Cameron acquisition
and interest cover fell to 6.9 times.
COMMENT
To boost underlying beer sales in the recession-hit Midlands is quite a feat
of operational management and cost control. To cover the dividend more than
three times after an 11 per cent increase, is a sign of a similar financial
strength. Granted Wolves has taken longer than expected to turn round
Camerons, and delays with this programme means the acquisition will remain
dilutive in 1993. But with profits forecast to grow 8 per cent to Pounds
38m, or earnings of 40p the company deserves to be rated above a 13.4
prospective multiple.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3783</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Dobson Park 21% down and 'cautious'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DOBSON PARK Industries, which faces falling sales of mining equipment
because of the threatened closure of British Coal pits, yesterday reported a
21 per cent downturn in pre-tax profits to Pounds 10.3m for the 53 weeks to
October 3.
The directors said trading remained gloomy and the company was unable to
give 'any indication' about future dividend levels.
Mr Alan Kaye, chairman, said UK and overseas markets for the company's
mining equipment, instrumentation and power tools would remain difficult.
'That's why we are taking a cautious stance. It would be unwise to predict
we'll make more next year,' he said.
The profits fall, down from the Pounds 13.1m recorded for the 52 weeks to
September 28 last year, was mainly due to recession in Europe and lower
sales of industrial electronics products to US defence and aerospace
companies.
The final dividend was maintained at 3.85p to make an unchanged total of
5.75p.
Turnover fell to Pounds 209.3m (Pounds 233.7m), mainly due to a Pounds 21m
fall in mining equipment sales. However, benefits from previous years'
restructuring helped limit the fall in the division's operating profits from
Pounds 6.64m to Pounds 6.44m.
About half the division's sales went to British Coal, mainly for rebuilding
work on older equipment. New equipment sales to British Coal were depressed.
Operating profits from industrial electronics fell to Pounds 4.63m (Pounds
5.48m) while power tools reported a loss of Pounds 563,000 (Pounds 995,000
profit).
Reorganisation costs of Pounds 2.8m (Pounds 2.5m) were charged, and the
payroll fell more than 4,000 to 3,615.
Net interest costs increased to Pounds 1.05m (Pounds 858,000), but net
borrowings declined to Pounds 9.7m (Pounds 11.1m) cutting gearing by 2
percentage points to 12 per cent.
Earnings emerged at 5.52p (7.05p) per share.
COMMENT
Dobson Park is seen as an income stock, so the clear warning on the dividend
might have been expected to be more damaging on the shares than yesterday's
4p fall to 58p. But the market half expected a cut this time and the shares
have some support at this level, a ten-year low. With British Coal, most of
the damage stems from uncertainty about how many pits will close. Once a
decision is made - the company hopes in January - second hand equipment will
be transferred out of decommissioned pits and sent to Dobson for
reconstruction. But new orders are likely to remain very low. Assuming an
early decision on pit closures, profit forecasts of Pounds 9m to Pounds 9.5m
are possible, especially if a timely property disposal can be made. This is
well short of the Pounds 11m needed to cover the dividend, suggesting a cut
is likely next year and further pressure on the share price until then.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3784</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / UK Company News: BAe Dutch move prompts Ballast chairman to
leave
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMSTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH Aerospace has decided against hiving off its Dutch construction
subsidiary, Ballast Nedam, prompting the Dutch company's chairman to
announce his resignation.
Mr Willem Maeyer, who has spent the past year looking into the possibility
of a partial or full buy-out, to be followed by a bourse flotation, is to
resign at the end of this month.
Until a successor is named, Mr Maeyer's job will be taken over by Mr Arie
Glimmerveen, a former management board chairman who is now chairman of
Ballast Nedam's supervisory board.
Ballast Nedam said the move was the result of a decision by BAe against a
buy-out, but it did not say what the future of the company would be.
In the summer, Ballast Nedam informed its workforce that the company, or
parts of it, may be hived off from the loss-making BAe group, which is
undergoing a restructuring. At the time, an eventual bourse flotation was
not ruled out.
BAe acquired Ballast Nedam in 1987, mainly because of the Dutch company's
wide experience of construction projects in the Middle East. Ballast Nedam,
which built the causeway linking Saudi Arabia and Bahrain, was to be given a
pivotal role in construction orders tied to the massive Saudi Arabian orders
won by BAe for Tornado jet combat aircraft.
However, plans to construct the Sulayil air base as part of the order were
later shelved.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3785</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Abbey National raises Pounds 103m in free
shares sale
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ABBEY NATIONAL yesterday raised Pounds 103m by selling off 28.97m shares,
unclaimed or mis-allocated, from its 1989 flotation.
SG Warburg and Kleinwort Benson bought the shares for 356p each and then
placed them in the market at 360p. Kleinwort said the shares were sold very
quickly to a number of institutions.
The stock market took the weight of the shares well and Abbey National's
price fell only 7p to 366p.
The shares were owned by about 300,000 customers who had failed to claim
their free allocation when the building society converted to a bank in July
1989.
At that time, 5.6m members were allocated 100 free shares each with an offer
price of 130p.
Abbey National said it would donate Pounds 5m, representing 4.9 per cent
raised under the placement, to its Charitable Trust for donation to selected
charities.
The remaining Pounds 98m would go down as profit or reserves but the
financial accounting procedure has not been announced.
Mr James Tyrrell, group finance director, said he had yet to decide whether
to enter the money as an exceptional or extraordinary item.
The bank was legally entitled to sell the shares after October 21 1992. The
unclaimed shares were allowed to be sold after three years of flotation as
long as three months notice had been given to those entitled to the shares.
Abbey National last advertised to attract members to claim their shares on
July 20 this year. That resulted in 165,000 people applying for the shares.
More than 95,000 share allocations were confirmed.
Despite the sell-off, customers who were entitled to the shares can still
claim them - so long as they do so before December 1998. They will be
entitled to the net sale proceeds of 360p per share obtained today and to
receive net dividends after tax.
Abbey National termed the unclaimed shares as 'one of the most interesting
financial mysteries of our time.'
About 30,000 of the shares sold yesterday had been mis-allocations - mainly
as a result of members being issued duplicate shares.
In one incident, a large number of shares sent out to members at the time of
flotation were dumped into a skip which was then set alight.
The shares had to be reissued which resulted in some people receiving two
sets of shares.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3786</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Nu-Swift falls to Pounds 2.52m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MATTHEW CURTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Nu-Swift, the fire protection, office services and property group, is paying
no interim dividend because its distributable reserves have dried up after
it had to cover exchange losses on loans from one of its subsidiaries. The
group paid a 10p interim last time.
In the six months to June 30, pre-tax profits were Pounds 2.52m (Pounds
11.35m) on turnover of Pounds 154.5m (Pounds 165.7m). Earnings per share
fell to 5.09p (17.04p).
Operating profit for the service businesses, which contributed 96 per cent
of turnover, rose to Pounds 7.38m (Pounds 5.91m). But this was offset by the
impact of property investments, especially interest charges of Pounds 4.16m,
compared with Pounds 5.68m receivable and the write-off in its London
Securities investment, the property and investment group. There were also
currency losses of Pounds 1.2m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3787</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Drummond in black after exceptional
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
As it warned in September, Drummond, which makes fabrics and associated
products for the clothing industry, fell into pre-exceptional losses in the
six months to the end of September. However an exceptional profit of Pounds
220,000 on sale of premises and plant resulted in a pre-tax profit of Pounds
57,000, against Pounds 510,000.
Mr Stefan Simmonds, chairman, said that activity levels had been relatively
high but at the expense of margins. Turnover was Pounds 24.1m (Pounds 23m).
Net interest payable increased to Pounds 571,000 (Pounds 445,000).
With tax of Pounds 171,000 (Pounds 217,000) losses came out at 1.64p
(earnings 1.01p) and the interim dividend has been passed. There was a
payment of 0.75p last time.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3788</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Lift off for a flight of nostalgia - The
final count-down to the winding up of Dan-Air's parent, Davies &amp; Newman
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AFTER all the breast-beating that surrounded the swallowing up of Dan-Air by
British Airways, Monday's extraordinary meeting to consider winding up the
airline's parent may well have an air of nostalgia.
Mr Frederick Newman, a director of Davies &amp; Newman Holdings from 1946 to
1990, is likely to be there for the final act. He says he will vote in
favour of the winding up 'because there is no alternative'.
The last two autumn crises led first to Mr Newman being replaced as chairman
by company doctor Mr David James, and then to a Pounds 49.3m rescue share
issue that swamped the family holding.
With the prolonged recession scuppering the recovery plan, the upshot for
the Newmans is that shares that peaked at 845p in April 1989 are worth
nothing. The 19 institutions which took part in the rescue have seen a
50p-a-share investment wither away.
Davies &amp; Newman's difficulties emerged in May 1990 when a Pounds 3.1m
pre-tax loss was announced for the previous year. Most ominous was the 100
per cent gearing level on borrowings of Pounds 42m.
High finance costs have proved to be a feature of the Davies &amp; Newman saga,
although the banks ended up with little exposure. In the 3 1/2 years to June
this year, interest payments totalled Pounds 28.3m. In addition, Pounds
8.75m of the share issue proceeds went in special fees to the banks.
In 1989 Dan-Air's charter business turned over about twice as much as the
scheduled side and carried 4.5m passengers. But without a tie with a tour
operator, it was increasingly pushed to the periphery of the big holiday
companies' plans.
In response, it switched its emphasis towards scheduled services based on
Gatwick, where it was the largest operator with more than a fifth of the
slots.
Here Dan-Air faced three historic handicaps (some would say four because of
its 'Dan Dare' image):
The traditionally weak yields from Gatwick, outshone by Heathrow in the more
lucrative business sector.
Its lack of a scheduled culture. It sold too many seats cheaply to discount
houses, rather than reaching the customer direct. The arrival of Mr John
Olsen as chief executive in April improved the marketing, but not soon
enough.
The age and variety of its aircraft. Although running costs would have been
substantially lower in a modern simplified fleet, the balance sheet was not
strong enough to take the hits on disposals. Cuts in net worth could be ill
afforded as the borrowing ceiling of Pounds 35m fell with it.
These burdens proved too much in the longest recession since the 1930s.
Instead of heading for the Pounds 20m profit projected at the time of the
rescue, the group stayed firmly in the red - although a trading profit of
nearly Pounds 4m was made in the seasonally better third quarter.
If shareholders feel irate on Monday, they may quiz Mr James on such things
as cost-cutting or the search for a trading partner. As usual he is not
short of answers. He cites the sale of the engineering business as an
example of the former and talks with 20 airlines to satisfy the latter. BA
was the only one in at the death. It paid just Pounds 1 for the airline, but
took on about Pounds 35m of liabilities.
As to where the rescue money went: it drained away roughly equally in
trading losses and restructuring costs - including closing the charter
business, halving the number of scheduled routes to 14 and disposing of 26
of the 38-strong fleet.
Assuming liquidators are appointed, the way will be clear for a proper bout
of nostalgia. Did you know that Dan-Air was the last airline to fly a Comet?
Mr Newman reckons that was in about 1980, 15 years after it started
purchasing the jets from BOAC and really took off in the holiday business.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3789</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Northamber cuts loss to Pounds 495,000
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MATTHEW CURTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Northamber, the computer equipment distributor, reduced its pre-tax loss by
half, from Pounds 980,000 to Pounds 495,000, in the six months to October
31, thanks to increased sales, a decline in bad debts, and cost savings.
Turnover rose 13.5 per cent to Pounds 45.3m (Pounds 39.9m).
Mr David Phillips, chairman, would not comment on when Northamber was likely
to move back into the black, but said he was 'quietly confident' about the
performance in the current six months.
There is no interim dividend.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3790</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / A final foreign fray: The US military venture in Somalia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUREK MARTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
For the fourth and surely last time on President George Bush's watch,
American soldiers are being sent in numbers overseas on a specific military
mission. But Somalia is different from its predecessors in Panama, the Gulf
and northern Iraq, though it bears some resemblance in purpose to Operation
Provide Comfort 18 months ago, which sought to protect the Kurds from Saddam
Hussein. It is different mostly in that it was unexpected.
It is not easy to piece together how and why the Bush administration decided
on the eve of Thanksgiving last week that the US military should be
despatched to Somalia to ensure that humanitarian relief supplies got
through. The first contingent of 1,800 Marines out of a United
Nations-authorised force that might run to 20,000-plus were already off the
coast yesterday.
There is no dissent from the obvious - that this was George Bush's decision.
It may best be seen as the final act of a humiliated president, no longer
grubbing for votes, anxious to go out on a high note, and persuaded that a
Somali operation was militarily manageable where a Bosnian one was not. It
is instructive that nobody else has tried to claim responsibility, and the
president, having conceded he felt adrift after his election defeat and
grieving over the death of his mother, appears energised again.
It was unexpected mostly because there was no extraordinary discernible
pressure on the administration to act in a country where no vital US
interest is even remotely at stake. Congress was in post-election recess and
while some graphic US press reports on the suffering in Somalia filled the
news void in the interregnum between the Bush and Clinton governments, they
were by no means comparable to those which helped bring about the Kurdish
effort. Only yesterday did the heavyweight television anchormen start
landing in Mogadishu, the Somali capital.
The administration itself seemed in pure lame duck mode. White House daily
briefings had virtually ceased to exist, James Baker, Mr Bush's eminence
grise in so many things, has not been seen for a month and the State
Department's morale was further laid low by the disgrace of its involvement
in the rifling of Mr Clinton's passport files.
There were no overt hints that the Defence Department had revised its
long-standing aversion to open-ended and under-prepared military ventures.
The Clinton transition team was still in its formative phase and barely in a
position to make suggestions or come to conclusions. In any event, the
president-elect had made it clear that until his inauguration, Mr Bush was
in charge.
Nor were there great external pressures for involvement in Somalia. Mr
Boutros Boutros-Ghali, the UN secretary-general, had set in motion Security
Council deliberations about precisely what could be done about the unfolding
humanitarian tragedy, but his leverage in Washington is limited. Other
leading western powers had been conspicuously cautious, another contrast
with the Kurdish venture in which Mr John Major, the British prime minister,
had taken such a lead. The relief agencies, concerned for the safety of
their own personnel on the ground, seemed ambivalent about the wisdom of
military intervention, even though they reported that perhaps only 20 per
cent of relief supplies were being delivered to those who desperately needed
them.
There are theories that it was the State Department, traditionally more
interventionist than the Pentagon, intent on restoring its reputation and
free of Mr Baker's tutelage, took the critical initiative. Certainly the
policy paper which Mr Bush ultimately approved last week was principally
drafted by Mr Frank Wisner, the under-secretary for international security
affairs. But at least one cabinet member intimately involved in the process
and now with no particular axe to grind flatly denies that Foggy Bottom took
the lead.
The military high command did undertake a fresh risk analysis of Somalia. It
has been a practical rule of thumb of the maximum force doctrine of General
Colin Powell, chairman of the joint chiefs of staff, that whatever troop
deployment might be considered necessary to do the job needs to be
multiplied by five to ensure success. The Pentagon still insists, and has
got its way, that US forces answer to US, not UN, commanders. It is also
considered critical that whatever the US engagement, its duration must be
defined as carefully as possible. Mr Dick Cheney, the secretary of defence,
talks freely of the necessity of handing over authority to the 'blue
helmets' (the UN) as soon as the current threat to relief supplies is
neutralised.
Of imponderable, but perhaps significant, impact were external inputs into
these deliberations, for example those of Mr Fred Cuny, who runs a
consulting firm, Intertect, out of Dallas, Texas. He has often been
described as the Red Adair of the relief business, a hard-nosed freelance
troubleshooter familiar with regular and irregular military capabilities. He
is now back in Somalia but he told Mr Paul Wolfowitz, head of the Defence
Department's policy planning, and anybody else who would listen in
Washington in the middle of last month, that the Somali gangs holding relief
supplies hostage were simply no threat to a high-tech military. He estimated
that a US force of perhaps 3,500 men would be sufficient for the immediate
task at hand.
But Mr Cuny does not pull the sort of weight here that all high-level doors
open to him. In this transitional and Baker-free vaccuum, he was much helped
by the old resident foreign policy establishment, mostly now out of
government, though it certainly includes Mr Wisner and Mr Wolfowitz.
A leading, discreet role was undoubtedly played by Mr Morton Abramowitz, the
veteran diplomat who now runs the Carnegie Endowment for International
Peace, where he is emphasising contemporary humanitarian issues. He has
friends all over town and in the media and some say that it was he who made
sure Mr Cuny's views were received in the right circles, including the
foreign policy columnists of The New York Times.
Thus, only belatedly, has the wider political Washington begun to wonder if
this latest military venture is wise and if Mr Bush's hope that it can be
concluded by the time Mr Clinton takes office next month is realistic. Mr
John Murtha, of the House appropriations committee, has raised the
congressional flag of warning, which the president sought to calm by
briefing the Capitol Hill leadership yesterday morning. Any number of old
Africa hands, such as Mr Chester Crocker, formerly of the State Department,
have spoken of the complexities of forging a necessary political resolution
in Somalia. This is, of course, beyond the brief of the US forces. It will
not necessarily be beyond the brief of the next US administration.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3791</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Letter: Put another way, inequitable tax can be better
presented
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr E ANTHONY BRADMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, In publicising the council tax, the government has, yet again,
demonstrated its ineptitude in communicating with the electorate.
The basis of assessment to the tax is comparative property values determined
at April 1 1991. In practice, the choice of date is as irrelevant as it is
misleading.
If appeals are to be forestalled, the government should now adopt a
broad-brush approach and announce that, since property prices have fallen,
on average, throughout England and Wales, in the last 18 months by, say, 20
per cent, the starting point for each band will be reduced accordingly but
the allocation of individual homes into each band will remain unchanged.
Thus the new steps would be fixed at: B Pounds 32,000 (instead of Pounds
40,000); C Pounds 41,600 (Pounds 52,000); D Pounds 54,400 (Pounds 68,000); E
Pounds 70,400 (Pounds 88,000); F Pounds 96,000 (Pounds 120,000); G Pounds
128,000 (Pounds 160,000); H Pounds 256,000 (Pounds 320,000). Honour will
thus be satisfied]
Alternatively, as a real giveaway, the bands might be arbitrarily reduced by
50 per cent, resulting in potential vendors appealing to have their property
reassessed into a higher category. The public might then get the message:
all forms of taxation are inequitable and arbitrary, particularly those
based on transient asset values. The public rejected the tried and tested
(and arbitrary) rating system; they cannot object to its equally flawed
successors unless, in the interest of simplicity and equity, they abolish
local taxation and with it the concomitant right to elected local
government.
E Anthony Bradman,
Beech Lodge,
Marketgate North,
Crail, Anstruther,
Fife KY10 3TH
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3792</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Letter: Damaging repercussions if oil and gas shut off to
protect coal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr TONY CRAVEN WALKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, David Lascelles ('Coal on his Christmas list', November 30), although
eloquent on the balance of argument between the most vocal protagonists -
all state-owned or recently privatised - ignored the position of the oil and
gas industry.
Over the past 25 years the industry has considerably benefited the balance
of trade, boosted the Treasury by Pounds 118bn and, in 1991, provided 21 per
cent of total UK industrial investment. It currently involves more than
3,000 companies, employing some 300,000 people. As a result of the intense
'partisan lobbying' (Lex, November 30) taking place on behalf of Nuclear
Electric, National Power, PowerGen, British Coal, British Gas and the
regional electricity companies, all of which seek to maintain protected
positions in one way or another, the current coal debate overlooks the
importance of the offshore industry in the UK energy spectrum.
Offshore oil and gas reserves are as important a national asset as coal
reserves and must not be overlooked in the current energy review. It is not
simply a case of shutting off (or forgetting about) gas to provide a market
for coal as is being suggested by the coal lobby. Such a policy would result
in substantial reserves of oil and gas remaining undeveloped, the deflection
of international capital, a huge loss of investment, jobs and tax revenues,
and a negative impact on balance of trade.
Only competition will attract investment, increase jobs and reduce energy
costs, not the extension of monopoly positions. Coal can compete with gas
and British Coal should be grasping opportunities provided by lower exchange
rates to expand its markets within the international coal industry rather
than seeking protection by regulation in the UK.
This contrasts with British Coal chairman Neil Clarke's vision of there
being no alternative to closing mines other than closing down the offshore
gas industry. Shutting down oil and gas projects would damage not only
employment but also the willingness of the international oil industry to
invest in UK energy reserves.
In the 'white heat' of the current debate on the 'dash for gas', do not
forget the individuals who work in the offshore gas industry and the
benefits they have brought.
Tony Craven Walker,
chairman,
Monument Oil and Gas,
80 Petty France,
London SW1H 9EX
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3793</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Wet, wet, wet: The drought is finally over
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRONWEN MADDOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
I suppose you could say the drought has ended,' is the cautious response
from the UK National Rivers Authority (NRA) - and much of the water industry
 -to the past week's deluge.
Six days of near-constant rainfall have flooded much of Wales, the west
country and the Thames valley, prompting evacuation of villages,
slaughtering of livestock and causing an estimated Pounds 1m damage in Wales
alone.
This autumn is the wettest for eight years, with nearly one and a half times
the usual amount of rain. It has brought an end to one of the century's
worst droughts and to several years of disruption for householders in the
south-east, where water is scarcest.
Earlier this spring, after the fourth successive dry winter, 6.5m people in
the south-east were banned from using hosepipes. Two water companies -
Anglian and Essex - also made headlines last month by announcing that they
would start the compulsory installation of household water meters to
encourage people to use less water.
But as householders stare out at their waterlogged gardens they would be
entitled to ask how effectively the authorities would respond during the
next drought. Their concerns will have increased after this week's report by
Ofwat, the water industry regulator, that 22 per cent of treated water is
lost through leaky pipes and mains - enough to fill 48m baths a day.
The water companies are anxious to point out that the levels of the water
tables are not yet back to normal - in east Anglia the level is still near
its all-time low.
Echoing the now-famous British Rail excuse, several water companies have
blamed the weather for delivering 'the wrong kind of rain'. It has fallen in
the wrong place - four times heavier over Wales and the south-west, which
had no shortages, than over the dry south-east. And it has fallen too fast,
saturating the top soil and then running off into the sea without time to
percolate down to the water table.
'If this winter is wet it will solve a lot of problems, but we really need
another one to get back to normal,' said Ms Emer O'Connell of the NRA.
Customers may have found the shortages inconvenient, but the water companies
are proud of their 'drought-busting' efforts over the past few years.
Mr Alan Smith, group managing director of Anglian Water, in the driest part
of England, said: 'This drought was far worse than the 1976 one and we were
much better prepared this time - we had a 12-month hosepipe ban which ended
last winter, but no essential supplies were affected.'
Since the drought started, Anglian has spent Pounds 25m on linking the
wettest and driest parts of its region, which should reduce the impact of
any future droughts.
Could they have done more?
Mr Smith argues that 'whether to carry out drought work is always a dilemma.
We don't want to waste money by having an asset lying in the ground unused
and at the end of the day what we spend has to be reflected in customer
charges.' Although an engineers' report in the summer concluded that Anglian
could spend 'a hundred million pounds' on anti-drought measures if it chose,
'we had concluded by mid-September we were not going to do it'.
Other companies, commenting on this week's Ofwat report, are also adamant
that plugging leaks would not have offered an an easy solution, contrary to
public impressions. Cambridge Water maintains that its leakage rate is
already nearly half the national average, in common with many companies in
regions where water is scarce. Water companies also say that it is often
very expensive to the point of being uneconomic to detect and fix leaks in
pipes buried several metres underground.
However, others in the industry say privately that some problems could have
been tackled earlier. One southern executive called hosepipe bans 'the easy
option' compared to spending money.
Ms Janet Langdon, director of the Water Services Association (WSA), which
represents the 10 large water and sewerage companies, says that 'lack of
investment in the past' before the WSA companies were privatised in 1989 is
partly to blame for shortages.
Few companies are willing to say that there will never be hosepipe bans
again, but many are confident that they are now protected against the
vagaries of the weather. Mr Roderick Paul, chief executive of the
Birmingham-based Severn Trent which has just opened a Pounds 109m reservoir
said: 'Comfortable is an awful word to use, but water is not a problem
because we planned for it.'
Although the drought has grabbed the public imagination, southern companies
believe they need to spend more attention and money on coping with the
rapidly rising population in their regions. Demand for water in East Anglia
has been rising by nearly a quarter per decade as more people move in,
attracted by Stansted airport and the new roads which will make Cambridge a
key junction. Without new measures, lack of water year-round could
eventually 'be a real problem', according to Mr Smith.
That means plans for metering are probably here to stay, even if they are
resented by customers. It means, too, that some companies may seek to open
reservoirs and boreholes, even though this would provoke opposition from
environmental groups and need lengthy negotiation with the NRA. The costs of
meeting that demand will also, in one way or another, make its way onto
customers' bills.
The drought is over, but the problems of long-term water shortages in the
south-east are not.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3794</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Letter: Fire-fighting halons should not be banned
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr MAX JONES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, In welcoming, in your editorial 'Saving the ozone layer' (November 26),
the progress of the bureaucrats implementing the 1987 Montreal Protocol in
relation to the use of CFCs in refrigeration, you may not have noticed that
the ban on the production of halons for fire-fighting  - itself introduced
as a proposal at the 11th hour in 1987 - has been brought forward by six
years to January 1994.
This is despite no effective substitute for the two most widely used halons,
1211 and 1301, having been developed yet.
The timing of this announcement was particularly ironic, coming as it did in
the week after the great fire of Windsor Castle. These halons are ideal
where computers, archives and, yes, works of art, are to be protected, being
as they are not only very powerful fire killers but also neither wet nor
powdery. Unused halon fire extinguishers pose no threat to the ozone layer.
When used for fighting fires they are quick and effective and thus prevent
large quantities of carbon dioxide being generated by burning timber, etc.
The fire-fighting halons are environmentally friendly and should not be
banned.
Max Jones,
14 Montagu Drive,
Leeds LS28 2PD
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3795</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Letter: Who getting tough with whom?
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr CHRISTOPHER W TAYLOR-YOUNG
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Surely there is a misprint in your headline, 'Tougher control of City
urged by Treasury' (December 4).
Should it not read 'Tougher control of Treasury urged by City'?
Christopher Taylor-Young,
Taylor Young Investment Management,
45 Curlew Street,
Butlers Wharf, London SE1
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3796</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Letter: European agriculture forced in wrong direction
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr ANTHONY ROSEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, There appears to be considerable misinformation, or being charitable,
misunderstanding, about the effect that the probably General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade agreement will have on Europe's food production.
Under the agreement there is absolutely no actual requirement upon Europe's
farmers to reduce, for example, cereal production. What is required is that
the amount of subsidised exports is reduced. Un-subsidised exports will
remain unrestricted.
In addition, even the reduction in subsidised exports is relatively
non-damaging since the Gatt agreement requires a reduction in these of only
21 per cent in volume terms and 36 per cent in export subsidy cash terms by
the year 2000.
Last year export refunds cost European Community taxpayers over Pounds 8bn,
plus a further Pounds 5bn for storing surpluses. At the same time these
subsidised exports caused havoc in world food markets and were especially
damaging to Third World food producers.
The whole direction towards 'peasantisation', in which European agriculture
is being forced to travel by misdirected government subsidisation, is wrong.
The majority of Europe's farmers could compete, and be far better off, were
they allowed to compete, unsubsidised, on world food markets for that
percentage of their production that is surplus to EC domestic requirements.
The peasants of Europe could then be supported by governments, at
considerably less cost than the present corrupt and anachronistic Common
Agricultural Policy, for social reasons only.
Anthony Rosen,
Feenix Farming,
Rosehill, Arford,
Headley,
Hants GU35 8DF
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3797</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Letter: Successful military intervention in Bosnia is
feasible
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Lord HYLTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Malcolm Rifkind, the defence secretary, recently told the Western
European Union in Paris that 100,000 troops and many casualties would be
necessary for successful intervention in Bosnia. This might be so, if by it
he means the expulsion of every Serb. What is most needed, however, is to
raise the sieges of Sarajevo, Gorazde and Srebrenica, and to protect Travnik
and the remaining free Moslem areas. To do so would establish minimum
conditions for a permanent ceasefire.
To achieve such limited aims, the existing United Nations forces of 16,000
would suffice, provided:
the 'no-fly resolution' is rigidly enforced in Bosnia, by allied aircraft;
helicopter support is available for UN convoys and for the Bosnian state
forces;
the Bosnian forces are provided with ammunition, machine guns, rocket
launchers and mortars, together with a few military advisers;
air attacks on Serb artillery, munitions factories and air bases may also be
required.
The evidence of Slovenia, Dubrovnik and even Croatia shows that the Serbs
pull back when they are seriously resisted. Surely the above limited
proposals are necessary to halt aggression, prevent the exodus of another
million refugees and avoid the involvement of Middle East powers, in what
could only be an ever-expanding war. Air power is the key, as was seen in
Kurdistan.
Hylton,
House of Lords,
London SW1A 0PW
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3798</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Leading Article: Recession and recovery
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
INFLATION IS yesterday's problem. This is the new conventional view in
Anglo-Saxon economies, but not only in these economies, since it is also
held by many in Japan and continental Europe as well. Now, it is argued, the
priority must be growth.
This may be the new conventional wisdom. But it is not universally shared,
something that residents of inflation-prone countries should remember. Some
of those who do not give the idea allegiance also possess the power to
thwart its application. Most important among them are Mr Helmut Schlesinger
and his colleagues at the Bundesbank.
The need to shift attention from the control of inflation to the promotion
of economic growth had long been urgently argued by the outgoing Bush
administration. Mr Clinton's new administration is likely to be still more
enthusiastic, though its zeal for action may be blunted by the continuing
run of good economic data. As for Mr Major, just a month - together with the
collapse of his ERM policy - was enough to shift him from his target of
'zero inflation' to his new 'strategy for growth'.
Countries like Germany, which have avoided U-turns as shameless as
Britain's, have also avoided the stop-go cycles that tend to be their
consequence. The Bundesbank is determined to prevent the mistakes associated
with unification from ruining its historic achievement. It will not respond
to the evidence of recession by slashing interest rates in the British
manner. Evidence of recession is more likely to make the Bundesbank feel
grim satisfaction, since it believes that consumer price inflation remains
about double the tolerable level.
The figures for German gross domestic product in the third quarter show that
the country is in recession, defined in the classic manner as two successive
quarters of negative economic growth. But the Bundesbank does not believe
that the recession will be a deep one. This complacency is not universally
shared. The respected Ifo institute has argued this week that manufacturing
output will fall 1 1/2 per cent this year and then fall by up to 3 per cent
between this year and next.
Dark clouds
For the Bundesbank, even such a black cloud would have a silver lining. Wage
settlements should fall quite swiftly and have, indeed, started to do so. IG
Metall, the country's most powerful union, has accepted a deal in the steel
industry of between 3 and 4 per cent over 18 months. This followed a still
more encouraging 12-month, 4.2 per cent agreement in the less
internationally exposed insurance industry.
The question is how swiftly the Bundesbank will now ease. Remember that it
was established to protect the German people from the vagaries of German
politicians and is convinced that those politicians have been more than
usually irresponsible in their handling of unification. It will be inclined
towards a tight policy as long as there is any inflationary danger, pretty
well regardless of the domestic and international consequences.
Investors aware of the longer term prospects for German interest rates have
let the D-Mark lose about eleven per cent of its value against the dollar
since late September. Even the pound sterling has found what seems to be a
secure floor at DM2.40 and closed yesterday little short of DM2.50.
Domestic inflation
For currencies within the ERM, the external weakening of the D-Mark, though
helpful in terms of overall competitiveness, does little to relax the
current squeeze. D-Mark interest rates continue to set the floor for almost
all of them. The hope of Germany's partners must be that the recession will
be as deep as some Germans now fear. Only a deep recession is likely to
bring German inflation and so the Bundesbank's interest rates down quickly
enough to ensure the survival of the current parities. Mr Schlesinger's
remarks this week strongly suggest that foreign exchange intervention will
not secure this outcome. It must be strange for the French government to
find itself praying for a German recession. But these are strange times in
Europe.
What it sees across the channel must further convince the British government
of the good side of sterling's eviction from the ERM. There are even signs
of green shoots: car sales are up; monetary growth is up; the equity market
is up; even the pound is up. Unhappily, unemployment is also up, with 17,500
job losses announced on Thursday alone. But that is bound to continue for a
long time.
For all the better news in the UK, the traditional wisdom of the Bundesbank
should not be forgotten. Higher inflation will not bring an enduring
improvement in economic performance, as the British of all people must know.
What is more, British inflation is no better than the German even now. If
this is to be an enduring recovery, not just another flash in the pan,
underlying inflation must continue to fall. Many hope it will; but many fear
it will not. Much depends on wages. The government hopes for rapid recovery
now. But it should also remember how past dashes for growth have ended.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3799</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Man in the News: Fighter who is his own man - Yegor Gaidar
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN LLOYD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Yegor Gaidar was born as a politician at the last Congress of People's
Deputies in April. The mild-mannered former academic and journalist came out
fighting before a hall of deputies only a little less hostile than they are
now.
Then, he threatened his critics with his government's resignation - and won,
when they agreed to his economic reforms. Now, as a vote on the continuation
of his powers is expected daily at the current congress, he has refused to
woo those who must confirm him.
This seventh meeting of Russia's parliament sees a new role for the acting
prime minister and the architect of radical economic reform: that of a more
experienced statesman-of-principle who can still win a round or two of
bare-knuckle combat. Many of his colleagues have undergone a similar
transformation - particularly his deputies, Alexander Shokhin and Anatoly
Chubais, and Andrei Kozyrev, the foreign minister.
But Gaidar must bear the largest burden of responsibility by far, a burden
made heavier by the 'acting' which precedes his prime ministerial title, and
gives him the aspect of always being on trial. Though Boris Yeltsin, the
Russian president, is no longer untouchable, he is protected by his office
and his mandate: Gaidar, by contrast, occupies a post which in the Soviet
system was firmly controlled by the Politburo and which he now holds only
because Yeltsin supports him.
Yet he remains his own man. His speech on Wednesday was not calculated to
win round the uncommitted deputies in the 'swamp' of the central ground:
indeed, one deputy estimated after it was made that Gaidar had lost 20 per
cent of his support. If so, it was not through a display of cowardice.
To a hall more than half full of men and women chosen because they had been
loyal upholders of communism, he mocked the Soviet period as one where
'discussions of reform plans went on for a year and a half and they
privatised 107 shops, 57 canteens and restaurants, and 36 consumer service
departments'. To those deputies who had spent much of the past year trying
to whip up an apathetic populace to public protest, he observed that strikes
were down to a sixth of the levels a year ago and 'even demonstrations are
hard to organise'. And to the majority who had just put together a catch-all
motion condemning the reform programme as 'contrary to the interests of most
of the population', he said that there was no alternative to his way.
His speech still bore the hallmarks of the academic - he observed that
'Ludwig Erhard (the progenitor of German economic reform after the last war)
would be spinning in his grave' to observe what parliament had voted for in
the name of a 'social market' - namely, inflationary wage and pension rises.
But Gaidar also proved he is now a politician who thinks on his feet:
responding to a speech by Ruslan Khasbulatov, the parliament's speaker, who
had talked of a choice between an American monetarist model and a
Scandinavian social democratic model, he presented himself as the practical
man. He wearily dismissed Khasbulatov's abstruse theorising - 'we're simply
not at the stage where such a choice is realistic'. Darkly, he warned the
deputies that the real choice was between cleaving to the hard path of
reform, or descending to the status of the third world.
In insisting that economic policy must again be tightened, in stressing his
own government's mistakes in allowing credit to be loosened and inflation to
climb towards hyperinflationary levels, he again showed his independence by
contradicting much of what Yeltsin had earlier promised. But if he is to
control the country's finances, and realise his efforts to stabilise the
currency and force industry to reconstruct, then he and Russia face greater
trials than he is presently undergoing in the overpoliticised arena of the
congress.
Gaidar has not yet done what he said he would do: he has not been able to
change the economy to such an extent that companies and individuals now
responded to market signals. He argued in his speech they were beginning to
do so: that 'production is beginning to respond to changing demand,
directors are beginning to be concerned first of all about sales': but he
is, as he knows, plucking the first fruits - important as they are - not
gathering in a harvest.
Some of this is his own fault. He was too confident, at first, of the
ability of the government to hold the line on public spending. He
underestimated the power of the bureaucracy and the industrial lobbies, and
may have been too sanguine about the readiness of the west to assist and of
foreign companies to invest. He talked, as did others in his team, about a
kamikaze raid on the command-administrative system - an attack which would
sink the system, even as it destroyed the government which dared to launch
it.
But both the government and Gaidar survive, and both are fighting for their
lives. In the course of the past year, he and others, including the foreign
governments that hope anxiously for a continuation of reform, have learned
there is no such thing in the former Soviet Union as short, sharp shocks -
only long, complex movements through a society too inured to command and
direction to react quickly to anything, even liberation.
As he struggles, the environment in which he does so has changed. Mr
Yeltsin, on Tuesday, unequivocally pointed to the state as the lodestar of
reform, reminding his audiences in and outside the congress hall that
Russians had always looked to the state to assist them, in a way the
Americans and British had not - a reminder, it seemed, from the president to
his acting prime minister that Anglo-Saxon laissez-faire has its limits.
Many of his supporters in the west have asked recently whether or not Gaidar
should resign, and lead his team out of government in order to preserve a
market-reform alternative unsullied by too much compromise. He has thought
of this: but has decided to fight, at least through this congress, for the
acceptance of a reasonable budget for next year.
After that? There may still be no alternative to his course of action.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3800</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Difficult birth for son of poll tax: The council tax is an
improvement on its predecessor, but will people accept it?
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH and JOHN WILLMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The usual weekly meetings with electors this weekend will give Tory MPs
their first opportunity to judge whether the council tax represents a calm
after the storm produced by the poll tax, or whether it promises more of the
same.
There is no sign - so far - that the drama of the poll tax will be repeated.
But while there will be no rioting in the streets, there is unlikely to be
any dancing either.
Individual valuations putting each of England's 20m properties into one of
the eight bands for the new tax landed with local authorities this week,
amid predictions of a renewed political storm over local taxation.
Last week, Mr Michael Howard, the environment secretary, announced the
government's spending plans for local councils next year. This has led to a
series of estimates of likely council tax bills which allow most people to
make a reasonable guess about how much they will be paying from April 1993.
These developments have brought local finance back into the news from the
obscurity into which it had faded since the days of poll tax riots in
Trafalgar Square and mass resignations of Tory councillors in deepest
Oxfordshire.
It is already clear that in introducing the new tax, ministers have learnt
several lessons from the poll tax debacle. The structure of the council tax,
the limits on local government spending and the arrangements for moving from
one system to the next have all been informed by the traumas that wracked
the government and contributed to the then Mrs Thatcher's downfall.
On structure, the most important lesson learnt was the need for the new tax
to be seen as fair. The poll tax was a flat-rate charge on almost all
adults, designed to make local government more accountable to the electors.
But instead it was widely seen as unfair, bearing no relation to ability to
pay - hence its unpopularity.
The council tax takes local taxation back to a property base. The size of
the bill will depend on the value of the home, which acts as a proxy for
ability to pay. And each home will receive only one bill which, because it
is linked to property rather than people, will be harder to evade.
Cunningly, the council tax also avoids some of the difficulties associated
with the system of rates, the property tax which preceded the poll tax. The
most important criticism of rates was that they took no account of the
number of adults in a household. The widow living on her own paid the same
as the two-earner household next door. With the council tax, single
householders will be entitled to a 25 per cent discount on their council tax
bills.
The allocation of each home to one of eight valuation bands restricts the
ability of spendthrift councils to milk better-off home-owners, as some did
under the old rating system. The tax to be levied on a home in the top band
is three times that on the bottom band.
'The council tax is better than the rates for single people, and many people
think it better than the community charge (poll tax) because obviously it is
in part related to people's wealth through their property,' Mr John Redwood,
the local government minister, says. Even so, some Tories are worried about
the impact on traditionally Conservative single pensioners living in
southern England, whose fixed incomes are not related to the value of their
homes.
Labour's spokesman, Mr Doug Henderson, acknowledges that 'it's not as bad as
the poll tax', and Mr Jeremy Beecham, leader of Newcastle-upon-Tyne council
and chairman of the Labour-controlled Association of Metropolitan
Authorities, says: 'We will make the council tax work, though it's not
without its difficulties.'
Chief among these difficulties, according to Mr Beecham, will be making sure
that the 25 per cent deduction for single-adult homes is not abused. While
there will be no register of adults living in every household, some form of
checking will be needed.
And the tax is getting very complicated in order to be fair to everyone,
says Ms Elizabeth Anson, chairman of the Conservative-controlled Association
of District Councils. 'There are exemptions for students, for example, and
student nurses. Bills will have to be adjusted to take account of the
transitional relief which means that the extra people will pay with the new
tax is limited. The end result will be very confusing.'
Whatever the worries about the new tax, however, there is near-unanimity
among local government leaders of all political complexions that the council
tax is an improvement on the poll tax. There is also a realisation that, if
it does not work, there may be little future for independent local
government with its own tax base.
But selling the council tax to the voters does not just depend on whether
its structure seems fair and workable. It is vital that April's bills should
be kept at what ministers call 'realistic' levels to avoid the steep rises
that accompanied the poll tax, for which the government was blamed. The
rises were so steep that the government was ultimately forced to increase
VAT by 2.5 percentage points to take Pounds 140 off each bill.
Ministers are relying on last week's toughening of the government's limits
on local spending to hold down April's council tax bills. Some of the
councils which will feel the tightest squeeze are loyal Tory district
councils.
Mr Redwood calls the settlement 'tight but deliverable'. His optimism is
shared by Mr Bill Dixon Smith, chairman of the Association of County
Councils: 'Given the very tight controls by the government on local
government spending, there should not be massive increases in bills for most
people.'
There remains, however, a very real possibility that ministers will have to
'cap' the budgets of shire districts that have been Tory since elections
began. And if there is any single point at which the introduction of the
council tax could come unstuck over the next few months, it will be over the
Commons vote on capping. Councils begin setting their budgets in January,
and those provisionally selected for capping are announced in early April.
After councils have a further opportunity to make representations, MPs
debate capping in late May. There is likely to be a Tory revolt on the issue
in the Commons: its success will depend on how far councils press their
local MPs.
In addition to the structure of the new tax and the level of next April's
bills, another threat may lie in the organisation of the changeover.
The launch of the poll tax was marred by foul-ups in the computer software
and systems installed to collect it. This is unlikely to be repeated with
the council tax, according to Ms Moira Lee, of the Institute of Revenues
Rating and Valuation, the professional body for the local authority staff
who must make the new system work.
'The poll tax experience was a steep learning curve, and our members now
have a much better idea of what computer companies can do. So far, the
indications are that all is going well and the tax will be introduced on
schedule.'
Another problem with the introduction of the poll tax sprang from
predictions of average bills which turned out to be over-optimistic in most
parts of the country. Ministers are anxious to avoid the same mistake this
time round, and have resolutely avoided making predictions about average or
typical levels. They are assisted in this resolve by the banding system,
since it is by no means clear what a typical or average value is.
Even the valuation process - tipped by many as a stumbling block - does not
appear to have caused an upsurge of ill-will so far. The main worry for many
critics was that the valuations, based on prices in April 1991, would be
seen as unrealistically high by householders whose property values had
plummeted since then.
The valuers, however, seem to have produced lower values than most
commentators had expected.
As Mr Redwood is fond of pointing out, a quarter of householders will have
no cause to complain about their valuation, since they have been put in the
lowest band. Appeals may be deterred by the probable need for a professional
valuation, costing anything up to Pounds 150, to challenge the April 1991
assessment.
Even in London, where prices have fallen sharply and valuations are high in
comparison with the rest of the country, Tories believe they can live with
the bandings that have emerged. 'The worry about valuations is still there,'
says Mr Richard Tracey, chairman of London Tory MPs, 'though there is some
evidence that the average valuation for the boroughs is better than one
thought.'
London Tories are also concerned about the timing of transitional relief
which will ensure that no one, even in the most highly valued property,
should face an increase in their local taxation bill of more than Pounds
182. While they welcome the way it has been designed, they are concerned
about how quickly it will be phased out, and what the bills for 1994-95 will
look like. They are particularly worried about the impact on London borough
elections in spring 1994.
Mr Redwood offers a glimmer of hope, pointing out that the transitional
relief is for a minimum of two years. 'If people say that that's too rapid,
we will have to see whether we can do it over a longer period,' he says.
'We'll make final decisions in the light of the settlement next year.'
But despite all these positive portents for the new tax, the government is
by no means home and dry. Labour believes that there is enough unfairness in
the system to make it worth keeping up the sniping. 'The rich do well,
single rich people do well and middle-income people in an ordinary house in
London do badly,' says Mr Henderson.
And in the long term, the council tax will do nothing to solve the problems
of local finance. The tax will still raise only the paltry 15 per cent of
council spending budgeted for next year. Most people involved in local
government believe that this is too small a proportion. They argue that the
council tax will therefore need to rise to provide an adequate tax base for
local government. However, the number of changes in local government
finance, plus the reorganisation and the rolling programme of elections
means that it is hard to find a good time to raise bills.
'I don't see how anyone with commonsense can be happy about it, but we've
got to make it work,' one southern Tory backbencher said. It may not be
much, but even a mood of grim determination is better than the reckless
hostility that sealed the fate of the poll tax.
 ------------------------------------------------------
COUNCIL TAX: WHO FOOTS THE BILL
 ------------------------------------------------------
Projected average council tax bills in England
 ------------------------------------------------------
              Property                      % of homes
Band       value (Pounds)   Bill (Pounds)  in this band
 ------------------------------------------------------
A           Up to 40,000        329             26
B          40,000-52,000        384             19
C          52,000-68,000        439             22
D          68,000-88,000        494             15
E          88,000-120,000       604              9
F         120,000-160,000       713              5
G         160,000-320,000       823              4
H            Over 320,000       988              1
 ------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3801</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Housing market turnover halved
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER, Property Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TURNOVER in the housing market has roughly halved since 1988, Inland Revenue
statistics indicated yesterday. The total number of housing transactions in
1988 was 2.12m. In the year to October this yearthey fell by 11 per cent to
1.08m, equivalent to 7 per cent of the owner-occupied housing stock.
A report published by the Valuation Office, an Inland Revenue agency, said
most deals arose from events such as job relocation or repossession.
'Very few are in consequence of a desire to move in and trade up in the
market,' it said. Residential land values have fallen by about 23 per cent
in London and 5 per cent in the north and north-west of England. 'What
little optimism there was 12 months ago has gone,' the report added.
The pace of decline in agricultural property had slowed in the past year
except for dairy farms in the south-west and Wales. Arable farm values had
fallen by 8 per cent, mixed farm values by 7 per cent and dairy and hill
farms by 6 per cent since October last year.
Across the country there was a big drop in the number of agricultural sales
over the past six months. Most deals involved small parcels of land rather
than whole farms.
The report said the property investment market had continued to re-establish
itself, albeit at lower levels.
The report said the market in industrial property had virtually dried up in
much of the country in the past six months.
Development land values dropped 10 per cent in the six months to September
30, with a 17 per cent decline over the previous 12 months.
Wales and the west Midlands were the most resilient parts of the country.
The Property Market Report, published twice a year, is compiled from
information supplied by 117 district valuers in England, Scotland and Wales.
Meanwhile, Alliance &amp; Leicester, the fourth-largest building society,
yesterday announced 400 job losses over the next one to two years.
The cuts will result in the loss of a quarter of the staff at each of
Alliance &amp; Leicester's administrative centres at Oadby, near Leicester and
Hove, East Sussex.
The cuts are expected to be shared evenly between the two centres, which
employ 800 people each.
Alliance &amp; Leicester said it was looking for voluntary redundancies; most of
the job losses would be clerical. It said Alliance &amp; Leicester would not be
closing any of its 412 branches, although there would be a review of branch
staffing numbers in January.
In March the society announced 85 jobs cuts in junior to senior management.
The number of houses started by builders fell to 11,800 in October from
14,200 in the same month last year, government figures showed yesterday.
There were 13,600 completions compared with 16,200 last year.
Starts for the quarter to October were down 7 per cent compared with the
previous quarter and 11 per cent from the same quarter last year.
Property Market Report. Chief Executive's Office, Valuation Office Agency,
Room G33, New Court, Carey Street, London WC2A 2JE. Pounds 30.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3802</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Heseltine tackles power deadlock
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Michael Heseltine, trade and industry secretary, tried yesterday to break
the deadlock between British Coal and electricity companies over contract
terms by suggesting they negotiate a deal for one year rather than the five
under discussion.
He also gave the strongest indication yet that the energy review, due to be
completed by the end of January, will result in substantial increases in the
market for British coal.
Mr Heseltine's remarks in a letter to Mr Neil Clarke, British Coal chairman,
are likely to stimulate interest by the regional electricity companies in
reaching agreements. But there are still obstacles and it remained unclear
last night whether agreement would be reached before the energy review is
completed. Completion is due by the end of next month.
Some regions would be unwilling to buy electricity at the same price as was
envisaged in five-year deals because a one-year deal could give no guarantee
of subsequent price reductions.
Agreement will also have to be reached on tonnages, with the possibility
that British Coal will want to sell more than the 40m tonnes on offer in the
five-year talks.
One option is that present deals will be extended by a year with adjustments
for prices and volumes.
In his letter, published yesterday in response to a parliamentary question,
Mr Heseltine tells Mr Clarke that any contracts should not prejudice the
energy review's outcome. The review, he said, was launched amid widespread
concern that there might be a market for substantially higher tonnages.
Mr Heseltine hoped that 'against that background' negotiators could agree
arrangements that will 'ensure a sound and stable basis for the British coal
industry and the electricity supply industry to plan their businesses at
least for 1993-94, and pending implementation of options identified in the
light of the review of the prospects of the 21 pits'.
The three-year coal contracts with the electricity companies terminate at
the end of March.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3803</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Renault will close Dunstable plant
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RENAULT, the French car and commercial vehicle maker, is to close its truck
assembly plant at Dunstable, Bedfordshire, ending truck making in the town.
Dunstable was once one of the leading truck centres in Europe, producing
vehicles under the Bedford, Commer, Karrier and Dodge names.
The workforce was cut to 522 from 1,070 at the end of 1989. The closure,
with the loss of 280 jobs, comes about six months after AWD, the privately
owned truck maker that took over the loss-making Bedford truck operations in
Dunstable from General Motors in 1987, went into receivership with the loss
of 650 jobs.
The plant was once part of the Rootes group. Its ownership changed to
Chrysler of the US in the 1960s, to the Peugeot group of France in 1978 and
to Renault in 1981.
Renault truck operations in the UK have lost money consistently for the past
decade. The company said yesterday that UK production of its 50 Series and
Midliner trucks would end in the spring.
It will maintain its commercial and parts operations at Dunstable, employing
244 people, and form a small vehicle-engineering centre at the site to
provide UK vehicle specifications.
It is understood that Renault Truck Industries has lost Pounds 11m-Pounds
12m this year compared with a pre-tax loss of Pounds 18.6m in 1991. Closure
provisions are expected to push the total loss above last year's level.
RTI said it would change its name this month to Renault VI United Kingdom.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3804</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Pit clean-up cash
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Environment Department has given the National Rivers Authority Pounds 8m
to find a way to clean polluted water flowing from the Wheal Jane mine near
Truro, Cornwall.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3805</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / British Sugar deal
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BLUE-COLLAR workers at British Sugar, the maker of Silverspoon sugar, have
won a two-hour cut in the working week to 37 hours and a 5 per cent rise
backdated to April.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3806</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Dockers opt for payoff, not pay cut
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LISA WOOD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MORE THAN 250 dock workers at Sheerness in Kent have taken redundancy this
week rather than accept new contracts of employment, Lisa Wood writes.
The dock workers voted on Monday to strike in protest at the contracts,
which cut pay by up to 10 per cent and introduced new working patterns.
Mr Peter Vincent, chief executive of Medway Ports, said that contract labour
was being used temporarily and every ship was being serviced normally.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3807</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / London buses to be sold
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD TOMKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LONDON BUSES, operator of the capital's red double-deckers, is to be broken
into its 11 subsidiary companies and privatised from the end of next year,
the government announced yesterday, Richard Tomkins writes.
The move might mean the end of the capital's distinctive red buses if, as
seems likely, buyers of the 11 companies adopt their own liveries and move
towards single-deck, one-person-operated buses.
The London Tourist Board said it would be 'a sad day for London' if
privatisation led to the disappearance of one of the city's most famous
symbols. 'The red double-decker is very much a part of the potential
visitor's image of London and it should be protected,' the board said.
Red double-deckers are already in retreat in the capital after a decision by
London Transport, London Buses' parent, to put the operation of 40 per cent
of the bus route network out to competitive tender.
Where London Buses has won the route contracts, the buses have kept the
distinctive red colour. Where private companies have won the contracts,
buses have appeared in an increasingly wide variety of colours and sizes.
The government's aim is to privatise London Buses' subsidiaries and
encourage them to compete with other private-sector operators for the right
to operate the rest of London Transport's bus routes.
For the present, London Transport will continue to control routes,
timetables and fares in the capital, but Mr Steven Norris, minister for
transport in London, said it remained the government's intention to move
towards deregulation of the London bus market at the earliest opportunity.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3808</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Sunday ruling due later this month
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE EUROPEAN Court is to rule on December 16 whether the Sunday trading laws
in England and Wales are compatible with EC rules.
The ruling might have a bearing on the speed with which the government's
planned Sunday trading reform is implemented. Retailers said it was unlikely
to affect decisions whether to open on the last Sunday before Christmas.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3809</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / ITV is angered by OFT assault
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ITV YESTERDAY expressed outrage over an Office of Fair Trading report that
condemned its proposed new network system as anti-competitive, Raymond
Snoddy writes.
The OFT ruling against the system is likely to cause uncertainty in the ITV
sphere for at least the next year and is almost certain to lead to an appeal
to the Monopolies and Mergers Commission.
Sir Bryan Carsberg, director-general of fair trading, said yesterday the
arrangements proposed 'are likely - indeed were in part intended - to have
an anti-competitive effect on the television programme-making and the
television broadcasting businesses.'
The proposals governing ways in which independent producers would sell
programmes to the ITV network specified that ITV could buy UK rights for 10
years with a further five-year option.
Independent producers could submit ideas to the network centre, but the
programmes would be commissioned through a sponsoring ITV company which
would see that all the rules were followed.
Sir Bryan ruled that in deals with the network centre a contract should run
for no more than five years, with an optional additional two. He also said
independent producers should have the option of being commissioned directly
from the centre to reduce the cost, inconvenience and possible unfairness of
finding a sponsoring ITV company.
The OFT also decided that the exclusive option for ITV to acquire rights to
further programmes in a series and the programme format - which can often be
sold to other countries - should be removed from standard contracts.
British broadcasters have to buy 25 per cent of their programmes, apart from
news and current affairs, from independents. Mr John Woodward, chief
executive of Pact, the body representing independent producers, said: 'What
this means is that for the first time independent producers will be able to
sell programmes to the ITV network on the same terms as ITV companies.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3810</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Kinnock urges Smith to move on electoral reform
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR NEIL KINNOCK, the former Labour leader, has expressed support for
electoral reform.
In a BBC interview to be shown today Mr Kinnock also differs from Mr John
Smith, who succeeded him in July, over the pace of reform in the party. Mr
Smith spoke in and interview with ITN last night.
Mr Kinnock says he wants a change in the electoral system not purely to
block the prospect of indefinite Tory rule, but 'because I think it's the
only way to ensure that all parts of the country can be properly represented
in a party or parties that can form a government'.
During the general election campaign he refused to express a view on
electoral reform before Labour's commission on constitutional matters
reached a conclusion. The commission is due to report in the spring.
Mr Kinnock's advice to Mr Smith to push on with changes seems drawn from his
own experience.
Mr Kinnock says: 'My instinct is that the longer you give yourself with an
assembled body of policies the better it is . . . The general thrust must be
there and people must be confident about it and the sooner you do it the
better.'
Mr Smith said, in contrast, that he constantly kept in mind the need 'to
pace politics properly'.
He added: 'I don't believe that you should rush forward and put everything
in your shop window . . . you've got to do the patient and careful work,
taking some original thoughts, working them through in practical ways.'
He believed his overriding obligation to the Labour party was 'to make sure
that we hit our period of maximum effectiveness at the relevant and
important point in the political cycle'.
Meanwhile, he continued, 'no doubt there will be plenty of parliamentary
fireworks, but they are not the most important thing on my agenda.' He has
been criticised by some Labour MPs for undue caution.
Mr Nick Raynsford, Labour MP for Greenwich, said recently that the party
appeared to be 'substituting a state of anaesthetised torpor for a previous
mood of hyperactive aggression'. Ms Clare Short, MP for Birmingham Ladywood,
spoke of 'masterful inactivity'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3811</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Caution follows sterling euphoria
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMMA TUCKER, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   THE 'PROUD pound'
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
a recent term of endearment among foreign exchange dealers - rose more than
7 pfennigs this week. From DM2.41 at Monday's open, it climbed to DM2.4875
at last night's close, prompting suggestions that sterling's fortunes had
turned the corner.
Currency analysts yesterday recommended caution. Sterling may not be about
to fall below DM2.40, but many factors behind its recent surge are
temporary.
The main forces buoying sterling this week were:
Turmoil in the European exchange rate mechanism. The pound benefited from
its more stable position away from the strains that have rocked other
European currencies, in particular the French franc.
Hopes for an economic recovery. Strong money supply data at the beginning of
the week hinted at a recovery in retail sales.
Repatriation of funds. Many fund managers who reduced their exposure to
sterling over the summer were tempted to repatriate funds this week,
particularly from France, where there was concern that the franc might be
devalued. Sterling also benefited from flows out of the Far East, where
political tensions unnerved investors.
Longer-term prospects for sterling are more mixed. Its main drawback is the
economy's continued weakness.
The outlook in other European countries is even duller as Germany moves into
recession. Mr Stephen Hannah, head of research at IBJ International in
London, said: 'One positive influence on sterling will be the fact that next
year interest rates in the UK will probably hit bottom, but in Germany
lending rates will be falling right through 1993.'
By last night, many analysts, looking beyond recent boosts, were confident
that the pound had established a firm floor at about DM2.40.
A small fall in the Central Statistical Office's shorter leading index,
which indicates turning points in the economy about four months in advance,
suggests further falls in output before the end of the year.
The latest cyclical indicators from the CSO point to more bad news before
Christmas and in the new year, but a rise later next year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3812</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Labour hits at tax break
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A Pounds 60M SUBSIDY will go to people living in the UK's most expensive
homes through the single-person council tax discount, Labour said yesterday.
The party said the subsidy would be at the expense of middle and low-income
families.
The emphasis on the 25 per cent cut in council tax available to
single-person households regardless of wealth is a key element in the
opposition's attempt to highlight what it sees as the unfairness of the new
tax.
Tories seem more worried about the squeeze on spending to prevent bills
rising too sharply, given the limited amount of grant that was available for
the first year of the new tax.
Even so, Labour is determined to attack the basis of the tax as well as the
spending settlement.
Mr Doug Henderson, Labour's local-government spokesman, pointed out that in
terms of cash reductions, the discount most benefited those in the top
bands. He said last night that the Pounds 60m could have been used instead
to save every household Pounds 3 from its council tax bill.
Mr John Redwood, the local-government minister, attacked Labour for
challenging the discount, available to 6m people, without saying how the
party expected single people on low incomes to pay the full charge.
Mr Henderson emphasised that benefit from the discount was concentrated in
London.
'It is clear that ordinary householders in London and the rest of the
country are subsidising a small number of rich single people, Mr Henderson
said.
Son of Poll Tax, Page 6
Weekend, Page IV
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3813</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / November new car sales up 6.3% on year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UK NEW car sales rose 6.3 per cent to 106,902 in November compared with the
same month a year ago, while new commercial vehicle sales increased 15.3 per
cent to 15,920.
Registrations of new cars and commercial vehicles have been higher than a
year ago in three of the past four months.
Although stronger demand for new cars comes mainly from the fleet sector,
where sales in November were 8.6 per cent higher, retail demand also rose
4.3 per cent.
Sir Hal Miller, chief executive of the Society of Motor Manufacturers and
Traders, said: 'These figures reflect a continuing modest but welcome
increase in UK sales, with the full benefit of the abolition of special car
tax still to work through.'
Special car tax was abolished three weeks ago, cutting car prices by about 4
per cent. Several carmakers have, however, been forced to raise prices
because of the devaluation of the pound.
Sir Hal said there was an 'encouraging increase' in sales of light
commercial vehicles, with a 'modest upswing' in registrations of trucks and
buses. 'It is clear . . . that the green shoots of domestic growth are
beginning to show through.'
New car sales in the first 11 months of the year, at 1,513,698, were still
1.3 per cent lower than a year ago, while new commercial vehicle sales in
the first 11 months fell by 4.4 per cent to 189,031.
Car sales have dropped by nearly a third from the peak of 2.3m in 1989,
while commercial vehicle sales have almost halved during the recession.
Ford, the leader of the UK new car market, suffered a 19.2 per cent drop in
its sales volume in November in spite of the 6.3 per cent increase in the
overall market. Its market share in November tumbled to 19 per cent from
24.9 per cent in the same month a year ago, while its share in the first 11
months of the year fell to 22.5 per cent from 24.2 per cent.
Weakening sales and excess stock levels in the UK and in continental
European markets have forced Ford to cut output severely at its Eu-ropean
assembly plants.
Rover, a subsidiary of British Aerospace, increased its sales volume by 16.4
per cent in November, mainly because of heavy sales to large fleet
operators.
Rover accounted for 24.5 per cent of the fleet car market in November,
compared with an average share for the first 11 months of 17 per cent. In
spite of higher sales in November, Rover's registrations for the first 11
months fell by 10.2 per cent, depressing its market share to 12.9 per cent
from 14.2 per cent a year earlier.
Meanwhile, Japanese carmakers were capturing a growing share of UK new car
sales. They were led by Nissan, which more than doubled its sales in
November from the same month a year before.
Jaguar and Rolls-Royce Motor Cars, the luxury carmakers among those worst
affected by the recession, also increased sales year-on-year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3814</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Lamont eager to stay chancellor
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR NORMAN LAMONT has made clear his determination to remain chancellor. In
interviews yesterday he said he wanted no other job in government.
There has been growing speculation at Westminster that he will be moved in a
Christmas or new year cabinet reshuffle. He had been criticised over the
recession, disclosures about his Access credit card bill, and the Treasury's
partial payment of legal fees incurred over an unwanted tenant in his
private house.
Interviewed by the Wall Street Journal, Mr Lamont said there was
'absolutely' other job that interested him in government. He told The Times
that his work as chancellor was 'like living a thriller; there is no other
way I would like to spend my life.'
Mr Lamont has shown his irritation at his treatment by the press in the past
two weeks, saying the media were in danger of abusing their powers in the
way the unions did in the 1970s. The herd instinct of newspapers would prove
their undoing, he predicted.
This week Mr Lamont has called in Peter Carter-Ruck and Partners, the law
firm, over reports in some newspapers about his credit card transactions.
But Mr Lamont is not believed to be a supporter of a privacy bill.
The chancellor was in Brussels negotiating Britain's future when newspapers
began inquiring about his credit card bill. 'To have to leave that meeting
to telephone my private office to answer questions about whether I had
bought a bottle of wine in Paddington, and the price of that wine, was the
height of absurdity,' he told The Times.
Checks have been made on the Treasury account used to help pay Mr Lamont's
legal bills for evicting a tenant, it was disclosed today.
Mr Anthony Nelson, Treasury economic secretary, said in a Commons written
reply that, apart from the Pounds 4,700 payment to Carter-Ruck, the only
others relating to MPs were the purchase of minor stationery items for
ministers' offices.
Mr Dale Campbell-Savours, Labour MP for Workington, had asked for details of
payments out of the account since the Tories came to power.
Mr Nelson said it was 'a sundry payments account'. It was not possible to
check records as far back as 1979.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3815</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Are there significant signs of recovery?: Weak economy reins
back rising pound; Manufacturers sceptical of 'green shoots'; Jobs agency
chief is optimistic
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MORE than two years into its longest recession since the 1930s, a weary
Britain is sensing that better times might be near, Peter Marsh writes. But
any upturn is almost certain to be modest.
Cautious optimism is abroad in the City and industry because several
economic indicators in recent weeks have pointed to a recovery of sorts. Few
observers are being upbeat, however. The Treasury, which has predicted an
imminent upturn several times during the past two years, is notably
cautious, saying only that 'conditions for recovery' are in place.
There have been several encouraging developments. M0, the narrow measure of
the money supply, which mainly comprises notes and coins in circulation and
is a good indicator of consumer demand, grew by 3 per cent in the year to
November. Retail sales volumes expanded by 0.9 per cent in the three months
to the end of October, underlining the resilience of shop spending.
Import volumes have grown, there are signs that the housing market may be
picking up slowly and some job agencies are reporting increased demand for
office workers. Against those positive factors, industry order books are
still thin, consumer confidence has yet to show much sign of an uplift and
projected growth in unemployment to more than 3m over the next year is
likely to damp confidence for the foreseeable future.
Here FT reporters examine the main sectors of the economy for signs of the
long awaited recovery.
MANUFACTURERS remain highly sceptical about the prospects for any
significant recovery next year, in spite of patchy evidence of some recent
improvement in trading.
Companies are emphasising that any recovery in business will start from
extremely low activity levels - with many manufacturers still recording
output running as low as 30 per cent of capacity.
The Engineering Employers' Federation said it saw signs that output would
begin to increase slowly from the beginning of 1993, but only in the vehicle
and electrical and instrument engineering sectors.
Lord Hanson, chairman of Hanson, the industrial conglomerate, said: 'We
expect tighter margins in the UK for 1993 than in most of 1992.'
Lord Weinstock, managing director of GEC, the electrical engineering group,
said he was deeply cautious over the outlook for next year.
Mr Duncan Allen, managing director of Compair Broomwade, the industrial
compressor manufacturer, said vital export markets had picked up
significantly since the pound's devaluation.
Housing
House sales have picked up during the past fortnight, according to some of
the country's biggest builders and mortgage lenders. But the industry feels
that might merely show a transitory improvement after one of the worst
autumn selling seasons in memory.
Mr Joe Dwyer, chief executive of Wimpey, Britain's second-largest house
builder, said: 'I would like to believe this was the beginning of a more
sustained recovery, but it is far too early to be talking of an
improvement.'
Halifax Building Society, the UK's biggest mortgage lender, noticed a slight
increase in sales during the last week of November. The society reported
that house prices, assisted by the late surge in sales, increased on average
by 0.1 per cent last month, the first monthly increase recorded by the
society since June. But Nationwide, Britain's second-largest society,
reported a 2 per cent fall in prices last month.
Retailers
Retailers are concerned that Thursday's bombings in Manchester were the
start of an IRA campaign targeting shopping areas, which might further
depress the sector.
Mr Liam Strong, chief executive of the Sears retail group, said demand was
flat.
Mr Stanley Kalms, chairman of Dixons, the electrical retailer, was more
optimistic. 'The high streets are bustling and it looks like Christmas will
come this year,' he said.
John Lewis Partnership, the department store chain, said sales were better
in the final week of November than in previous weeks, but were still 1.3 per
cent down on the same period last year, while food sales were 1.7 per cent
down.
The company said: 'As far as we are concerned, the jury is still out on (the
degree to which sales will rise) this Christmas.'
Food and drink
Among the big brewers, few signs of economic recovery were apparent. Mr Ian
Prosser, chairman of Bass, said: 'Emotionally, I feel more confident; but,
having said that, trading conditions are still extremely difficult and there
is no real evidence of any recovery.'
Sir Allen Sheppard, chairman and chief executive of Grand Metropolitan,
said: 'At present, evidence of early economic recovery is sparse.'
Transport
The transport sector provides a picture of almost unremitting gloom, with
demand for goods and passenger services at best bumping along the bottom,
and operators seeing little prospect of an upturn.
Mr Chris Green, managing director of British Rail's InterCity sector, said
demand in his part of the rail business was 'absolutely flat', although
things were not getting any worse.
The Freight Transport Association, the trade body for freight carriers, said
confidence among members was patchy to non-existent. Almost the only
operators expecting to increase fleet sizes next year were those in food
retailing.
Jobs agencies
Although unemployment will continue rising well after the upturn has begun,
the jobs market provides useful clues to recovery. There are some grounds
for optimism.
Some evidence exists that demand for temporary staff is picking up strongly.
Mr Alec Reed, chairman of Reed Personnel Services, was one of the first to
predict the downturn in 1988. 'Now, I am pleased to say that I can confirm
that recovery is under way,' he said yesterday.
Mrs Lillian Bennett, chairman of the employment agency Manpower UK, is more
circumspect but also sees some signs of recovery. 'There has been some
increase in demand over the past few weeks but it may be partly seasonal,'
she said.
Information technology
Few companies in the industry see many signs of improvement. Mr John
Gardner, managing director of UK operations at computer maker ICL, said:
'The UK market for information technology is flat and there is no sign of
growth.'
Meanwhile, the picture in the semiconductor industry is mixed. Manufacturers
supplying memory chips and microprocessors to the computer industry are
experiencing a strong pick-up in demand.
Mr Ernie Pusey, sales and marketing director of GEC Plessey Semiconductors,
which concentrates on telecommunications and military markets, said:
'Business in the UK is still in the doldrums.'
Advertising
The advertising world is still in a deep recession in spite of a short-lived
burst of increased spending by advertisers immediately after the election.
Industry estimates suggest that television advertising revenues this quarter
will be down by at least 5 per cent in real terms against the same period
for 1991. Immediate prospects for 1993 are that advertising expenditure (in
real terms) generally will be no higher, and perhaps lower, than this year.
Property
The industry is shell-shocked, with confidence at a low ebb. Tenant demand
continues to be weak and rents are still falling, as might be expected in an
industry that traditionally trails the rest of the economy. 'Tenants are
still in the driving seat,' says Mr Richard Guignard, managing director of
Greycoat, a London-based property developer.
The slide in rental values, which was largely confined to London and the
south-east until the start of this year, has spread to northern England and
Scotland. Industrial property, which had been relatively resilient in the
downturn, has suffered a particularly sharp decline.
Landlords report that an increasing number of tenants have asked to defer or
reduce their rent payments.
Leisure
In spite of the recession, bingo clubs are flourishing. The number of club
licences has risen this year for the first time for nearly 20 years,
attendances are up by 2 per cent and the average amount staked has
increasing steadily to over Pounds 660m a year. Mr Mike Robinson, managing
director of Top Rank, a big bingo operator, said: 'People in such difficult
times still want to have a night out where they can forget their immediate
worries.'
In book publishing, the industry has been in the doldrums for two years, and
there are conflicting views as to whether 1993 will see an improvement.
Meanwhile, holiday companies report that demand has remained reasonably
resilient. Thomson, the UK's biggest travel company, said it had sold almost
all its Christmas holidays.
Hotels and travel
There are few indications that the sector is starting to hum. Forte, the
UK's biggest hotelier and a large restaurant operator, said: 'There are no
significant signs of an upturn.'
Luxury goods
Hope springs eternal in this sector. Truffles and champagne will be
fashionable in the 1990s as consumers shake off the recession gloom and look
for new ways of spending money, according to suppliers of such items. After
very poor results last year, sales of luxury items seem to have picked up
again at the end of the spring.
Harrods, the London department store, said sales of luxury items had shown
very good results this year and had in general fared better than overall
sales.
Insolvency practitioners
A boom sector during the recession; and unfortunately for much of the rest
of industry, the trend of increased activity shows little sign of ending.
Few insolvency practitioners believe business is about to decline. In the
year to April, the fee income of the insolvency departments of the leading
10 firms in the sector was more than Pounds 300m, at a time when audit and
other work has been suffering, with many of their clients in decline.
Mr Mark Homan, head of insolvency at Price Waterhouse, says 'We are the
surgeons of the commercial world rather than the undertakers.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3816</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Brazil sticks to date for steel sale
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINA LAMB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   RIO DE JANEIRO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BRAZIL'S President Itamar Franco said yesterday he would go ahead as planned
with the privatisation of the National Steel Company (CSN) on December 22 -
to the relief of investors.
With a minimum price of Dollars 1.6bn (Pounds 1.05bn), the CSN sale will be
Brazil's largest privatisation so far. Mr Franco, who has frequently
criticised the privatisation process, had been expected to delay the sale,
but relented after meetings with ministers and the president of CSN.
Cancellation of the sale would have increased fears about the new
president's commitment to modernisation. He has, however, ordered a new
evaluation of the price and warned yesterday that if he is not satisfied by
its findings he will halt the sale.
Mr Franco denied that he was planning to sack his economy and planning
ministers. Rumours of the imminent dismissal of the two men have rocked
financial markets all week after a comment by the president that 'ministers
can leave the government at any time' and his refusal to approve their plans
on future economic policy.
In a change of strategy, Mr Franco said the ministers would now be free to
adjust public sector tariffs and government controlled prices, but added: 'I
would just like to know first.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3817</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Kohl to hold talks on nuclear power
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GERMANY'S leading electricity generators are to hold talks with Chancellor
Helmut Kohl this month, to try to break the political deadlock over the
future of nuclear power generation.
Two of the biggest power station operators, RWE and Veba, have been holding
talks with the opposition Social Democrats, represented by Mr Gerhard
Schroder, prime minister of Lower Saxony.
Both operators denied yesterday that they were contemplating abandoning all
nuclear power generation, as reported yesterday in the German media. However
they are refusing to commission any new nuclear power stations until a
political consensus has been reached.
Mr Schroder confirmed in Hanover that he had talked to Mr Klaus Piltz of
Veba and Mr Friedhelm Gieske of RWE.
One proposal to emerge from the talks was a switch from the present system
of nuclear fuel reprocessing - in France - to one of direct disposal and
storage, he said.
Mr Schroder also said there was a possibility of keeping nuclear energy as
part of a combination of power sources, including coal and gas-fired power
stations, but only if safer nuclear technologies could be developed.
That concession was immediately welcomed by the German government as a
significant move by the opposition, possibly opening the way for a
cross-party consensus on nuclear power generation.
RWE and Veba yesterday said they wanted to include nuclear energy in power
options, stressing that nuclear power stations were the only ones which did
not produce carbon dioxide emissions.
However they also said that they would not be commissioning any new power
stations until a political consensus on future regulations had been agreed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3818</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / EC hopes for trade reforms accord this year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GARDNER, QUENTIN PEEL and TIM COONE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS, BONN, DUBLIN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ESSENTIAL elements of the Uruguay Round world trade reforms can still be
agreed before the end of the year, according to EC officials. But they
expect hard bargaining with Japan when across-the-board negotiations resume
in Geneva next week.
In Bonn, meanwhile, President Francois Mitterrand of France insisted
yesterday he wanted a wide-ranging Gatt agreement on trade liberalisation as
soon as possible, though he continued to reject the terms of the recent farm
trade deal reached by negotiators from the US and the European Community.
In spite of supportive words from German Chancellor Helmut Kohl on the need
for a viable agricultural sector, delivered after their Franco-German summit
in Bonn, the two sides were still clearly divided on the farm trade element.
A joint statement said Germany accepted that the US-EC compromise was
possible to implement within the agreed reform of the Common Agricultural
Policy. But France asserted: 'The results of Washington are not acceptable,
because they are not compatible with the CAP.'
EC officials in Brussels conceded it would not be possible, by the end of
the year, to finalise details of liberalisation in 15 sectors of world trade
being negotiated by the 108 participants in the General Agreement on Tariffs
and Trade (Gatt). But by then, 'we will have to be able to say to heads of
government that this negotiation is now going to be completed,' a senior EC
negotiator added.
Only now that the EC and US have settled their row over farm trade and farm
subsidies can there be a start on wider Gatt negotiations about cutting
tariffs by an average 30 per cent, opening up trade in services and amending
the Uruguay Round draft 'final act', the official said. On tariff reduction
in particular, 'we are really starting from scratch,' he added.
He said Japan's proposals on tariffs were 'honourable on paper. . . but the
way in which the (Japanese) system really works is not like that,' because
of their dense networks of non-tariff protection of their market.
'Japan seems to avoid getting wet in every multilateral negotiation, but
this time they're going to have to come on board,' the EC official said. 'We
have to try to corner them this time on non-tariff barriers.'
The EC itself wants more flexibility in the Gatt code restricting subsidies,
and revisions in the Uru-guay Round chapters on intellectual property and
dumping.
But the official indicated the EC would be cautious on pressing its
concerns, for fear of unravelling the Gatt package tied up so far and
missing the deadline for overall agreement.
The expiry of the US administration's 'fast track' authority in March -
after which Congress could seek detailed amendments to a deal - means a
political agreement must be in place by the end of this month.
The danger of France attempting to veto a Gatt deal to defend its farm
exports is being played down in Brussels.
Paris is likely to reserve its position until a full Uruguay Round agreement
is ready, unless it is cornered at next week's Edinburgh summit of Community
leaders.
The French government wants the European Commission to investigate whether
the US-EC deal can be implemented without going beyond CAP reforms in terms
of cuts in farm output and acreage.
In Washington, meanwhile, Mrs Carla Hills, US trade representative, formally
announced she had cancelled the threat of punitive tariffs on EC food and
wine exports following the farm trade accord reached by US and EC
negotiators. The US had threatened to impose the tariffs from today.
Tim Coone in Dublin adds: The Irish government yesterday appeared to be
backing away from the EC-US agreement.
Mr Joe Walsh, Irish agriculture minister, told farm leaders the agreement
'did go beyond what was contained in the CAP reform agreement, particularly
in the case of beef'. He said the restraints on export volumes were a
barrier to Irish acceptance.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3819</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Jobless fall lifts hopes of US recovery
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON, OTTAWA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE US unemployment rate fell to 7.2 per cent last month from 7.4 per cent
in October and a peak of 7.8 per cent in June, indicating that a steady, but
not spectacular, economic recovery is under way.
At the same time, the Labour Department said employment in the
non-agricultural sector rose 105,000 to 108.6m, more than most analysts
expected. Figures for previous months were revised up to reveal a net gain
of more than 300,000 private-sector jobs since the beginning of the year.
On Wall Street the figures were seen as reducing the chance of a big fiscal
stimulus next year, although the incoming Clinton administration is still
likely to unveil a modest package of measures, including an investment tax
credit and an acceleration of infrastructure spending. The Dow Jones
industrial average rose 12.15 to 3,288.68.
The dollar rose on the news, as analysts discounted the chance of any
further cuts in US short-term interest rates. However, with inflationary
pressures modest, the Federal Reserve is not expected to tighten monetary
policy for many months. The dollar gained more than a pfennig to DM1.5930.
Officials cautioned that the employment figures were less strong than they
appeared: up to 45,000 of the new jobs reflected temporary jobs at polling
stations. Manufacturing employment rose 35,000, but this followed net job
losses of 200,000 in the previous three months. The construction and
retailing sectors shed jobs.
Some regions, moreover, remain depressed. The unemployment rate in
California rose to 10.1 per cent last month against 9.8 per cent in October.
The employment report was the latest in a series of improved statistics,
including sharp gains in consumer confidence, factory orders, labour
productivity and the Purchasing Managers' Index - which tracks conditions in
manufacturing.
Monetary growth and bank lending are also beginning to pick up.
The likely pace of the recovery is disputed but few analysts expect the
annualised growth rate of 3.9 per cent reported for the third quarter to be
sustained in coming months. This reflected many special factors, including a
decline in personal savings and some involuntary rebuilding of inventories
by companies.
The much slower pace of job creation than in previous economic recoveries is
widely expected to constrain growth of incomes and personal spending.
Analysts also warn that US exports, surprisingly resilient to date, are
likely to suffer as other big economies, such as Japan and Germany, slip
into recession.
Canada's unemployment rate rose sharply last month to 11.8 per cent from
11.3 per cent in October, Reuter reports from Ottawa. The jobless rate was
the highest since July 1983.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3820</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Japan investing less abroad
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPANESE foreign direct investment fell by about 16 per cent in the first
half of this financial year compared with last year, according to government
figures published yesterday.
However, Japan's current account surplus continued to grow strongly in
October, rising to Dollars 11bn (Pounds 7.2bn), about 60 per cent up from
the same month last year, while the trade surplus rose by about 28 per cent
to Dollars 13bn.
Exports were 9 per cent up at Dollars 30.1bn, with imports at Dollars 17bn,
2.6 per cent lower than the same month last year. The growth of the surplus
is likely to add to pressure on the government to revive the economy to
raise import growth.
Japanese companies made 1,913 foreign direct investments in the six months
to the end of September worth about Dollars 17.3bn. This was 39 per cent
lower than in 1990.
The figures suggest Japanese companies are pulling back from the aggressive
international strategies they pursued in the late 1980s, as a result of the
slowdown in the Japanese economy, which has sharply cut profits and raised
the cost of capital for investment.
The number of investments made in the US fell by about 22 per cent from last
year's half-yearly rate to 629, worth about Dollars 8bn, about 11 per cent
down. Japanese direct investment in the US is running at 38 per cent below
the 1990 level. However, the US accounted for about 46 per cent of all
Japanese foreign investment in the first half, compared with about 43 per
cent last year.
Japanese investment in the UK is holding up well compared with that in the
rest of Europe. There were 103 Japanese investments in the UK, worth about
Dollars 1.8bn, a marginal increase on last year. In contrast, Japanese
investment in Germany fell sharply. There were just 26 investments in the
six months to the end of September, worth about Dollars 297m, compared with
119 investments worth Dollars 1.1bn all last year.
The Japanese are retreating from investment in eastern Europe. There were no
Japanese investments in the Commonwealth of Independent States in the first
half of this year and just one in Hungary, worth about Dollars 2m.
Asian states were the main gainers, reflecting the strategic shift in
Japanese investment towards the faster growing Asian economies such as
Malaysia and Singapore.
There were 622 investments in Asia during the first half.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3821</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Optimism for new S Africa talks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE South African government and the African National Congress ended three
days of talks yesterday with both sides saying they expected multi-party
constitutional negotiations to begin again early next year.
The talks, the first extended contact between the two sides since June,
appear to have strengthened the good relations between them, but to have
yielded few concrete agreements.
In a joint statement, Pretoria and the ANC committed themselves to move
speedily toward democracy, and to ensure that the Convention for a
Democratic South Africa, which broke down last May, is reconvened in an
enlarged form as soon as poss ible.
The ANC expects talks in January.
But the success of such talks will depend on whether Chief Mangosuthu
Buthelezi and his mainly Zulu Inkatha Freedom Party agree to take part.
There was little sign yesterday that the government and the ANC had agreed
on a strategy to persuade Chief Buthelezi to rejoin the talks, which he is
boycotting.
Indeed, the three-day talks, which were said to have been a 'social
success', could well drive a further wedge between the government/ANC axis
and Chief Buthelezi, who suspects his two rivals of forging an alliance
against him.
This impression will be strengthened by the wording of the cautious joint
statement, which speaks of a 'shared responsibility to ensure that a
multi-party negotiated transformation from the present situation to a
democracy must take place rapidly'.
The two sides appointed a sub-committee to continue the debate over ways to
restart democracy talks and slow township violence, and said they would meet
again for a full session in the second half of January.
They discussed a timetable for the installation of an all-race interim
government, but did not set a date, as demanded by Mr Nelson Mandela, ANC
president.
This evidence of common cause from the country's two main political
groupings will lift the morale of whites, under severe pressure in recent
days because of two terrorist attacks, both believed to have been carried
out by the radical Pan Africanist Congress.
On Thursday night, a restaurant bomb blast injured 19 whites, the second
such attack in a week, sparking fears of a terrorist campaign against the
white minority.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3822</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Drugs row threat to free travel pact
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS and DAVID BUCHAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FRANCE has threatened not to apply the Schengen accord on free travel in
continental Europe next year, unless the Dutch government curbs the sale of
soft drugs.
Northern French cities such as Lille and Roubaix face serious social
problems from both hard and soft drugs imported from Amsterdam and fear
Schengen will worsen the crisis unless the Dutch clamp down. According to Mr
Pierre Mauroy, mayor of Lille and former prime minister, there has been a
sharp rise over the past 18 months in imports of heroin and ecstasy by
youngsters who drive to Amsterdam to buy drugs.
'France cannot accept the application of the Schengen accords unless the
Netherlands change their legislation, their regulation and their judicial
practice on drugs,' Mr Paul Quiles, the interior minister, told a senate
hearing.
The Schengen accord, which obliges its nine European signatories to scrap
passport checks on their shared borders, is due to be operational on land
frontiers by the middle of 1993.
The Dutch-Belgian frontier is already control-free, under a special Benelux
accord, while customs make only random checks on the Belgian-French border.
Such checks would vanish completely if Schengen came into effect.
Privately, Dutch officials described France's remarks as an attempt to
discredit their candidacy for the siting of 'Europol', a proposed EC police
clearing house for information on drug trafficking. The Hague, Strasbourg
and Rome are all vying for the institution.
Dutch drugs policy is aimed at tackling trafficking in hard and soft drugs
rather than possession of small quantities of soft drugs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3823</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Reagan: a smile and a call to arms
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD EVANS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OXFORD students queued for hours yesterday to hear Mr Ronald Reagan, former
US president and former actor, give his views on the world scene. It was
hard to decide which of his former roles was more prominent on the day.
His theme was that success in conquering the old enemy of communism must now
be followed by success in conquering the host of smaller but no less deadly
challenges facing younger generations.
He singled out Bosnia and Somalia as current trouble spots that should be
sorted out by the deployment of arms, preferably through a strengthened Nato
force.
'Our multilateral organisations must declare ethnic cleansing and the
slaughter of civilians by military forces unacceptable. And we must be
prepared to put weapons behind our words,' he said.
The speech was a cunning mix of political proposals and jokes. 'I am
delighted to be with you today. At my age I'm delighted to be anywhere.' The
former president is 81.
Mr Reagan said his dream was for countries to unite 'to impose civilised
standards of behaviour on those who flout every measure of human decency'.
He condemned Serbia as a 'tinpot tyranny' and said the Serbs must be given
an ultimatum to stop attacking civilians or face being bombed themselves.
In Somalia, as US troops prepare to move in to safeguard the distribution of
relief supplies, he said it was 'morally imperative' that the UN should
intervene militarily.
He called for a standing UN force - an army of conscience - that was fully
equipped and prepared 'to carve out human sanctuaries' by force if needed.
At the end, presented with an oar in Oxford's dark blue, Mr Reagan took his
curtain call, beaming. It had been a good performance.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3824</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Japan call on Arab boycott
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JERUSALEM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Japan yesterday responded to a long-standing Israeli complaint that it has
for years largely complied with an Arab economic boycott against Israel, by
calling for an end to the embargo in return for curbs on Jewish settlements
in the occupied territories, writes Hugh Carnegy in Jerusalem.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3825</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Few rally to Bhutto cause
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ARIFWALA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Pakistan's opposition leader, Ms Benazir Bhutto yesterday failed to attract
big crowds to support a 'long march' aimed at massing popular backing to
oust Prime Minister Nawaz Sharif's government, Reuter reports from Arifwala.
Her campaign began on November 18 when she and her supporters tried to march
from Rawalpindi to nearby Islamabad. Police broke up that march and arrested
hundreds of people.
She accuses Mr Sharif's Islamic Democratic Alliance of rigging the 1990
elections.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3826</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / UN observers released
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BANGKOK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Khmer Rouge guerrillas yesterday freed six United Nations observers detained
in a village in Cambodia's Kompong Thom province since Tuesday, writes
Victor Mallet in Bangkok.
The guerrillas had demanded that government forces be withdrawn from the
area as a condition for their release, but UN officials said the six were
freed unconditionally as the UN had insisted.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3827</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / German industrial orders fall again
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUDY DEMPSEY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FRESH evidence of Germany's slide into recession emerged yesterday with the
release of October's industrial order figures showing a fall for the eighth
consecutive month, writes Judy Dempsey in Bonn.
The federal Economics Ministry said industrial orders, after taking into
account seasonal and price adjustments, were down 5 per cent in October on
the previous month, and 9.7 per cent against October 1991. Domestic demand
for west German factory goods fell 4.7 per cent, and 6 per cent for foreign
orders.
Orders for capital goods declined by 7 per cent, or 12.4 per cent over the
same period last year. Domestic orders fell 7.4 per cent, and foreign orders
6.2 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3828</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Foreign bargain hunters rally Hong Kong stocks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON DAVIES, SIMON HOLBERTON and YVONNE PRESTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG, BEIJING
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
HONG KONG share prices broke their steep downward trend yesterday after
heavy overseas buying. But there was no expectation of a resolution of the
row between Britain and China which has shattered confidence in the colony.
Meanwhile stockbrokers called in an open letter for the withdrawal of
Governor Chris Patten's proposed democratic reforms and for his resignation.
Support for the letter came from Chim Pui-chung, the financial community's
representative on Hong Kong's Legislative Council
Mr Chim claimed strong backing from some of the smaller local brokerages.
However, international brokers said it was not their role to make political
judgments based on the performance of the stock market.
The Hang Seng Index - the colony's barometer of blue chip stock prices  -
climbed 289.89 points, or 5.82 per cent, yesterday, but recovered less than
a third of the week's losses.
Mr Archie Hart, research director at Crosby Securities, said: 'This is a
knee-jerk reaction. I don't see any reason why the market should sustain
this rally.'
Confidence was hit last week by China's threats to reverse contracts handed
out by the 'Hong Kong-British' Government before 1997, and to invalidate the
Sino-British Joint Declaration.
The Joint Liaison Group - the Sino-British forum for discussing the transfer
of Hong Kong to China - is to meet on Tuesday and some investors are hoping
that it could break the deadlock.
However, government officials do not see scope for any fine-tuning of the
Chinese insistence that Mr Patten unconditionally withdraws his proposals.
China's call has found significant support within a business community which
has suffered short-term losses from the effects of the uncertainty, and
which is concerned over the potential ripple effect into the economy and the
property market.
Some of the larger international broking houses reported record overseas
buying yesterday and turnover hit Dollars HK5.4bn (Pounds 462m)one of the
highest figures ever recorded on the Hong Kong Stock Exchange.
Mr Richard Witts, managing director of local brokerage United Mok Ying Kie,
said: 'It is difficult to resist buying at these levels; but we are not out
of the woods yet.'
Yvonne Preston adds from Beijing: Lord Howe, the former British foreign
secretary, yesterday rallied to the support of Mr Patten, criticising China
for its 'oversimplified denunciations and rejections' of the reform
proposals.
Lord Howe, who was foreign secretary when the Sino-British Joint Declaration
on Hong Kong was negotiated in 1984, said in Beijing of the present angry
confrontation: 'These situations don't continue indefinitely without the
prospect of any forward movement.'
Lord Howe was leading a six-man British human rights delegation to China.
The visit comes just over a year after Prime Minister John Major's warning
to the Chinese that the British government intended to maintain
'unremitting, unrelenting and continuing pressure' over human rights.
On Monday the first US congressional delegation to visit China since the
election of Mr Bill Clinton as president warned Chinese leaders to improve
their human rights record or risk losing their most-favoured-nation trade
status with the US.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3829</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / European policy debates may go public
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GARDNER and ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Community is close to agreeing proposals to open important
policy debates and initial discussion of 'major new legislative proposals'
to the public, as part of the EC drive to bring decision-making closer to
the people.
In practice, this would mean televising the debate for viewing in the press
area of the Council of Ministers of the 12, according to proposals from EC
ambassadors. These will be discussed - behind closed doors - at a 'conclave'
of EC foreign ministers, meeting in Brussels on Tuesday ahead of the
Edinburgh summit.
EC leaders believe the popular backlash against 'Europe' and the Maastricht
treaty is in large part due to too much secrecy and centralisation in
decision-making.
The latest draft of the 'transparency' plan from the current UK presidency
of the EC claims most member states would back public access to:
Six-monthly debates by foreign and finance ministers on 'relevant Presidency
or Commission work programmes';
'Regular open debates on major issues of public interest' in agriculture and
environment policy;
A breakdown of how member states voted when a formal vote is taken. This
would include a justification of the vote, where requested, but not
publication of the minutes of the meeting.
Andrew Hill adds: The EC yesterday named the seven people who will carry out
an inquiry into the alleged failings of Brussels' communications and
information policy.
Sir Bernard Ingham - Downing Street spokesman when Lady Thatcher was UK
premier - was on the original shortlist for the group but the Commission
said yesterday that he was not asked to take part in the audit.
The working group will be chaired by Mr Willy de Clercq, a former
commissioner and Belgian member of the European Parliament. The other
members are Mr Ronald Beatson, director general of the European Association
of Advertising Agencies; Mr Julian Bravo, chairman of the Madrid office of J
Walter Thompson, the advertising agency; Ms Colette Flesch, head of the
Commission's information department; Mr Sergio Guccione, head of the
Parliament's information service; Mr Jacques Pilhan, deputy managing
director of the Paris-based agency Havas; and Mr Mark Wossner, head of
Bertelsmann, the German media group.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3830</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Germans back call for EC growth plan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GERMANY yesterday supported France in pushing for a European economic growth
initiative from the European Community summit in Edinburgh next week - while
insisting that it must not come at the expense of monetary stability and
strict budgetary control.
The finance ministers of both countries also pledged their firm commitment
to the exchange rate mechanism of the European Monetary System, and praised
their central banks for their joint efforts to resist currency speculation
against the French franc.
They said that the existing parity between the D-Mark and the franc was
'fully justified by the economic data of both countries', and clearly
implied that they were determined to continue to resist any speculative
pressure.
The joint declaration by Mr Theo Waigel, the German finance minister, and Mr
Michel Sapin, his French counterpart, was a key element to emerge from the
60th Franco-German summit in Bonn, which covered the whole gamut of
negotiations for the Edinburgh summit.
Germany has been less than enthusiastic about the plan for a European growth
initiative, and was clearly keen to restrain any suggestion that it should
be financed by a big increase in public-sector spending.
On the other hand, France has compromised in its EC negotiating position by
accepting that enlargement negotiations to bring new members into the
community can begin on January 1, even though neither Britain nor Denmark
will have ratified the Maastricht treaty by then.
German Chancellor Helmut Kohl stressed after the summit the need for all
member states to go to Edinburgh ready to make compromises, and repeated the
absolute determination of both France and Germany to press ahead steadily in
their joint ambition of building an integrated 'European union'.
The finance ministers said that any growth initiative must be in conformity
with the economic convergence criteria of the member states, which include
strict limits on public debt and budget deficits, as well as inflation.
The initiative should concentrate on stimulation of investment activity,
including both infrastructure spending and house-building.
The ministers said that the European Investment Bank and a European
Investment Fund could play an important role, as well as the 'rapid
realisation' of the proposed cohesion fund to promote economic development
in the weaker EC economies.
Mr Kohl expressed his confidence that another important Franco-German
initiative, the creation of a Euro-corps for joint defence, was gaining
acceptance by other Nato member states.
Nato's supreme allied commander in Europe, General John Shalikashvili, and
the chiefs of the defence staffs in France and Germany, will begin talks on
Monday to decide the precise relationship between the proposed Euro-corps
and Nato, according to Mr Volker Ruhe, the German defence minister.
They have to reconcile the need for German troops in the corps to be subject
to Nato inspections in peacetime, while French troops, not assigned to Nato,
will remain independent.
Mr Kohl said: 'All the reservations and aversions to this project have been
systematically dropped, and the whole thing is now getting much more
positive marks from our partners.
'This is true not just for this side of the Atlantic, but also for the other
side.'
Both France and Germany say the future corps, with a headquarters in
Strasbourg, is 'an element in the process of building European union which
will include, eventually, a policy of common defence. The European corps
also constitutes. . . a contribution to the reinforcement of the European
pillar of the (Nato) alliance and its common defence.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3831</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Christian Democrats attack Maastricht compromise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LIONEL BARBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FIVE Christian Democratic leaders in Europe last night said a British
compromise to meet Danish demands for exemptions from the Maastricht treaty
were not acceptable in their present form.
The Christian Democrats, led by Chancellor Helmut Kohl of Germany, expressed
reservations about a British proposal to give Denmark a legally binding
opt-out on European monetary union and exemption from a future European
army.
The hard line signalled tough bargaining between Denmark and its European
partners ahead of next week's Edinburgh summit. Without a resolution of the
Danish question, senior officials and diplomats in Brussels yesterday
predicted that the summit could be derailed.
The Christian Democrat leaders included Mr Kohl, Belgian prime minister
Jean-Luc Dehaene, Greek prime minister Constantine Mitsotakis, Luxembourg
prime minister Jacques Santer and a senior deputy to Dutch prime minister Mr
Ruud Lubbers.
Mr Wilfried Martens, president of the European Peoples Party, which groups
the parties in the European parliament, and a former Belgian prime minister,
said that Denmark was not entitled to a unilateral declaration or decision
by the 12 opting out of monetary and political union. This was not
acceptable, he said, because it could influence present and future members
of the EC to make similar demands.
However he was conciliatory in suggesting that the British text on the
Danish question had some positive point. Also, the joint declaration by the
five leaders on the Edinburgh summit was less explicit in criticising the
British text.
Mr John Major, UK prime minister, has linked completion of ratification to a
second referendum in Denmark, probably next May. Mr Major does not attend
the Christian Democrat gatherings because the Tory party is not part of the
EPP, even though Conservative MEPs are allied to it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3832</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Bonn calls for safe havens
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUDY DEMPSEY and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN, BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GERMANY wants the European Community and the United Nations to establish
safe havens in Bosnia-Hercegovina to stop further destruction of the
republic and dissuade Islamic countries from arming Bosnian forces,
officials in Bonn said yesterday.
They also said the war in the former Yugoslavia could spread if the EC
failed to find a compromise with Greece over what an independent Macedonia
should be called. The dispute is holding up the Community's recognition of
Macedonia.
The officials, speaking at the end of the two-day Franco-German summit in
Bonn between President Franc,ois Mitterrand and Chancellor Helmut Kohl,
admitted any decision to set up safe havens would require tens of thousands
of troops deployed under the UN flag.
France and Germany are together carving out a 'mini' safe haven in the
north-western corner of Bosnia, around Bihac.
Mr Mitterrand and Mr Kohl called on the EC to find a rapid solution to the
Macedonian question.
Macedonia will be discussed at the pre-Edinburgh summit meeting of foreign
ministers which opens in Brussels on Monday. outcome will determine whether
Macedonia should be placed on the agenda at Edinburgh.
Britain's Lord Owen, a key participant in efforts to bring peace to the
former Yugoslavia, warned Nato yesterday that war could soon spread in the
Balkans and that the west had to decide where to draw the line, Reuter
reports from Brussels.
A Nato spokesman said Lord Owen, co-chairman of the Geneva peace conference,
told a restricted meeting of ambassadors from the 16 alliance nations that
the situation was 'grave and sombre'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3833</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Rise of right spreads to Slovenia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURA SILBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LJUBLJANA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE rise of the extreme right in parts of Europe has spread to Slovenia,
which votes tomorrow for the first time since the former Yugoslav republic
declared independence in June 1991.
The campaign success of an ultra-nationalist politician, Mr Zmago Jelincic,
has surprised many Slovenes.
With the slogan of 'Slovenia for the Slovenes', he has denounced some
100,000 guest workers from the former Yugoslavia for taking jobs from
Slovenes.
Mr Jelincic, who heads the Slovene National Party, has accused the 100,000
Bosnian refugees in Slovenia of having fled economic deprivation rather than
war.
'They should be sent back. This is not their country. It is a different
state,' he said in an interview yesterday.
'Jelincic stepped in with a clear right-wing message that could be
understood by everybody,' says Mr Ervin Hladnik, a journalist of the
independent weekly Mladina.
The candidate could capture about 10 per cent of the parliamentary vote,
which is likely to be split among the Christian Democratic Party, the United
Left, a coalition which includes the reformed communists, and the centrist
Liberal Democrats.
The refugees, and an unemployment rate of 11.5 per cent, appear to have
provided Mr Jelincic with plenty to protest about.
A drop in living standards after the loss of Yugoslav export markets has
also fostered the rise of nationalism in the tiny north-western republic,
which borders Austria, Italy and Hungary.
Mr Milan Kucan, the current president and strong favourite in the
simultaneous presidential race, sees 'the intolerance as part of the
'Rostock syndrome' which is spreading across Germany.'
It is due to a 'lack of perspective for young people,' says Mr Kucan.
Over one million voters in Slovenia will go to the polls tomorrow. The
parliamentary and presidential elections, follow a campaign marked by the
absence of such issues as the economy and the war in Bosnia-Hercegovina.
Instead, a jumble of political parties sought to forge their identity in the
elections, which were called after the collapse of Demos, the broadly based
ruling coalition.
Under the guidance of reformed communists, Slovenia broke away from
Serb-dominated Yugoslavia after a ten-day war in June 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3834</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Yeltsin could bypass Congress
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN LLOYD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT Boris Yeltsin could bypass the increasingly hostile Russian
Congress of People's Deputies and appeal to the people for extra powers and
approval for a new constitution if votes go against him in the assembly
today.
Deputies will vote for a series of amendments to the constitution - already
a palimpsest of the old Soviet constitution - which in sum would force Mr
Yeltsin to gain their approval not just for the appointment of a prime
minister but also for the naming of every important figure in the cabinet.
In a brief speech yesterday, Mr Yeltsin said that many of the amendments
would 'reverse the development of Russia's statehood. . . the country would
get a weak government, whoever was its leader.'
Later, Mr Vyacheslav Kostikov, the president's press secretary, said the
Congress would be 'out of its head' to oppose the president. He hinted that
Mr Yeltsin would go to the country with a demand for extra powers and for
the approval of a new constitution if deputies get the required two-thirds
majority for their amendments today.
Drafts of an appeal to the nation were said by aides to be under preparation
yesterday, though neither Mr Yeltsin nor any of his ministers made further
attempts to influence the vote.
The deputies will vote in secret on these vital clauses, and much of
yesterday's business was devoted to selecting which of the amendments
merited this treatment.
The anti-government, even anti-presidential, mood of the assembly was
demonstrated yesterday when the deputies voted 668-210 to support in
principle a resolution thoroughly critical of the progress of economic
reform, calling it 'contrary to the interests of most people'.
The motion did not, however, call for the government's resignation and
government supporters intend to seek changes and deletions when it is
debated clause by clause.
The government's opponents also have a steep hill to climb. A constitutional
amendment requires two-thirds of the available votes of 1,040 deputies.
Inevitably, some deputies will fail to turn up at the session, thus
weakening the chances of attaining that figure: yesterday's attendance was
around 930.
Mr Oleg Rumyantsev, a centrist deputy who is also secretary of the
constitutional commission, pointed to one possible solution when he said he
would vote for some of the general amendments curtailing the president's
powers - thus firing a warning shot at Mr Yeltsin - but would not support
the detailed amendments which spelled out the number of ministers who must
be confirmed by the parliament.
Even if the amendments are not passed, however, the problem of the division
of powers among the president, the Congress and the government remains.
Mr Yeltsin has proposed a massive shift of authority, especially over
economic reform, in his direction. But there is almost certainly not a
simple, let alone a two-thirds, majority in the Congress for that.
Mr Andrei Kozyrev, the foreign minister, said in a speech that 'the position
of our government is stable enough, our determination is strong enough, not
to allow a revanchist reversal in international affairs'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3835</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / UN fears it can only 'ease the passage of history': How
restricted resources and powers may prevent UN troops from fulfilling their
already limited tasks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WHITE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Thirty-tonne British Warrior fighting vehicles, French Sagaie light tanks
with 90-millimetre guns: this is the new UN image in the former Yugoslavia.
In as much as the weapons are more potent and up-to-date than those seen in
other UN peacekeeping operations, they are signs of a new departure. But
they may well become symbols of frustration in the first blue-helmet
operation in continental Europe.
'Anybody working here is bound to be frustrated by the limits of what we are
allowed to do,' a UN official admitted this week.
Fourteen generals and brigadiers head a combined military force of more than
22,000 in Croatia and Bosnia-Hercegovina.
With further deployments now being studied as a preventive measure in
Macedonia, the UN already has more troops in the ex-Yugoslav republics than
in Cambodia, more than it despatched to the Congo in the early 1960s, and
almost twice as many as were engaged in all its peacekeeping operations this
time last year.
But it is questionable how far these forces will be able to fulfil even
their limited tasks, with the resources and powers they now have.
The initial UN Protection Force was set up in February following the
ceasefire in Croatia to stop renewed fighting. Twelve enlarged infantry
battalions, backed up by logistics and support troops, were given the job of
'demilitarising' four zones, covering about a third of Croatia, in which
Serbs made up the majority or a substantial minority. This meant ensuring
the withdrawal of forces, disbanding any remaining troops, impounding their
weapons, and seeing that the police respected civil rights.
In the central zone known as Sector West, it has largely worked. Police
carry only handguns and act like police. But in Sector East, abutting
Serbia, and in the mountainous southern Krajina region the situation is
described as 'nearly anarchic'. Talks on demilitarisation have got nowhere.
Croatian troops are meanwhile said to be 'visibly gathering' across some UN
Protected Area borders, moving up from the agreed lines of withdrawal,
especially in the southwest near Zadar.
Croatia says it wants the UN out by the end of March, when its current
mandate ends. UN officials, diplomats and politicians in Zagreb believe that
would lead, perhaps within days, to new hostilities, since Croatia would
seek to repossess at least parts of these areas.
The more recent UN force in Bosnia has a different job and and different
organisation. As in Somalia, the UN is breaking new ground trying to protect
relief supplies in the middle of an ongoing war.
The 6,000 British, French, Canadian and Spanish troops sent to protect aid
routes - in addition to forces despatched earlier to secure Sarajevo's
airport and help supplies to the besieged Bosnian capital - are funded
directly by their governments and not out of the UN's overstretched funds.
General Philippe Morillon, the UN's French commander in Bosnia, has a high
profile in negotiations between the warring parties, but is regarded in UN
circles as a loose cannon.
The troops' new role is itself controversial. Dr Cornelio Sommaruga,
president of the International Committee of the Red Cross, has questioned
the wisdom of resorting to military means to support humanitarian aid,
insisting that the use of troops for this purpose 'must remain a temporary
and exceptional measure.'
After delays in deployment, the troops have found their operations
obstructed by local militia commanders, mainly - but not solely - Serbs. The
new Canadian battalion and a company of Dutch transport troops have been
kicking their heels in Croatia, waiting to move to the Bosnian Serb
stronghold of Banja Luka. This is not only an important aid route but the
only one of the new UN operations scheduled to be based in a Serb-held area.
'Without the Serbs' co-operation a lot of things can't be done,' a UN
officer commented.
UN forces, finding it increasingly difficult to appear even-handed, are
afflicted by a sense of powerlessness.
Serb helicopters flout the ban on military flying to re-supply front-line
forces. But prospects for taking military action against them are
complicated by the presence of UN ground troops, who would be vulnerable to
retaliation.
Gen Morillon takes a broad view of the UN force's humanitarian mandate. But
if the troops' role is extended, for instance to evacuating refugees, it
could cause problems. Since many of the male refugees fleeing Serb attacks
wear uniforms, the UN could be accused of providing direct military
assistance. On the other hand, it could equally be accused of abetting
'ethnic cleansing' by moving civilians away from their homes.
UN commanders hope the conspicuous presence of their armoured vehicles will
build local communities' confidence. But many Croats and Moslems see the UN
as an irrelevance or even an encumbrance. 'If I were at the receiving end of
the shells,' said a senior French diplomat, 'I would not be grateful for the
kind of help I've been receiving.'
The UN's Bosnia-Hercegovina headquarters at Kiseljak could support a much
larger operation, as could the British army's logistics base. But from
humanitarian aid to intervention, even against fifth-rate military
opposition, is a large leap. UN officials do not see western governments
being ready to pay for an indefinite mission.
Colonel Michael Dewar, deputy director of the International Institute for
Strategic Studies, says the UN might muster enough forces to set up safe
areas for Moslems.
But to separate and disarm forces throughout Bosnia, he reckons, would
require hundreds of thousands of troops; setting up a cordon sanitaire
around Sarajevo alone would need at least 50,000.
The military advice governments are receiving is that intervention would be
extremely complex and costly and could even make things worse. Without it,
the best the UN can do, says Col Dewar, is to mitigate the damage. It will
be doing no more than 'easing the passage of history.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3836</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Bonn wants safe havens in Bosnia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUDY DEMPSEY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GERMANY wants the European Community and the United Nations to establish
safe havens in Bosnia-Hercegovina to stop further destruction of the
republic and dissuade Islamic countries from arming Bosnian forces,
officials in Bonn said yesterday.
They also said the war in the former Yugoslavia could spread if the EC
failed to find a compromise with Greece over what an independent Macedonia
should be called. The dispute is holding up the Community's recognition of
Macedonia.
The officials, speaking at the end of the two-day Franco-German summit in
Bonn between President Franc,ois Mitterrand and Chancellor Helmut Kohl,
admitted any decision to set up safe havens would require tens of thousands
of troops deployed under the UN flag.
'It is clear we need safe havens in Bosnia, but the political will is
lacking among EC states,' a foreign ministry official said. Germany's
constitution prevents it from participating in UN peacekeeping operations.
France and Germany are together carving out a 'mini' safe haven in the
north-western corner of Bosnia, around Bihac. France, which has committed
2,000 UN troops to the region, and Germany, which is providing humanitarian
and medical back-up, yesterday together called for greater humanitarian
assistance from their EC partners in providing shelter and safety for the
50,000 refugees already in Bihac.
Mr Mitterrand and Mr Kohl called on the EC to find a rapid solution to the
Macedonian question.
Macedonia will be discussed at the pre-Edinburgh summit meeting of foreign
ministers which opens in Brussels on Monday. The outcome will determine
whether Macedonia should be placed on the agenda at Edinburgh.
'It is pointless raising the issue at Edinburgh if all 12 Community states
do not agree to recognise the independence of the former Yugoslav republic,
yet further delay could ignite this part of the Balkan peninsula,' said a
German official.
Mr Jurgen Chrobog, head of the political directorate at the Bonn foreign
ministry, last week visited Croatia, Serbia, the Serbian province of Kosovo
and Macedonia to try to find a solution to the Macedonian conundrum as well
as apply pressure on Croatia to withdraw its forces from Bosnia-Hercegovina.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3837</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Bosnian aid to go by rail
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE United Nations refugee agency said yesterday it was going to try to take
aid into war-torn Bosnia-Hercegovina by train, an idea rejected until now as
too dangerous, Reuter reports from Geneva.
The decision came as Ms Sadako Ogata, the UN High Commissioner for Refugees,
warned that her agency had been stretched to its limits in former
Yugoslavia, where 3.1m people have been displaced by fighting.
The first UNHCR 'train convoy' into Bosnia, carrying 250 tonnes of supplies,
will leave the Croatian port of Ploce on Monday, said UNHCR spokeswoman Ms
Sylvana Foa. The UNHCR reckons Bosnia needs a minimum of 9,100 tonnes of
food aid every week. With relief operations interrupted repeatedly by
attacks , it has never managed to achieve more than two-thirds of that
figure.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3838</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Montenegro dam: Correction
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
In yesterday's report and graphic on the Mojkovac dam in Montenegro, the
amount of toxic metallic waste was incorrectly given as 3.5m tons. It should
have been 7m tons.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3839</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Signs of fragile economic upturn in some sectors
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Economics, Industrial and Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FURTHER signs that a fragile recovery in the UK might be imminent emerged
yesterday, as the pound gained against the D-Mark, while there was news of a
strong rise in car sales last month.
But any expectations about a vigorous overall upturn were damped by a
Financial Times survey which showed that sentiment about an end to the
recession was extremely muted across a large swathe of manufacturing and
services companies.
Even though some businesses in the housing, leisure and electronics sectors
are relatively optimistic about a recovery next year, gloom about the next
few months is particularly deep among manufacturers and in the transport and
advertising sectors.
On currency markets yesterday, the general feeling about a weak recovery
prompted some large investors to switch funds into sterling, which finished
in London more than 1 pfennig stronger against a weak D-Mark at DM2.4875.
This was its highest close since mid-October and represented a gain of more
than 7 pfennigs on the week. In New York it fell slightly to close at
DM2.4854.
Against the dollar the pound closed nearly 1 cent down in London at Dollars
1.5575, but still up 4 1/2 cents on the week. In New York it rose slightly
to Dollars 1.5605.
Hopes of an upturn were buoyed by the announcement that sales of new cars in
November were 6.3 per cent up on a year previously, while new commercial
vehicles saw a 15.3 per cent rise over the same period. In three of the past
four months, registrations of new cars and commercial vehicles have been
higher than in the corresponding months last year.
Sir Hal Miller, chief executive of the Society of Motor Manufacturers and
Traders, said: 'These figures reflect a continuing, modest but welcome
increase in UK sales.'
He said the full benefit of the abolition of special car tax, which Mr
Norman Lamont, the chancellor, announced as part of his package of growth
measures in last month's Autumn Statement, had still to work through.
On the stock market, investors yesterday took a generally downbeat view
about a recovery, with share prices dropping slightly amid profit-taking
after the sharp rises earlier in the week. The FT-SE 100 share index was
down 11.6 to close last night at 2,759.4, virtually unchanged on the week.
Mr Robin Aspinall, an economist at stockbroker Panmure Gordon, said: 'Hardly
anyone expects growth next year to be any more than modest. The stock market
is getting moderately enthusiastic because even with a small amount of
growth in the economy companies may be able to boost profits by up to 15 per
cent by stepping up sales without increasing their labour forces.'
Among industry managers, the mood about the economy is one of extreme
caution. Mr Jon Shep-heard, senior economist at British Gas, said: 'There
are some tentative signs of recovery but the outlook is very confused.' Mr
John Duff, UK strategy and business director at IBM, the international
computer company, said: 'I do not see very much in the way of an upturn.
There are still a lot of very frightened businesses out there.'
However, the FT survey shows that among some specific sectors there are some
relatively hopeful straws in the wind.
In particular, indications from agencies specialising in finding employment
for temporary staff are that demand in some sectors of the economy may be
picking up.
At the Treasury, few ministers or officials want to predict a strong
recovery after several occasions in the past two years when the department
said an upturn was imminent, only to find a false dawn.
Mr Stephen Dorrell, financial secretary at the Treasury, said yesterday that
most independent forecasters expected 'a gentle recovery to take root next
year'.
Are there significant signs of recovery?, Page 4
Caution follows sterling euphoria, Page 4
New car sales rise, Page 4
Editorial Comment, Page 6
Currencies, Page 11
London stocks, Page 13
Lex, Page 22
Markets, Weekend II
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3840</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Stock and Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 ------------------------------------------------------
STOCK MARKET INDICES
 ------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE 100:                         2,759.4      (-11.6)
Yield                                 4.43
FT-SE Eurotrack 100               1,052.78      (-2.33)
FT-A All-Share                    1,308.63      (-0.3%)
FT-A World Index                    138.36       (same)
Nikkei                           17,295.69     (+35.61)
New York:
Dow Jones Ind Ave                 3,288.68     (+12.15)
S&amp;P Composite                       432.06      (+2.15)
 ------------------------------------------------------
US RATES
 ------------------------------------------------------
Federal Funds:                      2 7/8%         (3%)
3-mo Treas Bills: Yld               3.322%     (3.353%)
Long Bond                        101 19/32  (100 25/32)
Yield                               7.485%     (7.553%)
 ------------------------------------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 ------------------------------------------------------
3-mo Interbank                      7 1/8%    (7 3/16%)
Liffe long gilt future:       Dec 100 3/32       (same)
 ------------------------------------------------------
NORTH SEA OIL (Argus)
 ------------------------------------------------------
Brent 15-day (Jan)           Dollars 18.25       18.125
 ------------------------------------------------------
Gold
 ------------------------------------------------------
New York Comex (Dec)        Dollars  335.7        335.5
London                      Dollars 335.45       335.75
 ------------------------------------------------------
STERLING
 ------------------------------------------------------
New York:
Dollars                             1.5605        1.564
London:
Dollars                             1.5575     (1.5665)
DM                                  2.4875      (2.475)
FFr                                  8.445      (8.425)
SFr                                 2.2325       (2.21)
Y                                    194.5     (195.25)
Pounds Index                          80.7       (80.5)
 ------------------------------------------------------
DOLLAR
 ------------------------------------------------------
New York:
DM                                   1.593      (1.583)
FFr                                  5.407     (5.3875)
SFr                                 1.4285     (1.4135)
Y                                   124.95     (124.67)
London:
DM                                   1.597     (1.5805)
FFr                                 5.4225     (5.3775)
SFr                                 1.4335     (1.4115)
Y                                   124.85     (124.65)
Dollars Index                         65.5       (65.2)
Tokyo close:
Y                                   124.63
 ------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3841</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Ministers consider insurance support over terrorist damage
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS, RICHARD LAPPER and JIMMY BURNS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CABINET ministers are considering limited support for insurance companies to
cover against terrorist damage on the British mainland.
With insurance companies warning that existing policies covering against
terrorism could be withdrawn from next month, Mr Michael Heseltine, trade
and industry secretary, is discussing possible solutions with the Treasury
and the prime minister.
No decision has been taken, however, and the government is adamant that
insurance companies must bear the brunt of the risks.
Ministers are concerned about the propaganda advantage to the IRA if the
government gave help and about the cost of its involvement. April's IRA bomb
attack in the City caused an estimated Pounds 1bn damage.
Mr Heseltine indicated on BBC Radio that he recognised the damage
withdrawing cover might have on the property market. 'It is obviously a
matter of urgency,' he said.
He and Mr Neil Hamilton, the corporate affairs minister, will hold further
talks with insurance companies. A Whitehall official said: 'It is quite the
most difficult problem that we have had to look at in this parliament.'
One scheme being considered is a 5 per cent levy on industrial property
insurance that would be pooled to provide cover for terrorist damage with
any extra cost underwritten by the government. The scheme has been proposed
by the Association of Insurance and Risk Managers in Industry and Commerce,
representing more than 300 UK companies.
Mr Heseltine is unwilling to disclose his negotiating position, saying he
wants to ensure market coverage 'to the greatest extent that is possible'.
He appears to have vetoed a version of the Northern Ireland Office's
compensation scheme for businesses in the province which pays for all
terrorist damage.
Last month the Association of British Insurers recommended its members
withdraw terrorism cover from commercial insurance policies. The ABI, which
has written to the prime minister, wants a similar scheme to that in
Northern Ireland
Yesterday the ABI said some members were considering cancelling policies
that include terrorism cover. Insurers can cancel most commercial policies
by giving policyholders 30 days' notice.
Concern heightened this week after IRA bomb attacks in Manchester. Material
damage is likely to amount to less than Pounds 4m but claims through loss of
business could be much higher.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3842</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Nelson's love letter for sale
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The letter believed to be the first from Lord Nelson to Lady Hamilton is
expected to fetch up to Pounds 10,000 when it comes up for auction later
this month.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3843</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Former diplomat jailed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Former Thai diplomat Piseth Pamarapa, 44, was jailed for 20 years by
Kingston Crown Court for his part in a Pounds 4.5m operation to smuggle
heroin into Britain.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3844</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Oil slick threat
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The 80,000-tonne oil slick spilled by the Greek tanker off the coast of
northern Spain is threatening birds and marine life, the World Wide Fund for
Nature said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3845</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Spotlight caused Windsor fire
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The fire which ravaged Windsor Castle was sparked by a spotlight which
overheated a curtain, says the official report.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3846</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Ferry blaze
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Twenty-four crew members were treated for smoke inhalation after fire broke
out on the Sealink cross-Channel ferry Stena Londoner as it was entering the
harbour at Newhaven.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3847</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Untitled item
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE IRA yesterday admitted responsibility for Thursday's Manchester city
centre bomb attacks which injured 64 people. It also warned of more bombings
before Christmas.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3848</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Sugar faces resistance to Amstrad buy-out
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE TIDE of shareholder opinion is flowing strongly against Mr Alan Sugar's
controversial 30p-a-share bid to take Amstrad private, according to figures
on proxy votes released by the consumer electronics group yesterday.
Last night Mr Sugar said he was 'disappointed' by the poll so far and
acknowledged that 'at the moment we are losing'. He appealed to shareholders
who back his bid to 'wake up and get out their proxies'.
In an attempt to swing small shareholders behind the buy-out bid, Amstrad
has hired an outside polling firm to call shareholders at home. The practice
is common in the US but unusual in Britain.
If the trend revealed by the proxies already voted continues, Mr Sugar's
proposal to pay Pounds 113m for the 65 per cent of Amstrad he does not
already own will be solidly defeated at the company's extraordinary general
meeting next Thursday.
Based on the 9,443 proxies received by the close of business on Thursday,
5,511, or almost 60 per cent, were against Mr Sugar's proposed 'scheme of
arrangement'. However, it is open to shareholders to withdraw or reverse
their proxy votes.
Amstrad has 31,000 individual shareholders and, under one test of support,
Mr Sugar needs to win a simple majority of those voting in person or by
proxy to proceed with his plan to take the company he founded private again.
This means that the vote of an individual shareholder, perhaps only holding
a few shares, is as crucial as the vote of a big institutional investor
holding millions of Amstrad shares.
With almost a third of Amstrad's shareholders voting by Thursday, the proxy
poll so far shows an unusually high shareholder interest in the outcome.
Under a second test of support, Mr Sugar must also win the support of
three-quarters of the shares he does not already own. Amstrad has 581.2m
shares in issue, including 375.6m which Mr Sugar does not own. His bid would
also fail this test on the basis of the proxies received.
So far, just over 34m shares have been cast in favour of the scheme and
32.8m against. A separate resolution has won the backing of 45.9m shares
against 33.1m, but both of these votes need to exceed 282m if Mr Sugar is to
succeed.
Mr Sugar said: 'I have been telling them all along, 30p is all I have got to
offer. It is my opinion that if it is rejected they will never get the
chance again.'
He added that if his bid was defeated, 'I don't know what will happen'. But
he said, 'one thing that will be cast in concrete in the City is that I once
offered 30p'.
Lex, Page 22
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3849</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLGBYAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Yeltsin under Congress pressure
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A communist supporter, holding a photograph of Stalin, shouts at deputies of
the Russian Congress meeting in Moscow yesterday. President Boris Yeltsin is
under pressure from the Congress and may appeal to the people for extra
powers and approval for a new constitution.
Report, Page 2; Man in the News: Yegor Gaidar, Page 6
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3850</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLGBYAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Inverness mill to be expanded
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
NORBORD Highland, a subsidiary of Noranda Forest of Toronto, announced a
Pounds 23m expansion programme at its Inverness mill yesterday.
The mill employs 120 people and supports three times that number in the
forestry industry.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3851</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLGBYAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Statistics warn of further falls
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A SMALL fall in the Central Statistical Office's shorter leading index,
which indicates turning points in the economy about four months in advance,
suggests further falls in output before the end of the year.
The latest cyclical indicators from the CSO point to more bad news ahead of
Christmas and in the new year, but a rise in the economy later next year.
The longer leading indicator, which locates turning points about 10 months
in advance, moved upwards in September and October.
The coincident indicator was slightly higher in September and October. It
reflected some upturn in the production industries and retail sales.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3852</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLGBYAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Matrix Churchill challenge by MP
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Ken Livingstone, Labour MP for Brent East, alleged yesterday that Iraq
was aware that staff of Matrix Churchill - a company at the heart of the
arms export controversy - were feeding information to British intelligence.
He said Iraq had arranged for disinformation to be transmitted that resulted
in the Amiriya shelter bombing of February last year.
Mr Livingstone called on Mr John Major, the prime minister, to investigate
allegations
in an affidavit submitted to Lord Justice Scott, who is investigating the
Matrix Churchill affair.
Mr Livingstone alleges that the Iraqi authorities sent women and children to
the shelter 'in the certain knowledge that the site would be targeted as a
military installation by the allies'.
He said President George Bush had been 'outraged' by the bombing because the
US distrusted British intelligence material culled from businessmen.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3853</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLGBYAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Russia wants arms market access
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Russian foreign minister, Mr Andrei Kozyrev, yesterday urged the west to
establish a 'new agenda' for assistance to Russia, providing active support
for foreign investment in his country and access to western arms markets.
'Humanitarian aid, for all its importance, is not an answer to the
challenges of our time,' he told a meeting of the International Press Club
in Moscow. He said Russian democrats needed 'concentrated' assistance to
continue reforms aimed at joining the ranks of 'first-class democratic
states with market economies'.
Allowing the reforms to stop at their 'most difficult, initial stage' would
prompt even greater political instability, an explosion of corruption,
organised crime and what he called metaphorically 'a series of Chernobyls' -
disasters from which the outside world would not be able to protect itself.
He urged western governments to provide support for their companies to
invest in Russia, which badly needs capital, especially to convert defence
plants to civilian uses.
Mr Kozyrev also urged the west to make room for Russia in arms markets such
as the Gulf and even Nato countries, so it was less dependent on customers
like Iran. Mr Peter Aven, foreign trade minister, said yesterday Russia was
'intensively' negotiating to sell Mig-29 aircraft to Malaysia and expected a
big increase in arms sales to China next year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3854</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLGBYAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Sarajevo aid airlift still halted
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SARAJEVO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
HEAVY shelling of Sarajevo's Moslem-held suburbs yesterday drove hundreds of
people from their homes and forced UN aid workers to put off resuming the
airlift to the besieged Bosnian capital, Reuter reports from Sarajevo.
With no sign of a let-up in the fighting in Bosnia, political tension grew
in neighbouring Serbia after moderate Yugoslav Prime Minister Milan Panic
was told he was ineligible to run against hardline nationalist Slobodan
Milosevic for the Serbian presidency.
Sarajevo radio said Serb fighters shelled the western suburb of Otes late
into the evening. Earlier in the day 600 civilians fled from the district,
which has been the target of fierce assault since Thursday.
As fighting continued in Otes and other outer districts of Sarajevo, UN
relief workers said they would not resume supply flights until Monday at the
earliest and said they might consider postponing them indefinitely.
'If they decide there is an acceptable level of risk they may carry on,' a
UN relief official said. 'But the problem is we have had two planes fired at
and hit this week.'
The United Nations refugee agency said yesterday it was going to try to take
aid into war-torn Bosnia-Hercegovina by train, an idea rejected until now as
too dangerous.
Flights were halted two days later after an aircraft carrying the chief of
UN peacekeepers in Bosnia, General Philippe Morillon, was hit by gunfire.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3855</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLGBYAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / EC names group to look at publicity
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL and ROBERT GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS, ROME
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE EUROPEAN Commission yesterday named the seven people who will carry out
an inquiry into the alleged failings of Brussels' communications and
information policy.
Sir Bernard Ingham - Downing Street spokesman when Lady Thatcher was UK
premier - was on the original shortlist for the group. But the Commission
said yesterday that in the end he was not asked to take part in the
communications audit.
The Commission has included in the list two senior officials responsible for
Commission and European Parliament information policy, contrary to
suggestions that it should be made up entirely of objective Brussels
outsiders.
The working group, which should report by the end of next March, will be
chaired by Mr Willy de Clercq, a former commissioner and Belgian member of
the European Parliament.
The other members are Mr Ronald Beatson, director general of the European
Association of Advertising Agencies; Mr Julian Bravo, chairman of the Madrid
office of J Walter Thompson, the advertising agency; Ms Colette Flesch, head
of the Commission's information department; Mr Sergio Guccione, head of the
Parliament's information service; Mr Jacques Pilhan, deputy managing
director of the Paris-based agency Havas; and Mr Mark Wossner, head of
Bertelsmann, the German media group.
The Italian government yesterday announced the nomination of two new
commissioners for Brussels after a much criticised delay of nearly five
months, Robert Graham writes from Rome.
The new commissioners are Mr Raniero Vanni d'Archirafi, the current director
general of political affairs at the foreign ministry, and Mr Antonio
Ruberti, an automation specialist, academic and former minister of research.
They will replace Mr Carlo Ripa di Meana, who left as EC environment
commissioner to become an environment minister in the current government in
June, and Mr Filippo Maria Pandolfi.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3856</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / Food &amp; Drink: Appetisers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS LANDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE SPANISH couple we passed at the entrance to London's newest Spanish
restaurant, Albero &amp; Grana at 89 Sloane Avenue, SW3 (tel: 071-225-1048),
looked typically elegant, writes Nicholas Lander. Even more typically, they
were going in to eat at 11pm as we were leaving.
Albero &amp; Grana is a brave attempt to introduce Spanish colour and some of
the more unusual dishes that top quality Spanish cooking can offer. Although
the restaurant takes its name from two colours associated with the bullfight
(albero is the sand used in bullrings, grana the red of the matador's cape),
there are some sensible design touches which soften the decor and
differentiate it from the bustling tapas bar at the front.
The restaurant has imported Angel Garcia, a Michelin-starred chef from
Madrid who, not surprisingly, will take some time to find his feet. At our
dinner, only the main courses - zarzuela, a Catalonian fish stew, a huge
plate of grilled fish, and a best end of lamb with garlic puree - really
evoked the best of modern Spanish cooking.
Restaurant: about Pounds 20 a head. Open seven nights 7.30pm-11pm. Tapas
bar: 5.30pm-midnight.
One item missing from the smartest dining tables in Britain for the past two
years has been Badoit mineral water. Exports were stopped when droughts in
France led to a sharp reduction in source levels. Now, it is available again
from Majestic Wine Warehouses. One litre costs 97p. There is a deposit of
20p a bottle and crate deposit of Pounds 2 (fully refundable).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3857</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Crude oil
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Cynics might regard last week's fall in crude oil prices as the natural
response to the latest Opec agreement. Clearly the deal was hard to reach,
even though it involves only a nominal cut in output to 24.6m barrels a day.
And even that cut is only temporary. Indeed, with most members producing at
or near full capacity, it is questionable whether the oil producers are
really acting as a cartel at all. The subtext to the latest tensions within
Opec is the desire to keep output as high as possible before negotiations
begin to re-admit Iraqi oil to the market. Once that occurs quotas will have
to be cut, so the race is on to establish benchmarks.
That is not to say, however, that even a badly co-ordinated Opec will let
crude prices slide indefinitely before acting. The memory of the 1986
collapse is still burnt deeply into Opec psyches. Besides, supply and demand
are not far from balance at present. If there were a cold snap on either
side of the Atlantic, or an interruption in supply, the rebound in crude oil
prices could be sharp. The assumption of a gently falling trading range is a
dangerous one.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3858</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / International Company News: Gemex launches big stock issue
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MEXICO CITY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GRUPO Embotellador de Mexico (Gemex), the biggest bottler of PepsiCo
beverages in terms of volume outside the US, is to offer 1.6m shares in a
primary offering in Mexico and 2.4m shares in a secondary placement, Reuter
reports from Mexico City.
The group also plans to issue 1.6m American depositary shares, equivalent to
3.2m shares, and 2.4m global depositary shares, equivalent to 4.8m shares,
in international markets. It is estimated that Gemex will raise around 190bn
pesos (Dollars 61.3m) through the offering.
According to the prospectus, Gemex will apply the proceeds of the offering
to either expansion and capital investment or to debt reduction.
The prospectus suggested that Gemex might extend the franchises it already
holds or enter into joint deals with PepsiCo, although the company stressed
there was no guarantee such deals would be struck with the US soft drinks
group.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3859</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Independence is best guarantee of trust - A
look at the AITC's swift response to the Cadbury report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INVESTMENT trusts, despite their ultra-respectable outward appearance, have
often been involved in scandal, with examples dating back to the 1929 Wall
Street crash and including the empire of Sir Denys Lowson in the 1960s.
More recently, there was the affair of First Tokyo Investment Trust, part of
the late Mr Robert Maxwell's empire, where Pounds 37.6m of the trust's
Pounds 44.8m of assets were lent on the basis of verbal agreements, without
a board resolu-tion.
The incestuous nature of some investment trust empires, with families of
trusts owning crossholdings in each other and in their management groups,
creates opportunities for abuse.
So it is not surprising that the Association of Investment Trust Companies
was quick off the mark yesterday in publishing guidelines for the sector in
the wake of the Cadbury report on corporate governance earlier this week.
The AITC guidelines start from the proposition that an independent board is
the best guarantee of good practice. 'Shareholders' interests are, of
course, paramount', says Mr Paul Manduca, chairman of the Association.
'Our guidelines ensure that the board will always put shareholders'
interests first and that a majority of the board is independent of the
management house and of other interested parties.'
Indeed, this principle may soon become a listing requirement. As part of its
present review of the Yellow Book, the Stock Exchange is proposing the
introduction of the following condition for investment companies. 'The board
of directors (or equivalent) body of the investment company must be able to
demonstrate that it will act independently of any fund managers to the
investment company and that a majority are also independent of any fund
manager.'
And independence may need to be rigorously defined. The AITC guidelines
state: 'The condition of independence cannot be fully satisfied where a
director is an employee or former employee of the manager or a professional
adviser to the manager or is in any way remunerated by the manager.'
One issue which has brought the independence of trust boards into question
is the tendency to 'brand' a range of trusts with the manager's name.
Some trusts were founded in the late 19th or early 20th centuries and were
given names relating to particular individuals or groups. Such names no
longer bear any relation to the investment policy of the trust concerned.
Outside investors may be confused as to the real nature of the trust, and
ignore it as an investment option. This is a disadvantage in a competitive
savings market.
Branding a range of trusts gives them an identity and allows investors to
see what type of investment beast they are buying; whether it is a high
income or European for example.
But does branding create a strong incentive for boards to retain their
existing investment manager, rather than face the inconvenience, and
possible loss of investor recognition, involved in a name change?
The AITC does not believe branding is a problem, provided the majority of
the board is independent. 'We believe that branding can strengthen, rather
than weaken, the board's position, since the independent board of a branded
trust has a very powerful weapon to exact an improvement in service and
commitment from unsatisfactory managers, while retaining the ultimate
freedom to change managers.'
The Association also suggests that each trust should establish an audit
committee which would:
receive a report from the management each year confirming that the
management company has conducted the company's affairs in compliance with
the regulations
receive an annual report from the company's auditors and have the
opportunity to question auditors without management present
review the company's investments, paying particular attention to the
valuation of unquoted holdings.
A management engagement committee, which could be the same as the audit
committee, should also be established to review the terms of the management
contract 'to ensure that they are competitive and sensible for
shareholders'.
But there is no guarantee that proposals will ensure the security of
shareholders in the sector.
There is still the prospect of losses through investment mistakes. And the
AITC is just a voluntary body with no sanction over its members. Indeed many
trusts are not members of the Association.
However, trusts will have to indicate to shareholders in their accounts when
they do not comply with the Cadbury report.
According to Mr Hamish Buchan, an investment trust analyst at County NatWest
WoodMac, 'these things are all good news and definitely a step in the right
direction. But shareholders should still be prepared to look out for their
own interests.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3860</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLFAYAAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921205
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  05 DEC 92 / More job cuts at Renault
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Renault is to cut 2,250 more jobs in France next year, having shed 3,750
this year, writes William Dawkins in Paris.
The French state-owned car maker expects FFr6bn (Pounds 720m) net profit in
1992, twice the FFr3.08bn it reported last year. It has cut its workforce by
25 per cent over the past five years but says it still needs to improve
productivity by 30 per cent to meet the best Japanese plants in Europe.
Dunstable closure, Page 5
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3861</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / TSSA drops threat to Tube
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A THREAT of industrial action against London Underground by the TSSA
white-collar union was called off yesterday even though members had voted
narrowly in favour of action in a ballot last month.
All three rail unions have now decided against industrial action in
opposition to London Underground's new pay and conditions package.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3862</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / British proposal seeks to break Danish deadlock on
Maastricht
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Foreign Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN has put forward proposals over Denmark's relationship within the
European Community which seem likely to break the deadlock over the
Maastricht treaty.
EC governments last night cautiously welcomed the proposals, which are
expected to reduce the risk of acrimony over the EC's future at next week's
Edinburgh summit.
The British initiative avoids tampering with the text of the treaty, but
would allow Denmark to remain outside key areas such as monetary union and
European defence.
The four-point plan calls for a series of declarations from the EC and the
Copenhagen government to allow Denmark to submit the Maastricht treaty to a
second referendum next year.
The proposals involve three clarifying 'declarations' and one 'decision' by
the 12 EC nations. Although there was still uncertainty last night over the
precise legal status of the package, the latter part of the proposal would
exempt Denmark from being bound to follow the key goals of the Maastricht
treaty.
France welcomed the plan to solve the problems caused by Danish voters'
rejection of Maastricht in June. Up to now, the government in Paris has been
suspicious that a Danish compromise could water down the Maastricht treaty.
Mr Jean Musitelli, the spokesman for President Francois Mitterrand, said in
Bonn: 'We consider that there is a possibility of satisfying the demands
presented by the Danish government to its 11 partners by adopting adequate
declarations.'
Mr Poul Schluter, the Danish prime minister, said the British suggestion was
'an excellent starting point for arriving at a satisfactory solution for
Denmark'.
In Brussels, officials from several member states expressed hopes that the
plan could enable Denmark to ratify Maastricht. The treaty cannot come into
force unless ratified by all 12 member countries.
Success on the Danish front would in turn clear hurdles holding up other
contentious issues, such as the future financing of the EC and the entry of
new member countries.
The proposals were announced after talks on Wednesday between Mr Schluter
and Mr John Major, the prime minister, currently the Community president.
There was, however, apparent disagreement over the crucial point of whether
the Danish requirement for exemptions from monetary union, a future European
army and EC citizenship would be 'legally binding'.
One senior EC diplomat said in Brussels last night that the Danes were
'softening' this demand after other EC members spelt out the risks of
Denmark torpedoing the Edinburgh summit.
But Mr Uffe Ellemann-Jensen, the Danish foreign minister, said the British
proposals would provide the legally binding guarantee Denmark was demanding
for exemptions.
Danish opposition politicians - who will have considerable say in deciding
whether the deal is acceptable - also expressed reservations.
Mr Bjorn Westh, market affairs spokesman for the opposition Social
Democratic party, said: 'There is much that needs to be formulated otherwise
and more satisfactorily.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3863</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Lords' revolt over fishing to stand
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
EARL HOWE, the junior fisheries minister, made it clear yesterday that the
government would not seek to overturn a move by the House of Lords last
month to ensure that the government considered a more extensive scheme for
de-commissioning fishing boats before limiting time at sea.
Privately, however, ministers believe that the requirement, forced on them
by a Tory revolt, will not unduly tie their hands. The bill will complete
its passage through parliament next week.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3864</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Labour has 23-point lead in Gallup
poll
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
LABOUR holds a 23-point lead over the Conservatives in a Gallup poll taken
for today's Daily Telegraph.
For support in a general election if one were held tomorrow, Labour is on 52
per cent (up 2 per cent from the previous poll last month), the
Conservatives on 29 per cent (down 3 1/2 ) the Liberal Democrats 14 per cent
(up 1) and others 5 per cent (up  1/2 ).
The figures are based on a sample of 1,026 electors in 100 districts
interviewed between November 25 and 30.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3865</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Delay in register of MPs' interests
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE register of MPs' business interests is unlikely to be published until
mid January, and in the meantime, no one should have access to the
computerised records already compiled, the cross-party committee on MPs'
interests has decided, Alison Smith writes.
The committee met this week for the first time since the April election, and
approved the publication of the register, the timing of which now depends on
the stationery office. The MPs decided that the computerised information
should not be available before then even though many Labour MPs have
expressed concern that there has already been undue delay in providing
information about MPs' business connections.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3866</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Bombs in central Manchester injure 64
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN HAMILTON FAZEY, Northern Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TWO BOMBS exploded in Manchester city centre yesterday, injuring 64 people
and paralysing the area throughout the day.
The city centre was closed to traffic and thousands of office and council
workers were evacuated while police searched for two more devices and blew
up 10 suspect packages with controlled explosions. No more bombs were found,
and all the suspect packages turned out to be items abandoned during
evacuation.
Damage to buildings was light but extensive, and consisted mainly of broken
windows. The injured were all cut by flying glass, but only one person was
kept in hospital.
The first bomb exploded outside tax offices in Parsonage Gardens off
Deansgate at 8.40 am as people were arriving for work. Seven minutes later
the Samaritans received a telephoned coded warning, saying that four bombs
had been planted. A similar warning was given to the BBC soon afterwards.
The second bomb exploded in Cateaton Street near Manchester Cathedral at
10.07 am as police were clearing the adjacent Cathedral Street, where the
telephone caller had said the bomb was hidden.
Commander David Tucker, police national anti-terrorism co-ordinator, said he
had no doubt from the methods used that the IRA was responsible. Both bombs
contained about 2lbs of high explosive hidden in shrubbery. It was unknown
if they were made of Semtex, but they were different from the
fertiliser-based explosives used in recent London incidents. Mr Jim
Paterson, the assistant chief constable of Greater Manchester, said: 'I
think it is absolutely deplorable to place bombs and then give warnings that
do not allow us to respond properly. They can only have been targeted at
ordinary people on their way to work.'
The Association of British Insurers yesterday wrote to Mr John Major asking
the government to fill the gap left by the recent decision of many large
insurers to drop cover against terrorist attacks next year.
The association said one method might be to compensate businesses as the
government has done for many years in Northern Ireland.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3867</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Allied Group fined over adverts
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ALLIED MAPLES Group, the furniture retailer, was yesterday found guilty of
putting its prices up by 25 per cent ahead of a sale which advertised '25
per cent off everything'.
Magistrates in Reading, Berkshire, heard how local Allied branches sold
goods at the normal price, and even more, while the chain promised 'massive
reductions' in advertising in national newspapers and on TV.
The group, based in West Bromwich, West Midlands, was found guilty on five
counts of placing misleading advertisements between last December and March
this year. The company was fined a total of Pounds 3,250 under the Consumer
Protection Act 1987 and was ordered to pay Pounds 2,232.95 costs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3868</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Miscarriage risk from microchips
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WOMEN working in semiconductor chip production facilities have a 40 per cent
higher risk of miscarriage than those whose jobs in the industry are outside
the production area, according to a study conducted by independent
researchers on behalf of the US semiconductor industry, Louise Kehoe writes
from San Francisco.
The results of the study into health risks of semiconductor production work,
the largest and most comprehensive to date, confirm concerns raised by
earlier, smaller-scale research efforts that pregnant women working in
semiconductor production facilities have a higher risk of miscarriage caused
by exposure to chemicals used in the plants.
The study results are expected to lead to significant changes in the
chemicals used by chip makers and to efforts to reduce worker exposure to
certain chemicals.
The research team, based at the University of California at Davis, said that
their findings suggested exposure to photo-resist-developer solvents,
including glycol ethers, might be responsible for the higher rate of
miscarriage.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3869</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Law lords reject plea by don on job-for-life right
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ADONIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE RIGHT of university academics in England and Wales to tenure until
retirement, even if appointed before the practice was made illegal in 1988,
was undermined yesterday when the law lords refused to intervene in support
of a lecturer made redundant on cost-cutting grounds.
Mr Edgar Page, made redundant by Hull University in 1988, lost his appeal
against the decision of the university's visitor - a law lord appointed on
behalf of the Queen to review the case - to uphold the redundancy.
The case has serious implications, since most of the 50,000 academic staff
in the 'old' universities were appointed with tenure before 1987, from when
the 1988 Education Act made it illegal. Those in the 'new' universities -
former polytechnics - never had that right.
Widespread redundancies are not likely, but the ruling makes cuts in
academic staff an option for universities facing financial difficulties
after the slowing of expansion announced by the government last month.
Five law lords, headed by Lord Keith, dismissed the appeal from Mr Page, 61,
whose case was backed by the Association of University Teachers.
Mr Page, a former philosophy lecturer, was the first academic to be made
compulsorily redundant. He had been in post for 22 years.
Mr Page claimed that Hull's decision was unlawful because it was contrary to
its own charter and statutes, which stated that staff could only be
dismissed for incompetence or gross misconduct.
The decision was upheld by the university's visitor in October 1989. It was
quashed by the High Court after a judicial review, but the Court of Appeal
upheld the university's case.
Lord Browne-Wilkinson ruled that the courts had no power to overrule a
visitor in his exercise of discretion within his jurisdiction under an
institution's statutes.
The visitor was not applying the general law of the land but a 'peculiar,
domestic law' of which he was the sole arbiter.
Mr John Akker, acting general secretary of the AUT, said he was 'profoundly
disappointed' by the decision.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3870</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / John son Controls to open new plant at Staffordshire
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHNSON Controls, the US automotive components supplier, is to open an
Pounds 8m plant at Burton upon Trent, Staffordshire, to supply seats to the
Toyota car assembly plant at Burnaston, near Derby.
Johnson Controls has been rapidly expanding in Europe in the past five
years.
The Burton plant, which will create about 80 jobs, will supply Toyota on a
just-in-time basis with final assembly of the seats taking place at Burton.
Johnson said one production line would operate initially at the Burton
plant, but there was space for a second to keep pace with growing production
at the Toyota plant.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3871</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: Proton tumbles 36% in year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KIERAN COOKE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KUALA LUMPUR
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PROTON, the Malaysian car manufacturer, blamed a softening domestic car
market for last year's 36 per cent decline in pre-tax profits, writes Kieran
Cooke in Kuala Lumpur.
Proton has a 65 per cent share of car sales in the Malaysian market. It said
there had been a 15 per cent drop in overall car sales in Malaysia in the
past 12 months.
Half-year, pre-tax profits were MDollars 130.46m (USDollars 52.1m), against
MDollars 203.3m. Proton made a pre-tax profit of MDollars 408m on turnover
of MDollars 2.2bn in 1991-1992.
Proton is 50 per cent owned by Malaysian government interests. It was
partially privatised earlier this year. The government haslifted
restrictions on foreign share ownership of Proton, allowing foreign
investors to hold more than 30 per cent of total equity.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3872</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: Full bid for Custos abandoned
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BROWN-HUMES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
VOLVO, the Swedish motor vehicle company, and Skanska, Scandinavia's largest
construction group, yesterday abandoned their bid for full control of
Custos, the investment concern which they already majority own, writes
Christopher Brown-Humes in Stockholm.
The two companies said the upturn in the Swedish stock market and falling
interest rates, following the floating of the krona, had greatly improved
Custos' financial situation. They indicated that big shareholders had
rebuffed the offer, worth about SKr750m (USDollars 109m).
But a joint bid for the minority stake in a smaller investment group,
Protorp, is being continued, and the terms improved to SKr200 per share from
SKr131 per share. This offer values the company at SKr2bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3873</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Wrexham and East Denbighshire Water
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Pre-tax profits of Wrexham and East Denbighshire Water Company showed an 87
per cent increase, from Pounds 572,000 to Pounds 1.07m, in the six months to
end-September.
The outcome was achieved on turnover up by Pounds 523,000 to Pounds 5.15m.
The improvement in the turnover figure was partly the result of an increase
in metered consumption of more than 5 per cent, the company said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3874</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / New victim in bank scandal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SHIRAZ SIDHVA
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW DELHI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CITIBANK of the US has transferred the chief of its Indian investment
banking operations following intense criticism of the bank's role in the
Rs35bn (Pounds 816m) securities market scandal, writes Shiraz Sidhva in New
Delhi.
Mr AS Thiyagarajan's departure for New York means the four foreign banks
most active in the securities market have now lost their top officials since
the scandal erupted in April.
All four - Citibank, US-owned Bank of America, Australia's ANZ Grindlays and
Standard Chartered Bank of the UK - were criticised by the Reserve Bank of
India, the central bank, and by a parliamentary committee investigating the
scandal.
A Citibank official confirmed Mr Thiyagarajan's transfer to the bank's
headquaters but declined to comment on reports that he was being shifted
after criticism from the Reserve Bank of India about Citibank's operations
in India.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3875</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UN gives Somalia force go-ahead
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL LITTLEJOHNS at the UN and DAVID BUCHAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE United Nations last night gave the go-ahead for an international force
under US command to go to Somalia to back up the world's aid efforts with
firepower.
The unanimous vote by the 15-nation Security Council is the signal for the
US to send more than 20,000 troops to the starving country to disarm local
warlords and make sure food aid is not looted.
France yesterday offered to contribute 2,000 troops to the force and other
countries, including Italy, Canada and some African states, are expected to
send contingents.
The Pentagon put units on alert in California and New York for rapid airlift
to Somalia. Warships carrying 1,800 Marines and 23 helicopters are already
off the coast of the east African nation ready to spearhead the
UN-authorised force.
Command arrangements will resemble the Gulf war's Desert Storm operation.
All troops will be nominally under UN auspices, but effectively under US
command.
Lieutenant Robert Johnston, who was General Norman Schwarzkopf's
chief-of-staff in the Gulf war, is expected to command the force.
Half the French contingent is likely to be drawn from a base in neighbouring
Djibouti and half from France.
France may ask the US to airlift light French tanks to the area, while the
French base at Djibouti may in turn be used by US forces.
This is the first time the Security Council has approved force for
humanitarian ends.
In the 21-point text, UN member states were authorised 'in consultation with
the secretary-general to use all necessary means to establish as soon as
possible a secure environment for humanitarian relief operations in
Somalia'.
The resolution endorsed the view of Mr Boutros Boutros Ghali,
secretary-general, that the use of force now is imperative. But he also
favours a switch to conventional peace - keeping procedures as soon as order
is restored.
Heeding African and other third world suspicions about a US-led campaign so
soon after the Gulf conflict, the council gave the secretary-general the
role of co-ordinator of the operation. He is to report within 15 days.
A small UN liaison staff to work with the 'unified command' - a term out of
the resolution that sent US-led troops to Korea 40 years ago - will be set
up, along with a special commission.
Placing the secretary-general 'at the controlling centre' was a compromise
that enabled Zimbabwe to support the action and assured other third world
backing.
For an organisation in financial need, there is another positive element:
the US and other countries contributing troops will not be expected to
submit bills.
In Washington, although the use of force in Somalia appears to have general
public and political support, some opposition has been voiced.
Congressman John Murtha complained that US intervention in Somalia could be
a precedent for demands in a host of other countries.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3876</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Fears grow in India of bloody clashes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEFAN WAGSTYL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW DELHI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TENSIONS were running high in the Indian holy town of Ayodhya in the state
of Uttar Pradesh last night as tens of thousands of Hindu militants
converged with the aim of building a temple on a controversial site next to
a mosque.
The possibility of a renewed outbreak of bloody communal clashes between
Hindus and Moslems over the temple dispute is putting growing pressure on
New Delhi to impose central government rule on Uttar Pradesh.
About 12,000 paramilitary police are guarding the site to prevent possible
damage to the mosque and further bloodshed on an issue which has claimed
2,000 lives across India in the last three years.
Mr Arjun Singh, the human resources minister, told parliament yesterday the
situation was 'very dangerous'. Referring to the separation of India and
Pakistan in 1947, he said: 'We do not want a second partition of the
country."
Hindu fundamentalists have long voiced claims to land in Ayodhya and other
sacred sites. But their demands have been transformed in the last three
years by the political rise of the Hindu Bharatiya Janata party, which has
grown into the largest opposition party by promoting Hindu militancy. Its
success has prompted the formation of radical groups, including the Vishva
Hindu Parishad.
BJP leaders have been playing a dangerous game, whipping up national
enthusiasm for the temple, whilst trying to keep in check the passions of
extremists, some of whom believe India's Moslems should be expelled to
Pakistan.
The government is relying on a Supreme Court order issued this week
instructing the state government of Uttar Pradesh to prevent construction
work.
But Uttar Pradesh is led by the BJP, so Mr PV Narasimha Rao, the prime
minister, may be unable to rely on the state carrying out the Supreme
Court's bidding. This would force him to impose central rule, a step he is
loathe to take.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3877</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / New victim in bank scandal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SHIRAZ SIDHVA
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW DELHI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CITIBANK of the US has transferred the chief of its Indian investment
banking operations following intense criticism of the bank's role in the
Rs35bn (Pounds 816m) securities market scandal.
Mr AS Thiyagarajan's departure for New York means the four foreign banks
most active in the securities market have now lost their top officials since
the scandal erupted in April.
All four - Citibank, US-owned Bank of America, Australia's ANZ Grindlays and
Standard Chartered Bank of the UK - were criticised by the Reserve Bank of
India, the central bank, and by a parliamentary committee investigating the
scandal.
A Citibank official confirmed Mr Thiyagarajan's transfer to the bank's
headquaters but declined to comment on reports he was being shifted after
criticism from the Reserve Bank of India about Citibank's operations in
India.
Earlier this week it emerged that the central bank refused to allow Mr
Vikram Talwar, Bank of America's chief executive for India, to extend his
posting after his three-year term expired on Monday.
Mr Bob Edgar, ANZ Grindlays' chief executive for India, is leaving this week
to a senior posting in Australia after two years in India. Earlier Mr PS
Nat, Standard Chartered's chief executive for India, resigned to take
responsibility for his bank's heavy losses.
The Central Bureau of Investigation yesterday arrested Mr Binoy Jacob, a
non-resident businessman, for his alleged involvement in the receipt of
illegal commission payments from foreign companies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3878</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Uproar over Pakistan atom bomb report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our New Delhi Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INDIA yesterday reacted strongly to a US television report that Pakisan
built seven nuclear bombs and considered using them during a flare-up in
border tensions in 1990.
Even though Pakistan denied the allegations, the report based on CIA
sources, caused uproar in the Indian parliament.
The report could escalate tensions between the two countries which are
already running high after two Pakistanis were shot dead in October by
Indian security forces in the troubled Indian province of Punjab. India has
said the two were agents aiding local terrorists - a charge Pakistan has
denied.
The report said Pakistan prepared seven atom bombs, each the size of the
weapon which destroyed Hiroshima, and considered using them in the event of
a conventional Indian attack.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3879</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: TUC pits appeal
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The TUC has urged the European Commission to take legal action to stop pit
closures, claiming the regional electricity companies were 'manipulating'
the energy market.
British Coal proposes measures to save 13 pits, Page 10; Boost for Scottish
Hydro, Page 24; Eastern Electricity surges by 69 per cent, Page 26
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3880</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAGAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Brawl in Russian congress
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Brawling broke out in Russia's supreme legislature minutes after acting
prime minister Yegor Gaidar appealed for centrist support to stave off
hardline attacks on his radical market reforms. Yeltsin seeks to be economic
supremo, Page 3
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3881</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAF9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Bosnia flights suspended
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
UN peace-keepers suspended all international relief and logistic flights
over Bosnia for 48 hours after a plane carrying their commander was hit by
gunfire. No-one was hurt. Major scorns 'glib' talk of bombing Serbs, Page
12; Calls for tough action, Page 3; Editorial Comment, Page 20
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3882</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAF8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Labour on attack as 17,500 job losses
announced
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Labour attacked the government's failure to stem the rise in unemployment,
as a further round of 17,500 job losses was announced.
Ford, the US car maker, was also expected to announce redundancies of about
10 per cent of the European automotive workforce, just as pre-
production models of the Ford Mondeo, the car that will replace the Ford
Sierra in Europe, have gone on test in Germany, the UK and Finland.
The US also said it is to close four more military sites in Britain, with
the loss of at least 81 civilian jobs. Ford may cut Euro workforce, Page 3;
Job losses, Page 8; Land Rover set to win Pounds 150m order, Page 10; Nine
more GM plants to be closed, Page 27
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3883</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAF7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity Futures and Options Trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
STOCK index futures were enlivened yesterday by the appearance of a US house
as a buyer of more than 200 of the December contracts and also by extensive
rolling-over of December positions into the March contract, writes Terry
Byland. December moved up sharply to regain the 2,000 mark, albeit briefly.
Traders interpreted the move to roll-over positions into the first of the
1993 contracts as 'very bullish.'
In early trading, December showed a premium of around 20 points against the
cash market - 2,805 was the high water mark for the contract. Pressure eased
off later but at the close the December contract was still showing a
comfortable premium of about 4 points above its fair value premium of 5
against cash.
Open positions of around 35,000 December contracts imply substantial
roll-over requirements of at least 20,000 contracts before the end of the
month, indicating that daily volumes will move above yesterday's level,
according to strategists.
Traded options were busy, recording 32,955 contracts against 22,510 in the
previous session. Business in the FT-SE contract increased from 9,715 to
10,374. Individual stocks were headed by Asda with 6,673 contracts. Also
active were stocks featuring in the day's list of corporate reports. Hanson
recorded 1,427 contracts and Grand Metropolitan 952.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 46
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3884</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAF6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: Fisons deal expected
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOEL KIBAZO and CHRISTOPHER PRICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
STRONG rumours that Fisons will shortly announce the sale of its remaining
consumer health and horticulture businesses, lifted the shares. A price tag
of Pounds 300m was suggested by the market. Last week, the group sold the US
divisions of the same businesses for Dollars 140m to Ciba-Geigy, at the same
time inviting bids for the remainder of its operations in these areas
worldwide.
The proposed disposals would transform Fisons balance sheet. Mr Robin
Gilbert at James Capel: 'This would put the company into cash surplus and is
further evidence of determined management action.' German group E Merck is
said to be interested in Fisons vitamin business, which includes the popular
Sanatogen line. Other names being suggested include Boots, whose shares rose
5 to 530p yesterday.
More good news on Fisons came from the US where an industry newsletter
reported that the group was in discussions with third parties in the US over
the production of its Imferon and Opticrom drugs, according to analysts in
London. Both drugs have failed to meet US production regulations. The shares
rose 10 to 223p.
Hanson active
Despite recording a full-year profit fall for the first time, Hanson saw its
shares climb towards their peak at one time after reporting figures above
most analysts' expectations. Later, however, the gain melted away and the
shares closed unchanged on the day at 236p in London on heavy turnover of
13m.
Profits came in at Pounds 1.286bn against Pounds 1.316bn last time but the
group increased the dividend by four per cent. The industrial and consumer
divisions performed well but the building arm was hit by a slump in the
company's UK aggregates business. After the figures, Hanson held an
international conference call with US analysts for the first time. Following
a tightly controlled analysts meeting, UK researchers came away concerned by
what they saw as a veiled warning on UK profits for the current year, a
higher tax charge, and the acquisition accounting employed by the company.
It was those worries that led to the retreat in the shares just ahead of the
market close.
However Mr Jack L. Kelly, Goldman Sachs US-based Hanson analyst said; 'I was
quite pleased with the results. They came in above my estimate of Pounds
1.05bn.' He said he was keeping the stock on his select list in the US and
Goldman Sachs top European stocks.
Figures from Grand Metropolitan received a mixed response, although the
post-results meeting with analysts produced more positive comments. Mr
Graeme Eadie at County NatWest said that while the increase in marketing
expenditure would be rewarded, worries remained over earnings growth
particularly in the short-term. He downgraded his figures 5 per cent to
Pounds 972m for the current year and remains a hold. Others were more
positive. Kleinwort Benson upgraded 10 per cent to Pounds 991m and said that
the 12 per cent discount to the market make the shares a buy. Strauss
Turnbull, citing the positive current trading news, also upgraded,
forecasting Pounds 1bn for 1993 and remaining a buyer. The shares retreated
12 to 428p.
Bass recovered from Wednesday's results mauling, Nikko and Strauss
recommending the stock. The shares rose 15 to 600p. Guinness shed 9 to 534p
after Grand Met suggested weak spirit price inflation.
Shares in international conglomerate BTR gave up an early gain of 5 1/2
after broker Smith New Court placed a block of 7m shares at 516p. Several
dealers talked of initial problems in finding a home for the total amount.
The stock had however been cleared by the close of business which helped the
shares firm a  1/2 to 518p, on total turnover of 17m.
Shares in Royal Insurance fell early in the day after the company announced
a Pounds 70m convertible bond issue. The issue was however later reported to
have been oversubscribed, though sentiment remained depressed by fears of
large claims for flood damage. By the close the shares had fallen 12 to
253p, in heavy trade of 7.4m with some dealers saying some investors were
selling stock to take up the issue.
Shares in Abbey National fell 5 to 373p, after it was reported that Moody's,
the US credit rating agency, had downgraded some of the banks.
HSBC had a volatile session. Early in the day the shares fell 25 to 455p,
following heavy falls in Honk Kong Bargain hunters however came in later in
a big way which and helped the shares close 5 up at 485p, after heavy trade
of 23m shares.
Also busy was Royal Bank of Scotland. The shares jumped 8 to 189p, following
a positive meeting after the release of full year figures in line with
market forecasts. Turnover rose to 13m.
Turnover in BP rose to 10m as the shares fell 4 to 230p, on the back of the
weakened oil price. Mr John Toalster at Strauss Turnbull said: 'Investors
realise falling oil prices will play havoc with BP's cash flow and balance
sheet.'
Alexon fell heavily after issuing a trading warning. The shares retreated 27
to 98p.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1992
NEW HIGHS (56).
AMERICANS (2) Chrysler, Sears Roebuck, BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (2) Bulmer (HP),
Taunton Cider, BUSINESS SERVICES (2) Rentokil, Serco, CHEMICALS (1) Croda,
CONGLOMERATES (1) Hanson 9 1/2 pc Cv., CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (1) NSM,
ELECTRICITY (1) Scot. Power, ELECTRONICS (1) Hoskyns, ENGINEERING GENERAL
(3) Carclo, FKI, Siebe, FOOD MANUFACTURING (1) Acatos &amp; Hutcheson, FOOD
RETAILING (3) Argyll, Iceland, Sainsbury (J), HEALTH &amp; HOUSEHOLD (1)
Huntleigh, HOTELS &amp; LEISURE (3) Granada, Do 7 1/2 p Pf., Vardon, INSURANCE
COMPOSITE (1) Travelers, INSURANCE LIFE (1) Trans. B 6pc Pf., INVESTMENT
TRUSTS (10) Acorn Inv., Equity Consort, GT Venture Wts., Henderson Highland,
Jove Inv., Law Debenture, London Amer. Venture, Murray Enterprise Zero Cv.
'94, Murray Inc. B, TR Tech. Units, MEDIA (3) Central ITV, EMAP, Reuters,
MISCELLANEOUS (2) Danka Business Sys., Frost, OILS &amp; GAS (1) Norsk Hydro,
OTHER FINANCIAL (2) Caledonia, Perpetual, OTHER INDUSTRIAL MATERIALS (1)
Scapa, PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING (5) Bowater, Do 7 3/4 pc Pf., Capital
Inds., Portals, St. Ives, STORES (3) Boots, Fine Art Devs., MFI, TRANSPORT
(4) BAA, Mersey Docks, Powell Duffryn, Tibbett &amp; Britten, WATER (1) East
Surrey.
NEW LOWS (32).
BUILDING MATERIALS (1) Spring Ram, BUSINESS SERVICES (1) CRT, CHEMICALS (1)
Caird 7p Cv. Pf. '09, CONGLOMERATES (1) Bibby (J), CONTRACTING &amp;
CONSTRUCTION (2) Campbell &amp; Armstrong, Westminster Scffldg., ELECTRONICS (2)
Graseby, P-E Intl., ENGINEERING AEROSPACE (1) Ipeco, ENGINEERING GENERAL (1)
Wyko, FOOD MANUFACTURING (1) Sheldon Jones, HEALTH &amp; HOUSEHOLD (1)
Swallowfield, INVESTMENT TRUSTS (1) Drayton Recovery, MISCELLANEOUS (2) FII,
Hornby, MOTORS (1) DAF N/V, PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING (2) High-Point,
Intl. Comm. &amp; Data, PROPERTY (3) Bredero, Bucknall, Power, STORES (2)
Alexon, Stylo, TEXTILES (3) Hawtin, Ingham, Lamont, TRANSPORT (1) IoM Steam,
MINES (5) East Rand, Northam Platinum, Placer Res., Precious Metals,
Renison.
Other market statistics, Page 30
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 46
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3885</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAF5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: US houses active in London equities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
VOLATILE trading in the London stock market yesterday left share prices firm
at the close of a session featured by the presence of several of the US
securities houses. There was a slightly cool reception for a batch of
profits statements from leading UK companies but, once again, there was
little sign of significant selling.
The FT-SE Index closed 6.9 up at 2,771 after moving through a 20 points
range during the session. Heavy buying of the stock index futures by a US
house rescued the underlying equity market from a dull start which saw the
Footsie down by 6.1 in early trading. Later, the Index for December rose
sharply as sterling advanced sharply against the D-mark and showed a 13.6
gain at 2,777.7 at the day's best. But the mid-session gain was then in turn
trimmed as Wall Street opened uncertainly to show a fall of 5.6 on the Dow
in UK trading hours.
Traders expressed satisfaction with the market's performance against a
potentially troubling backcloth yesterday, which included the continued
turmoil in Hong Kong equities and poor economic data from Germany.
Two sizeable trading programmes were identified and ascribed to two of the
largest US houses; a third was known to have been a heavy buyer of the
December futures contract on the FT-SE Index. The past week has brought more
favourable news on the US economy and dealers will focus on today's
announcement of the latest US employment statistics.
The trading programmes helped swell the day's Seaq-reported volume total to
669.5m shares from Wednesday's 624.2m; retail volume remained high on
Wednesday and was worth a total of Pounds 1.26bn.
The day's list of corporate reporting features included Hanson and Grand
Metropolitan, both US-influenced stocks. Hanson's half year figures found a
satisfactory response but Grand Metropolitan disappointed some investors.
The firmness in sterling in the second half of the session, while not
necessarily helpful for overseas earning companies, was regarded as
favourable for prospects for the cut in bae rates pencilled in by stock
market analysts for soon after Christmas.
Most of the activity was in the blue chip internationals, indicating the
presence of the US investment houses. Reuters RTZ and ICI all found buyers
and there was some selective demand among the pharmaceutical stocks. UK
store and retail issues held steady as sector analysts began to look for
signs of some recovery in consumer spending which would boost Christmas
spending patterns.
UK banking stocks also looked firmer, with Royal Bank of Scotland supported
following the results, despite the expected news on bad debts. HSBC rallied
from the losses suffered in the wake of the fall in the Hong Kong stock
market as some UK strategists began to predict that the Far Eastern market
was due for a recovery in confidence.
Market strategists remained fully confident, commenting that it was not
unexpected that the London market should jib at breaking through the FT-SE
2,800 mark after rising so rapidly over the past week. The general consensus
that the Footsie will close just above 2,800 at the end of the calendar year
seemed to be holding firm.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 46
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3886</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAF4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Dow claws back early loss on
recovery hopes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
ALTHOUGH blue-chip stocks continued to slip on profit-taking, the rest of
the US stock markets either held their ground or posted new gains on growing
confidence in the economy, writes Patrick Harverson in New York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was down 9.72 at 3,276.53,
although off its lows of the day when it had been down 16 points. In
contrast, the broadly based Standard &amp; Poor's 500 ended 0.04 firmer at
429.93, while the Amex composite put on 1.12 at 393.68 and the Nasdaq
composite firmed 3.44 to 656.35, a new high for the index. Turnover on the
NYSE was heavy at 239m shares, and rises outpaced declines by 909 to 867.
Analysts regard the selling of recent days as a temporary correction in
prices following the recent period of strength. The fundamentals of the
market, meanwhile, remained positive, with investors encouraged by recent
signs that the economic recovery is picking up. However, there were some
concerns about the possible revival in inflation.
The day's news was mostly positive. Jobless claims fell 12,000 in the third
week of November, October factory orders increased 7 per cent, third quarter
non-farm productivity rose 3.0 per cent, and the latest car sales figures
showed strength. Today the November employment report is due to be released.
Woolworth initially fell Dollars  7/8 to Dollars 31 1/4 in early trading
after the retailer reported that November domestic same-store sales fell by
1.1 per cent, and that total sales fell by 6.9 per cent in the month.
Although the figures disappointed some investors who had hoped for a
post-election bounce in consumer spending, optimism about a strong Christmas
period helped Woolworth's shares recover to end Dollars  1/2 higher at
Dollars 32 1/2 . Advanced Micro plunged Dollars 1 7/8 to Dollars 16 1/8 in
turnover of 3.5m shares after a judge ruled that the company had no right to
copy certain Intel software in versions of the 486 personal computer
microprocessor.
The ruling means that the introduction of a 486 chip to compete with the
Intel 486 will be delayed, allowing Intel to enjoy a longer period without
competition. Intel, which is traded on the Nasdaq market, jumped Dollars 4
to Dollars 77 1/4 in turnover of 5.9m shares
Also on Nasdaq, Pomeroy Computer climbed Dollars 1 3/8 to Dollars 5 3/8
after the Cincinnati-based technology company announced it had signed three
agreements that would generate more than Dollars 31m in sales and service
revenue over the next 12 months.
Canada
TORONTO stocks finished virtually flat with the merchandising sector gaining
strength from a rise in heavyweight Hudson's Bay Co.
The merchandising index gained 32.55, or 0.9 per cent, to 3660.62 while
Hudson's Bay rose CDollars  1/2 to CDollars 26 3/4 after reporting an
improvement in third quarter profits excluding extraordinaries.
The TSE-300 edged down 0.3 to 3264.9 on volume of 42.8m shares valued at
CDollars 354.3m
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 43
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3887</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAF3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
STRONG offshore demand for gold shares sent the index up by 42 or 4.8 per
cent to 905, though off the day's high of 912. The overall index put on 42
to 3,246 while industrials rose 29 to 4,258. Vaal Reefs gained R2.50 to
R149.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 43
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3888</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAF2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Fall-out from Hong Kong
spreads throughout region
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A FURTHER sharp fall in Hong Kong triggered selling in Japanese shares
yesterday, writes Emiko Terazono in Tokyo.
The Nikkei average fell 133.60 to 17,260.08, although buying by investment
trusts and arbitrageurs pushed the index up to the day's high of 17,508.32
at the start of the afternoon session. However, short selling and
profit-taking by dealers depressed the Nikkei to the day's low of 17,205.32
just before the close.
Volume rose to 240m shares from 206m. Declines led advances by 573 to 367
with 172 issues remaining unchanged. The Topix index of all first section
stocks fell 4.23 to 1,304.08 and in London, the ISE/Nikkei 50 index rose
0.09 to 1,051.29.
Traders said investors used the fall in Hong Kong as an excuse to take
profits. 'It's a consolidation period, as investors have started to realise
that the recent rise may have not be backed by economic fundamentals and
corporate profits,' said Mr Takatoshi Okuyama at Daiwa Securities.
Most investors, including public funds, waited on the sidelines for third
quarter GNP figures which were announced in the afternoon. Traders said that
while the 1.6 per cent annualised fall from the previous quarter shocked
investors, hopes of an imminent cut in the discount rate emerged.
In spite of the fall on the first section, The second section rose 4.06 to
1,677.76, gaining for the 11th consecutive day as dealers targeted
small-capitalisation shares.
Dealers also traded speculative issues, with Nippon Carbon, second most
active issue of the day, unchanged at Y513 and Clarion up Y13 to Y485.
High-technology issues were lower on profit-taking, with Toshiba down Y4 to
Y618 and NEC retreating Y9 to Y659.
Toy makers, which firmed on hopes of robust sales ahead of Christmas, also
fell on profit-taking. Bandai lost Y150 to Y3,630 and Konami fell 80 to
Y2,870.
Morinaga Milk Industry jumped Y57 to Y700 on reports that the company had
started drug research for a new virus.
In Osaka, the OSE average fell 54.68 to 18,718.60 in volume of 35.4m shares.
Machinery and construction stocks fell on profit-taking, while
pharmaceuticals and electronics companies gained ground.
Roundup
THE fall-out from Hong Kong was felt throughout the region.
HONG KONG crashed 8 per cent as the stand-off between Governor Chris Patten
and China's leaders prompted panic selling across the board. However, a
small bounce in the Hang Seng index in the final minutes and a slight
premium in December futures on the Hang Seng raised hopes that the market
might be close to its bottom.
The Hang Seng index ended 433.44 lower at 4,978.21, but off the day's low of
4,947.75. Turnover jumped to HKDollars 5.3bn from HKDollars 3.6bn. Among the
most active stocks, HSBC was down HKDollars 4 at HKDollars 51 and Cheung
Kong 90 cents lower at HKDollars 18.
SINGAPORE closed lower in cautious trading as sentiment was dampened by Hong
Kong. The Straits Times industrial index fell 11.55 to 1,448.34 in volume of
86.62m shares.
Speculative interest in companies linked to Multi-Purpose Holdings Bhd
(MPHB) remained but there was light profit-taking. MPHB lost 7 cents to
SDollars 1.65 and it was the most active share with 6.21m traded.
AUSTRALIA was also depressed by Hong Kong but dealers noted an inflow of
capital into Australia from Hong Kong. The All Ordinaries index closed 4.6
down at 1,433.8 in turnover of ADollars 141.4m.
The gold sector was weak as an ownership dispute at the Porgera gold mine in
Papua New Guinea weighed on shares. The three listed co-owners of Porgera
continued a slide begun last month on news that the PNG government wanted to
raise its 10 per cent stake to 30 per cent. Placer Pacific slid 8 cents to
ADollars 1.10, Highlands Gold 4 to 63 cents and Renison Goldfields 2 cents
to ADollars 2.65.
NEW ZEALAND finished lower for the third consecutive day as the market
continued to consolidate from a strong run. The NZSE-40 Capital Index closed
down 6.02 at 1,519.54 in turnover of NZDollars 25m.
SEOUL fell after the central bank's rejection of a cut in interest rates.
The index closed 11.27 lower at 638.93 in turnover of Won430.87bn.
TAIWAN reversed early gains to end lower and the weighted index closed 21.62
down at 3,614.08 in thin turnover of TDollars 4.9bn.
MANILA rose for the third day on hopes of better economic conditions in the
Philippines in 1993. The composite index went up by 6.14 to 1,279.54.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 43
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3889</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAF1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Frankfurt stays calm amid
signs of recession
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CONFIRMATION that Germany was closer to recession did not have much impact
on Frankfurt yesterday, while Paris was lifted by renewed currency and
interest rate speculation, writes Our Markets Staff.
FRANKFURT lost early gains as investors took the view that there was little
to get excited about in yesterday's batch of corporate results. The DAX
index, which had reached a high of 1,539 early on, fell to an intraday low
of 1,526 before closing down 1.46 at 1,532.50. Turnover was little changed
at DM4.7bn from DM4.8bn.
A 1.5 per cent fall in west German GNP in the third quarter from the second
quarter in line with expectations while news that the steel workers had
accepted an 18-month pay package worth 3.3 per cent was taken as a sign that
realism had entered wage settlements. On Tuesday insurance employees
accepted a 4.2 per cent salary increase, having sought 7.5 per cent.
Commerzbank provided no surprises in its 10-month figures when it reported a
13 per cent rise in group operating profit. The shares initially reacted
with a DM2.20 gain to the day's high of DM247.00 but came back after the
bank said that there was no room to improve last year's DM10 dividend to
close unchanged at DM244.80
Elsewhere in the sector, Deutsche Bank lost DM3.50 to DM669 ahead of its
results next week, while Bayerische Hypo Bank was unchanged at DM402 on a 12
per cent increase in operating profit.
Henkel lost another DM18 or 3 per cent to DM551 on Wednesday's disappointing
1992 profits forecast and Volkswagen was DM1.70 weaker at DM253.30 after the
company said orders for its vehicles were declining in spite of a 5.6 per
cent rise in deliveries in the first 10 months. Kugelfischer, forecasting
full-year losses above DM132m as against a DM81m deficit in 1991, eased DM2
to DM112.
PARIS rose briefly above 1,800 on renewed speculation that Germany would
lower interest rates next week and that the franc would be devalued. The
CAC-40 index rose as high as 1,805.39 but later closed up 16.10 at 1,799.43
in good turnover of FFr2.7bn.
Interest-rate sensitive stocks were among the gainers, as Societe Generale
rose FFr13 to FFr567 and Compagnie Bancaire put on FFr6.40 to FFr361.50.
Thomson-CSF shares rose FFr6.40 to FFr132.90 on a newspaper report that the
company might win an order to sell fighter aircraft electronics to Abu
Dhabi.
Euro Disney steadied after its recent drop, closing FFr1.30 higher at
FFr57.80.
The drinks group Pernod Ricard bucked the trend, falling FFr5.4 to FFr371.6.
MILAN ended lower on worries that a disagreement between the treasury and
the industry ministry on the timetable for planned privatisations would hold
up the sell-off of state companies. The Comit index fell 6.8 to 426.46 as
turnover continued to decrease steadily, to an estimated L160bn from L171bn
on Wednesday.
Generali was in focus, as it dropped L280 to L27,740 on one or two big sell
orders. However, its drop below 28,000 prompted some buying interest,
dealers said.
The hotel group Ciga remained weak on worries about its financial situation
and the shares fell L137 or 13.2 per cent to L898. The retailer Rinascente
regained some ground after its recent fall, rising L162 to L6,732.
AMSTERDAM turned its attention to Daf after the truck maker announced
further restructuring plans and said that it hoped to conclude talks soon
with banks regarding a refinancing package. The shares were temporarily
suspended at Fl 5.40 and then closed unchanged at Fl 6.20, though some
analysts commented that there was really nothing new in the announcement.
The CBS Tendency index was 1.2 higher at 105.6.
Cyclical stocks remained in favour with investors: DSM up Fl 1.00 at Fl
81.50, Akzo rising Fl 1.50 at Fl 137.70 and KLM firming Fl 1.60 to Fl 26.60.
ING, which reported a 6.6 per cent rise in nine-month net profit just after
the close, was unchanged at Fl 49.60.
MADRID remained buoyant as the general index closed 2.07 higher at 211.40.
Repsol came off the day's high of Pta2,600, on news that a chartered Greek
tanker had run aground off Spain, raising fears that the company might be
liable for clean-up costs. The shares closed Pta30 higher at Pta2,575.
ZURICH was encouraged by lower short-term interest rates as the SMI index
gained 4.7 to 1,928.6. SMH, the watch manufacturer, saw its registered
shares rise SFr65 to a year's high of SFr1,405.
STOCKHOLM eased as lower domestic interest rates failed to offset gloomy
predictions for the Swedish economy. The Affarsvarlden General index fell
2.6 to 882.6 in turnover of SKr700m.
VIENNA fell in light volume as the ATX index closed 8.37 down at 751.54.
Wienerberger, the building materials supplier, lost Sch110 to Sch2,850 with
a large sell order being noted.
ISTANBUL fell back as metal workers threatened to strike and investors
waited for the release today of November inflation data. The 75-share index
lost 21.76 to 3,921.88 in turnover of TL192.7bn.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Actuaries Share Indices
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
December 3  THE EUROPEAN SERIES
Hourly changes
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                         Open     10.30     11.00     12.00
FT-SE Eurotrack 100   1055.60   1054.90   1053.62   1053.18
FT-SE Eurotrack 200   1133.33   1133.17   1133.34   1134.46
                        13.00     14.00     15.00     Close
FT-SE Eurotrack 100   1053.78   1056.09   1056.12   1055.11
FT-SE Eurotrack 200   1138.21   1139.19   1139.42   1136.09
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                        Dec 2     Dec 1    Nov 30    Nov 27    Nov 26
FT-SE Eurotrack 100   1052.11   1056.79   1057.75   1049.92   1048.05
FT-SE Eurotrack 200   1130.96   1135.62   1132.14   1122.37   1118.56
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value  1000 (26/10/90)  High/day: 100 - 1057.18; 200 - 1142.56
Low/day: 100 - 1053.03  200 - 1132.45
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 43
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3890</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAF0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets: France fails to live up to expectations
 -An economic slowdown and pressure on the franc are to blame
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
This time last year if any analyst had been asked to predict which European
stock markets were likely to be the best performers in 1992, Paris would
almost certainly have been at, or near, the top of the list.
So much for predictions. The CAC 40 index now stands just below 1,800,
almost the same level as at the start of the year. The French economy has
grown faster than many of its European counterparts, notably Germany, but
not quite as fast as even the most sceptical analysts expected.
In retrospect the analysts appear to have been hopelessly over-optimistic in
their initial forecasts. But at the time they had every reason to expect
1992 to be a robust year, both for France's economy and for the Paris stock
market.
The French economy had slowed down in 1991, reflecting the impact of high
real interest rates on domestic demand and the effects of the global
recession on France's export markets. The same trends seemed set to continue
into 1992. But analysts - and the French government - harboured hopes of an
improvement in exports as, thanks to years of low inflation, French
companies had become cost-competitive in the international marketplace.
There also appeared to be little risk of an economic volte face from
France's socialist government which, led by Mr Pierre Beregovoy, first as
finance minister and then as prime minister, continued to cling to its rigid
fiscal policy, despite the continuing increase in unemployment and the
steady slide in its popularity in the approach to next spring's elections.
The CAC 40 index rose rapidly in the first five months of 1992, just as
analysts had expected. By the second week of May it had reached 2,077,
nearly 20 per cent higher than at the start of the year. But that was the
peak. Since then the Paris stock market has fallen fairly steadily, dipping
down to 1,611 in early October.
Growth is the problem. The domestic economy has been stubbornly static, both
in terms of consumer spending and corporate investment. Meanwhile exports
have slowed down, initially because of the global economic slowdown and
latterly due to the strong franc.
The latest analysis from Paribas forecasts growth of just 1.9 per cent for
1992. The prospects for 1993 could be worse. Societe Generale warns that
France could fall into a vicious circle whereby confidence crumbles, thereby
stopping companies from making the investments needed to regenerate the
economy.
Meanwhile, the French economic scene is now dominated by one overwhelming
issue - what will happen to the franc?
The critical question is whether the franc can continue to resist market
pressure to devalue. Both the Bank of France and, its new best friend,
Germany's Bundesbank, have been forced yet again to bolster the franc in
recent weeks.
The government insists that it has no intention of abandoning its franc fort
policy of protecting the franc. Indeed to do so before the elections next
March would deal a devastating blow to Mr Beregovoy's credibility, even if
it would seem to be the easiest way of avoiding a slowdown in exports and
reviving the rest of the economy.
Most analysts suspect that, although the pressure will persist, the franc
will probably pull through. The market will then have to bide its time until
the elections to see whether the next government has same attachment to the
franc.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 43
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3891</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Foreign Exchanges: D-Mark hit by pay settlement
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER JOHN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRESSURES on the franc eased yesterday as a news of weak growth in Germany,
including a surprisinglu low pay deal, prompted widespread selling of the
D-Mark. The sell-off led to a switch into sterling which performed well
against both the German and US currencies, writes Peter John.
The franc had received some continuing support from the French central bank
which had been intervening in early trading. It received a further boost
when Mr Michel Sapin, the French finance minister, said France and Germany
would do everything in their power, jointly, to preserve the current parity
of their two currencies.
In a warning shot to speculators who had been testing the strength of the
currency over the past two days, Mr Sapin said; 'Anyone who wants to damage
the franc-mark link will find himself faced with the solidarity of the two
(finance) ministers and the two central banks.' The franc, which had
languished at around FFr3.411 against the D-Mark over the past two days
despite intervention from the Bundesbank as well as the Bank of France,
lifted to FFr3.404 and reached FFr1.859 against the dollar, up from
FFr1.866.
Meanwhile, pressure on the D-Mark developed in the far eastern markets as
investors sold the D-Mark in exchange for pounds, yen francs and dollars.
When the European markets opened the pressure intensified as Germany
announced a surprisingly moderate pay settlement with steel workers. A 3.3
per cent rise over 18 months against demands of about 7.5 per cent gave a
strong pointer to the strains on the economy and the impending need to cut
interest rates. The settlement implications were compounded by disappointing
economic statistics and the D-Mark tumbled a pfennig to DM1.580 against the
dollar.
Meanwhile, sterling, ignored for so long, put on a bravura performance that
was said to have been prompted by a significant purchase from one UK
institution.
It was suggested that a complicated cross, carried out through one clearing
bank involving mark and yen and worth around Pounds 500m, gave the initial
impetus to the UK currency. Then, when the pound broke through the DM2.45
barrier, a bear squeeze developed as dealers who had sold sterling earlier
in the week as the were caught short.
The pound surged nearly four pfennigs to to DM2.475 regaining a level last
reached in mid-October. It was also one and a half cents stronger against
the US currency, closing at Dollars 1.5640.
Most dealers argued however that the sharp rise in sterling did not presage
economic recovery but rather pointed to a reassessment of a currency that
had been left on the sidelines for some time and was beginning to look
cheap.
Elsewhere among European currencies, the Irish central bank said it had
arranged to borrow up to DM4bn from German banks in order to support the
Irish punt in the foreign exchange markets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3892</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Money Markets: Rate cut hope revives
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER JOHN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARP rises in the pound yesterday, and a rebound in gilts following
Wednesday's auction, enabled short sterling to continue its climb back
towards the level which would signal further interest rate cuts writes Peter
John.
Short sterling for March delivery, the contract which has become the lead
indicator for the direction rates might take, was sold very heavily down to
93.19 on Monday. That showed a divergence of nearly seven percentage points
from 100 and suggested to some that the current cent base rate was here to
stay. Since then, the contract has picked up steadily as increasingly gloomy
news from mainland Europe has pinpointed the UK as a potential safe currency
haven.
Buying of sterling, especially from Germany was seen yesterday and the
pound's attractiveness encouraged short sterling dealers to mark up the
contract by nine basis points at the start of trading. March continued firm
throughout the day and closed only two basis points off the day's high at
93.54 with 24,000 lots dealt. December, which is now only reacting to
technical factors, opened at 92.78 and ended the day six better at 92.84
with nearly 10,000 lots dealt.
Meanwhile liquidity shortage levels among the clearing banks returned to
normality following wild swings earlier in the week. The Bank of England
said it would offer the money market an early round of assistance after
forecasting a liquidity shortage of around Pounds 900m. Among the main
factors affecting the position were the take-up of treasury bills and paper
maturing in official hands, which were expected to drain Pounds 350m from
the system, bankers' balances below target, which would take out Pounds
250m, exchequer transactions, which would remove Pounds 135m and a rise in
note circulation which would withdraw Pounds 160m.
The Bank later provided the money market with Pounds 615m of early
assistance, buying bills for resale to the market on December 30 at an
interest rate of 6 15/16 per cent.
The help took pressure off overnight rates which opened at 6 9/16 per cent
and came back to around 4.5 per cent by the close. The Bank provided Pounds
500m in the afternoon, buying Pounds 477m of band one bills and Pounds 23m
of band two bank bills, both at 6 7/8 per cent and bringing total help to
Pounds 1.115bn. This compared with a raised forecast shortage of Pounds
1.15bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3893</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / World Commodities Prices: Fruit &amp; vegetables
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Grapes from Spain are this weeks best buy at around 40-55p a lb reports the
FFVIB. Good buys for Christmas include; Satsumas at 35-40p a lb, clementines
at 40-45p a lb and glove boxed dates at Pounds 1.20-1.35 each. Leeks at
45-55p a lb, cauliflower at 35-50p each, Brussels sprouts at 15-25p a lb and
Savoy cabbage at 25-35p a lb continue to be great value for money this week.
Look out for different sized cucumbers, ranging in price from 40-70p each.
Celery at 40-50p a head, spring onions at 40-50p a bunch and flat lettuce at
25-35p a head round up this weeks best salad buys.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 36
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3894</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Brazilian orange boost
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BILL HINCHBERGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAO PAULO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE 1992-93 orange harvest in the Brazilian state of Sao Paulo should be 18
per cent higher than last season at 289.6m boxes, 6 per cent above previous
expectations, according to an industry study.
Sao Paulo accounts for 98 per cent of Brazil's orange output.
The increase in Brazilian production and a 34 per cent jump in Florida
output are primarily responsible for the lowest juice prices in 16 years,
said Mr Ademerval Garcia, president of the Brazilian Association of Citrus
Exporters. Brazil's higher yield results mainly from high rainfall.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 36
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3895</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / World Commodities Prices: Market Report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Prices on the LME continued to fluctuate irregularly as the market sought to
establish a fresh set of trading ranges after, apparently, bottoming out of
its bear trend, traders said. Setbacks found support at well above levels
ruling a month ago but there is still considerable resistance to stall
prices before a significant rise can gather momentum. Support for
three-month COPPER is being found on dips to around Dollars 2,180 a tonne
whereas in early November support was in the Dollars 2,125-Dollars 2,130
band. Three-month ZINC and ALUMINIUM seem to be underpinned at Dollars 1,070
and Dollars 1,200 compared with Dollars 1,030 and Dollars 1,160
respectively. London's robusta COFFEE futures were showing signs of resuming
their uptrend by the close after absorbing a bout of profit-taking. Dealers
said the mood on fundamentals and technicals remained bullish after
Wednesday's rise to a 10-month peak. London COCOA ended near the day's lows
on sterling's strength against the dollar and the French franc.
Compiled from Reuters
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 36
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3896</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Opec fails to talk up oil price
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBORAH HARGREAVES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TELEPHONE DIPLOMACY briefly talked up the oil price yesterday as ministers
from the Organisation of Petroleum Exporting Countries tried to restore oil
traders' faith in last week's agreement.
But futures traders remain sceptical that Opec can stop the slide in world
oil prices, which have lost over Dollars 1 a barrel since last week. In
volatile trading, the price of North Sea Brent crude for January delivery
closed at Dollars 18.15 a barrel, a drop of 25 cents.
Brent prices had recovered slightly after a weak opening, following strong
statements from Opec, but the market lost its gains at the close of trading.
'The Opec agreement is all right under the circumstances but with a surplus
in product stocks, it was just not enough,' said Mr Andy LeBow, a trader at
ED &amp; F. Mann in New York.
Prices on the New York Mercantile Exchange weakened after a report by the
American Petroleum Institute on Wednesday that US crude stocks rose by 1.08m
barrels last week to 325.15m barrels. The January crude futures price
slipped 33 cents yesterday to Dollars 19.12 a barrel.
Opec is stressing that last week's agreement to cut output to 24.58m barrels
a day will cover sales to the market and not just well-head production. This
means the organisation will not release stocks on to the market if supply
becomes tight this winter.
However, oil companies are holding substantial stocks of oil products such
as gasoline and distillates which could depress the market if colder winter
weather does not increase demand.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 36
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3897</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Palladium price pushed to
highest for 21 months
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING, Mining Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PALLADIUM, A platinum group metal used by the electrical and dental
industries and by car catalyst producers, was at the centre of a speculative
overnight rally in New York and Tokyo and then its price was fixed in London
yesterday morning at Dollars 101.80 a troy ounce, the highest since April,
1991.
Mr Neil Carson, marketing director, platinum, for Johnson Matthey, the
precious metals group, suggested that underlying the rise was a sharp
increase to 10 per cent in the rate for leasing palladium. This was probably
the highest level seen for two years and well above the cost of money.
Many palladium leases were due to mature in December and some users were
almost certainly borrowing US dollars to buy the metal rather than renewing
their leases. This would put more pressure on a market which JM believed
would this year suffer a supply deficit. Mr Carson recalled that a recent JM
study suggested palladium supply, including sales to the west from Russia,
the world's biggest producer, would this year total 3.75m ounces while
demand would move up to 3.86m, leaving a shortfall of 110,000 ounces.
The electrical industry, which uses about 1.8m ounces a year and where
palladium is employed mainly in multi-layer ceramic capacitors found in
products such as computers and video recorders, and the dental industry
(1.2m ounces a year), which uses it in alloys to fill teeth, provide most of
the demand for the metal. But palladium for anti-pollution car catalysts is
expected to grow by a third this year and show the fastest growth.
Palladium's price eased to Dollars 100.85 an ounce at the afternoon 'fix' in
London yesterday, up Dollars 3.35. Some analysts expected the price to fall
back to Dollars 98 but others suggested that, if it closed above Dollars 103
in New York it could climb towards Dollars 127.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 36
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3898</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Indian mine project cancelled
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KUNAL BOSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CALCUTTA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
HINDUSTAN COPPER has decided not to go ahead with the development of the
Malanjkhand underground copper ore mine after failing to find a foreign
joint venture partner.
On its own, Hindustan Copper, an Indian government undertaking, is not in a
position to mobilise Rs20bn (Pounds 470m) to finance the mine development
and a 60,000 tonnes-a-year copper smelter.
According to Mr Ved Leekha, the company's chairman, Hindustan Copper sought
to interest Outokumpu of Finland, Codelco of Chile and Mamaco of Zambia in
the project. Bishimetal Exploration of Japan has estimated in its
feasibility report that up to 5m tonnes of copper ore can be extracted from
the underground mine of Malanjkhand in Madhya Pradesh. The Malanjkhand
reserves are estimated at 275m tonnes.
The viability of the project, according to Mr Leekha, has also become
somewhat doubtful as the copper content in the Malanjkhand ore is now found
to be less than 1 per cent, with hardly any traces of silver and gold,
compared with the 1.23 per cent thought earlier.
Mr Leekha said that Hindustan Copper had now two alternatives. It might
develop the mines 'with or without a cut-off grade' and go up to the copper
concentration stage. The concentrates would then be smelted abroad.
Alternatively, to keep the investment low, Hindustan Copper might opt for
mining of 2.5m tonnes of ore. In either case, the company would seek a
private sector partner, whether local or foreign.
India's domestic production of copper will be 45,150 tonnes this year, while
demand is estimated at 160,000 tonnes.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 36
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3899</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Chile prepares copper for the
melting pot - Tentative steps on the road to a controversial partial
privatisation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LESLIE CRAWFORD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CHILEAN government is understood to be considering the division of
Codelco, the state copper company, into four independent units as a first
step towards the partial privatisation of the world's biggest copper
producer.
Opening Codelco to private investors is seen as the best long-term solution
to a number of problems afflicting the company. The government is trapped in
a double-bind: the income it gets from Codelco is falling and at the same
time it has been unable to allocate sufficient investment funds to reverse
the trend of rising production costs and dwindling reserves at Codelco's
existing mines.
In 1989, Codelco's net earnings mustered almost Dollars 2bn, or 6.5 per cent
of GDP, for the treasury. This year the figure is expected to drop to below
Dollars 900m. According to TASC, a group of economic consultants to the
Chilean parliament, lower copper prices forecast for next year will further
reduce Codelco's contribution to about Dollars 400m or 1 per cent of GDP.
Codelco, which owns a third of all registered mining property in Chile, has
a list of projects it wants to develop, alone or with partners in the
private sector, and has asked the finance ministry for a Dollars 600m
investment budget next year. The company's executives think, however, that
they will be lucky to get Dollars 450m.
'As a state company, we compete with health, housing and education for the
government's limited resources,' says Mr Ignacio Guerrero, Codelco's
financial director. Codelco's executives have won the backing of the finance
ministry for divesting non-core businesses to raise extra investment funds.
Top of their list is Tocopilla, the 530 Mw power plant in the Atacama desert
that feeds electricity to Chuquicamata and La Escondida, the world's two
biggest copper mines.
Executives say selling Tocopilla could finance the Dollars 450m development
of Radomiro Tomic, an ore body near Chuquicamata, which could be producing
150,000 tonnes of copper a year from 1995, if the project goes ahead as
planned. Codelco has also discovered another important copper deposit near
Chuquicamata, named MM, which has reserves of between 650m and 900m tonnes.
The privatisation of Tocopilla is being resisted by the Mining Minister, Mr
Alejandro Hales, and the Copper Workers' Union (CTC), neither of which wants
to see Codelco dismembered. Union sentiment is running so high that even the
relatively innocuous move to split off Codelco's maintenance works from the
Teniente division sparked protests and go-slows this month.
The Mining Ministry has invited Codelco's management and the union later
this month to discuss the company's modernisation. Given the almost
sacrosanct nature of Codelco's public ownership, enshrined in the Chilean
constitution, modernisation has become a code-word in Chile for ideas such
as divestiture and privatisation that cannot be named openly.
Mr Ivan Valenzuela, the deputy mining minister, says the main topics under
discussion will be how to generate more resources for the development of
Codelco's mineral deposits. 'We are trying to prepare the ground so that
there is the least possible political resistance to the government's plans,'
he says.
As a first step, says the deputy minister, the government would like to
decentralise management to give Codelco's four divisions - Chuquicamata, El
Teniente, Salvador and Andina - more autonomy in the running of their own
affairs. Many inefficiencies, he says, are now masked by cross-subsidies.
There will also be an attempt to persuade the 19,000-strong CTC that
divesting from Tocopilla, where only 500 jobs are at stake, will allow the
creation of more mining jobs in Codelco's new projects. The company's
management wants to discuss other ways of raising investment finance. One
proposal gaining support is to tap the Dollars 15bn of savings managed by
Chile's private pension funds and insurance companies.
Mr Alejandro Foxley, Chile's finance minister, is preparing new legislation
to widen the investment options open to private pension funds. Although the
details have yet to be made public, the new law might allow pension funds to
take part in project finance, including the new mines Codelco wants to
develop. The idea is likely to please nationalists of both right and left,
as the pension funds would be channelling domestic savings into the
development of the state copper industry.
The pension funds are eagerly awaiting the new investment regulations. But
they say they will measure Codelco's projects against the same criteria that
they use to analyse other investment options. 'We will look at the risk and
the return. Nobody can force pension funds to invest in Codelco,' says Mr
Augusto Iglesias, a pension fund consultant.
From there, Codelco's executives argue, it is a short step to opening up the
company to new shareholders. However, the mining ministry insists that the
ownership of Codelco is not under discussion. 'This is not the right
political moment for a blitzkrieg,' Mr Valenzuela says.
With general elections in Chile only one year away, however, Mr Valenzuela
concedes that the nature of Codelco's ownership will be a political issue on
the platform of every party. Mr Ricardo Lagos, the Socialist presidential
candidate, says there should be no 'sacred cows' as far as Codelco's future
is concerned. 'The main problem of privatising Codelco,' he says, 'is having
one partner, the armed forces, which take 10 per cent of Codelco's gross
sales'. This amounted to Dollars 277m last year.
Mr Lagos believes the military rights over Codelco's earnings will have to
be scrapped for privatisation to become a realistic proposition. But this in
turn would require a revision of military income and expenditure - a subject
which remains strictly out of bounds for civilians despite the formal end of
military rule in 1990.
Codelco's El Teniente division has negotiated collective wage agreements
with two unions representing 1,600 workers, a quarter of the total
workforce. Although the present two-year contracts do not expire until July
1993, Codelco offered to bring forward wage negotiations to avoid a
repetition of the damaging wage strikes that hit El Teniente and
Chuquicamata in 1991.
The new two-year contracts for the unions that agreed to advance wage
negotiations come into effect immediately. They include a no-strike bonus of
310,000 pesos (Dollars 830), higher productivity incentives and a
profit-sharing scheme for Codelco's employees.
Codelco executives have hailed the agreement as a new departure in labour
relations. Mr Pedro Courard, El Teniente's general manager, said the absence
of labour strife and lower absenteeism in 1992 had allowed the mine to step
up output this year to 300,000 tonnes of refined copper, from 276,000 tonnes
in 1991. He said El Teniente planned to invest Dollars 712m between
1993-2000 to bring new areas into production.
Although the mine still has huge reserves, most of these are located in
brittle primary rock which are costly and difficult to exploit.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 36
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3900</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Thailand (11): Beware of pitfalls for the
uninitiated - A look at modern Thai capitalism
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER UNGPHAKORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE experience of arriving at Don Muang, Bangkok's international airport,
typifies modern Thailand and some of the pitfalls that await the
uninitiated.
The international terminal was modernised in the late 1980s and some
construction is still going on. Because of the rapid expansion of tourist
and business traffic, Don Muang is already becoming congested and a new
airport is being considered at Nong Ngoo Hao, south-east of Bangkok.
Nevertheless, arrival can be a pleasant experience in comparison to other
airports in the region. There are dozens of immigration counters and
officials vigilantly watch the queues. Whenever lines start to lengthen,
extra officers swiftly appear and more counters are opened.
Luggage arrives on the carousels with refreshing speed, and passengers can
pass through customs within minutes. Signposts point to the counters of the
two limousine companies operating shuttle services between the airport and
the city centre. Just in case jet-lagged passengers miss the signposts,
uniformed staff offer a helping hand, sometimes a little too aggressively.
Private sector competition, friendly Thai service and a desire to make life
comfortable for foreign visitors all help to convey the customer swiftly out
of the terminal and onto the Vibhavadi Rangsit Highway.
Only then do Bangkok's infamous traffic jams, worsened by the construction
of a second-storey toll-way, bring the passenger rapidly down to earth.
What the first-time passenger to Bangkok probably does not know is that
there is a third taxi service into the city. There are no signposts and no
official guides.
You should neither head straight out of the building, nor turn right along
with the tour groups, nor go to one of the limousine counters. Instead, you
have to turn left outside the customs hall, walk through the friends and
relatives waiting to greet arriving passengers, and report to an official
counter.
You can then board a regular taxi, now more and more frequently a brand-new,
comfortable cab, and travel into Bangkok without the luxury of the
limousines but at half the cost.
This, too, is the result of modernisation. A closer look at its background
reveals much more about the nature of Thai capitalism and the complexity of
doing business in a country where enterprise is not always as free as it
seems.
Don Muang airport is also the site of the Royal Thai Air Force headquarters.
Between the runways, officers and their friends can be seen playing the
greens and fairways of the air force's golf course. The head of the Airports
Authority of Thailand, officially a separate state enterprise, is
traditionally an air force officer.
'We'll always need the assistance of the air force,' executives of the
authority assert frequently, even after the anti-military protests in May
and such reforms as the reshuffle at the top of Thai Airways International.
The third taxi service used to be a totally illegal racket, apparently
controlled by middle-level air force officers and military police. The
drivers were often moonlighting junior officers who paid bribes to the
controllers. Proper taxis were not allowed into the airport, but some
managed to gain entry also by paying bribes.
The limousines at that time were a monopoly of Thai Airways International,
also dominated by the air force.
Locals, unwilling to pay either the illegal operators or the exorbitant
limousine fares, used to drag their luggage to the Vibhavadi Rangsit Highway
in order to hail a regular cab.
Public opposition to this set-up and its association with crime forced the
authorities to install a more open system that would conflict less with such
tourism promotions as Visit Thailand Year in 1987.
Vested interests prevail, however. Thai Airways' limousine monopoly was
broken with the introduction of the second service but the new concession
was awarded to a company run by politicians with close connections to some
air force officers, a fact that aroused considerable press criticism.
The total absence of any information in the arrivals hall about the regular
taxi counter is an indication of the protection the Airports Authority is
willing to offer the two limousine services. Modern Thai capitalism consists
of competition, openness and a more streamlined bureaucracy in some
agencies, blended with influence, personal connections, corruption and
red-tape.
Public opinion and the desire to attract foreign investors and tourists have
led to more modern practices. The Board of Investment offers faster,
one-stop processing for new companies. Telephones are becoming easier to
obtain without the customer always having to pay a hefty bribe. The new
taxis really do operate with their meters running, at least part of the
time.
But the Customs Department remains one of the most corrupt in the Thai
bureaucracy and the Immigration Department is a headache for many
foreigners. An archaic aliens' business law reserves for Thais (and
Americans under a special treaty) such occupations as hairdressing,
alongside professions such as accounting. Changes of government or cabinet
reshuffles tend to swing the fortunes of government projects back and forth
with equal frequency.
Foreign investors are therefore usually advised to form joint ventures with
local partners who know the terrain well. Participants in trade missions are
advised to give themselves enough time to learn about Thailand so that they
are not misled into thinking this is another Malaysia, Taiwan or Italy.
A typical battle is being waged by Lavalin International Group of Montreal.
Since 1988, Lavalin has been trying to persuade the Expressway and Rapid
Transit Authority (ETA), a state enterprise under the Interior Ministry,
that its light rail system with an advanced linear-induction motor
technology is ideal for an elevated railway in congested Bangkok.
Lavalin's fortunes rose and fell as successive administrations - including
successive shifts of power in the ETA - first favoured then cast doubt on
Lavalin's bid. The technical side was not straightforward. Lavalin was
offering technology and construction specifications that in some
circumstances were radically different from the more traditional heavy rail
technology of its rivals.
At the same time, technical specifications were only part of the story. The
battle between Lavalin and its competitors - which included Germans,
Australians and Japanese - hinged on individuals both in the Interior
Ministry and in the Cabinet. Some favoured Lavalin. Some favoured the
others.
While Thai governments came and went, Lavalin itself was taken over by
another Canadian company, UTDC.
At the critical moment of the final decision, power was in Lavalin's favour.
It led to the signing on February 7, 1992, of an agreement for Lavalin to
build what has become known as 'Skytrain'. In July, the government declared
the agreement null and void because the Canadians had failed to keep a
commitment on raising capital for the project.
The Canadians say the problem is a technical misunderstanding arising
because another partner in the project was also taken over. The details are
convoluted, but the upshot was that the government, at that time under the
premiership of Mr Anand Panyarachun, scrapped the project. Instead, a new
state enterprise was set up to handle the capital's rail projects directly.
The consortiums that bid against Lavalin have long given up the fight. But
Lavalin's Thai representatives have tenaciously kept up the pressure. If
Lavalin were not going to build and operate the new railway, at least it
could sell the technology - and some trains - to the new state enterprise.
Two recent developments seem to have improved Lavalin's chances. The
September 13 general election brought a new government to power and with it
new Interior and Transport ministers. The Expressway and Rapid Transit
Authority has also seen another reshuffle which some observers say will
swing the balance back in Lavalin's favour.
A smooth ride can never be guaranteed, however. Two other rail projects for
Bangkok are also being built and a German company recently proposed building
an underground railway, something few ever thought possible for a city that
is essentially built on delta swampland.
The Lavalin story is a repeat of countless others. Leyland of Britain and
Van Hool of Belgium spent years trying to sell buses to the Bangkok Mass
Transit Authority, yet another state enterprise supposed to look after the
welfare of the city's commuters.
Neither made a single sale - the Japanese and South Koreans waited quietly
while the Europeans battled and then shared out the lower-priced spoils when
a decision was eventually reached to replace almost the entire fleet of
buses.
And yet the booming and congested Thai economy has created both the
purchasing power and the need for infrastructure investment. The
accompanying social changes are slowly forcing changes in the way business
is conducted and in the way the bureaucracy works. And companies such as
Lavalin show that tenacity, suitable products and skilled partners do allow
non-Asian companies a chance in a country that often seems distant and
mysterious.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 35
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3901</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Thailand (9): Low profile preferred - Foreign
Relations
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THAI leaders are not much given to strutting around the world stage; not for
them the role of defender of the Third World played by Dr Mahathir Mohamad
of Malaysia, or that of economic guru played by Mr Lee Kuan Yew, Singapore's
elder statesman.
Apart from the occasional dabbling in the affairs of their neighbours in
Burma and Indochina, Thai governments usually prefer to concentrate on
domestic affairs and keep a low international profile.
The spotlight aimed at Thailand in the past few weeks following the refusal
of the Khmer Rouge guerrilla group to comply with the Cambodian peace
agreement was therefore particularly unwelcome.
As the United Nations Security Council considered the possibility of
imposing economic sanctions against the Khmer Rouge, it immediately became
clear that Thailand would have to bear most of the burden if sanctions were
actually to be enforced.
The Khmer Rouge is thought to earn at least Dollars 100m a year by selling
gems and tropical timber from its strongholds in northern and western
Cambodia to Thai businessmen, who in turn sell oil and other supplies to the
guerrillas.
Thai officials squirmed at the prospect of sanctions. They not only pointed
out that a trade embargo would be difficult to enforce but made it plain
that they hated the whole idea of putting pressure on the Khmer Rouge.
Such an anti-sanctions policy was popular in the border provinces which
profit from the trade with the guerrillas.
But Thailand's support for an extremist organisation reckoned to have killed
1m Cambodians between 1975 and 1978 did not look good abroad - or in
Bangkok, where the civilian coalition government had come to power in a
September election in the aftermath of a middle-class, pro-democracy
uprising.
To make matters worse Thai politicians were accused of reneging on
pre-election promises to reform Thailand's pragmatic and mercenary regional
foreign policy.
Liberal voters had hoped that the five-party coalition would voice a
principled support for democracy, human rights and the need to protect the
environment which is being wrecked by indiscriminate logging and
strip-mining of gems in Cambodia. They had hoped that the new government
would take a firm stance against the military junta in Burma and the Khmer
Rouge in Cambodia. In fact, not much has changed.
'Each political party has its own foreign policy platform, but once they
join together into a coalition it's necessary to see how to merge the
policies,' Mr Prasong Soonsiri, the Thai foreign minister, told the
Financial Times in an interview. 'Many issues which the individual parties
were advocating during the campaign may have to be adjusted for the sake of
unity.'
That did not mean there would be no shift at all, Mr Prasong said. 'We
notice that the world is attaching greater importance to issues such as
human rights, democracy and the environment,' he said.
'Thailand has also emerged from a fight for democracy. . . We also wish to
see our neighbours in a position which is accepted by the international
community - but we are not in a position to manage their affairs.'
Mr Prasong, a former air force squadron leader and national security chief,
is all too aware that his ministry's conduct of foreign affairs is limited
by the continued influence of the armed forces, especially on the borders
with Burma and Cambodia.
Thailand is a signatory of the Cambodian peace accord, but the Khmer Rouge
leaders now flouting the agreement have long had close relations with Thai
army generals, and the Thai officers on the frontier have profited from
commissions on the informal trade with Cambodia.
The Khmer Rouge, furthermore, is regarded by Thailand as a useful counter to
the influence of Vietnam, Thailand's old rival, which invaded Cambodia in
1978, overthrew the brutal Khmer Rouge regime and installed the present
Cambodian administration.
Thailand takes an equally ambivalent attitude towards Burma, supporting the
ruling State Law and Order Restoration Council - which has been shunned by
much of the rest of the world - at the same time as tolerating Burmese
ethnic insurgent groups fighting the Rangoon regime from bases on the Thai
border. Western diplomats can therefore be forgiven for suspecting that
Thailand still prefers to see its neighbours unstable and divided than to
risk the prospect of strong, united and prosperous nations on its borders -
although it does seem to have made its peace with Laos.
The question is whether such a policy is adequate for the 1990s. It favours
army timber smugglers and small-time frontier traders, but may weaken the
prospects of legitimate Thai businesses and investors in the region.
Thailand, which advertises itself as a regional hub for Indochina and Burma,
appears to be losing out to commercial rivals such as Singapore, Taiwan,
Hong Kong and Malaysia in the fast-developing economy of Vietnam.
Too much concern for frontier traders, as Mr Prasong appears to realise, may
also distract attention from the vital task of attracting foreign investment
to Thailand, fighting trade protectionism and securing access for Thai
exports to the country's principal markets in the US, Europe and Japan.
'I came into office as minister of foreign affairs at a time when the world
was changing rapidly; in particular the world has seen a move from military
confrontation towards economic confrontation,' Mr Prasong said. 'The
government has a duty to try to solve the obstacles arising from the
increasingly competitive international scene.
'We see increasing competition in economic matters, in trade, and
competition to secure markets and capital.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 34
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3902</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Thailand (10): Making a meal of quotas - An aspect
of Thai politics
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER UNGPHAKORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Dr Narongchai Akrasanee is one of Thailand's more well-known
economists-cum-businessmen. Educated in Australia and the US, he was the
youngest dean of the economics faculty of Thammasat University in Bangkok.
He made his name as a specialist in industry and trade.
Dr Narongchai is now head of a finance and securities company called GF.
Last year, he was the special envoy of the then-prime minister, Mr Anand
Panyarachun, negotiating regional free trade among the six members of the
Association of South East Asian Nations. In September, Dr Narongchai was
almost appointed a minister in the new government. 'Almost' because at the
last minute he fell foul of something he, as a free trader, has spent much
of his working life arguing against: quotas.
Foreigners frequently complain that Thai politics is impossible to
understand. Unpronounceable Thai names do not help matters and it does not
help that so many of the 'anti-military' political leaders have military
rank. But often it is the behaviour of politicians that is difficult to
understand, as if some code has to be cracked. One set of codes deals with
quotas, around which Thai politics sometimes appears to revolve.
Dr Narongchai was to have been appointed to the Cabinet by Gen Chavalit
Yongchaiyudh, leader of the New Aspiration Party, the second-largest in the
coalition. Thai coalition cabinets are formed by quota and under the present
constitution, governments are allowed a maximum of 44 ministerial positions.
These are shared out in proportion to the size of the coalition parties.
After the election in September, the New Aspiration Party was given 11
cabinet seats. When word leaked out that Dr Narongchai was among the
non-elected appointees that Gen Chavalit was proposing to nominate, the
party's MPs threatened a rebellion. One more cabinet seat given to an
appointee, no matter how able, would mean one less for an MP. Gen Chavalit
had to yield; an elected MP was picked instead.
The quota system does not allow much flexibility. The selection of MPs to
fill those portfolios is often based on arithmetic. MPs of the Democrat
Party, the largest in the present coalition, say they are virtually
guaranteed a cabinet post if they can head a team of candidates that has
made a clean sweep of all the seats available in a province or in a
multi-seat constituency.
The previous elected government came to power in March. No sooner had the
cabinet posts been announced than Mr Banharn Silpa-archa, secretary-general
of the Chart Thai Party - at that time ranked second in the coalition - told
reporters that his party would periodically reshuffle its ministers so that
all senior members could have a turn in the Cabinet.
It did not, apparently, occur to Mr Banharn that the prime minister, Gen
Suchinda Kraprayoon, might want to be consulted. Not even a prime minister
who was in power as a result of leading a coup. Reshuffling the Cabinet
within the Chart Thai Party quota was an internal affair of the Chart Thai
Party.
This adherence to quotas and 'fair shares' is supposed to mean objective
selections that avoid favouritism. Of course it does nothing of the kind,
and it contrasts starkly with the way most Thais conduct their private
lives.
No group of friends or associates would dream of having a meal and dividing
the bill into 'fair shares'. Emphasis on generosity dictates either that the
most senior or most wealthy pays the bill or members of the group informally
take turns to pay.
Quotas continue to play a role once ministers have been appointed. A
commerce minister is in charge of allocating export quotas for tapioca and
garments. An agriculture minister's responsibilities could include
fertiliser procurement and sales quotas. A finance minister can decide which
foreign banks will be in the next batch allowed to open Thai branches.
These quotas keep many - but not all - ministers busy. There is nothing they
enjoy better than deciding that conditions have changed and therefore the
method of allocating quotas has to be changed as well. Naturally, every time
the method is changed there are winners and losers. The stakes can be very
big.
Quotas mean money: 'quota-rent' according to the jargon. Ministers who
control quotas can become indispensable financiers of their parties.
One interesting case of quota-rent in Thailand involved taxi licensing. For
such a prosperous city, Bangkok had, and still has, some of the most
decrepit cabs in the world. But because the numbers were restricted and
owning one was still profitable, licence plates were bought and sold for as
much as Bt600,000 each; the plates cost more than the taxis themselves.
Earlier this year, the Anand Panyarachun government, an enemy of quotas,
liberalised taxis. Only certain minimum requirements have to be met and
commuters can now ride in brand new, comfortable taxis with proper meters,
often paying cheaper fares than in the old quota-bound wrecks.
Tapioca is another example. The main allocation method for tapioca export
quotas, a highly lucrative business because of the quirks of the EC's Common
Agricultural Policy, is based on the amount of tapioca an exporter has
stocked up. This is supposed to encourage exporters to buy more tapioca and
raise farm-gate prices. It has also led to a great deal of cheating. One
inspection a few years ago was supposed to have measured eight million
tonnes of tapioca in exporters' warehouses: rather a lot of school puddings.
Officials were transferred, questions were asked in parliament, and former
ministers are still fighting an official committee's ruling that they were
'unusually rich', a ruling that led to the seizure of their assets.
Unwittingly therefore, French farmers who insist that the EC limit tapioca
imports have played their part in Thai political power struggles.
Some ministries control more quotas than others and the politicians struggle
to gain those with most quotas. But once they have acquired cabinet quotas,
the ministers tend not to interfere with their colleagues' activities.
The government of Gen Chatichai Choonhavan, who was overthrown in last
year's coup, was dubbed 'the buffet cabinet', a suitably modern expression
in a country where the word for 'eat' is slang for being on the take. In the
age of double-digit growth, there was plenty for everyone. In political
terms, quotas actually meant a kind of free trade, a free-for-all.
The present Cabinet has its share of rent-seekers but the experience of the
past two years and the frugal appetite of Mr Chuan Leekpai, the prime
minister, could curtail the buffet.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 34
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3903</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Thailand (8): Experienced and honest - Interview,
Chuan Leekpai
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Unlike most of his predecessors, Mr Chuan Leekpai, Thailand's new prime
minister, is neither an army general nor a Bangkok-based, western-educated
aristocrat.
The mild-mannered Mr Chuan, leader of the Democrat Party, has been an
elected member of parliament for the southern constituency of Trang for 23
years. After the election which followed the killing of pro-democracy
demonstrators by troops on the streets of Bangkok in May, he emerged as
prime minister at the head of a five-party coalition government.
Mr Chuan, 54, is of humble origins. His father was a teacher and his mother
a vegetable-seller and he describes himself as 'an ordinary man'. He has
pledged to put more emphasis on rural development than previous Thai
governments. Although regarded as honest and experienced in politics, he has
been branded a 'wimp' by some of his opponents.
He spoke to Victor Mallet and Peter Ungphakorn at Government House. These
are excerpts from the interview, translated from Thai:
Question: What do you hope to achieve during your tenure?
Chuan: There are policies we want to emphasise that are different from those
of previous governments. The first is the promotion of democracy at all
levels. . . It will probably take some time. We'll start at the level of
villages and tambons (sub-districts). The second is a problem raised by
economists and academics who work with us. As a politician I agree with
them. It is the problem of income distribution.
Q: What exactly will you do?
Chuan: We will expand job creation in non-agricultural sectors. This is the
policy of spreading investment into rural areas. The Finance Ministry and
the Board of Investment will be asked to co-operate by providing clear and
sufficient incentives for investors to regard rural areas as priority
targets and to provide them with profits.
We have to accept the reality that to expect them to make sacrifices would
be too idealistic. So the state will have to be prepared to create
incentives for them.
Secondly, we can offer income support by cutting people's expenses. This is
also a reality - that poor people tend to have problems with their health
and their children's education. . . We think we should allocate perhaps no
more than a few billion baht of the budget to look after people who are
unable to look after themselves, for example children and the elderly. . .
As for the job creation and income distribution, we would hope to take some
people out of the agricultural sector. Those who cannot leave would still
farm but they would not have to share too much of the land with other
people. They would then have enough land to earn a reasonable income.
Q: Do you agree with those who describe the Anand government (the previous
administration) as pro-big business and your government as pro-rural?
Chuan: Prime Minister Anand had more experience from the industrial sector.
We have more experience from the village sector. Nevertheless, if the
industrial sector is not successful, job expansion for the village sector
will be difficult, and therefore the two depend on each other.
Q: Which of Anand's policies will you continue, and which will you change?
Chuan: Among the policies of Prime Minister Anand that we should continue. .
. is limiting the expansion of the bureaucracy. The bureaucracy should not
be free to expand. And Prime Minister Anand's policy of placing emphasis on
free trade is a policy I think has been adopted by three or four
(consecutive) governments. I will try to continue with it, including Prime
Minister Anand's policy on Afta (the Asean Free Trade Area). I think it
should expand beyond Asean, but that is something that should be discussed
further.
Q: Has the Sia Song affair (involving a clampdown on stock market
speculators) been properly handled? What will happen next?
Chuan: We discussed this matter for about three weeks before it erupted. At
the end we had to conclude that this was the best way out because the law
did not give us any other option. We realised that it would have some
negative effects. But taking a long-term view, we believed that it would
raise the stock market to international standards.
We realise that investors still behave like gamblers. They are not
interested in dividends. They probably don't even know what businesses the
companies are involved in; they don't know what dividends are paid. It's
only day-to-day trading.
Q: You're not a shareholder or a punter yourself?
Chuan: No.
Q: Have the lessons of May been learnt, or is Thai politics back to the bad
old ways?
Chuan: After May I said before anyone else that we should not believe that
Thailand had suddenly become democratic just because Gen Suchinda
(Kraprayoon) had gone. I was the first to remind people. I don't believe
that a single event will change people's attitudes completely.
We have to accept the reality. The politicians are the same group of people,
mostly old faces. There are only a few new faces. The attitudes are the old
attitudes. But I consider us to have made one step forward.
Q: Will the armed forces now stay out of politics? Will you make sure that
they do stay out of politics and business?
Chuan: In my opinion, the military are more likely to stick to their own
role than to play a political role as they did in the past. There are two
reasons. First, I, as the government, will not make the military my own
personal power-base. . .
Second, the present military commanders are more democratically-minded than
previous commanders. Some laws have been changed so that military decisions
will have to receive the approval of the cabinet.
Q: Are any other measures being taken to ensure that they do not get
involved? The recent incident in Ranong (in which drunken soldiers are
alleged to have attacked a police station after a brawl) shows there are
still problems.
Chuan: It will take time for everyone to accept that the military should be
professional. I cannot be sure that such an event will not happen again.
I said on the day we handed over our policy to officials all over the
country - I really did - that if soldiers, police, border patrol police and
defence volunteers, and so on, do not cause trouble, then the country's
problems will be greatly reduced.
I come across these problems frequently. Restaurant owners often complain to
me that soldiers get drunk and smash the place up. So problems arise because
people get drunk. It will get better. It will get better, I'm confident.
Q: Is there a danger that your efforts will be undermined by disagreement
and instability in the coalition?
Chuan: Coalitions will always have these problems. I've been in many
coalitions, so I'm prepared to face the obstacles. But ultimately I believe
we'll be able to maintain the coalition so that it follows the principles of
the parties who got together to draft this common policy statement. It may
be slow, too slow for some people, but I think we can continue this way.
I try to bring everyone in to participate in decision-making according to
the democratic process. . . The things that we have said all along are
intended to show the public the principles that this government adheres to
when it rules the country. . . The people are the most important factor in
preventing other powers from returning.
Q: Existing laws on everything from traffic to the environment to
prostitution are not enforced. So why introduce new laws?
Chuan: It is true that Thailand's weakness is in law-enforcement. . .
Enforcement is a real problem.
Q: On the other hand, many Thais would argue that there is not enough new
legislation, except during the Anand governments, to meet the needs of a
modern state. The frequency of Parliamentary meetings has been doubled, but
only from once to twice a week. Is that enough?
Chuan: In Khun Anand's time, an immense amount of laws were passed because
there was no opposition. Those laws are all the problems of the present
government. Passing laws is dead easy when there is no opposition. But when
the time comes to put them into practice, they all cause problems. . . They
did not think through whether the laws would work in practice.
Q: Should the police be paid more so that they don't take bribes and do
enforce the law?
Chuan: That's more of an excuse made by the people who take bribes. . . They
should be paid more, but in this economy other officials are also underpaid.
And in comparison to most people, officials in all branches of the
bureaucracy earn more. People struggle and are willing to pay to get their
children into the bureaucracy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3904</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Thailand (7): Key facts
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Area                                               514,000 km2
Population                                        57.6m (1992)
Head of State                          King Bhumibol Adulyadej
Head of Government                               Chuan Leekpai
Currency                                             Thai Baht
Average exchange rate       25.52 (1991 average). Latest 25.42
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
ECONOMY
                                           1991        1992
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Total GDP (dollars bn)                    91.70       106.3
Real GDP growth (%)                         8.2         7.2
 o/w agriculture                            2.2         3.5
 non-agriculture                            9.3         7.8
GDP per capita (dollars)                  1,609       1,845
Sectoral shares in GDP (%)
 Agriculture                               13.8         n/a
 Industry                                  36.4         n/a
 Services                                  49.8         n/a
 Total                                      100
Ind. production (% change pa)               8.4         7.1
Consumer prices (% change pa)               5.7         5.0
Unemployment (% of lab force)               4.2         4.7
Reserves minus gold (dollars bn)1          17.5     20.2sep
Narrow money growth (% pa)2                13.8     19.7aug
Broad money growth (% pa)2                 19.8     15.3aug
Discount rate (% pa,year end)2             14.0     12.0aug
Stock Mkt (% change over year)3          +16.1%      +19.11
Govt. budget balance (Bt bn)              +104.2         n/a
Govt. Balance (% of GDP)                   +4.5         n/a
Current account balance (dollars bn)       -8.0        -7.5
Exports (dollars bn)                       28.1        32.0
Imports (dollars bn)                       33.0        35.5
Trade balance (dollars bn)                 -4.9        -3.5
Total external debt (dollars bn)           27.4        29.1
Debt service ratio                         15.1        13.8
Main trading partners (1991)              Exports     Imports
Japan (% share)                            18.3        28.8
US                                         21.8        10.7
Singapore                                   7.8         9.2
Germany                                     5.4         5.3
Taiwan                                      1.7         5.1
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Notes: 1992 figures are forecasts except for those noted which are (1)
September; (2) August; (3) as at November 25 Source:Bank of Thailand,
Ministry of Finance, NESDB, Ministry of Commerce, IMF, ADB, Datastream,
Economist Intelligence Unit
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3905</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Thailand (6): Adjusting to modern needs - Politics
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER UNGPHAKORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'DOES this mean a split in the coalition?' reporters asked Thai government
leaders barely a week after the new cabinet had been announced on September
29.
The context of the question was unimportant. It happened to be about one
party's decision to make public its ministers' assets, a move not emulated
by the other four parties. But it could have been about the proposal to
elect provincial governors, or any other subject being debated as the new
government prepared its policy statement for parliament.
Thai politics had returned to normal. The public would complain about the
bickering and self-promotion among members of parliament. The urban
electorate would complain about vote-buying in the countryside. Academics
and other intellectuals would complain about superficial policy debates and
decision-making. And economists would complain of 'rent-seeking' -
corruption in various guises - and unwise interventions in commodity
markets.
The urban elite and expatriates would regret the departure of Mr Anand
Panyarachun, twice the caretaker prime minister. Activists would pester the
government to investigate the fate of about 200 people who went missing
during the military clamp-down on pro-democracy demonstrators in May.
But property and stock market speculators celebrated the prospect of a
return to the bullish markets that they had enjoyed before the Gulf War and
the February 23, 1991 coup.
Some of this enthusiasm was dampened with the eruption of a share
manipulation scandal in mid-November that sent the stock market index
tumbling. Nevertheless, Thailand's messy politics no longer entirely destroy
confidence. Its open government and freedom of speech, with all their
disadvantages, are often seen as attractions for investors.
Recent history shows that despite its weaknesses, the political system is
adjusting to the modern needs of an increasingly sophisticated society.
The September 13 general election was the second this year. The first, on
March 22, brought to the premiership Gen Suchinda Kraprayoon, leader of last
year's coup. The military's claim at the time of the coup that they had no
intention of retaining power for themselves was discredited and mass
demonstrations in May led to a bloody military suppression that ultimately
forced Gen Suchinda out of power.
Following the intervention of King Bhumibol Adulyadej, the Thai government
was once again in the hands of Mr Anand Panyarachun, the independent-minded
businessman and former diplomat who was first appointed after last year's
coup.
This time, Mr Anand set about reducing the power of the military through
legislation and a reshuffle of the top brass before handing over to an
elected government.
For the time being, the military are back in their barracks. At some future
date, their return to politics cannot be ruled out, but the trend of the
past decades is for this to be increasingly difficult.
The results of the September 13 general election have to be interpreted with
care because they indicate mixed and often conflicting tendencies. One
outcome was the emergence of the Democrat Party as the largest in
Parliament. The Democrats are probably the closest in Thailand to a genuine
political party because they rely less on the domination of individuals.
Mr Chuan Leekpai, the Democrat leader and new prime minister, is considered
to be honest. His modest lifestyle contrasts with that of many of his
parliamentary colleagues. Mr Chuan eschews the trappings of power of his
predecessors, accepting a modest police escort but preferring his personal
Toyota to his official Mercedes.
Mr Chuan and his coalition partners have appointed several unelected
ministers to oversee the economy, a move partly in response to recognition
that parliament lacks individuals with skills in economic management.
Many believe that these ministers will stand in the next election, further
strengthening electoral politics.
The welcome that Mr Chuan received also reflects a growing concern with the
more corrupt side of parliamentary politics. Corruption was used as an
excuse for the military's overthrow of the Chatichai Choonhavan government
in last year's coup and even though it was not the military's real motive,
it was one reason why public criticism of the coup in the capital was
initially muted.
The debate over the public declaration of ministers' assets reflects the
growing concern with corruption. The law already requires ministers to
report their assets to the Counter Corruption Commission. One party, Palang
Dharma, which has placed particular emphasis on clean politics, has made its
ministers' assets reports public. Coalition partners have described the
Palang Dharma move as a publicity gimmick.
Corruption remains a concern partly because the Thai system still relies
largely on patronage and influence, with little emphasis on policy issues.
The modern, urban, middle classes that played such a dominant role in the
overthrow of the military in May want an open parliamentary system that
concentrates on reasoned decision-making.
They realise, paradoxically, that their achievement has actually been to
swing the balance towards the rural electorate whose criteria for choosing
MPs are not approved in the cities. Despite a minor shift by voters that
brought to power the parties involved in the pro-democracy demonstrations in
May, the September 13 election appears to have seen as much if not more
vote-buying than its predecessors.
Rural voters are so alienated from Thailand's centralised state machinery
that they often have to rely on the skills of manipulators and influence
peddlers if the villages are to gain a share of the country's resources. A
candidate's skill and generosity in handing out money at election time can
be a measure of his ability to peddle influence, and to use the networks of
personal patronage to bring asphalted roads, electricity and water to the
villages.
Political patronage comes in many forms, and sometimes it is associated with
violence. One Thai academic privately describes the country's rural MPs as
'hoodlums in suits'. As with so much of Thai politics, however, the
colourful summary does not accurately reflect the complex reality.
Others argue that rural voters are acting rationally when they accept money
or even vote for candidates supported by the local godfathers. The only way
to reduce the unappetising aspects of electoral politics is reform, to give
local government more power, resources and accountability, according to this
argument.
It is an argument that is beginning to gain acceptance; most parties
promised during the September election campaign to reform local government.
Coalition parties are divided, however, on whether to start at the village
or district level, or to begin with directly elected provincial governors to
replace officials currently appointed almost in colonial fashion by the
Interior Ministry in Bangkok.
The Palang Dharma party of Maj-Gen Chamlong Srimuang, which took a more
radical anti-military line in the May protests, wants early elections for
provincial governors.
Gen Chavalit Yongchaiyudh, New Aspiration Party leader, interior minister,
and former army chief - and also a staunch opponent of the military group
that seized power last year - argues that other reforms need to be
introduced first. His critics accuse him of breaking an election promise and
of capitulating to interior ministry officials.
Such splits can always destroy a coalition government, sometimes almost
without warning. But the costs of an election campaign are now so high that
the MPs are likely to avoid a swift dissolution of parliament. They have
already seen two elections this year and Mr Chuan's cool temperament and
honesty could avert disruptive excesses.
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
THE NEW THAI PARLIAMENT
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
                         Leader                            Seats
Coalition parties:
 Democrat                Chuan Leekpai                        79
 New Aspiration          Gen Chavalit Yongchaiyudh            51
 Palang Dharma           Maj-Gen Chamlong Srimuang            47
 Social Action           Montri Pongpanitch                   22
 Solidarity              Uthai Pimpchaichon                    8
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
TOTAL                                                        207
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
Opposition parties:
 Chart Thai              Pramarn Adireksarn                   77
 Chart Pattana           Gen Chatichai Choonhavan             60
 Seritham                Arthit Urairat                        8
 Muanchon                Pol Capt Chalerm Yubamroong           4
 Prachakorn Thai         Samak Sundaravej                      3
 Rassadorn               Chaipak Siriwat                       1
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
TOTAL                                                        153
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3906</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Thailand (4): Air Force officers ousted - Thai
Airways International
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE turmoil in the boardroom of Thai Airways International (Thai), the
partly privatised national airline, has mirrored the upheaval in national
politics: in both cases the military were finally thrown out.
For decades, the senior officers of the Royal Thai Air Force had controlled
the board of Thai and treated the airline as their personal fiefdom, but
this year they were ousted from the company by the interim civilian
government of Mr Anand Panyarachun.
Mr Anand and his cabinet, appointed by the King after troops killed about 50
pro-democracy demonstrators on the streets of Bangkok in May, moved rapidly
to reduce military influence in state enterprises before leaving the field
to the new civilian coalition government elected in September.
The targets included such military-dominated cash cows as the Communications
Authority of Thailand, which controls international telephone calls, as well
as Thai Airways.
Thai, however, provided the clearest evidence of the military's declining
influence, partly because its business gives it a higher public profile,
partly because its shares are now listed on the stock exchange, and partly
because Air Chief Marshal Kaset Rojananil, the supreme military commander at
the time of the May killings, was at the same time also the chairman of the
Thai Airways board.
With less than a week to go before the September 13 election - which might
have produced a pro-military government but ended up handing the country a
broadly liberal coalition - the Anand government succeeded in removing the
reluctant air force officers from the Thai board and installing its own
civilian nominees.
Mr Pandit Bunyapana, the finance ministry permanent secretary, became
chairman, and Mr Chatrachai Bunya-Ananta, Thai's marketing chief, was
promoted to the post of president.
The changes at Thai, valued at about Dollars 3.5bn by the stock market, were
swift and visible, and Mr Chatrachai himself is a changed man.
Under the old regime, the urbane Mr Chatrachai was deputed to receive
foreign visitors but, mindful of his military bosses, he was only able to
shrug and give the most evasive answers to queries about corruption or the
airline's financial health.
One of the most glaring examples of mismanagement was Thai's decision to
waive its rights to fly the lucrative route to Cambodia in favour of Bangkok
Airways, a local airline with links to Air Chief Marshal Kaset.
Mr Chatrachai and other Thai executives wheeled out a motley collection of
excuses, ranging from the poor state of Phnom Penh airport to the alleged
lack of passengers - at a time when competitors such as Malaysia Airlines
were starting to fly in from other centres, flights from Bangkok were full
and passengers were paying exorbitant fares for the route.
Since the boardroom revolution on September 7, Thai has started flights to
Phnom Penh and Mr Chatrachai has moved quickly to expose the follies of his
predecessors and restore the airline's fortunes.
'We have to set about cleaning our house, reorganising and restructuring to
return to a leaner and more efficient organisation,' he told a corporate
planning conference in November.
In his speech, he soberly assessed where Thai had gone wrong and outlined
his plans for the future.
The fall in profits could be blamed partly on the effects of the Gulf war,
the recession in leading international markets and the political violence in
Thailand in May, he said.
But there were other factors, too, including lower productivity among Thai's
workers and a proliferation of aircraft and engine types which made
maintenance more expensive.
Thai may have been doing better than the average international airline, but
its operating margin of 7.2 per cent compared unfavourably with its
principal competitors in the booming Asian market, Cathay Pacific with 17.4
per cent and Singapore Airlines with 19.2.
Mr Chatrachai produced a graph which showed the break-even load factor line
crossing and rising above the drooping load factor line in 1991.
In other words, the airline was losing money on flights, even if it had been
able to massage its profits with other operations and the sale of aircraft.
This year, Mr Chatrachai said, the load factor was 66.3 per cent, whereas a
figure of 78 or 80 per cent was 'child's play' a few years back.
He has already started to apply his medicine. He has banned any expansion of
Thai's 20,000-strong workforce and is attempting to deploy his staff more
profitably.
He has also cut flights and reduced the seat-kilometres flown by 4 per cent.
He has decided to retire eight aircraft - five BAe-146s and three DC-10s -
eliminating two aircraft types at a stroke and thereby reducing the cost of
maintenance and of spare parts stocks.
Mr Chatrachai disclosed that some aircraft were flying less than three hours
a day.
Those who bought Thai's shares when 7 per cent of the airline was sold to
the public by the state earlier this year, and who have watched the share
price languishing below the 60-baht offer price, are delighted by the new
management's apparent dynamism.
If Thai's profits and its share price react positively to Mr Chatrachai's
initiatives, he may be able to fulfil his ambition of selling another 14 per
cent of the company to local and foreign investors by the end of this
financial year in September 1993.
'I feel that by next year we may be in a position to launch an overseas road
show, perhaps in London, Hong Kong and Tokyo prior to our second shares
offering,' Mr Chatrachai said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3907</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Thailand (2): Semblance of normality - The Economy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER UNGPHAKORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Psychologically, the September 13 general election in Thailand marked the
end of a big freeze for the economy. The Gulf crisis that began in August
1990 had suddenly taken bullish sentiment out of the speculative stock and
real estate markets. With the coup of February 23, 1991, the country's
politics and economy took on a transitional air as investors and the public
waited for a new constitution to be drafted and elections to be held. The
election on March 22 this year served merely to plunge the country into
deeper crisis.
It was only after the violent clashes in May were resolved and the
military's wings clipped that a semblance of normality could return, with
the September election and the installation of the Chuan Leekpai government.
The task ahead for the Chuan government will not be easy, however. It will
have to overcome the Bangkok elite's distrust of the economic management
style of previous elected governments. At the same time, it will have to
cater more for the rural electorate that was ignored under the two
governments of Mr Anand Panyarachun.
Within its first few weeks, the new government has therefore swung between
the liberalism of the Anand governments, favoured by the modern business
sectors, and pressure to intervene to support agricultural prices.
Nevertheless, although these are still early days, some observers detect a
new maturity in economic and political matters both in the government and
the opposition.
Foreign investors did not like the coup; nor did many urban Thais. But few
were prepared to defend the overthrown Chatichai Choonhavan government, with
its worsening reputation for corruption.
Although the military, too, were blamed for corruption, elected governments
were becoming tainted with accusations of economic mismanagement and a new
crisis of confidence appeared to be in the making as the September election
approached.
Having overthrown the military and defended parliamentary democracy, the
urban middle classes now faced the prospect of elected politicians who would
grab as much as they could while in power, and rock the boat as much as they
could while in opposition.
Mr Chuan and his coalition colleagues have tried to prove that they, too,
can place the economy in capable hands.
Three senior bankers, unelected but with political inclinations, have been
put in charge of the economy: Mr Tarrin Nimmanhaeminda, former president of
the Siam Commercial Bank and Thai Bankers Association, is finance minister;
Mr Supachai Panitchpakdi, former president of the Thai Military Bank, is
deputy prime minister in charge of trade negotiations and other economic
matters; and Mr Amnuay Viravan, former executive board chairman of Bangkok
Bank, is another deputy prime minister with economic responsibilities.
Observers have warned that the three could become rivals, but so far
insiders say they have been working together well. One economist has
welcomed the prospect of the first debates on economic policy - as distinct
from sharing out economic spoils - within the Cabinet.
One of the first issues they had to tackle was the budget for fiscal 1993,
which should have been operational since the beginning of October. Earlier
political turmoil delayed the bill's passage through parliament.
Signalling their determination to retain Thailand's traditionally cautious
fiscal policy, the three said they would submit a bill that essentially
continued with the previous practice of balancing budgets. A new budget
accounting method which takes account of when the money is likely to be
spent - rather than in which year the spending is administratively handled -
will give the government a slight deficit on paper, however.
In the past few years, planned balanced budgets have actually yielded
end-of-year surpluses for the government. The official treasury reserves now
stand at about Bt200bn. Such a large figure has been tempting to
politicians, some of whom are suggesting it could be used to write off
farmers' debts. Most economists warn that drawing heavily on the treasury
reserves would be inflationary and although Mr Tarrin initially toyed with
the idea of making some use of the money, he has now changed his mind.
Annual inflation, measured by the consumer price index, is about 5 per cent,
a level that few would want to rise.
Despite the uncertainties and the slowdown in investment compared with the
1980s, investment has continued quietly. Some businessmen see signs that
increased prosperity in a population approaching 58m could mean domestic
demand serves to continue the momentum should the external climate take a
downward turn.
Exports are still expected to have risen by almost 16 per cent to about
Bt835bn this year, with imports up a more modest 10 per cent to about
Bt1,070bn. Earnings from tourism, a big foreign exchange earner, have
stagnated since 1990.
One economist has even forecast a return to the double-digit growth of the
late 1980s. But most envisage economic growth of about 8 per cent for the
next few years provided the international climate does not become too
depressed.
Opinions differ over how serious is the trade deficit in goods and services
 -the current account. One of the causes of the deficit is a failure of
domestic savings to cover Thailand's investment. Some economists, including
those in the Bank of Thailand, believe that domestic savings can be
increased sufficiently to keep the current account deficit at sustainable
levels.
But Mr Supachai, himself a former central banker, has expressed concern that
the current account deficit could remain a serious problem over the next few
years and therefore threaten the stability of the economy. This year, it is
running at about Bt180bn a year or 6.6 per cent of gross domestic product,
down slightly from last year's 8.25 per cent.
With cautious fiscal and monetary policies likely to remain solid
foundations for the economy, the big challenge for the government is likely
to be its handling of the country's infrastructure bottlenecks. Large-scale
road, mass transit and telecommunications projects have been prime targets
for corruption and have been delayed as frequent Cabinet reshuffles and
government changes have swung the odds for various bidders.
The Anand government tried to reform the selection procedure for large
projects in order to make selection more accountable and less susceptible to
corruption. Whether the new government will continue along those lines
remains to be seen. Mr Chuan is known to be clean, but he does not have the
economic acumen of his predecessor and could place less emphasis on sound
project screening.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3908</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Thailand (5): Progress towards a free trade area -
Links with Asean
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER UNGPHAKORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
On January 1, Thailand and its five partners in the Association of South
East Asian Nations (Asean) are due to start cutting tariffs on goods traded
within the group. By the year 2008 these first steps should have led to the
creation of an Asean Free Trade Area (Afta).
Thailand was the main driving force behind the agreement to set up Afta.
This was not because Thailand was more liberal than the other five - Brunei,
Indonesia, Malaysia, the Philippines and Singapore. Far from it; Thailand's
tariffs are on average the highest in Asean and towards the end of the year
some Asean partners were beginning to question Thailand's good faith.
There were two principal reasons for Thailand's push. First, in the months
leading to the 25-year-old group's third summit in Singapore in January this
year, Thailand happened to have as its prime minister Mr Anand Panyarachun.
Mr Anand is a committed free-trader and, as an active member of the Asean
Chambers of Commerce and Industry, had lobbied for years for Asean trade
liberalisation. His efforts bore fruit when the Afta agreements were signed
at the January summit.
Second, with the Europeans and North Americans integrating their markets,
and with the Uruguay Round of world trade liberalisation talks in limbo,
some sections of the Thai business community and bureaucracy were convinced
that Afta was needed.
With a population size matching that of the European Community, a
liberalised Afta would attract more investors, according to this view. It
would cut costs and help Asean respond to the increased competitiveness
arising from the North American Free Trade Agreement and the European Single
Market. If necessary, it would provide alternative markets for Asean exports
which presently depend on the west, should Nafta and the EC become
protectionist trade blocs.
Asean countries still tend to trade more with Europe, North America and
Japan than among themselves. Only about 20 per cent of Asean members' trade
is with other Asean countries, and the figure falls to about 5 per cent if
Singapore is excluded. But the statistics show a slow growth, suggesting the
six are gradually becoming more important to each other.
Economic integration within Asean would imply that the prices of traded
goods would be more uniform among the six markets, that exchange rates would
rise and fall together more closely and that money and capital markets would
show greater unity. This has not been happening in Asean, says Prof Rolf
Langhammer of the Kiel Institute of World Economics in Germany.(*)
'One cannot say that Asean as an entity enjoyed a trend towards a higher
degree of market integration in the past, perhaps except for some small
segments like consumer goods,' he says. 'Against this background, Afta has
to be seen as a signal and perhaps as a push factor towards some degree of
convergence.'
Mr Anand also offered his Asean partners a special gesture. Because Thai
tariffs were the highest in the group, he promised that from January 1,
1993, a ceiling of 30 per cent would be imposed on all tariffs on goods
imported from other Asean countries. Eleven months later, Thailand is seen
in some Asean countries as having second thoughts.
On December 11 and 12, the Asean ministerial council set up to administer
Afta is due to agree on details of the first steps towards regional free
trade. Thai officials preparing for the meeting were considering seeking
delays in some tariff cuts that could cause resentment among other Asean
countries and even threaten to unravel the Afta agreements.
The most controversial is an Agriculture Ministry plan to delay import duty
cuts on palm oil. Palm oil and chemicals are product groups that have been
the subject of the most intense lobbying for continued protection in
Thailand. They are among the 15 sectors specified at the Singapore summit
for 'fast-track' accelerated Afta tariff cuts to 0-5 per cent within seven
to 10 years, but with escape clauses that allow delays in liberalisation at
least for eight years.
The southern provinces, where most of Thailand's oil palm is planted, are
the stronghold of the Democrat Party of Mr Chuan Leekpai, who replaced Mr
Anand as prime minister after the September 13 general election.
In November, a House of Representatives committee said it would call Mr
Anand to explain why the Afta agreements had been signed without
parliamentary ratification.
But perhaps the most confusing episode for Thailand's Asean partners was in
October when Asean economic ministers held their annual meeting in Manila.
At the start of the meeting, the Thai delegation said it had no mandate to
agree on Afta subjects, the most important item on the agenda, because right
at that moment the Thai parliament was debating the new government's policy
statement.
However, there was more going on than the simple question of Thai
parliamentary protocol. Severe rivalries have developed within the Thai
bureaucracy over which ministry should take the lead in international trade
negotiations, and without strong leadership from the new coalition these
rivalries left the Thai delegation in disarray.
As soon as parliament had approved the policy statement, Mr Supachai
Panitchpakdi, the deputy prime minister assigned to handle international
trade negotiations, took charge of the situation. He assured the rest of
Asean that Thailand remained committed to Afta, both in principle and
according to the agreements signed in Singapore. Was he right, or are the
suspicions that Thailand is having second thoughts justified?
The suspicions are partly justified because the arrival of a new, elected
government has shifted the emphasis slightly away from the modern business
interests that Mr Anand and his appointed government represented. This,
together with the Democrats' strength in the south, means that pressure to
protect palm oil now carries more weight. And because palm and other
vegetable oils are important exports for Malaysia, the Philippines and
Indonesia, an attempt by Thailand to delay liberalisation in this sector
would be viewed with displeasure by those countries.
A coalition government means a greater susceptibility to lobbying, and a
greater need to seek compromises. Therefore the chemicals industry's desire
to remain protected could also carry weight. But the lobbying is not new and
in this sense does not represent a shift in Thai thinking.
The principles of free trade have gained considerable acceptance in
Thailand. Sectors seeking continued protection normally need to base their
arguments on special and temporary needs, and often face opposition within
their business associations.
The Federation of Thai Industries has long been split on regional free
trade. Countering the arguments of the chemicals industry are the textiles
and garments manufacturers who want lower-cost fibres and dyes, made from
those chemicals, in order to retain competitiveness in the export markets in
the west.
In one sense Thailand is different from the rest of Asean with the exception
of the Philippines: the debates between the interest groups are more public
and more intense. This may not always be easy for Thailand to explain to
neighbours such as Malaysia and Singapore where the governments are more
authoritarian.
The bids by the various lobbies to retain protection could still fail.
Because Afta is being phased in over several years, officials are preparing
programmes to absorb the shocks. And compromises can be found to allow
tariff reductions while retaining some protection.
The Thai chemicals industry is not so much afraid of competing with imports
made in other Asean countries, but of low-duty imports of non-Asean
chemicals that have undergone cosmetic changes within Asean countries such
as Singapore.
This particular problem could be solved with tougher rules of origin, a
sensitive issue debated behind closed doors at Asean meetings that has not
received much public attention. The Thai chemicals industry could find an
ally in Indonesia which has been pressing for stiff rules of origin.
* Rolf Langhammer: Afta - A step towards intensified economic integration?
Paper presented at a seminar on Asean: Future Economic and Political
Co-operation, Institute of Strategic and International Studies, Kuala
Lumpur, November 13-15, 1992.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3909</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Thailand (3): Regulators under fire - The Stock
Market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
This was supposed to be the year when the regulators brought discipline and
maturity to the lively casino known as the Stock Exchange of Thailand (SET).
The reality was somewhat messier.
It all started cleanly enough. With the economy booming and new companies
being listed on the exchange every week, Thailand enacted a law on the
regulation of financial markets and installed the new Securities and
Exchange Commission (SEC) in one of the central bank's offices on Surawong
Road in Bangkok.
Perhaps it was unfortunate that the SEC's formation coincided with the
market's nadir in May, when Thai soldiers were killing pro-democracy
demonstrators on the streets of the capital.
For as confidence revived following the political defeat of the armed
forces, the return of law and order and the election of a civilian coalition
government in September, investors and speculators piled into the stock
market, often buying shares with money lent to them by their stockbrokers.
The SET index rose inexorably and by November 5 it had reached 963.03, up 44
per cent from its low of 667.84 on May 19. Bangkok's trading volume soared
as well, and at times was second only to Tokyo among Asian bourses.
Meanwhile a controversy had erupted over a meteoric rise in the price of
shares in Bangkok Bank of Commerce (BBC), the country's ninth-largest bank.
Mr Song Watcharasriroj, a wealthy market player better known as Sia (Tycoon)
Song, turned out to have bought a large stake in the bank, but nobody knew
quite how much he owned.
His personal declared stake was 10.66 per cent, but most people believed he
had bought at least 25 per cent of the bank in collaboration with a group of
relatives and associates, in which case he should have made an offer for the
rest of the shares.
Mr Song, who like most other market players was able to benefit from
stockbrokers' credit lines, was accused of being a 'greenmailer' and of
manipulating the shares without keeping the SET informed of his real holding
or his intentions.
At this point various officials started talking about the case to the press
and hinting that they were about to do something. The SET, the SEC, the
finance ministry, the central bank and the police were all involved. 'No-one
has given a clear delineation of duties. It's a mess,' said one stockbroker.
BBC shares fell.
The SEC, under fire not just because of its inaction but also because some
of its members evidently had conflicts of interest - one was advising the
chairman of BBC in the battle against Mr Song and another, the head of a
brokerage, had announced that Mr Song was innocent - pleaded for more time.
'It's not that simple,' Mr Ekamol Kiriwat, SEC secretary-general, told the
FT in an interview. 'How long did it take for (Michael) Milken to be in
trouble?' He complained that people were smearing his reputation with false
allegations that he had met Mr Song, and said it was hard to prove that
speculators were acting in concert with each other even when everyone knew
it was true.
'Some people say we should not disclose anything and others say we are not
doing anything,' he said. 'I did not even want this job.'
Meanwhile the finance ministry and the central bank had moved to prick what
they saw as a potentially dangerous stock market bubble inflated by easy
credit. By September, brokers had outstanding loans of Bt62.66bn to their
clients - three times as much as a year earlier - and there were signs that
speculators were also using personal loans from the banks to buy shares.
'We are trying to allow some steam out of the bubble before it becomes a
bubble,' said Mr Asavin Chintakananda, the SET executive vice-president. 'I
think we have the matter well in hand.'
The Bank of Thailand named 22 brokers with outstanding loans of more than
Bt1bn - one had more than Bt10bn - and told them to restrict credit. The SET
index started to fall. Then the SEC pounced on Mr Song, announcing on
November 18 that they had filed a case with the police against him for
manipulating shares. Investors feared further moves against market players -
after all, the SET had passed on 11 cases of suspected malpractice to the
SEC and only one of them appeared to involve BBC and Mr Song - and dumped
their shares. The market plunged and angry small investors staged
demonstrations outside the exchange.
Mr Song, a dapper 35-year-old, emerged into the limelight to protest his
innocence. 'I have never sold BBC shares since buying them,' he said at a
Bangkok hotel. 'I have not made any gains from this bank's shares. So how
could they charge me with manipulating the price?' He calmly produced Bt10m
in cash for his bail money; it was twice as much as required.
At the time of writing, the case of Mr Song has not been resolved but most
stockbrokers assume that the SET index will start to rise again.
At first, Thai small investors seemed unimpressed by the government's hasty
decision to mobilise Bt15bn of funds to buy shares and stabilise the market:
Bt5bn from the government-controlled Krung Thai Bank and a further Bt10bn
from stockbrokers.
But some foreign investors looked at the market's fall as a heaven-sent
opportunity to buy. Corporate profits are strong and the Thai economy is
growing at 7 or 8 per cent a year.
The SET, now with more than 300 listed companies, recently upgraded its
computer system to handle up to 200,000 orders an hour, compared with
current peaks of less than 100,000. A group of brokers are planning to set
up an over-the-counter market for smaller companies which would operate
alongside the SET.
'We are going through this particular phase when the SEC is still very new,'
said a quietly confident Mr Asavin. 'We are investigating who might be
taking certain liberties, but I can assure you that the Thai stock market is
not being manipulated more than any other market in the world.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3910</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Thailand (1): Painful step towards democracy -
Thailand needs a government which can channel the country's dynamic but
unguided economic growth in the right directions - and impose the rule of
law on a society where power is often measured in money and guns
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT did not take long for Thailand to return to normal after four days in May
that shook the nation. The economy is booming and parliamentary politics
have been restored to their perennial state of instability.
Between May 17 and 20, Thai troops shot dead about 50 pro-democracy
demonstrators on the streets of Bangkok in the most serious outbreak of
political violence since the 1970s.
The protests were directed against Gen Suchinda Kraprayoon, the army
commander who masterminded a coup in February 1991 and had himself installed
as prime minister by a coalition of pro-military parties following a general
election in March this year.
Gen Suchinda was forced to resign after the bloodshed - but not before he
had issued an amnesty decree which pardoned himself and his military
colleagues.
The legal controversy over the pardon was ended last month when the
Constitutional Tribunal ruled that the amnesty could not be overturned. But
many of the middle-class Bangkok residents at the centre of the May
demonstrations are incensed that Gen Suchinda remains a free man.
At least 170 people are still reported to be missing following the protests
and suspicions remain that troops took away several bodies and buried them
secretly. The exact death toll is unknown.
'Many people still feel that justice was not done,' says Mr Savit
Bhotiwihok, a cabinet minister and a Democrat Party MP. 'It leaves a bad
taste.'
A new election was held in September and the Democrats emerged as the
largest party in parliament at the head of a group of broadly liberal
coalition partners opposed to military intervention in politics.
Mr Chuan Leekpai, the Democrat leader, became the first elected Thai prime
minister for 16 years not to have a military background. Mr Anand
Panyarachun, a much-praised businessman and economic reformer who served two
terms as interim premier following the 1991 coup - first appointed by the
military and then, later, by the King - was an unelected appointee.
But Mr Chuan and his allies - dubbed the 'angel parties' by the liberal
press to distinguish them from the pro-military 'devils' - won the election
by the narrowest of margins. They were supported by the urban elite, but
most poor voters in the countryside - who knew little and cared less about
Bangkok politics - continued to sell their votes to corrupt politicians.
In the light of the election results, the events of May can be seen not so
much as a dramatic turning point in Thai history as another painful step on
the long road towards a properly functioning parliamentary democracy.
The armed forces have had their influence in politics and business reduced
rather than eliminated.
One of the Anand cabinet's last acts before the September election was to
remove air force officers from the board of Thai Airways International and
replace them with civilian managers who have already started to revitalise
the airline and root out corruption. The same medicine was applied to other
military fiefdoms in domestic and international telecommunications.
And one of the first acts of Mr Chuan's administration was to seek to revoke
laws which had allowed the military to break up civilian demonstrations
without seeking approval from the cabinet.
But few political analysts are bold enough to suggest the armed forces are a
spent force in politics or to predict that the Chuan government will last
its full four-year term. Already there are signs of strain in the five-party
coalition.
Yet now more than ever Thailand needs a government which can channel the
country's dynamic but unguided economic growth in the right directions - and
impose the rule of law on a society where power is usually measured in money
and guns.
The economy, after a brief disruption during the May violence, is expected
to grow at 7-8 per cent this year and continue expanding at the same rate
into the second half of the 1990s. But successive governments have failed to
plan transport and communications networks - Bangkok is notoriously
congested and short of telephones - or invest in the new schools needed to
create a skilled workforce for the long-term industrialisation of Thailand.
Tourism, like industrial exports, suffered only a temporary decline as a
result of the May crisis, and arrivals in 1992 are now expected to exceed
last year's 5.1m.
Thai officials, however, are worried that the environmental damage caused by
uncontrolled development of industry and of the tourist resorts themselves
is beginning to deter potential holidaymakers. The British consumer magazine
Which? this year named Bangkok and the beach resort of Pattaya, with its
sewage-tainted water, massage parlours and clinics for sexually-transmitted
diseases, as the two sleaziest holiday destinations in the world.
Although it is true that other south-east Asian economies are experiencing
similar growing pains, the problems in Thailand are particularly severe.
As this year's two elections have shown, Thailand embraces two nations - the
urban rich, who bemoan the loutishness of their politicians and the poor
state of government services but are unwilling to pay much in the way of
taxes to remedy the situation, and the rural poor who often migrate to the
cities to find work as labourers, domestic servants or prostitutes.
In attempting to introduce laws compatible with the growing sophistication
of urban Thailand - such as those requiring compulsory third-party vehicle
insurance and the wearing of motor-cycle helmets - the government found
little support from MPs whose constituents rely mainly on tractors, bicycles
and oxcarts.
Likewise, the wild movements of share prices on the Stock Exchange of
Thailand, and the charges of price manipulation recently filed against a
dozen speculators - one of whom had the equivalent of nearly Dollars 2m in
cash lying around his office - by the newly-created Securities and Exchange
Commission must have seemed of scant relevance to north-eastern rice
farmers.
Average non-agricultural incomes are 13 times as high as those of farmers.
Of the total workforce, 83 per cent have primary education only. 'This is a
land of primary education,' says Mr Narongchai Akrasanee, a director of the
Thailand Development Research Institute. 'The economic boom of the last
decade has not substantially changed this picture.'
In contrast to Mr Anand, who concentrated on macro-economic policy and the
interests of the Bangkok business community, Mr Chuan, a southerner, quickly
identified rural and regional development as a priority.
The government has promised that more money will be channelled directly to
the provinces. It has pledged to support the continued development of the
fast-growing eastern seaboard, and vowed to start a project in the south to
build a road, rail and pipeline 'land bridge' linking the Andaman Sea and
the Gulf of Thailand, a trade route which could divert cargo from the
congested Strait of Malacca.
Mr Chuan's ministers are also attempting to sort out the tangle of mutually
incompatible mass transit railway projects for Bangkok agreed by previous
governments, but they believe the best solution to the capital's traffic
problems is to lure investors to the provinces.
'I would prefer to see the funds being used for the new strategic growth of
Thailand,' says Mr Savit. 'You have to provide new alternatives elsewhere
which are competitive with Bangkok.'
There is little doubt that the government has good intentions. The question
is whether the mild-mannered Mr Chuan is strong enough to hold his coalition
together without compromising his policies into insignificance, and whether
his government will last long enough to carry out the tenuous mandate it
inherited from the events of May.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3911</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Government Bonds: Gilts surge on sterling strength and
firmer markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB and PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
UK GOVERNMENT bonds rallied strongly yesterday, gaining over a point at the
long end on the combination of sterling strength and a firmer tone to the
other European government bond markets.
Dealers expressed some surprise as gilt prices surged ahead, following
Wednesday's disappointing gilt auction, and pointed out that volume in the
Liffe gilt future was average, with around 27,000 contracts traded.
The Bank of England auctioned Pounds 2.5bn of 8 per cent gilts due 2003 on
Wednesday, but the auction failed to attract foreign investors and dealers
said some of the stock had been left with marketmakers. However, dealers
said yesterday that worries about the disappointing auction had faded, and
the market recovered over a point mainly on the strength of sterling.
The pound ended at DM2.468/2.471, compared with DM2.434/2.436 on Wednesday.
The 10 1/2 per cent gilt due 1997 rose from 110 3/16 to 110 23/32 , while
the 8 3/4 per cent gilt due 2017 rallied from 97 13/32 to 98 25/32 by late
afternoon.
GERMAN government bonds gained nearly half a point helped by the combination
of a favourable wage settlement and the latest German economic data.
Bund prices rose across the yield curve with short-dated paper
out-performing longer-dated issues.
The Liffe bund futures contract rose from 90.85 at the opening to a high of
91.22 by late afternoon.
The announcement yesterday morning that the IG Metall union had agreed a 3.3
per cent 18-month wage deal for its 125,000 German steelworkers sparked
buying interest early in the day. The settlement is below the 3.7 per cent
annual inflation rate and was viewed positively by the market.
The market rallied further on the release of weak German economic data.
Gross Domestic Product (GDP) fell for the second quarter in a row, dropping
0.5 per cent in the third quarter. West German industrial production fell
2.2 per cent in October and unemployment rose to 6.9 per cent in November
from 6.7 per cent in October.
PROFIT-taking wiped out early gains in the Japanese government bond market,
and bond prices ended slightly lower on the day.
The market closed before the announcement of the Gross National Product
figures for the third quarter, which showed that real GNP fell 0.4 per cent.
Japan's economy contracted at an annualised rate of 1.6 per cent.
Dealers pointed out that the figures are positive for the bond market.
The yield on the benchmark No 145 moved between 4.575-4.605 per cent and
ended at 4.59 per cent. In the futures market, the contract opened at 107.89
and moved as high as 107.97, but dealers noted the 108 level is likely to
prove a strong resistance point.
The Bank of Japan allowed open money market rates to edge lower, with the
unsecured overnight call money rate slipping  1/32 to 3 7/8 per cent.
US TREASURY prices traded in a narrow range yesterday as dealers and
investors cautiously awaited today's important jobs report.
In late trading, the benchmark 30-year government bond was up  1/32 at 100
23/32 , yielding 7.558 per cent. There was also little movement at the short
end of the market, where the two-year note was down  1/32 at 99 21/32 ,
yielding 4.791 per cent.
Prices eased slightly in early trading on more economically bullish news.
The latest data was a 12,000 decline in initial claims for unemployment
insurance during the third week of November. The drop was bigger than
expected and suggested that today's keenly awaited employment report for
November will show a small improvement in labour market conditions.
Treasuries recovered later, however, as dealers covered their short
positions and other participants prepared their books for the jobs figures.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3912</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Capital Markets: Ireland to borrow up to DM4bn
to support punt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IRELAND has arranged to borrow up to DM4bn from German banks in order to
support the Irish punt in the foreign exchange markets. The package consists
of a DM2bn commercial paper facility, a DM1bn overdraft facility and a DM1bn
loan facility.
Ireland's National Treasury Management Agency has arranged the loans with a
group of leading German banks, including the country's three largest banks,
Deutsche Bank, Dresdner Bank and Commerzbank.
The government has been struggling to prop up the Irish punt within the
exchange rate mechanism since September. During September, the government is
believed to have spent around IPounds 2bn supporting the currency.
While the level of the country's reserves are not known, they are likely to
have been severely depleted.
Ireland made short-term borrowings in September to fund heavy intervention
in the foreign exchange market, and some of those borrowings fall due
shortly.
In addition, Ireland needs further funds as it continues to support the
currency within the exchange rate mechanism.
This struggle is made more difficult by the political vacuum following last
month's general election. A new coalition government has yet to be formed.
Short-term rates have risen as high as 100 per cent in order to stem
speculation in the foreign exchange market.
Yesterday, the three-month Euro-deposit rate fell a point to 18 per cent on
renewed hopes that the Bundesbank may ease German interest rates following
weak German gross national product data.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3913</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Bonds: Warm reception for Royal Insurance
Pounds 76m convertible
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRIAN BOLLEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ROYAL Insurance of the UK tapped the international capital markets yesterday
as part of its continuing efforts to strengthen its balance sheet.
The size of its 15-year convertible subordinated convertible bond issue was
governed by existing shareholders' pre-emption rights, though it was
increased to Pounds 76m from Pounds 70m in response to demand.
The coupon was set at 7 1/4 per cent, at the lower end of the indicated
range, and the conversion premium at 20.8 per cent, at the higher end of the
range. Proceeds will be used primarily to repay existing debt.
The exercise forms part of the strategic plan pursued by Mr Richard Gamble,
group chief executive, since he took over at the start of this year, to
restructure debt and smooth its maturity profile, reducing an over-reliance
on short-term borrowings. Previous moves have focused on restructuring
businesses to release cash.
Debt at the lossmaking group stood at Pounds 426m at the end of September
this year, down from Pounds 752m a year earlier, said Mr Gamble. Gearing has
dropped from more than 50 per cent to 29 per cent.
The company opted for a convertible structure rather than take the undated
preference share route followed by Commercial Union and General Accident.
Preference share coupons are higher than those payable on a convertible, and
the coupons are effectively increased further if tax on UK profits is not
sufficient to meet a company's Advance Corporation Tax liability.
The Royal will continue to look at other ways of strengthening its balance
sheet by improving the structure and maturity profile of its debt, said Mr
Gamble.
Elsewhere, the Paris-based Council of Europe, a regular borrower on the
international markets, made its second appearance in Swiss francs in recent
weeks.
Its SFr150m, 10-year, 6 per cent issue was acknowledged as being priced very
aggressively, but bankers pointed out that borrowers can take advantage of
year-end liquidity in Switzerland to launch issues on tighter terms than
might otherwise be acceptable.
Broadly speaking, the issue was well received, although bankers said
investors would prefer five-year paper from top quality names. Unlike most
supranational agencies, the Council of Europe does not have a triple-A
rating, but it benefited from a shortage of product and continued
expectation of lower interest rates. Bankers are forecasting that the next
triple-A rated issue will have a coupon of below 6 per cent.
The Province of Ontario's SFr300m, 10-year issue marks the first time it has
tapped the Swiss market in its own name, said lead manager Credit Suisse.
Proceeds were swapped into floating rate US dollars.
BANCO Exterior de Espana filed a registration statement with the US
Securities &amp; Exchange Commission for Dollars 150m of non-cumulative
perpetual preference shares at Dollars 25 a share.
Banco Exterior will offer the shares through Extecapital Ltd, a wholly-owned
Cayman Islands subsidiary. Merrill Lynch is lead manager.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3914</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Capital Markets: Nasdaq plans to double
trading capacity
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN an attempt to double trading capacity, Nasdaq plans to replace its
computerised trading system in a multi-year effort costing around Dollars
100m, Reuter reports.
Nasdaq will install new hardware and software to boost the volume of trades
that can be processed, cut operating costs and make it easier to introduce
new trading products and dealing systems to the market.
Nasdaq said it will be able to handle up to 800m shares a day, double the
current capacity. Nasdaq handled its highest volume in mid-January when
trading hit 328m shares a day.
Nasdaq unveiled the overhaul - which will occur over the next five years -
at the Securities Industry Association's annual meeting. To lift trading
capacity, Nasdaq will replace its communications network so that its
computer system operates much faster.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3915</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAFAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Capital Markets: Abbey National debt rating
downgraded
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE weak state of the UK economy and the depressed housing market has led
Moody's Investors Service, the US rating agency, to downgrade one of the
country's two biggest home loan institutions and consider cutting the credit
rating of the other.
Moody's said changes in the market for housing finance in the UK meant the
lenders were facing a long-term deterioration in their credit quality.
Moody's long-term debt rating of Abbey National, which turned itself from a
building society into a bank two years ago, was cut from AA1 to AA2
yesterday. The AA1 rating of Halifax, the biggest UK building society, has
been put under review for possible downgrade.
The downgrading of Abbey National brings Moody's rating into line with those
of Ibca, the London-based agency, and Standard &amp; Poor's, both of which rate
it AA.
Commenting on the Halifax review, which affects Dollars 4.5bn of long-term
debt, Moody's said it will focus on 'the impact of the weak UK economy and
housing market and Halifax's asset quality, as well as on the way in which
changing market dynamics may affect the building society's future financial
flexibility.'
Moody's said both institutions would be affected by long-term changes in the
housing market. 'The inflationary cushion which has always helped to keep
risks in this kind of lending down is changing,' said Ms Angela Jameson, a
senior analyst at Moody's in New York. She said losses on mortgage indemnity
insurance would lead insurers to provide less comprehensive cover in future,
leaving lenders more exposed to losses.
Moody's decision affects Dollars 7.5bn of debt issued by Abbey National.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3916</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAE9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: Navistar cuts loss to Dollars
30m as sales rise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURIE MORSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CHICAGO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NAVISTAR International, the US trucks and bus maker, yesterday announced a
reduced loss for the year to October 1992.
For the fourth quarter the group lost Dollars 30m, or 15 cents a share,
while losses for the full year totalled Dollars 147m, or 70 cents.
That compares with a fourth-quarter loss of Dollars 67m, or 29 cents, in
1991, and a 1991 full-year loss of Dollars 165m, or 77 cents.
The 1992 results are preliminary as the company is engaged in negotiations
to reduce health care and retirement costs.
Navistar said developments related to the negotiations may have an impact on
the 1991-92 audited accounts.
Navistar officials and representatives of the United Auto Workers of America
have said they expect to settle the benefits issue this month.
In the fourth quarter, Navistar had sales of Dollars 1.14bn, compared with
Dollars 817m in the same quarter a year ago.
During the quarter the company had an Dollars 18m charge for recalling a
potentially defective steering gear shaft in some trucks and school buses.
For the year, Navistar recorded sales of Dollars 3.87bn, up 12 per cent from
the Dollars 3.46bn for 1991.
The company is projecting a 3 per cent increase in North American demand for
medium-sized trucks to 122,000 units in fiscal 1993, and a 16 per cent jump
in demand for heavy trucks to 145,000 units.
Based on these projections, Navistar does not expect to cut production,
other than scheduled holiday breaks, during the first quarter of the current
year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3917</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: CIBC hit by CDollars 1bn loan
losses provision
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A SPECIAL CDollars 1bn provision for property loan losses taken in the
second quarter reduced Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce's total fiscal
1992 earnings to CDollars 12m (USDollars 9.4m), compared with CDollars 811m
a year earlier.
After preferred dividends, the bank suffered a net loss of 59 cents a share
for the year to October 31, against net profit equal to CDollars 3.93 a
share a year earlier. The quarterly dividend rate is capped at 33 cents a
share.
Fourth-quarter earnings were CDollars 45m, or 9 cents a share, against
CDollars 225m, or CDollars 1.09 a share, a year earlier. An additional
special provision of CDollars 150m was made.
CIBC's CDollars 1bn write-off was announced on April 27. The bank had
CDollars 860m in loans to the Olympia &amp; York group, about half for Canary
Wharf in London and the rest for Canadian and US operations. CIBC and Royal
Bank are the most exposed of the big six Canadian banks to O&amp;Y.
The second-quarter and fourth-quarter special provisions also cover
corporate bad loans in Canada and Australia.
CIBC said net non-performing loans at October 31 were CDollars 3.1bn, or 3.1
per cent of total loans, against CDollars 1.9bn or 2 per cent, a year
earlier.
Non-interest income was up 11 per cent on the year, with strong investment
banking performance, and gains in personal deposits, residential mortgages
and credit card business.
Total assets at year end were CDollars 132bn, up 9 per cent.
Magna International, Canada's biggest independent car parts producer,
sharply improved profits for the first quarter of fiscal 1993 and is raising
the quarterly dividend from 10 cents to 15 cents.
Earnings rose to CDollars 31.7m, or 76 cents a share, up 24 per cent from
CDollars 25.5m, or 92 cents, on sales of CDollars 615m, against CDollars
617m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3918</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAE6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: Top German banks report strong
advance in profits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TWO OF Germany's biggest banks yesterday reported a strong rise in profits
for the first 10 months of the year.
Commerzbank, Germany's third-biggest bank after Dresdner Bank and Deutsche
Bank, raised total operating profits 13.3 per cent to DM1.67bn (Dollars
1.06bn) in the first 10 months and predicted full-year profits would exceed
DM2bn, against DM1.83bn last year.
Bayerische Hypotheken und Wechsel-Bank, a large Bavaria-based bank, reported
operating profits up 13.2 per cent to DM1.29bn for the 10 months and said
partial operating profits - which exclude trading income - increased by 23.2
per cent to DM1.27bn.
However, the banks warned of a worsening risk environment, and analysts said
the banks' figures for the current year would be the peak of the sector's
profitability.
The reason for the sharp increases in profits is that lending growth has
continued to climb in spite of the economic slowdown, and the banks have
held back costs. The economic downturn has not yet led to an increase in bad
debts, although bankers warn that credit risk has increased sharply.
At Commerzbank, total lending for the group rose 2.4 per cent to DM161.6bn,
while net interest income climbed 10.3 per cent to DM3.69bn. Commission
income rose 2 per cent to DM1.1bn, reflecting poor stock market conditions.
Total earnings rose 8.7 per cent, while expenses rose 6.3 per cent.
At Hypo-Bank, net interest income rose 17.3 per cent to DM2.7bn, while
lending climbed 10.6 per cent overall to DM167bn. Commission income was 14
per cent up at DM472.5m.
Mr Martin Kohlhaussen and Mr Eberhard Martini, chief executives of
Commerzbank and Hypo-Bank respectively, said the lending climate had
deteriorated sharply. Mr Martini said the deterioration had not yet fed
through to the 10-month figures, but had been reflected in the number of
refused applications for credit.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3919</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: Kuwaiti banks plan to merge
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KUWAIT CITY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
INDUSTRIAL Bank of Kuwait and the Kuwait Real Estate Bank plan to merge in
what would be the first success in the central bank's long campaign to
reduce the number of banks in the emirate, Reuter reports from Kuwait City.
The chairmen of the two banks, Mr Saleh Mohammed al-Youssef of Industrial
Bank and Mr Saad Ali al-Nahedh of Real Estate Bank, said in identical
statements that the banks 'have seen fit to merge . . . creating a unit
which is bigger, has wider aims and more diverse activities'.
Analysts say both banks face problems.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3920</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: Sleeping Korean behemoth stirs -
John Burton finds intense interest as Kepco opens to foreigners
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
KOREA Electric Power, which was officially opened to foreign shareholders
last month, is normally known as a quiet behemoth.
Ever since the government offered 21 per cent of the state-run utility to
the Korean public in 1989, investors have considered Kepco, the largest
capitalisation on the Seoul stock market, a safe, but boring, investment.
All that changed in August when the government announced its intention to
allow foreigners to acquire up to 8 per cent of Kepco. That unleashed
frantic demand for the shares as domestic investors anticipated a surge of
foreign buying orders.
Kepco shares rose from a low of Won9,200 (Dollars 11.70) in August to
Won20,600 yesterday, after hitting a peak of Won25,300 on November 24, the
first day Kepco was opened to foreign investors. Kepco now accounts for 17.5
per cent of the capitalisation of the Seoul exchange against the 10 per cent
share it previously claimed.
Kepco has a healthy financial structure. Annual net earnings have grown at
17 per cent on average during the past five years, although this masks
profit declines in 1989 and 1990. Last year, it reported net profits of
Won719bn, an increase of 18.6 per cent, on sales of Won5,702bn. Analysts
expect a 20 per cent profit rise this year.
Kepco's dividend yield of 4 per cent is high by national standards. This
reflects its relatively low debt/equity ratio of 90 per cent in a country
where most companies have debt/equity ratios of 200 to 300 per cent.
Interest in Kepco has been particularly strong among foreign fund managers
because its large capitalisation makes it one of the few stocks on the Seoul
exchange in which a single investment of several million dollars can be made
without exceeding the strict limits on foreign ownership.
However, investors will be watching closely the impact of the company's
construction programme, which will more than double generating capacity from
19,851MW to 47,655MW by 2001. Kepco is being forced to build new power
facilities because its reserve capacity of electricity has shrunk from a
surplus of 72.3 per cent to only about 5 per cent in just five years.
The slim reserve capacity means that Kepco can barely meet electricity
demand during peak periods. The shortage has forced the government to
introduce energy conservation measures.
The electricity shortage was ironically of the government's own making.
Confronted with surplus capacity in the mid-1980s, the government encouraged
consumption by cutting rates as part of an anti-inflation policy. But
demand, which has risen by an average annual rate of 13 per cent since 1987,
exceeded expectations.
Growth in electricity is expected to average around 9 per cent until 1997
since Korea's per capita power consumption remains low compared to other
countries. Demand growth is expected to slow down thereafter to between 4.5
and 6 per cent.
To meet short-term increases in demand, Kepco is building eight liquefied
natural gas and 25 coal-fired facilities, which can be constructed
relatively quickly.
But the centrepiece of Kepco's expansion programme is the construction of
nine nuclear plants, to be commissioned between 1995 and 2001, in addition
to the nine it already operates.
South Korea is one of the few countries in the world expanding nuclear
capacity. It is also one of the world's biggest users of nuclear power,
which provided 47.5 per cent of electricity generated in Korea last year.
Although there is growing public criticism about nuclear power, the
government prefers it as the fundamental supplier of electricity because it
does not want resource-poor Korea to become dependent on foreign fuel
sources.
Officials also say that nuclear plants are the cheapest source of
electricity in terms of cost per megawatt of energy generated, although they
are costly to construct.
The nuclear plants are expected to be built by Korean Heavy Industries and
Construction, with four of the reactors supplied by ABB Combustion
Engineering and two by Atomic Energy of Canada.
Kepco plans to spend Won5,000bn annually over the next 10 years on the
construction programme, which will also include improving its transmission
and distribution system.
The group is hoping to finance the expansion programme through annual rate
increases of around 5 per cent in addition to loans from the state banks at
preferential rates.
Kepco will also borrow funds abroad through bond issues, including Dollars
300m it raised through a Yankee bond issue in June. No plans have been
mentioned so far of raising funds through new share issues.
Jardine Fleming predicts that the increased borrowings will raise Kepco's
debt/equity ratio to almost 130 per cent by 1995 but estimates that annual
earnings growth can be maintained at 20 per cent.
Other analysts are more cautious, and all agree that net earnings will not
rise much above 5 per cent next year as capital costs start to bite into
profits.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3921</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: Fortis records a steady 10.3%
earnings increase
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMSTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FORTIS, the Belgian-Dutch insurance and banking group, yesterday reported a
10.3 per cent increase in net profit for both the third quarter and the
first nine months of the year.
Third-quarter net rose to Ecu108.1m (Dollars 86.89m) from Ecu98m, while
nine-month results increased to Ecu303.9m from Ecu275.4m. Turnover in the
nine-month period was up 22.7 per cent at Ecu6.5bn, helped partly by
acquisitions and exchange rate movements. Without these influences, turnover
showed a 13.5 per cent increase.
In the third quarter, operating profit in insurance came under pressure,
falling to Ecu97.9m from Ecu102.6m, because of a decline in non-life
results.
'In both Belgium and the Netherlands, the outlook for motor insurance, which
is essentially cyclical, and fire insurance is less bright than was
previously assumed,' the company said. 'Measures will inevitably have to be
taken in both sectors.'
Banking results advanced to Ecu26.3m from Ecu17.9m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3922</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: Gas groups warm to Argentine
sell-off
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN FIDLER and HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ARGENTINA'S state-owned gas industry has been sold to private investors in a
sale valuing it at Dollars 4.2bn, almost double the anticipated value.
The results of Argentina's largest privatisation will mean Dollars 680m of
cash flowing to the Argentine Treasury and the cancellation of almost
Dollars 3.6bn face value of government debt, with a market value of Dollars
1.7bn.
The sale - the largest energy privatisation outside the UK - has meant
splitting the state monopoly, Gas del Estado, into two transportation
companies and eight distribution companies. Between 60 and 90 per cent of
these companies are being sold to operators in the privatisation.
Bidding groups led by Enron of the US and Nova Corporation of Canada secured
the transportation companies, while two Italian companies - Italgas and
Camuzzi - were prominent bidders for distribution companies.
Three distribution companies went to a second round of bidding, including
the two largest based in Buenos Aires. British Gas was said to be well
positioned to win a significant stake in at least one of the two companies
in the capital.
The success of the gas sale - assuming the promised payments are made - will
bolster the economy minister, Mr Domingo Cavallo, whose economic programme
has over the past two months faced significant pressure. The government
hopes the signing, beginning on Sunday, of a debt relief deal with
international banks should further aid the programme.
The size of the response to the privatisation appeared to reflect enthusiasm
by international gas companies over a rare opportunity to take a significant
stake in an important gas utility and also to operate the company.
Mr Carlo da Molo, chairman of Italgas, the Italian state-controlled gas
distribution group which won two concessions, said that in spite of
continuing economic difficulties, 'Argentina is a country with great
potential, in which a process of reorganisation and development is now
taking place. But our commitment is cushioned by a sense of caution based on
adequate profitability criteria'.
Italgas said its engineers believed its two companies had the highest growth
potential of any of the gas distribution areas put up for tender. Though the
company holds only 25 per cent of the winning consortium, with the remainder
held by the Argentine Sideco group, it will be the technical operator for
distributing gas in the two regions.
Gas del Estado's 1992 sales are expected to reach Dollars 1.5bn, and next
year local natural gas demand is expected to rise to gross Dollars 2bn.
The privatisation, the advisers to which were NM Rothschild of the UK and
Goldman, Sachs of New York, entails initial tariff reductions for industries
and businesses of about 18 per cent and a rise in rates for residential
consumers of about 8 per cent. In addition to the cash and debt offered, the
new operators will have to buy the Dollars 157m of working capital held by
the companies and take on Dollars 790m of debts.
An initial public offering of minority stakes in the larger companies will
follow in the international and domestic markets. Ten per cent of each will
be held in trust for employees.
The aim of the government, which has been advised by the World Bank, has
been to privatise and deregulate the industry at the same time. The new
system, combining elements of US and UK industry regulation, allows for the
free bidding by distributors for gas supplies at the well-head, but has
regulated the costs for the transportation of gas, limiting yearly price
increases to less than the rate of inflation through the so-called 'RPI
minus x' formula.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3923</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: Intel wins microchip dispute
with AMD
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES in Intel surged yesterday, while Advanced Micro Devices declined
sharply, following a court ruling denying AMD the right to use Intel
microprocessor software after a long-running copyright dispute between the
two US chipmakers.
The ruling protects Intel's exclusive rights to the microcode for its
microprocessors, which are widely used in personal computers. Microcode is
the internal software that controls the functions of a microprocessor chip.
AMD had claimed rights to use Intel's microcode under the terms of a 1976
licensing agreement between the two companies. But a federal judge ruled on
Wednesday the prior agreement did not give AMD the right to distribute
products containing Intel microcode.
AMD said it was planning an appeal of the ruling and might seek a new trial
in the microcode copyright dispute.
Intel closed Dollars 4 up at Dollars 77 1/4 yesterday, while AMD's stock
ended Dollars 1 7/8 lower at at Dollars 16 1/8 .
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3924</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: Westinghouse bows to activists
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WESTINGHOUSE Electric, the troubled US conglomerate, yesterday bowed to
pressure from shareholder activist groups and announced a series of changes
to its corporate governance provisions - the rules which determine how a
company is run.
They include the establishment of a new board committee, composed entirely
of outside directors, which will handle the nomination of new board members
and other governance issues; and the elimination of the company's 'poison
pill' anti-takeover device.
However, the company did not split the roles of chairman and chief
executive, which has been urged by some investors, such as Washington-based
Lens Inc. The board expressed its confidence in Mr Paul Lego, chairman and
chief executive, who has been criticised by some shareholders.
The measures adopted by the board underline the growing importance in the US
of a movement for better corporate governance, which involves shareholder
rights groups targetting poorly performing companies and demanding changes
in their rule books.
Westinghouse has become a prime target of shareholder dissatisfaction,
largely because of its financial services division, which has suffered heavy
losses on poor real estate investment. The company last week announced plans
to quit financial services, sell off four other businesses and take a
Dollars 1.13bn after-tax charge in a bid to restore Wall Street's faith in
its management.
It faced a barrage of shareholder resolutions on corporate governance
matters to be put to a vote at its annual meeting, in April. But yesterday's
action should eliminate the need for many of these so-called 'proxy
proposals.'
Yesterday's provisions include the removal of all impediments to
confidential voting on company matters by shareholders. This is a widespread
demand of the activist movement, which argues that lack of confidentiality
can intimidate some shareholders into backing management. Until now,
Westinghouse has excluded proxy contests from confidential voting.
The company is also moving from a system where directors are elected on a
staggered basis over several years - a popular anti-takeover device - to one
where all will be elected on an annual basis.
The board's compensation committee, which oversees top management's pay,
will continue to be composed only of outside directors but will retain
independent, paying consultants to advise it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3925</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: US cable TV operators promise
brave new era
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A GLIMPSE of the brave new world of American television was offered
yesterday by Tele-Commmunications the biggest cable television operator in
the US. TCI said it could provide as many as 500 television channels by
1994.
TCI said within the next two years it planned to introduce digital
compression technology, which allows one standard cable channel to become 10
channels, to as many as 1m homes in the US. TCI could expand the service to
as many as 10m household subscribers.
Most cable subscribers in the US now receive 30 to 40 channels. But the TCI
move is likely to cause other cable operators in the US to follow.
Time Warner, another of the big US cable operators, has begun an experiment
offering 150 channels to subscribers in the Queens section of New York. But
the experiment is a limited one, so far.
The new technology means American television viewers could soon find
themselves with a bewildering panoply of special interest stations,
pay-per-view services, sports, movies and inter-active services that bring
together computers and television.
Inter-active television is a priority among cable operators. The new TCI
multi-channel system is expected to offer inter-active services, allowing a
home viewer to press a button to vote in an opinion poll, order dinner, shop
for consumer goods or play a computer game.
'Television,' said Mr John Malone, president of TCI, 'will never be the
same.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3926</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: Intel wins microchip dispute
with AMD
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES in Intel surged yesterday, while Advanced Micro Devices declined
sharply, following a court ruling denying AMD the right to use Intel
microprocessor software after a long-running copyright dispute between the
two US chipmakers.
The ruling protects Intel's exclusive rights to the microcode for its
microprocessors, which are widely used in personal computers. Microcode is
the internal software that controls the functions of a microprocessor chip.
AMD had claimed rights to use Intel's microcode under the terms of a 1976
licensing agreement between the two companies.
A federal judge ruled late on Wednesday, however, that the prior agreement
did not give AMD the right to distribute products containing Intel
microcode.
'We are very pleased with the decision,' said Mr F. Thomas Dunlap, Intel
vice-president and general counsel.
AMD had been expected to launch, within the next few weeks, its own version
of Intel's 486 microprocessor, one of Intel's most lucrative products, a
chip used in the latest generation of personal computers.
However, AMD said it was well advanced with development of its own 486
microcode. 'As a prudent company, we had a contingency plan,' said Mr W. J.
Sanders, AMD chairman and chief executive.
AMD plans to launch its 486 chip in about six months. But the company said
it was planning an immediate appeal of the ruling and might also seek a new
trial in the microcode copyright dispute.
'No verdict and no ruling can change the underlying truth. In 1976 I
negotiated in good faith and AMD paid a substantial sum for the rights that
AMD is now being denied. There is no acceptable alternative for us other
than to continue to fight for justice,' Mr Sanders said.
AMD's appeals cannot, however, make up for lost time in the fast-paced
microprocessor market. The court ruling has cost it an opportunity to
compete with Intel when sales of 486 microprocessors are peaking. Personal
computer manufacturers are already developing products based upon Intel's
next generation microprocessor, called Pentium, which follows the 486.
Although Intel dominates the market for PC microprocessors, AMD has made big
inroads over the past year.
AMD stressed the latest ruling would have no effect on its shipments of 386
chips. Last year an arbitrator awarded AMD a 'permanent, royalty-free
non-exclusive, non-transferable worldwide right' to Intel's 386 technology
as a remedy for Intel's breach of a technology exchange agreement between
the two companies. Intel is appealing the arbitrator's decision.
Intel was up Dollars 2 at Dollars 75 1/4 at mid-day yesterday, while AMD's
stock was trading at Dollars 15 3/4 , down from a Wednesday close of Dollars
17 7/8 .
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3927</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: Daf shares dive as shake-up
planned
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GRIFFITHS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES in Daf, the Dutch truckmaker, touched a new low yesterday as it
admitted that further retrenchments would be made.
The shares sank to Fl 5.40, down Fl 0.80 from Wednesday's close, before
being suspended briefly ahead of a joint statement by the company and its
unions. They recovered to close steady Fl 6.20, compared with a high for the
year of Fl 26.90.
DAF, which also controls the former Leyland truck and van-making operations
in the UK, gave no details of the planned restructuring and job losses.
Daf's UK plants have taken the brunt of the previous job losses. But with
the UK commercial vehicle market having stabilised, and some key continental
European markets now turning down, it is expected that the main focus of
job-cutting will shift to DAF's Dutch and Belgian facilities.
In a further bid to reassure markets, yesterday's statement also declared
that long-running negotiations with its banks and the Dutch and Belgian
government on additional state-guaranteed credits of Fl 210m should soon
reach a 'positive' conclusion.
Daf has said it would have to defer payment of a dividend this year on an
issue of preference shares made a year ago to raise Fl 250m to strengthen
its finances.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3928</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: Dutch financial group up 6%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMSTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
INTERNATIONALE Neder-landen Group, the Dutch financial services company,
said net profit in the first nine months of 1992 rose by 6.6 per cent.
Insurance results showed little change, but banking posted an increase of
more than 9 per cent.
Net profit in the first three quarters increased to Fl 1.14bn (Dollars 630m)
from Fl 1.07bn, on turnover up 3.4 per cent at Fl 35.4bn.
ING gave no figures for the third quarter alone, but a comparison of the
latest results with half-year figures shows that third-quarter net profit
was up 5.5 per cent at Fl 386m against Fl 366m a year earlier.
Pre-tax results in insurance were virtually flat at Fl 774m in the first
nine months, an increase of 0.3 per cent from Fl 772m a year earlier.
Life insurance and non-life insurance both showed improved results, but
reinsurance swung into the red with a loss of Fl 12m compared with a profit
of Fl 29m a year earlier. ING blamed the loss on a deterioration on the
London and Scandinavian markets.
In banking, pre-tax profits rose by 9.2 per cent to Fl 810m from Fl 742m in
the first nine months of 1992.
ING, which described its nine-month results as satisfactory, forecast a
'light' increase in 1992 net profit. Three months ago, it predicted that
full-year results would at least match those of 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3929</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: Paramount plans Italian chain
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PARAMOUNT, the US entertainment group, is to invest Dollars 250m in a new
multi-screen cinema chain in Italy, following the success of similar
ventures in the US and the UK.
The new scheme will be a joint venture between UCI Europe, a Paramount
cinema subsidiary, and Situr, the parent company of Italy's Valtur tourism
and hotels group.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3930</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: SEC bans Gutfreund for life over
bond auctions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE US Securities and Exchange Commission yesterday announced that Mr John
Gutfreund, the former chairman of Wall Street securities house Salomon, and
three other former senior Salomon executives, have agreed to settle charges
that they failed to properly supervise the firm's government bond trading
desk between 1989 and 1991, when it was involved in illegal bidding during
Treasury auctions.
The settlements follow Tuesday's announcement that the SEC is suing Mr Paul
Mozer, the former head of government bond trading at Salomon, for his
alleged part in the scandal that rocked Salomon in August 1991.
Mr Mozer, and a senior aide who worked with him on the bond desk at the
time, have been charged with violating federal securities law by submitting
false orders for securities to circumvent government bidding limits. Both
men are contesting the charges.
Under yesterday's settlement, Mr Gutfreund was fined Dollars 100,000 and is
barred from taking charge of a securities firm for life. Mr Thomas Strauss,
the ex-president of Salomon, was fined Dollars 75,000 and is suspended from
the securities industry for six months, while Mr John Meriwether, a former
vice-chairman, was fined Dollars 50,000 and barred from the business for
three months. All three accepted their settlements without admitting or
denying wrongdoing.
The three executives resigned in August last year, soon after it was
discovered that they had waited several months before informing the
authorities about false bids submitted by Salomon's trading desk in a number
of Treasury auctions.
It was their failure to report the illegal bids immediately, and their
failure to discipline Mr Mozer for his actions, that led the SEC to charge
the executives with failure to supervise. The SEC said that there was no
evidence that Mr Gutfreund, Mr Strauss or Mr Meriwether were involved in the
illegal bidding.
Of the various sanctions, Mr Gutfreund's is the most severe. While the
Dollars 100,000 fine is not particularly substantial, the SEC's decision to
bar him from running a securities firm is a significant blow to a man who
made his name and fortune as the head of the biggest bond trading house in
the US.
Mr Donald Feuerstein, a fourth ex-Salomon executive, the former chief legal
officer who also resigned over the bond trading scandal, was not fined or
suspended, but was criticised in the SEC report on the matter for his role
in not reporting the firm's illegal activities earlier.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3931</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: Nine more GM plants to be closed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GENERAL Motors, the US motor manufacturer in the throes of a sweeping
restructuring, yesterday announced plans to close nine more North American
plants, employing more than 18,000 workers, and to dispose of some 14 per
cent of its automotive components operations.
The closures, designed to help restore GM's lossmaking North American
operations to profit, are the latest stage in a plan the company announced a
year ago to shut 21 plants and shed 74,000 jobs by the mid-1990s. It
announced the names of 14 of the plants earlier this year and had promised
to decide on the remaining seven by the end of 1992.
In the event, it yesterday named nine factories, bringing to 23 the total to
be closed between now and 1996. They include two assembly plants:
Wilmington, Delaware, which employs 3,500 and makes Chevrolet Corsica and
Beretta cars, and the Flint, Michigan, truck assembly plant, which employs
4,450.
Mr Jack Smith, chief executive, said the closures would allow GM to cut its
capacity to 5.4m vehicles by the mid-1990s, which it believed to be in line
with market demand for its products.
Employees are likely to be shielded from the worst effects of the cuts by a
GM scheme which allows redundant workers to remain on virtual full salary.
The company is also working on a new early retirement scheme for blue-collar
employees.
Other plants to be shut include a metal fabricating operation in Kalamazoo,
Michigan, which employs 3,100 and makes doors, floor pans and other items
for a variety of GM vehicles.
Five other US plants are to be closed as part of a restructuring announced
yesterday at GM's Automotive Components Group, the world's largest supplier
of vehicle parts. An axle plant in Canada will also be shut or sold.
Analysts have long argued that GM needs to cut back on its components
operations, which supply about 70 per cent of the company's vehicle parts, a
far higher proportion than at its two US rivals, Ford and Chrysler.
The group said yesterday it would now channel its energies into seven major
business segments, accounting for some 86 per cent of its Dollars 24bn
annual sales, in each of which it ranked first or second in global market
share.
These were: energy storage and management systems; engine management
systems; lighting systems; occupant environment management systems; power
and signal distribution systems; ride and handling systems; and thermal
management systems.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3932</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / International Company News: Pechiney to take FFr1bn charge
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PECHINEY, the French state-owned aluminium and packaging group, is to make a
FFr1.1bn (Dollars 205m) to FFr1.3bn restructuring charge against profits
this year to cover job losses, but said yesterday it did not expect more
charges in 1993.
The group, Europe's largest aluminium producer, yesterday said the 1,250
French job losses it announced recent-ly would cost between FFr400m and
FFr600m this year.
This comes on top of a FFr700m charge made in the first six months of the
year to cover restructuring at Howmet, its North American turbine components
producer, hit by the decline in demand from the aircraft industry.
Sales fell by 9.1 per cent in the first nine months of this year to
FFr49.8bn.
Pechiney recorded a 63 per cent rise in net profits in the first half of the
year, helped by exceptional gains which made up for a sharp fall in
operating profits.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3933</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Oceonics up to expectations
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Pre-tax profits at Oceonics Group, the provider of survey and positioning
services, were Pounds 2.06m in the six months to September 30, compared with
Pounds 2.42m.
Turnover for the period was Pounds 20.6m (Pounds 19.7m). Net interest
payable fell to Pounds 151,000 (Pounds 363,000) as a result of healthy cash
flow and the rights issue. Earnings per share came out at 0.8p (1.2p).
There was an exceptional charge of Pounds 106,000 relating to an exchange
loss suffered on the pound's devaluation. However, there was a Pounds
270,000 currency gain on the retranslation of the group's interest in the
net assets of overseas subsidiaries which was taken to reserves.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3934</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: James Latham lower at Pounds 54,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
James Latham, the timber importer and builders' merchant, reported pre-tax
profits of Pounds 54,000 in the six months to September 30, against Pounds
121,000 which included a property profit of Pounds 270,000.
The company said that importing had seen some margin improvement but
elsewhere progress had been patchy. On the advice of consultants
unprofitable Timber Centres branches were being cut and central overheads
reduced.
Turnover was Pounds 31m (Pounds 30.5m). The interest charge was Pounds
616,000 (Pounds 707,000). Earnings per share came out at 0.29p (0.82p) and
the interim dividend is held at 1.5p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3935</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Western Selection Pounds 24,800 in the
black
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Western Selection, the principal activity of which is the holding of
substantial stakes in two investment companies - Creston and Burlington
Group - reported a pre-tax profit of Pounds 24,800 for the year to
end-September.
That compared with a deficit of Pounds 363,000 last year and came from total
income of Pounds 103,100 (Pounds 177,100). Earnings per share were 0.15p
(losses 2.51p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3936</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Drayton Blue Chip restated figures
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Drayton Blue Chip Trust yesterday circulated restated figures for the half
year to September 30 to bring them into line with accounting policy adopted
for the year to end-March 1992.
Net asset value per income share at September 30 is restated at 58.1p,
against 60.5p at the March 31 year end and 89.4p a year earlier.
Net revenue for the six months was Pounds 510,000, against Pounds 675,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3937</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Holmes &amp; Marchant in the red
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Holmes &amp; Marchant, the marketing consultancy group, announced pre-tax losses
of Pounds 160,000 for the year to September 30. There were profits of Pounds
2.1m last time.
The loss was after an exceptional charge of Pounds 1.29m (Pounds 564,000)
relating to reorganisation, empty property costs and provision against
property values.
Mr John Holmes, the chairman, said the losses at CCD in Spain, referred to
in the interim report, had continued into the second half. As no upturn was
expected for the current year the group's 75 per cent interest had been sold
to its president.
Losses relating to the disposal are shown as an extraordinary charge of
Pounds 2.87m.
Mr Holmes said that cost benefits from the recent reorganisation would
continue in the first half of the current year.
Turnover fell to Pounds 37.4m (Pounds 46.2m). Losses per share amounted to
1p (7.3p earnings) and again there is no final dividend.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3938</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Syltone profits warning
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SYLTONE, the transport engineering group which makes ancillary systems for
trucks, warned yesterday that six years of steady profit growth were likely
to come to a halt by the March 1993 year-end because of recession in the UK
and Europe.
Syltone shares fell 15p to 248p on the announcement.
Although the group reported a 4 per cent increase in pre-tax profit to
Pounds 1.22m (Pounds 1.17m) in the half-year to September, Mr Mike Clewes,
finance director, said sales to Europe which had sustained Syltone through
the UK recession, had dried up in the last quarter.
Turnover amounted to Pounds 17.35m against Pounds 16.94m.
Mr John Marsh, managing director, said: 'The current six months are going to
be rough, but I've no problems about the future from then on.' The group's
UK business was picking up and the devaluation of sterling would lift
exports, he stated.
The interim dividend is held at 3.15p from earnings per share of 8.25p
(8.4p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3939</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Murray Enterprise lifts net asset value by
40%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MURRAY ENTERPRISE yesterday belied recent problems in the venture capital
trust sector with a 40 per cent rise in net asset value per share over the
year to September 30.
The recession's impact on small businesses and the difficulty of valuing
unquoted holdings has caused problems at investment trusts such as Drayton
Consolidated and Gresham House.
Murray Enterprise's portfolio was strengthened by the flotation of two of
its US investments, Fleet Call and Centigram. Four unlisted investments were
also realised for a total consideration of Pounds 1.67m.
Since the end of the financial period, the directors have announced that due
to the strengthening of the US dollar and a rise in share prices of two of
the US holdings, the net asset value has increased to 162p per share.
During the year, the trust redeemed some Pounds 2.48m of loan stock, which
increased net assets per share by 5.25p.
The trust's aim is capital growth, not income.
Nevertheless, the trust received a one-off dividend from an unlisted
investment last year.
Since investment trust rules require the distribution of income, Murray
Enterprise will make a dividend payment of Pounds 125,000 in July 1993.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3940</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Eastern Electricity surges by 69% - Interim
profits buoyed by significant cost cutting and reduced interest charges
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EASTERN ELECTRICITY reported a 69 per cent increase in interim pre-tax
profits yesterday buoyed by significant cost cutting and reduced net
interest expense.
Profits in the six months to September 30 increased to Pounds 26.1m compared
with Pounds 15.4m last time on turnover which edged higher to Pounds 830.2m
(Pounds 821.7m).
The sharp increase in pre-tax profits was underpinned by a jump in operating
profits which grew to Pounds 31.5m (Pounds 26m) and the decline in interest
costs from Pounds 16.9m to Pounds 12.4m.
Earnings per share rose to 6.9p against 4.3p and the group plans an
increased interim dividend of 5.5p (4.85p).
Commenting on the results, Mr James Smith, chairman and chief executive,
said: 'The increase in operating profit reflects the benefit of our cost
reduction programmes and the continued strategic development of our
portfolio of electricity purchase cont-racts.'
He added that the group also saw a useful increase in sales to the
competitive non-franchise market.
'Profit before tax and earning per share benefited significantly from
reduced interest charges. We are confident of achieving satisfactory results
for the full year.'
In the core electricity distribution business net units distributed fell by
1.9 per cent, although after adjustments for weather differences and other
factors the underlying level of distribution was only marginally lower.
Electricity sales to domestic and industrial customers dropped but were
offset by a slight gain in units distributed to commercial customers.
The most significant factor affecting performance, however, was the tight
control of costs.
In particular, increases in costs of distribution were again kept below the
rate of inflation while 400 jobs out of a total of 8,000 have been lost in
the last 12 months.
Earlier this week the group announced it was seeking a further 450 voluntary
early retirements within the next three months.
Capital expenditure, which totalled Pounds 38m in the first half, has been
reduced in line with a decrease in new business, mainly reflecting the
impact of the recession on new housebuilding.
COMMENT
Eastern has the lowest customer tariffs and the lowest added costs per
customer among the 12 regional electricity companies and is clearly
determined to maintain this edge.
Mr John Devaney, the group's new managing director, has a reputation as an
effective cost-cutter and has already set to work. This year pre-tax profits
could reach Pounds 173m and earnings could reach 45.5.
Assuming a dividend increase to 18.7p the shares are on a high prospective
yield of 6.2 per cent reflecting caution over Eastern's role as an industry
leader.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3941</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Adverse exchange rates hold Scapa back to
Pounds 20m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ADVERSE exchange rates held back growth at Scapa, a manufacturer of
papermaking and printing equipment with a third of its business in the US,
as it revealed virtually flat pre-tax profits of Pounds 20m for the first
half.
Mr David Dunn, finance director, said the weak dollar in the first half had
depressed US profits by Pounds 1.4m. However, if the effects of the pound's
devaluation continued throughout the rest of the year, 'the big hit in the
first half would be reversed'.
Acquisitions in the US, Europe and Scandinavia helped Scapa report an 11 per
cent increase in sales to Pounds 156.9m for the six months to September 30.
Mr Bill Goodall, chairman, said all of the group's divisions had 'turned in
encouraging results' given the difficult market conditions.
Europe showed the strongest growth, with sales up 84 per cent to Pounds
41.3m and operating profits jumping 66 per cent to Pounds 4.4m.
Mr Dunn said the increase was solely due to the acquisitions of Scandiafelt
of Sweden and an Italian filtration company. These had more than offset a
setback in engineered rolls, which had been affected by the decline in
installation of papermaking equipment.
Sales in the UK remained steady at Pounds 55.4m (Pounds 55.6m), although
profits fell 17 per cent to Pounds 4.24m.
The industrial materials division in the UK had been 'the one bright spot in
the UK', Mr Dunn said, with significant benefits from integrating some of
the Italian filtration business.
Sales in North America were Pounds 3m lower at Pounds 52.2m when translated
into sterling, although they actually increased in dollar terms due to
acquisitions.
Mr Dunn said that stripping out currency factors and acquisitions, sales had
been totally flat. Operating profits fell 5 per cent to Pounds 11.9m.
North America was proving the most favourable of Scapa's sectors, said Mr
Dunn, although as yet there were no reliable trends.
The dividend was increased by 5 per cent to 1.6p. Earnings per share were
depressed by exchange rates, and the Pounds 55.6m rights issue in May 1991,
falling from 6.2p to 5.7p.
COMMENT
Scapa has been running hard to keep up and it appears to be succeeding.
Margins are under pressure, but not as severely as had been expected.
Management has so far moved quickly to cut costs, thus retaining a
competitive edge as paper manufacturers begin to use fewer suppliers. The
downside of protecting margins has been an increase in stocks and debtors,
adding an even heavier working capital burden to an already
investment-hungry business. This might ease a bit in the second half, but
not by much. Further growth should come from more acquisitions - Scapa has a
Pounds 70m cash warchest - and a hefty currency gain if the rates stay
anywhere near current levels. Forecasts are for Pounds 47m which, on a
prospective p/e of about 16.5 times, leaves the shares looking fairly
valued.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3942</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Spring Ram shares fall again
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE SHARE price of Spring Ram Corporation, the kitchens and bathrooms group,
fell 11 1/2 p yesterday to 89p following a press report on share selling and
a downgraded profit forecast.
The group's market value has collapsed from about Pounds 570m to Pounds 325m
since news emerged on November 6 of false accounting at its Balterley
Bathrooms subsidiary.
Yesterday's report in the Daily Mail suggested that British Steel pension
fund had sold a tranche of shares. This turned out to be untrue.
County NatWest said it had placed 8.2m shares on Wednesday at 98p. 'We did
it in six minutes and it was oversubscribed,' said Mr Angus Phaure, building
materials analyst.
However, he had downgraded his profit forecast for this year from Pounds
42.5m to Pounds 40m, before exceptional items. These will include additional
losses of up to Pounds 3.5m at Balterley offset by a Pounds 5.8m gain on the
sale of unused ACT capacity.
A pre-tax figure of Pounds 40m would represent a 6.5 per cent increase on
last year's Pounds 37.6m.
Asked about current trading, Mr Stuart Greenwood, finance director, said the
group was operating in tough markets. 'December is very important to us and
all of that is before us.'
Over the next couple of weeks directors will meet shareholders and analysts
to answer questions about Balterley, where a recurring question has been:
why is the loss so big - Pounds 5.6m in a subsidiary that only turned over
Pounds 10m?
Mr Greenwood said that the number was a maximum and the problem went back to
1989.
He said the figure would include all the factors leading to an overstatement
of profits: stock quantities, stock values, invoices, accruals and so on.
Balterley had apparently been building up stock rapidly - from Pounds 1.6m
to Pounds 3.85m during 1990 and to more than Pounds 7m by the end of last
year, but the build-up was illusory.
Questions may also be asked about share sales by two directors in April. The
company has said it thought the Balterley problem had been dealt with by
then. The much greater extent of the falsification was not discovered until
May.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3943</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Control Techniques rises 50% to Pounds
6.22m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CONTROL TECHNIQUES, the Powys-based electronic drives group, reported a 50
per cent increase in full year pre-tax profits yesterday, and announced
plans for a significant expansion of its overseas marketing and sales
operations.
Pre-tax profits increased from Pounds 4.15m to Pounds 6.22m in the year to
September 30 after rationalisation and closure costs of Pounds 1.02m, mainly
related to the sale of its process control division.
Turnover grew by 26 per cent to Pounds 88m largely reflecting the
acquisition of ICD Drives in the US last year. Excluding ICD, turnover grew
by 3 per cent. Mr Trevor Wheatley, chairman, said the integration of ICD had
proved costly but was now nearing completion.
Earnings per share increased to 9.7p (7.7p) and a proposed final dividend of
4.7p makes a 6.85p (6.5p) total.
Mr Wheatley said the strategy of growth by acquisition in order to reach the
'critical mass' in the core manufacturing business had been achieved,
together with a streamlined and automated manufacturing capability.
As a result, the group planned to focus on organic growth by opening a
further 30 sales and marketing CT Drive Centres overseas in the next couple
of years. Currently it has 15 overseas offices with another six under
negotiation.
The chairman added that research and development expenditure, totalling
Pounds 3m in 1992, would be increased by 20 per cent in the current year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3944</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Alexon warns of downturn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DISAPPOINTING sales of Dash leisure wear led Alexon Group to issue a profit
warning yesterday, and the share price fell a further 27p to 98p.
At that level it is less than a quarter of the 444p high hit in September
last year, a few months after its demerger from Claremont Garments
(Holdings), the Marks and Spencer supplier.
Alexon said that although autumn trading started well, sales had been
disappointing since September 16, particularly in Dash.
Analysts downgraded their profit forecasts from Pounds 7m to about Pounds 4m
pre-tax, against last year's Pounds 11.3m. They also pencilled in a dividend
cut. One forecast that the final would be cut from 7.6p to 3p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3945</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Johnson Matthey edges up 3%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING, Mining Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHNSON MATTHEY, the precious metals group, lifted pre-tax profits for the
half-year to end-September by 3 per cent from Pounds 32.2m to Pounds 33.2m
and is showing confidence about the second half by raising its interim
dividend from 3p to 3.2p a share.
'We have shown we can generate profits growth even in these difficult times
and I am sure this growth will be even sharper when the world's major
economies finally emerge from recession,' said Mr David Davies, chairman.
But he said there was no sign yet of the world-wide recession coming to an
end.
JM's share price, which was up by 9p on Wednesday, rose another 4p to 468p
after the news yesterday.
The group also reported:
An extension to its exclusive marketing contract with Rustenburg of South
Africa, the world's biggest platinum producer, taking a relationship that
started in the 1920s well into the next century.
The completed sale of its 50 per cent stake in the Tanaka Matthey former
joint venture in Japan. This raised about Pounds 20m and produced a pre-tax
profit of roughly Pounds 4.5m. The proceeds will help finance a new Dollars
60m (Pounds 39m) car catalyst technical centre in Japan with Japanese
management.
It had won a four-year contract to supply Honda in North America with an
annual 1m car anti-pollution catalysts. Mr Richard Wakeling, chief
executive, said this contract was won because JM had advanced technology to
offer and would double to 18 per cent the company's share of supply of
catalysts to Japanese car makers. JM would add a new production line to its
catalyst plant in Philadelphia for the Honda business.
Mr Wakeling said JM's Pounds 80m, three-year rationalisation programme was
almost at an end and there would be no more charges in this respect. Cost
savings were running at Pounds 18m a year and in six to nine months would be
an annual Pounds 22m to Pounds 23m.
JM will continue to spend heavily on research and development - about Pounds
20m has been allocated this year. It will concentrate mainly on the
autocatalyst, electronics materials and biomedical businesses.
Mr Davies said the highlight of the first half was the excellent performance
of the catalytic systems division, where operating profits rose to Pounds
12.9m (Pounds 10.6m).
Turnover fell from Pounds 918.9m to Pounds 895.1m, but Mr Davies suggested
net revenues were the true indicator of the level of business. These rose
from Pounds 150.1m to Pounds 152.8m. Earnings per share rose to 12.1p
(11.5p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3946</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Interest costs hold back Severn Trent to 3%
rise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRONWEN MADDOX, Environment Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SEVERN TRENT, the Midlands water and sewerage group, saw half-year pre-tax
profits held to a 3 per cent rise by interest charges incurred on its heavy
investment in water treatment and by the impact of recession on waste
management.
Nevertheless, profits of Pounds 140.8m (Pounds 136.7m) for the six months to
September 30 were slightly ahead of City expectations. That, together with
the 9.4 per cent rise in the interim dividend to 7p (6.4p), helped the
shares rise 1p to 445p.
Mr Roderick Paul, chief executive, said: 'The recession is real and I don't
see it ending. It doesn't worry me - I'd just like it to be different'.
Water and sewerage price increases and a full six months contribution from
Biffa, the waste management company acquired for Pounds 212m in May 1991,
pushed group turnover up by 16.2 per cent to Pounds 459.1m (Pounds 395.2m).
Operating profits from the core water and sewerage business rose by 11.7 per
cent to Pounds 149m (Pounds 127.8m) as operating margins rose from 37.5 per
cent to 39.7 per cent. Severn Trent said that cost savings of Pounds 5.5m
were made in the half year, including a 1 per cent cut in staff to 7,400.
Operating profits in Biffa rose to Pounds 6m (Pounds 5.4m) but on a
comparable basis for a full six months this represented a fall of more than
10 per cent.
Operating profit on other businesses - water and waste services in Belgium
and the US - rose to Pounds 1.6m (Pounds 1.2m) after a Pounds 600,000
contribution from recent acquisitions.
The fall in profits on a comparable basis was due to the costs incurred in
pitching for US municipal contracts, Mr Paul said.
Corporate overheads fell to 4.8m (Pounds 5m) because 'we've been attacking
all kinds of costs, and spending less on the annual general meeting and
paraphernalia', he added.
The interest payable of Pounds 11m, compared with Pounds 7.3m interest
received. It was incurred on debt of Pounds 280m at end-September, against
Pounds 170m in March and Pounds 36m in September 1991.
Earnings improved by 2.7 per cent to 37.5p (36.5p) per share.
COMMENT
It is not news by now that Biffa is unlikely to make the profits envisaged
at the time of acquisition for several years. Its Pounds 6m profits in the
half year covered only about half the interest charged on its acquisition
cost, but its dilutive effect on earnings appears largely to be in the share
price. Although interest charges will hold back profit growth, the peak
spending will soon be passed. Barring further disappointment in the non-core
businesses, Pounds 275m pre-tax profits and earnings per share of 70.7p
could be achievable for the full year. The dividend cover is still one of
the highest in the sector and if Severn pays a full-year dividend of 21p
(19.3p), that may give its shares reason to do better than the sector.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3947</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Inntrepreneur Pounds 157m in the red
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP RAWSTORNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INNTREPRENEUR Estates, the Grand Metropolitan/Courage pubs joint venture,
incurred a pre-tax loss of Pounds 157m in the year to September 30.
GrandMet disclosed yesterday that IEL's 6,800 pubs achieved a trading profit
of Pounds 162m but interest charges of Pounds 203m on the company's Pounds
1.3bn debt resulted in an operating loss of Pounds 28m.
A revaluation of IEL's property in September showed a reduction of Pounds
234m in the value of the estate over the year to Pounds 2.17bn.
Half of the deficit was charged against GrandMet's IEL revaluation reserve
of Pounds 280m and the rest charged to IEL's profit and loss accounts.
Apart from meeting IEL's operating loss of Pounds 28m, GrandMet and Courage
have each injected a further Pounds 32m cash into the venture to ensure
compliance with banking covenants.
With two-thirds of the pubs now converted to 20-year leases, GrandMet said
that operations were in line with forecasts.
In what Sir Allen Sheppard, GrandMet's chairman and chief executive,
described as 'one of the worst economic environments of our 30-year
history', disposal of peripheral businesses enabled the group to reduce its
debt by Pounds 158m to Pounds 2.44bn and gearing from 75 per cent to 64 per
cent. Interest charges fell from Pounds 171m to Pounds 94m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3948</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Wickes calls for Pounds 10m to fund retail
expansion
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WICKES, the do-it-yourself retailer which was rescued last year with a
Pounds 42.6m rights issue, yesterday called on investors to fund a Pounds
10m retail expansion in the UK and continental Europe.
The group, which operates 102 stores in the UK, Belgium, Holland and France,
announced plans for 17 new outlets to be opened next year.
All but two would be opened in the UK and some 350 new jobs would be created
as a result.
Stockbrokers SG Warburgs yesterday placed 13.5m new shares with
institu-tions at 72 1/2 p, raising a total of Pounds 9.8m, to fund the
expansion.
The new shares represent less than 5 per cent of the existing equity.
Wickes' shares closed last night 2p down at 75p.
Mr Henry Sweetbaum, chairman, said the group was taking the opportunity to
ex-pand when sites were cheap, in spite of tough trading conditions.
'We are not looking at the economy through rose-coloured spectacles in 1993,
but we do expect some recovery in 1994,' he said.
Wickes, which incurred losses of Pounds 7m last year, is forecast to report
profits of between Pounds 6m and Pounds 8.5m for the year to the end of
December.
Debt is expected to be lower than the Pounds 84m reported at the half-way
stage.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3949</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: B Elliott returns to SE with package to cut
debt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MATTHEW CURTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES in B Elliott, the struggling engineering group, were relisted
yesterday with the announcement of a refinancing package, including a Pounds
16.3m debt-equity swap.
The effect is to reduce the group's debt by Pounds 27m, and to provide the
base from which it can concentrate on its profitable businesses, specialist
machine tool manufacture and electrical engineering.
Reconstruction was triggered by the collapse of the UK and European machine
tool trade, its core business in the past.
Share trading resumed at 3p, giving a market value of Pounds 1.6m, compared
with 80p and Pounds 45m 18 months ago. Proposals include converting 20 old
shares into one new share and a Pounds 2.5m placing and open offer.
Falkner Moller Partners, a development capital group, and funds managed by
Foreign &amp; Colonial Ventures and the Independent Investment Company will
subscribe in cash for 15.6m shares to raise Pounds 9.5m. The subscription
gives Falkner a 40 to 46.7 per cent stale in Elliott, but the Takeover Panel
has waived any requirement that Falkner make a general cash offer to all
shareholders.
Elliott's bankers will convert Pounds 16.3m of debt into new ordinary and
preference shares.
Mr Michael Frye, chief executive, said Elliott had successfully
reconstructed the business after demand for machine tools had come to a
standstill - 'the worst conditions in the industry since the 1930s'.
Elliott reported a pre-tax loss of Pounds 487,000 (Pounds 106,000), on
turnover of Pounds 45.8m (Pounds 56m). Operating profit improved to Pounds
2.15m (Pounds 1.2m) but interest charges rose to Pounds 2.65m (Pounds
1.27m). There is no interim dividend.
Losses per share were 2.36p (3.64p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3950</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Shanks &amp; McEwan slips to Pounds 15.8m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHANKS &amp; McEwan, the Glasgow-based waste management company, yesterday
reported only a 5.5 per cent downturn in interim pre-tax profits in spite of
being unable to pass on increased costs of environmental control.
However, the recession sharply increased the group's interest charge as
collection of debts dramatically slowed.
Pre-tax profits in the six months to September fell from Pounds 16.73m to
Pounds 15.81m on sales up 2 per cent at Pounds 78.1m. The interim dividend
is to be maintained at 2.24p.
In the largest dry waste division Shanks made Pounds 7.43m after interest,
up 2.5 per cent and with an increased margin. Mr Peter Runciman, the
chairman who will be stepping down later this month, said new regulations
under the Environment Protection Act were bound to benefit Shanks. 'The new
environmental legislation is a powerful force in directing more waste
towards high standards of disposal,' he said. In the environmental services
division, which deals with high temperature destruction of hazardous wastes,
sales increased 8 per cent but profits of Pounds 4.58m were down 5.8 per
cent as Shanks was unable to pass on the cost of higher environmental
standards.
Debt doubled to Pounds 16.45m during the period, almost entirely due to
later payment of work in progress in the construction services division.
'Being a Scottish-based company with a Presbyterian ethos, we would not like
to see gearing go much higher,' Mr Runciman said.
COMMENT
It would take a brave man to call the turn in the UK's waste management
sector. Ravaged by price cutting, falling dry waste volumes and higher costs
of meeting stricter environment controls, investors have had ample reason to
be shell-shocked. Perhaps too much hope is vested in the removal of capacity
that might follow the introduction of new regulations next April. It is
simply too early to judge how this might pan out. But judging by what Shanks
and Biffa - Severn Trent's waste division - said yesterday about improved or
maintained margins, the sector may now have found a bottom. It is premature
to think multiples will return to the crazy levels of three years ago, when
Shanks traded on a 46 times earnings multiple. But with Shanks likely to
make Pounds 28m pre-tax at the full year, or 11.4p of earnings, the shares
should probably be on a greater premium to the market.
See People
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3951</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Improved margins lift Scottish Hydro to
Pounds 40.6m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON,Scottish Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SCOTTISH Hydro-Electric, the smaller of the two Scottish electricity
companies, increased its pre-tax profit by two-thirds to Pounds 40.6m in the
half year to September 30, thanks to higher volumes and better profit
margins.
Turnover of the integrated utility, which generates, transmits and
distributes electricity, increased 6.8 per cent to Pounds 301m (Pounds
281.9m).
Earnings rose 55 per cent to 7.93p and the interim dividend is being lifted
by 10.8 per cent to 3.6p.
Hydro-Electric's sales volume in Scotland showed underlying growth of 2 per
cent, and there was a 20 per cent rise to Pounds 60.3m in sales to customers
in England and Wales.
The operating margin improved to 16.7 per cent, thanks partly to the arrival
of 'sour' untreated gas from the Miller field in the North Sea at the
company's Peterhead power station, and partly to the high Scottish summer
rainfall, which permitted more hydro-electric generation. But these lower
costs were partly offset by higher bills from Scottish Nuclear.
Interest charges fell to Pounds 9.7m (Pounds 15.7m) as gearing was cut to
20.6 per cent through strong cashflow. It plans to redeem Pounds 116m of
government debt, saving Pounds 1m in interest this year and Pounds 4m
thereafter, although a redemption charge of Pounds 12.5m will appear in the
full year's accounts.
COMMENT
Hydro-Electric has the second lowest tariffs in Britain and its sales in the
English market will increase as the interconnector upgrade and Keadby come
onstream. Like Scottish Power, it is better insulated than other power
companies from the present energy review. If the government were to make
consumers pay more for electricity to support the coal industry,
Hydro-Electric would get higher income. If it tried to limit the
pass-through to the consumer of the costs of gas plants like Keadby, the
burden would fall on the regional generators, and Hydro-Electric is not a
regional company. Analysts forecast full-year pre-tax profits of between
Pounds 142m and Pounds 146m, and a full-year dividend of about 11.3p,
compared with this year's 10.16p. The shares closed yesterday up 3p at 240p.
With another 70p to be paid up next May, gross dividend yield on a fully
paid basis is 4.8 per cent, reflecting the greater potential of the Scottish
companies. The shares should be bought.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3952</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Individuals could block buy-back by Amstrad
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OPPONENTS of Mr Alan Sugar's controversial buy-back bid for Amstrad need to
muster only a small group of individual shareholders to block the deal at
next week's extraordinary meeting.
A close reading of the UK Companies Act shows that the 30p-a-share offer
needs the approval of a simple majority of shareholders by number voting at
the meeting or by proxy, regardless of the size of their shareholding. This
amounts to a one-man-one-vote provision.
This particular test of support had been overlooked while investors focused
on a second requirement that Mr Sugar, who holds a 35 per cent personal
equity stake in Amstrad, needs to win three-quarters of the shares by value
he does not own in order to proceed with his buy-back bid.
Under the second test Mr Sugar needs the support of 281m shares, although
even this has looked increasingly hard to achieve given the decision of two
leading institutional shareholders to vote against the plan. Amstrad and its
advisors confirmed yesterday that both tests must be satisfied, and
expressed surprise that no public mention of the simple majority requirement
had been made earlier.
The subject is being brought to light by PLC magazine, a publication about
practical law issues for companies, in its December issue.
Meanwhile the High Court yesterday threw out one shareholder's legal
challenge to the buy-out bid.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3953</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Greycoat Pounds 39m in red as property
losses take toll
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER PEARSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRE-TAX losses at Greycoat, the property investment company which in
September rescinded its recommendation to pay the 2.9p final dividend for
the year to March 31 only two days before shareholders were due to approve
it, grew sharply from Pounds 5.8m to Pounds 39.2m in the six months to
September 30.
The interim dividend is passed (2p). No preference dividend was paid on
October 1; nor is one likely on April 1.
However, Mr Richard Guignard, managing director, finance, said his company
was 'a million miles away from Rosehaugh', the property company that called
in receivers this week.
Greycoat's operating profits declined to Pounds 16.1m (Pounds 17.7m), but
there was a loss of Pounds 13m from properties with a book value of Pounds
85.8m sold for Pounds 72.8m, a loss of Pounds 15m from the Pounds 27.5m sale
of its interest in Finsbury Avenue, and Pounds 7m (Pounds 8m) provisions
against properties at cost.
Mr Guignard said Greycoat's aim was to pay down its debt via the 'not
reckless' sale of assets, adding that, unlike Rosehaugh, its assets were in
excess of its debts.
Losses per share emerged at 47.4p (12p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3954</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Photo processing restrains LIG
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LONDON INTERNATIONAL Group, the condoms, health and beauty products and
photo-processing group, reported a rise in pre-tax profits from Pounds 7.1m
to Pounds 15.5m for its half year to September 30.
However, the previous year's figure was depressed by an exceptional charge
of Pounds 13.4m, restated from an extraordinary debit. gained 1p to 235p.
Profits were depressed by a sharp fall in the photo-processing side, though
Mr Alan Woltz, chairman, said: 'I am pleased with the performance on our
health and personal products divisions, which continue to demonstrate the
fundamental strength of our brands in a recession.'
He added that LIG saw no sign of an end to the recession and was planning
accordingly.
He also announced that Mr David Harbut, finance director, would retire at
the financial year end of March 31 1993. A search for a successor was under
way.
Group turnover rose from Pounds 190m to Pounds 194.8m. Operating profits
were down 11 per cent to Pounds 22.4m. Net interest charges of Pounds 6.9m
(Pounds 4.6m) reflected higher borrowings.
Net debt was Pounds 134.1m at September 30, up from Pounds 94.8m a year
earlier and Pounds 107m at March 31. The group aims to reduce debt to the
March level again by the year end although exchange rate movements were
adverse.
Earnings per share came out at 6.37p, against 8.27p before exceptionals or
2.64p afterwards. The interim dividend is unchanged at 3.2p.
Health and personal products increased operating profits from Pounds 13.6m
to Pounds 16.1m, on sales up slightly at Pounds 120.9m (Pounds 119.1m),
showing further margin growth. Good results came from condoms, surgical and
industrial gloves as well as products such as Buttercup cough syrups.
Photo-processing profits fell from Pounds 11.5m to Pounds 6.3m as falling
volumes reduced the efficiency of the plants and competitors cut prices in
an attempt to keep market share. Another three plants are to close, costing
200 jobs and a second half exceptional charge of Pounds 2m.
COMMENT
The LIG story is beginning to be told and understood. Continual cost cutting
in photo-processing is getting the break-even rate down to a level where an
eventual recovery in volume should yield bumper profits. But in the short
term, last year's second-half loss of Pounds 5.6m in that division could be
repeated this time, unless there is a white Christmas, which would get
people snapping. Meanwhile, the other side of the business is doing well
despite the recession. Imaginative marketing on brands is having a good
effect on margins. A repeat of last year's Pounds 39.4m pre-exceptionals,
would give a p/e under 15. The shares have little downside, and should begin
to perform when signs of economic recovery appear.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3955</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Smith New Court falls 11% halfway to Pounds
6.7m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A QUIET period in the UK equity market in early summer accounted for a
decline in first-half profits at Smith New Court, the securities house.
The company, one of the UK's biggest market makers, reported profits down
10.7 per cent from Pounds 7.5m to Pounds 6.7m for the six months to October
30. The interim dividend is held at 1p, in line with the company's policy of
producing a steady dividend unaffected by fluctuations in financial market
activity.
A quiet period in June and July in the UK equity market - still Smith's most
important market, despite expansion overseas in recent years - accounted for
the dip in profits, said Mr Michael Marks, chief executive. He added,
though, that a renewed burst of activity in the UK stock market after
sterling left the ERM in the middle of September had brought a strong end to
the half year.
Profits were also bolstered by 'good volumes in Hong Kong and good volumes
and a reasonable amount of business in New York,' he added. The sharp
decline in Hong Kong share prices since the end of the half-year had not
hurt the company, he said.
Earnings were 7.2p (7.4p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3956</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Yorkshire boost as Metro Radio advances 10%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRIS TIGHE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Strong growth in its Yorkshire advertising revenue helped Metro Radio Group,
the USM-quoted local radio station operator, boost turnover to Pounds 15.15m
in the 12 months to September 30, from Pounds 12.82 in the previous year,
writes Chris Tighe.
The Tyneside-based group yesterday reported a 12.9 per cent increase in
advertising revenue to Pounds 12.64m (Pounds 11.2m), and 10 per cent rise in
pre-tax profits to Pounds 1.86m (Pounds 1.69m).
Earnings per share rose slightly to 7.5p (7.2p); total net dividend is
maintained at 5p.
Local and regional advertising revenue grew by 18.7 per cent and national
revenue 2.3 per cent. In Yorkshire alone it was up 30 per cent.
Mr John Josephs, finance director, who becomes group managing director on
January 1, said gearing at year end was just over 100 per cent. This
followed capital expenditure during the year of Pounds 1.1m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3957</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Hanson's US arm shows 15% growth
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HANSON's North American arm, Hanson Industries, reported the biggest
increase in trading profits, up 15 per cent from Pounds 494m to Pounds 567m
on sales of Pounds 4.1bn against Pounds 3.5bn in the year to September 30.
The US accounts for 51 per cent of group operating profits compared with 42
per cent from the UK and the balance from the rest of the world.
The results included a 10-month contribution from Beazer, which made only a
Pounds 1m net profit, and a full-year's contribution from Cavenham Forest
Industries, acquired in 1990.
Although the group is continuing to look for further acquisitions in the US
Lord White, chairman of Hanson Industries, said that with the US stock
market at historically high levels, acquisition costs remained high.
Hanson's businesses are divided under three headings: industrial, consumer
and building products.
Industrial products, which are based mainly in the US, reported the
following results:
Coal mining's trading profit fell to Pounds 157m (Pounds 170m) on reduced
sales of Pounds 1bn (Pounds 1.1bn). Chemicals showed a lower trading profit
of Pounds 116m (Pounds 136m) on sales of Pounds 543m (Pounds 563m). Material
Handling saw profits decline to Pounds 42m (Pounds 49m) on lower sales of
Pounds 258m (Pounds 276m).
Gold mining, in spite of record production, reported a fall in trading
profits to Pounds 29m (Pounds 38m) on increased sales of Pounds 106m (Pounds
98m).
Other industrial products reported increased profits of Pounds 86m (Pounds
58m) on sales of Pounds 802m (Pounds 772m).
Consumer products are divided between Imperial Tobacco in the UK and other
products, mostly in the US.
Imperial Tobacco reported record profits of Pounds 280m (Pounds 240m) on
sales of Pounds 2.98bn (Pounds 2.67bn.)
Other consumer products, which include the US brand names of Rexair vacuum
cleaners and Farberware stainless steel cookware, saw profits rise to Pounds
100m (Pounds 79m) on sales of Pounds 650m (Pounds 616m).
Building products are divided into three divisions
Aggregates saw its profits fall to Pounds 81m (Pounds 85m) on sales of
Pounds 1.12bn (Pounds 612m).
Forest products and lumber increased profits to Pounds 69m (Pounds 44m) on
sales of Pounds 221m (Pounds 178m). Housebuilding reported its first profits
of Pounds 45m on sales of Pounds 338m.
Other building products saw profits increase to Pounds 72m (Pounds 66m) on
sales of Pounds 677m (Pounds 671m).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3958</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Companies in this issue
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 --------------------------------
UK
 --------------------------------
Alexon 25
Amstrad 24
British Aerospace 10
Control Techniques 26
Direct Line 23
Drayton Blue Chip 26
Eastern Electricity 26
Elliott (B) 25
Glaxo 23
GrandMet 23
Greycoat 24
Hanson 24 , 23
Holmes &amp; Marchant 26
Inntrepreneur Ests 25
Johnson Matthey 25
Latham (James) 26
London International 24
Metro Radio 24
Murray Enterprise 26
Oceonics 26
Prudential 10
Royal Bank Scotland 23
Scapa Group 26
Scottish Hydro Elect 24
Severn Trent 25
Shanks &amp; McEwan 25
Smith New Court 24
Spring Ram 26
Syltone 26
Western Selection 26
Wickes 25
 --------------------------------
Overseas
 --------------------------------
AMD 28
Baltica 29
CIBC 29
Citicorp 28
Commerzbank 29
Daf 27
Dr Pepper/Seven-Up 28
Fortis 29
GM 27
Intel 28
In'drial Bank Kuwait 29
Johnson Controls 10
K mart 28
Kuwait R'l Estate Bk 29
Navistar 29
Nordstern 27
Paramount 27
Pechiney 27
Philip Morris 28
Salomon Bros 27
Tele-Communications 28
UAP 27
Westinghouse 28
Winterthur 27
Woolworth 28
 --------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3959</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Hanson turns in decline of 2% for year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HANSON, the Anglo-US conglomerate, yesterday reported a 2 per cent fall in
pre-tax profits for the year to September 30, its first ever year-on-year
decline.
Profits fell from Pounds 1.32bn to Pounds 1.29bn, on increased sales of
Pounds 8.8bn (up from Pounds 7.7bn) mainly because of the increase in
borrowings after it acquired Beazer, the aggregates and building products
company, last year.
Operating profits increased by 12 per cent to Pounds 1.07bn and earnings per
share were up 2 per cent to 22.2p (from 21.7p).
Mr Derek Bonham, Hanson's chief executive, said: 'There is no magic wand; we
do not walk on water and therefore cannot buck trends.
'But we are pleased that the businesses we are in are outperforming our
competitors.'
After integrating the subsidiary's Pounds 1.5bn borrowings the group
reported net debt of Pounds 774m, giving gearing of 18 per cent. Last year
the group had net cash of around Pounds 400m. Interest income fell from
Pounds 188m to Pounds 46m.
The third quarterly dividend was increased to 2.85p (from 2.75p) which is
equivalent to a annual dividend of 11.4p compared with last year's total of
11p.
The move to quarterly dividends, partly introduced for the benefit of the
group's US shareholders used to quarterly dividends, resulted in a tax
charge of Pounds 197m, down from Pounds 258m.
After recently dropping its bid for Ranks Hovis McDougall - which was
superseded by a higher offer from Tomkins, another conglomerate - Mr Bonham
said the group was continuing to look for another core business in the UK.
However, he added: 'We are not going to overpay for any company. If that
means we stay out of the market then we will.'
Mr David Clarke, chief executive of Hanson Industries, the group's North
American arm, said the group would continue to sell some of its smaller
businesses.
'If the price is right we are sellers.'
Hanson's results reflected the new accounting rules which mean that one-off
profits (or losses) on disposals are included above the line in the pre-tax
figure for the first time.
Last year's figures have been restated to reflect this.
Lex, Page 22; Details, Page 24
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3960</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Debts hit Royal Bank of Scotland
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GAPPER, Banking Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RECORD bad debt charges of Pounds 401m led to a sharp fall in annual profits
at Royal Bank of Scotland. Pre-tax profits at Scotland's biggest bank fell
to Pounds 20.9m in the year to September 30, from Pounds 57.7m last year.
This was in spite of a rise in profits before provisions to Pounds 469.4m
(from Pounds 407.4m).
Mr George Matheson, group chief executive, said the bank's attempt to sell
Charterhouse, its merchant bank, was 'taking longer than I would have
liked'. It has been trying to sell Charterhouse to a consortium of European
banks.
The results were dominated by a poor performance from the branch banking
division, which made a loss of Pounds 10.9m after provisions of Pounds
278.8m. The bank's Scottish branches made a Pounds 49m profit, but branches
in England incurred big losses.
Direct Line Insurance, the bank's insurance sales subsidiary, and Citizens,
its retail bank in New England, contributed to profits. Direct Line made a
pre-tax profit before exceptional items of Pounds 15.1m and Citizens a
pre-tax profit of Pounds 19.7m
The earnings of Mr Peter Wood, Direct Line chief executive, who was paid
Pounds 6m in bonuses and Pounds 285,000 basic salary in the year ending
September 30, reduced the subsidiary's pre-tax profits from about Pounds 21m
for the year.
Lord Younger, chairman, said the year was 'dominated by the severity and
length of the recession' which had required 'an exceptionally high level of
provisions for bad debts'.
He predicted another 'difficult' year in 1993, with the provision for bad
debts remaining at a high level.
The bank's total expenses rose 6 per cent, but its cost to income ratio, a
measure of bank productivity, improved to 63.8 per cent (from 65.6 per
cent). Staff numbers fell by 800 - or 4 per cent - in UK commercial banking.
Lord Younger said the liquidators of Wallace Smith, a small banking group
closed last year by the Bank of England, which had previously sued the Royal
Bank for Pounds 418m had now disclosed that they would be claiming more than
Pounds 108m. Royal Bank has denied any liability for Wallace Smith.
An unchanged final dividend of 8.8p per share was paid, although earnings
per share were only 1.4p. The bank's risk asset ratio, a measure of the
strength of its balance sheet, fell to 10.7 per cent (from 11 per cent)
after an issue of Dollars 400m (Pounds 255m) non-cumulative preference
shares in the year. Shares rose 7 1/2 p to close at 189p.
Lex, Page 22
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3961</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / GrandMet held to 5% decline by drinks side
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP RAWSTORNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GRAND METROPOLITAN, the food, drinks and retailing group, yesterday reported
a 5.1 per cent decline in full-year pre-tax profits to Pounds 902m.
Strong gains from the IDV drinks division - which accounted for more than
half the group's trading profits - were offset by reduced earnings from the
Pillsbury and Green Giant food operations.
A combination of weak consumer demand, a glut of vegetables, and pricing
pressures hit the north American food market in the late summer, causing a
sharp downturn in dollar sales. 'However, we believe the worst is now behind
us,' said Sir Allen Sheppard, chairman and chief executive.
'We are cautiously optimistic about the year ahead,' he added.
Property and other exceptional items were Pounds 50m lower than last year,
contributing to the reduction in taxable profits.
Earnings per share declined 7.1 per cent to 30.1p; but a final dividend of
7.7p raises the total payment to 12.2p, an increase of 8.4 per cent.
Group trading profit fell 7.6 per cent to Pounds 982m on turnover reduced
from Pounds 8.75bn to Pounds 7.9bn.
Overall food division profits of Pounds 210m were 16.3 per cent lower on
marginally higher turnover of Pounds 2.63bn.
The difficulties in the US market cut north American profits from Pounds
213m to Pounds 181m; and European operations recorded a 23.7 per cent fall
to Pounds 29m as investment continued in the expansion of Pillsbury and
Haagen-Dazs.
Drinks profits increased 12 per cent to Pounds 509m on turnover Pounds 430m
ahead at Pounds 2.86bn. Volume growth was helped by acquisitions of brands
such as Cinzano.
Retail trading profits were flat at Pounds 220m. Burger King, with growth of
9 per cent, accounted for Pounds 137m of the total. The Pearle eyecare chain
recorded a loss of Pounds 18m, though 'a material improvement' showed in the
second half. Profits of Chef &amp; Brewer managed pubs in the UK declined 4.7
per cent to Pounds 101m.
GrandMet's share of operating losses in the Inntrepreneur pub joint venture
with Courage were Pounds 14m. The group also had to write down Pounds 117m
against reserves after a revaluation of Inntrepreneur's estate, and to
inject Pounds 32m cash to comply with banking covenants.
Lex, Page 22
Details, Page 25
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3962</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Direct Line rings the changes: A UK insurer's success at
selling policies by telephone
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The scale of the threat to the UK insurance industry posed by rivals that
sell by telephone is underlined by yesterday's results from Direct Line, the
Royal Bank of Scotland's general insurance subsidiary.
When the company began direct telephone sales of motor insurance policies in
1985 the experiment was dismissed by many in the industry as unworkable.
Seven years on Direct Line has shown that it is possible to market motor and
home insurance successfully through mass media advertising and selling
policies over the telephone. This approach - copied by other fast-growing
insurers - short-circuits the industry's traditional chain of distribution
and leaves no role for the insurance broker.
In the past 12 months premium income from motor policies has grown 90 per
cent. Direct Line insures 670,000 drivers, 4.5 per cent of the Pounds
4bn-plus a year UK motor insurance market. Inroads are also being made into
the home insurance market, where Direct Line now has 206,000 policies.
At the same time, the company is continuing to make profits - pre-tax
profits for the 12 months to September 30 were Pounds 15.1m compared with
Pounds 12.1m (on a restated basis) last year. The company's assets rose to
Pounds 304.3m, up 48.2 per cent from the previous year's Pounds 205.4m. It
was this performance that won a Pounds 6m remuneration package for Mr Peter
Wood, the quietly spoken former insurance broker who launched the company.
Some of Mr Wood's rivals say Direct Line is able to grow so fast only
because it is under-reserving for future claims, offering cheap premiums or
skimping on service. Mr Wood says this is nonsense, and that R Watson &amp; Co,
the actuaries, describe reserving levels as 'reasonable'. The Consumers'
Association has consistently awarded the company high marks for the quality
of its policies and the speed of response on claims.
Instead, Direct Line's success appears to be based on two inter-related
factors. Its cost base is much lower than that of insurers which sell
through brokers, because its centralised computer system allows its clerks
to handle much more business per head than traditional insurers. Clever
software helps ordinary clerical workers to make underwriting decisions,
saving the costs of skilled underwriters and middle-managers.
As a result, Direct Line says its expenses are only 18 per cent of its
premium income, well below the market average in the high 20s. The company
is also more selective than its competitors about the business it writes. It
uses computer systems to tune finely the premiums it charges in line with
the level of perceived risk.
For good risks Direct line's motor premiums can be up to 20 per cent
cheaper, while the company refuses to insure what it regards as bad risks.
As a result a much higher proportion of customers choose to renew their
policies with Direct line than is the case with other companies, which in
turn reduces distribution costs. Retention rates are more than 85 per cent,
compared with 50 per cent for companies that sell through brokers.
Direct Line's success has attracted imitators, such as Churchill, a
subsidiary of Switzerland's Winterthur. Other recent 'direct writers' in the
UK market include Denmark's Topdanmark and France's Gan-Minster.
Together, this clutch of rivals poses challenges both for the composite
companies and for the UK's more than 3,000 independent brokers. Trade
association figures show that by 1991 direct writers had 13 per cent of the
motor insurance market.
Independent analysts such as Stephen Bird, of securities house Smith New
Court, suggest that market share could now be as much as 16 per cent, and
may rise to 25 per cent within the next few years.
Mr Wood claims that if present trends continue, Direct Line could soon be
the UK's biggest motor insurer.
The composites 'have to decide what to do about the magpie in the nest',
says Mr Clive Bannister, insurance specialist with Booz Hamilton &amp; Allen,
the consultants.
Increasingly companies relying on brokers to sell their products run the
risk that they will lose much of the better quality business and be left
with policies likely to produce heavy claims. In industry jargon composite
companies are being 'selected against'.
Some companies have responded by tightening their links with those brokers
who obtain the best quality business for them. They have stopped accepting
policies from brokers whose business produces higher than average claims.
Others have acquired interests in the larger broking groups such as Swinton,
AA Insurance Services and Hill House Hammond.
Three companies - General Accident, Royal Insurance and Eagle Star - set up
their own direct insurance operations between 1988 and 1990 but were
initially anxious to avoid open identification with these subsidiaries for
fear of offending brokers. During 1991 GA faced a brief boycott from brokers
angered by its promotion of direct sales. Over the past 12 months, however,
there have been signs that the insurers are changing their minds. Royal
Insurance, for example, is understood to be considering 'rebranding' its
Bristol-based subsidiary, The Insurance Service, which in the first nine
months of 1992 sold 30 per cent of the motor insurance policies sold by the
whole Royal group.
Hitherto publicity material produced by TIS has made little or no mention of
the fact that it was actually a Royal subsidiary, in spite of the well
recognised strength of the Royal Insurance brand.
The big losers from these trends are likely to be the smaller brokers.
According to Ms Julianne Jessup, of De Lisle Jessup Scott, an insurance
consultancy, 'personal lines brokers are clearly feeling the pinch'.
The British Insurance and Investment Broking Association, which represents
some 3,000 brokers, says its membership has fallen slightly recently, partly
as result of the competition between the direct writers and the traditional
composites.
Composites may be forced to continue to abandon caution and opt for more
vigorous promotion of their direct writing subsidiaries. 'They have to fish
or cut bait. They have to choose one way or another,' says Booz Hamilton's
Mr Bannister. 'If they continue to walk down the middle of the road they
will get run over.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3963</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / US approves use of Imigran
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL ABRAHAMS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GLAXO, Europe's largest drugs group, yesterday said the US Food and Drug
Administration had issued a letter of approval for its migraine treatment
Imigran.
The success of Imigran is vital to Glaxo. The drug is one of three potential
blockbusters being launched by the company to offset the expected decline in
earnings when the patents on Zantac, the world's best-selling drug, expire
during the mid-1990s.
Brokers UBS Phillips &amp; Drew estimate the drug should generate American sales
of Pounds 550m by 1996 and worldwide sales of Pounds 1.05bn. The US is the
world's largest market.
Analysts had been concerned about the delay in approval following an FDA
advisory committee recommendation in November 1991. There have been concerns
about cardiovascular side-effects.
Glaxo said it had received a letter notifying it that Imigran, known in the
US as Imitrex, would be given final approval once certain conditions had
been satisfied. These included agreeing the wording of the packaging insert
and prescribing information. Glaxo said discussions with the FDA were under
way. It could not predict when the drug might be launched.
The approval is for the injectible version of the drug. An application for
the oral version has been deposited. Imigran had sales of Pounds 43m in the
year to June 30. It has been launched in 22 countries.
The company refused to give details of the drug's US price. Glaxo's pricing
policy for Imigran has been heavily criticised by European ministries of
health.
The company had long-running discussions with the French ministry of social
affairs which initially proved unwilling to agree the prices for Imigran
required by Glaxo.
The group has been anxious to achieve a uniform price throughout Europe to
prevent parallel importing from low-price countries to those with higher
prices.
The US price of Imigran will be politically sensitive, given the increasing
criticism of pharmaceuticals pricing. Merck, the largest US drugs group,
recently surprised the industry and won political applause by setting an
unusually low price for Proscar, its breakthrough treatment for enlarged
prostates. However, sales of Proscar have subsequently disappointed
analysts.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3964</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / BBC says TV budget overran by Pounds 60m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BBC admitted last night after an internal investigation that BBC
television had overspent or overcommitted more than Pounds 60m over two
years.
The overrun will be reduced by drastic cuts in spending this year.
A report by a governors' audit committee chaired by Lord Barnett,
vice-chairman of the BBC governors, blamed 'a series of reporting and
control failures'.
The BBC has ordered the current year's budget to be cut by Pounds 20m. Mr
Will Wyatt, managing director of BBC network television, said last night
that more would have to be cut.
A drama series, The White Lady of Death, has had to be put on ice, other
spending has been postponed and more repeats will be shown.
Mr Wyatt apologised for the department's overspending and said 'we will do
our level best' to correct the errors and minimise the effect on viewers.
In the 1991-92 financial year, network television overspent a net Pounds
38m. This included a Pounds 7m shortfall in expected income from
co-productions. The figure could have been similar this year if action had
not been taken.
Part of the problem began three years ago when the television department
unwittingly allocated the same sum of money twice. Money was also spent on
independent productions while in-house resources were kept too high.
The overspending was not apparent in the BBC's 1991-92 accounts because
television is lumped in with the Home Services group, which includes all
domestic operations. This showed a deficit of Pounds 21.2m in Home Services,
although the BBC overall was not in deficit.
The audit committee said the problems continued this year. The aim now was
to keep the 1992-93 overspending 'at a level well below that in 91-92'.
The action taken includes appointment of a new financial controller at
network television.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3965</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Royal Bank
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The equity market never likes to miss a turning point. It seems determined
to scent one after Royal Bank of Scotland's 15 per cent increase in
full-year operating profits. Management has belatedly recognised the need to
cut costs. Though bad debt provisions of Pounds 401m were worse than
expected, the theory is that these should decline as economic recovery takes
hold. Maybe so, but operating profit is still only 2 per cent up on 1989-90.
Royal made the mistake of lending heavily at the peak of the cycle. Now it
is saddled with exposure to small and medium-sized corporate borrowers, who
may continue to suffer even in recovery.
That is not the only ground for caution. One can dismiss the seemingly
foolish way in which Royal has parted with nearly a third of group pre-tax
profit to Mr Peter Wood, head of its fast-growing Direct Line insurance
business. Though large, his Pounds 6m bonus is effectively compensation for
ceding his original equity stake. The real danger for the market is in
overestimating Direct Line's current contribution. Its Pounds 15m profit
pales against total operating profits of Pounds 469m as well as against the
possible Pounds 108m claim from the liquidators of Wallace Smith Trust.
Royal will struggle to increase its skimpy 2.6 per cent group net margin.
Its surplus capital makes the dividend secure even if the latest payment is
uncovered. But having too much capital can be unhealthy for a bank,
especially one determined to expand aggressively in the US. The proof of
that pudding will be in the eating. All in all, yesterday's 4 per cent rise
in the shares is stretching things a bit.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3966</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: GrandMet
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The market was unsettled yesterday by GrandMet's deluge of differing
accounting figures - and little wonder. The company has 'lost' Pounds 500m
of its historic 1991 profits and two-thirds of its reported earnings per
share. This apparently alarming restatement does not stem from indulgence in
GrandMet's drinks products; rather it reflects the sober reality of the new
accounting regime which demands that most extraordinary charges are taken
above the line.
The market has griped about GrandMet's accounting policies in the past. So
despite the initial shock, greater transparency may help project the company
more favourably in future. The smoke surrounding the accounts - and the
property writedowns at the now peripheral Inntrepreneur joint venture - has
obscured GrandMet's continuing evolution from opportunistic asset trader
into energetic manager of food and drinks brands.
GrandMet's US food business may have proved worryingly volatile last year
with a vegetable glut wiping the smile from the jolly Green Giant business.
But GrandMet's drinks business is resilient and the US economy may be
looking up. Currency translation gains alone could contribute Pounds 50m
this year although a sticky-fingered president-elect may decide to pocket
some of the surplus if his half-promised tax on foreign corporations
materialises.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3967</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Hanson
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
It is perhaps surprising that Hanson has managed to uncover Pounds 1.2bn of
value in its newly acquired US aggregates business which had escaped the
attention of the normally gimlet-eyed Mr Brian Beazer. At the same time, the
Pounds 1.7bn of provisions against the Beazer acquisition is also
substantial, even in the context of the business's Pounds 765m of
environmental liabilities. Both figures may surprise the City, which had
been expecting Hanson to move away from the extensive use of acquisition
accounting as it places greater emphasis on the development of its core
businesses.
On the basis of yesterday's full-year figures it may take the company a
little longer to divest itself of its image as an aggressive asset trader.
Those core businesses are clearly showing the strain of recession. Granted,
the company is right to stress the quality of its middle management and its
financial controls. But there must be questions about how much additional
value can be squeezed from the basic cyclical businesses under Hanson's
care. It is also questionable what kind of value the market is prepared to
attach to such an operation.
That is all the more important since recently so many of Hanson's mooted
acquisitions have run into the sand. It would be unfortunate indeed if the
company really had lost its dealing touch with the outlook for core earnings
growth still poor. The new accounting standards may make it easier for an
outsider to interpret what is going on inside Hanson. The view, however, may
not be as enticing as it once was.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3968</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Marking time
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Bundesbank will doubtless feign indifference to yesterday's rash of
gloomy economic data, but the currency markets may force its hand. True, the
second consecutive quarter of falling gross domestic product places west
Germany in recession on most definitions. Industrial production figures
confirm - if any confirmation was needed after recent grim results from the
likes of Daimler Benz - that manufacturing industry is suffering. But the
service sector continues to grow and fuel the inflationary fire.
The Bundesbank may hope to continue flexing its muscles until the budget is
brought under control and the wage round is over. Yesterday's pay deal in
steel was encouraging, but unions in that industry have a particularly weak
case. Organised labour elsewhere could argue into the spring. Whether the
French and Danish governments will wait that long for lower rates is another
matter. Judging by the renewed strains in the ERM this week, the foreign
exchange markets have their doubts.
Moving the French franc into a narrow band might impress the currency
markets for a while. But it will hardly resolve the basic underlying
tensions. The Bundesbank's Mr Helmut Schlesinger has indicated he is tired
of throwing public money at the market, and will only cut rates for domestic
reasons. So it is hard to see why narrow bands should be credible. The
alternative, a devaluation of the core ERM currencies against the D-Mark,
would mean a serious loss of competitiveness for precisely those parts of
German industry now feeling the most pain. Perhaps even the Bundesbank would
be stirred to sympathy then.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3969</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Lamont consults libel lawyers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR NORMAN Lamont, the chancellor of the exchequer, has called in leading
libel lawyers, Carter Ruck, over reports in six newspapers about his credit
card transactions.
The editors of the newspapers - The Sun, the Evening Standard, the Daily
Mail, the Daily Star, the Observer, The Independent and The Independent on
Sunday - have all had letters from the law firm.
It is believed the letters imply that Mr Lamont has been defamed by the
coverage and the lawyers are seeking an early response. Legal action has not
been ruled out at this stage.
Last night the Treasury was referring callers to Carter Ruck, a firm that
represented Mr Lamont in an earlier controversy, the eviction last year of a
tenant, Ms Sara Dale, from the basement of his Notting Hill home. Carter
Ruck declined to comment.
In deciding to move against the newspapers Mr Lamont has the agreement of
the government law officers. One of the main issues involved is understood
to be the apparent challenge made in some coverage to the chancellor's
truthfulness.
The decision to at least consider legal action against so many newspapers
marks a rise in tension between the government and the press.
In an interview in today's Times newspaper, Mr Lamont warned that the press
could become an important political issue in the 1990s as the trade unions
had been in the 1970s.
'They are both over-mighty subjects,' he said. 'I read that my view is that
there is a conspiracy. But I emphatically do not believe in conspiracies. It
seems to me that the press have a powerfully destructive herd instinct,
which I believe will be their undoing.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3970</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Germany edges nearer recession as output in west falls
sharply
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GERMANY slid further towards recession in the third quarter this year and
new indicators suggest the downturn is accelerating.
Gross national product in the west of the country fell a real 1.5 per cent
between the second and third quarters of this year, official figures show.
Industrial output has fallen sharply since and unemployment has risen
further.
Meanwhile, the number of company failures has grown by 13 per cent this year
after falling steadily for the previous seven.
Mr Jurgen Mollemann, economics minister, said the latest growth figures were
a clear warning of a further downturn, which must be avoided if recovery in
the east was not to be hit.
Mr Mollemann and Chancellor Helmut Kohl have both recently described
conditions as recessionary, but the Bundesbank still believes that the
economy is 'returning to normal' after rapid post-unification growth.
There is worse to come, according to the Ifo economics institute in Munich,
which yesterday forecast a real 3 per cent drop in industrial output in
1993, after a 1.5 per cent decline this year.
The one bright spot was a wages settlement, reached overnight, giving steel
workers a rise of just over 3 per cent for 18 months. This deal and moderate
demands from other unions suggest the downturn and the prospect of job
losses have had a powerful impact on wage hopes.
The Bundesbank would see this as positive, but insufficient on its own to
cut interest rates, economists said.
Real GNP in the third quarter was unchanged - officially 'minus 0.0 per
cent' - compared with the same period last year. Year-on-year growth in the
first quarter was 3.2 per cent, but only 0.6 per cent in the second. Gross
domestic product, which excludes overseas earnings, was a real 1 per cent up
on the comparable period of 1991 but 0.5 per cent down on the previous
quarter.
According to the economics ministry, capital spending fell a real 3 per cent
in the three months under review.
Other figures indicate further weakening. West German manufacturing industry
output in September and October was 2.6 per cent lower than a year earlier.
Capital goods and consumer products production slumped 3.9 per cent and 3.6
per cent respectively.
The impact on the labour market showed in an unadjusted rise of 54,000 in
west German unemployment in November and an increase of more than 150,000 to
almost 500,000 in numbers working short-time. Mr Heinrich Franke, labour
office head, said the jobless total in the west could rise to 2.1m next
year, if nil economic growth forecasts were correct and 1.2m - about 120,000
more than now - in the east.
Bleak forecast, Page 2 Strong growth by banks, Page 23
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3971</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Letter: Better a small spread and a round of golf
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr MARK HULL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Thirty years ago, when inflation and interest rates were last at
today's sort of levels, local building society managers ran their businesses
on a '5-4-3' rule: lend money for mortgages at 5 per cent, borrow it at 4
per cent, and then be on the golf course by 3 o'clock.
Now, though, my building society's mortgage rate is 8.3 per cent, and it
borrows money from me at 5.3 per cent gross. This is a spread of 3 points,
compared with 1 percentage point 30 years ago. Have building societies
become three times as efficient as they were more than a generation ago? Are
these the true economies of scale from all those amalgamations of small
building societies? Or is this the true cost of automating cash dispensing
and the back room operations? Can any of your correspondents think of a
similar industry where 'progress' has been so costly to the public?
Personally I'd prefer a 1-point spread and my manager on the golf course at
3 o'clock.
Mark Hull,
10 Oakthorpe Road,
Summertown,
Oxford, OX2 7BE
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3972</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Observer: Rainy day
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
When the weather's wet, how do you know which car drivers are Scots?
They're the ones who switch off their windscreen wipers as they go under
bridges.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3973</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Observer: China syndrome
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Everything seems to be going wrong at once in Hong Kong. Relations between
China and the UK are rock-bottom, Governor Chris Patten seems to have lost
his deft political touch, and the Hong Kong stock market is nose diving.
The Hong Kong Jockey Club - that bastion of colonial plutocrats - has been
forced to cancel the remaining eight of this year's racing fixtures due to
an epidemic of herpes . . . . among the horses that is. And finally, China's
People's Liberation Army has just finished practising its military
manoeuvres in Guangdong province next door to Hong Kong. The name of the
exercise: Catch the Eagle.
The word for eagle is pronounced 'ying' in the Cantonese dialect. The word
for England, though a different ideograph, is also pronounced 'ying'.
Its meaning was not lost on Hong Kong.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3974</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Observer: Recalled
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Good to see Gordon Waddell - former rugby international, progressive South
African politician and Anglo-American high-flier - get a proper job at last.
It is five years since he quit South Africa and the chairmanship of
Johannesburg Consolidated Investment Company, better known to old mining
hands as 'Johnies'.
Although Waddell, now 55, was married to Harry Oppenheimer's daughter for a
while, his rise up the Anglo empire was due to his undoubted business
prowess. Hence it has been rather surprising that he has kept such a low
profile since returning to the UK. Apart from a non-executive directorship
of Cadbury Schweppes and an investment trust, his only other interest was a
tiny company on the USM. The chairmanship of Shanks &amp; McEwan should give him
something to get his teeth into at last.
Who knows, he might even turn it into Britain's answer to America's Waste
Management Inc?
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3975</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Observer: Welsh players
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Time to place your bets on the likely successor to the Welsh Development
Agency's current chairman Gwyn Jones, who has surprised everyone by
celebrating his 44th birthday with the announcement that he is quitting one
of the most powerful jobs in Wales.
Much fancied to replace him is geologist Roy Bichan, whose North Wales
geology group, Robertson, was taken over by Simon Engineering last year.
Strength: a successful businessman. Weakness: an Orcadian by birth, Leeds by
training, Welsh only by adoption.
Contrariwise, Welsh by birth albeit English by adoption is surveyor Sir
Idris Pearce, chairman of English Estates now about to be absorbed into the
Urban Regeneration Agency. The fact that he'll be deputy chairman there to
former secretary for Wales Lord Walker must be seen a strength. So must
Pearce's closeness to the Tories.
Another similarly close is Cardiff's Thomas 'the Insurance', who sold his
business for mega-money to Sedgwick Jackson. Bonus point: Brian Thomas
served as electioneering chauffeur to present secretary for Wales David
Hunt, who has just put him on the board of another quango supervising the
development of Cardiff Bay.
Far more an outsider is Gareth Davies, boss of Midlands engineers Glynwed.
While his political form isn't known, he is Welsh-born and has a clutch of
non-executive directorships. Moreover an agency insider has been heard to
say: 'What we need is someone with investment links, access to cash and
knowledge of how international business works.'
Gareth Davies could fit the bill.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3976</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Observer: Lung arm of the law
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Is next year's French Grand Prix about to go up in smoke? The answer,
breathlessly awaited by not only motor-racing interests but tobacco
companies, is due next Tuesday from an appeal court meeting in Rennes.
Directly at stake is almost Pounds 4m imposed in fines on Renault and the
Williams grand prix team for breaking France's strict law against tobacco
advertising on television.
The ruling, against which they have appealed, was made by a court in the
small western town of Quimper.
But the fate of the 1993 Grand Prix also hangs on the Rennes court's
decision. The French motor-racing authority's president Jean-Marie Balestre
has said no attempt will be made to organise the race unless the appeal is
upheld, with a pronouncement exempting racing teams carrying such
advertising from punishment.
Although the law is scheduled to be toughened further on January 1, a
measure of its present strictness is that the Williams team's transgressions
did not take place in France. It was fined Pounds 300,000 for entering cars
bearing Camel cigarette logos in the Japanese Grand Prix, knowing the race
would be shown on French screens. Then another Pounds 3m was added for a
repeat occurrence in the equivalent event in Australia last month. France's
national TV company, TFI, faces court action for televising the races.
Moreover the same anti-tobacco crusaders who filed suit against Renault and
Williams have won a similar ruling from the same Quimper court against
Citroen and Mitsubishi for similar offences in the similarly televised
Paris-Peking rally.
As for next week's appeal, the British team's head Frank Williams says he's
confident of winning. If the decision goes the other way, however, the
reverberations could spread far beyond motor-racing. For example, given any
further economy measure in Britain's seagoing forces, newspapers selling in
France might be wise to avoid headlining the story 'Navy cut.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3977</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survival will suffice: John Major can claim success at
Edinburgh if he can somehow achieve a non-disaster
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOE ROGALY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
There is little practical value in high and mighty deliberations about
Britain's aims for the European Community summit in Edinburgh next week.
This is not an occasion for lofty thoughts. We need not consider the destiny
of a continent whose rhetoric about ever-closer unity is tempered by a
resurgence of nationalism. Another time will do for all that. The prime
minister holds the presidency of the European Council for a few more weeks.
The government's hopes are high, but its confidence is low, or at least it
wants people to think that it is. It dreams of glory, but what it really
seeks is survival.
Survival? If the summit is not a flop, if it is merely another ho-hum
meeting in a long series of such confabulations, that will be all right. The
remaining shreds of Mr John Major's credibility could survive such an
experience. If it ends in pandemonium, let the proximate cause be a fault
committed by a continental country or group of countries. Britain must not
be the guilty party. A continued show of willingness to be European can at
least enable the government to say that it has kept itself 'at the heart of
Europe'.
In short, survival may be all that is required. No one can tell whether the
EC is merely in the throes of one of its characteristic crises or whether it
is beginning to fall apart. That is for history to determine. What the prime
minister can ensure is that the British are involved in multilateral
discussions whenever they take place. We must always be participants, and
when possible equal partners. That is the principal aim of Mr Major's
European policy. It need not be jeopardised at Edinburgh.
Even with such a limited horizon, it is tempting to regard the prospect for
next week with a dismal eye. Everything is in place for what might turn out
to be a bad-tempered ending to a British presidency whose tendency to fall
on its nether end must have the clowns of this world suffering fits of
jealousy. Yet it would be a mistake to take negative speculation too far.
Governments always talk down summits in the weeks before they are held.
Mr Major, who has not enjoyed a happy autumn, is, as ever, fighting for his
political life. He greatly needs some demonstration of success, or at least
non-failure. Almost anything will do. An agreement on the Danish question,
the budget and subsidiarity would constitute a success, even if enlargement
of the Community, an anti-recession programme and France's doubts about the
Gatt agreement were set aside for another day. Yesterday's ingenious
proposals for Denmark are promising. Flim-flam on subsidiarity should be
possible. An intimation of 'progress' on the budget is achievable. If none
of that is available a flat communique that solves few problems might be the
least-worst outcome. On most issues, broad statements of good intent,
accompanied by timetabled schemes for working out the details, might be just
enough. The key is to make the hand-over to the Danish presidency look
respectable. Such an outcome need not be a disaster.
With a little bit of luck, the prime minister can achieve a non-disaster.
Quite possibly, he can do better. He has spent the best part of a fortnight
travelling around the EC, his hand out-thrust, his straight-in-your face
friendly smile to the fore, looking for deals. This is what Mr Major is good
at. He is a tactile politician, not unlike many American counterparts. When
he is really fed up with you he puts a hand on your shoulder and looks you
in the eye. He would have made a brilliant commercial traveller.
Perhaps he has studied the literature. He behaves like an archetypal student
of Getting to Yes. The chapter headings of that classic 1980s volume by
Roger Fisher and William Ury suggest Major-like responses. I recommend 'What
If They Won't Play?' and 'What If They Use Dirty Tricks?' as well as 'What
If They Are More Powerful?' (answer: 'develop your BATNA - Best Alternative
to a Negotiated Agreement'). It is this self-disciplined and personable John
Major who bartered for the best available deal at Maastricht a year ago. It
is this same prime minister whose telephone diplomacy helped get the Gatt
talks re-started following their dramatic breakdown last month. This is the
man who cajoled the Queen into realising that she had better volunteer to
pay taxes. He is good at business relationships, and a dedicated ferret in
search of the other side's bargaining strengths and weaknesses.
These carefully nurtured skills have been of little use against the storms
of 1992. No amount of charm could disguise the fact that by voting No in the
summer the Danes may have scuppered the Maastricht treaty. A warm handshake
could not cure the almost fatal shock of Black Wednesday. Pleas and
salesmanship may have helped the prime minister win over a few recalcitrant
backbenchers at the end of the recent paving debate on the bill to ratify
the treaty, but it was not enough. In the end Mr Major had to fall back on
his BATNA: he conceded that Britain's parliament would not take a final vote
on Maastricht until after the second Danish referendum. The debate on the
bill in the commons this week was purely symbolic.
All of this has soured the atmosphere at EC meetings. French, Dutch and
German criticisms of Britain's presidency have not been mere negotiating
ploys; some appear to be heartfelt. There is still a likelihood that at
their private pre-summit meeting President Mitterrand and Chancellor Kohl
(neither of whom have enjoyed recent sales calls from Mr Major) will devise
a joint approach to Edinburgh that spoils Mr Major's party. The prime
minister's pressing of the German flesh has paid dividends in the past; its
effect will be put to the test again next week. He may be fortunate. It is
in the German interest to prevent a British humiliation.
What is missing from all of this is a sense of positive purpose. The
government is no different from most of its predecessors in wanting to see
what its continental partners are doing in order to put a stop to it.
Opinion at the centre of the Conservative party is little different from its
counterpart of 30 years ago, when many Tories could not understand why we
needed anything more than a European free trade area. Mr Major developed a
second line of argument after Maastricht: that the treaty represented the
start of a turn away from central control and towards a Europe of nations.
This is a reflection of reality. Whatever the aspirations of
Euro-federalists, in practice the fundamental interests of member states are
rarely over-ridden. The Commission's powers have been increased because of
the single market. The government needs to develop proposals based on this
foundation. Perhaps in the balmy days after the presidency is laid down it
will learn to argue convincingly for such a Europe, such an Efta-plus. That
is, as Mr Kohl has perceived, the most the British will accept. For all
their fine words, it is clearly the most the French will put up with, the
exception being proposals for stronger ties to Germany. Efta-plus is
Germany's outer circle, beyond its D-Mark zone. It is there that the Tories
are most likely to seek a Europe they can live with.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3978</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Letter: Cadbury offers institutions a route to responsible
ownership
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr JOHN MAKINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Your leader on the Cadbury report ('Cadbury's code', December 2)
questions whether the new code will 'adequately fill the proprietorial gap
which has resulted from the growth of impersonal institutional share
ownership'. The prevailing view of institutional ownership as impersonal is
an odd one. The progressive concentration of equity ownership into the hands
of a small number of investing institutions may not be to everyone's taste
but it does at least permit management to maintain a regular and
businesslike dialogue with the personal representatives of the organisations
that control their company.
The proprietorial gap surely yawned rather wider when the share registers of
British companies were dominated by legions of private investors whose
personal relationship with management was confined to conversations over tea
and a bun at the annual meeting.
It is precisely because of the growth in their collective ownership that
institutional shareholders have found an effective voice to press for the
changes outlined in the Cadbury report. To argue that the 'whole emphasis on
non-executive directors largely reflects the unwillingness of fund managers
to take a direct proprietorial role' misses the essential point.
The enhanced status of non-executives results in large measure from the
determination of those same fund managers to see their interests represented
in the boardroom.
Non-executives, while operating within the structure of a unitary board, are
potentially the most direct and powerful conduit of institutional opinion to
executive management.
The recommendations of the Cadbury report will not, if properly implemented,
offer an alternative to responsible institutional ownership but rather a
mechanism through which that responsibility can be exercised.
John Makinson,
Makinson Cowell,
16-18 St John's Lane,
London EC1M 4DS
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3979</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Letter: Effects of European law on contracting for public
services
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr JOHN MCMULLEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, I wonder if I may contribute to the debate in your letters column on
employees' rights in respect of contracting for public services.
There are two main issues on which the applicability of the Transfer of
Undertakings (Protection of Employment) Regulations 1981 (TUPE) to
contracting-out situations have traditionally depended.
First, the TUPE regulations were drawn to exclude transfers of
non-commercial ventures. The European Court in Dr Sophie Redmond Stichting v
Bartol has, however, ruled that there is no such exclusion under European
law (Directive 77/187). In appropriate cases a tribunal may be invited to
apply European law. And, in any event, the government has provided in the
Trade Union Reform and Employment Rights Bill for the abolition of the
requirement of a commercial venture. This obstacle for employees will
therefore shortly cease to be a problem.
The second issue, however, is that TUPE requires a transfer of an
undertaking or part. According to the European Court this means there must
be an economic entity (whether or not commercial in nature) which has
retained its identity, before the legislation can apply. In some cases of
contracting out of ancillary services (whether in the private sector or the
public sector) what is granted to the contractor amounts, by contrast, to
nothing more than a contract for services. However, quite clearly, each case
depends on its own facts. There will be many situations where, on
contracting out, an employee's rights are transferred under the legislation.
Perhaps the latest example is the European Court case of Rask v ISS
Kantineservice (Case C209/91) in which the advocate general delivered an
opinion, only this October, that Directive 77/187 is perfectly capable of
applying to the contracting out of a staff canteen facility from an employer
to a contractor. The sole question for the national court being, in his
view, whether the undertaking's identity has been maintained.
It is therefore far from clear that, as Mr Forysyth states in his letter
(November 30), 'there is not normally a transfer of an undertaking' in the
context of compulsory competitive tendering legislation. It entirely depends
on how the activity has been structured and the nature of the contract given
to the contractor.
The position of parties involved in contracting is therefore at best
uncertain and will continue to be so until a sequence of illustrative cases
passes through the courts taking into account the recent European Court
decisions mentioned.
John McMullen,
partner and head of
employment unit,
Simpson Curtis,
41 Park Square,
Leeds LS1 2NS
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3980</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Letter: Telephone competition still lacking
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr KENNETH P ARMITAGE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, In response to a Mercury Communications initiative to promote
competition by offering cheaper calls to domestic users ('Competition cuts
phone charges', December 2) BT proposes to freeze the cost of UK calls but
increase the cost of line rental charges, just like last year, by 10p or
some 7 per cent per week, well above the rate of inflation. Thus an increase
in line rental charges will ensure that BT increases its revenue whether the
network is being used or not and regardless of whether the service is
improved.
Large organisations, those which make the most use of telecommunication
networks, will see some overall reduction in expenditure; however,
residential customers, who use the network far less frequently, will see an
increase in their bills, even before VAT.
Surely if I use a service or a facility more than my neighbour I should
expect to have to pay more for that service than my neighbour. The need for
more competition in UK telecommunications is becoming increasingly
essential.
Kenneth Armitage,
29 Stoneham Close,
Petersfield, Hants GU32 3BX
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3981</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Leading Article: Fixing the EC budget
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
IF NEXT week's Edinburgh summit is to achieve its goals, an agreement on the
European Community's budget must be reached. Of the complex questions on the
agenda, the budget is the least insoluble. A two-pronged strategy is needed.
In addition to an immediate compromise, a more radical programme of reform
should be started, aimed at making the EC budget more redistributionally
rational and more economically effective.
If the current EC budget did not exist, nobody would dream of inventing it.
The pattern of national contributions is the main problem. In 1992, Germany
will provide two-thirds of the net budgetary contributions, the UK 22 per
cent and France 11 per cent. Among the most important beneficiaries are not
only Greece, Ireland and Spain, but also Denmark, Luxembourg and Belgium,
some of the richest EC members. This is so despite the UK's controversial
rebate.
The EC's role as a Robin Hood in reverse was not intended. The most
important single reason for the outcome has been spending on the Common
Agricultural Policy, which has fallen from 80 per cent of total spending in
the 1950s to 58 per cent in 1991. It is expected to fall to less than 50 per
cent by 1997, on the Commission's plans. But it will remain much the most
important single category.
The pattern of spending is not the only problem. When the EC's 'own
resource' system was first introduced, it consisted of import duties and
levies, along with a top-up element related to VAT. The distribution of
revenue from import duties was particularly arbitrary, although this became
less important as tariffs were lowered and the VAT contribution increased.
Perverse pattern
The EC has taken a pragmatic approach to remedying the absurdities. The
perverse pattern of spending was remedied by the addition of new
cornucopias, such as the regional fund, which was added in 1973, and
structural funds for the poorer member countries. The package proposed by Mr
Delors plans to increase structural funds still further, from Ecu18.6bn in
1992 to Ecu29.3bn in 1997. Within that proposal falls the cohesion fund,
which is, in essence, a bribe for acceptance by the poorer member states of
the Maastricht treaty's commitment to economic and monetary union.
Revenue has been tinkered with as well. In 1988, for example, the VAT
contribution was pegged at 1.4 per cent of the VAT base and another resource
introduced, related to GNP. This was the first, cautious attempt to relate
contributions to relative wealth. The Commission has now proposed that the
VAT element be reduced and the GNP-related contribution increased from about
a quarter of total revenue to 40-45 per cent.
Need for success
In addition to tinkering with the pattern of spending and revenue, the EC
also imposed a specific ceiling on the budget in 1988. Currently set at 1.2
per cent of GNP, the dispute that will come to Edinburgh is over whether it
should rise to 1.36 per cent of EC gross product by the end of 1997, as in
the Commission's official proposal, or 1.32 per cent by 1999, which is Mr
Delors' latest suggestion, or to 1.25 per cent by 1998, this being the much
condemned proposal from the UK presidency.
These differences are not worth a breakdown, especially when the EC needs a
success. Splitting the difference between the poorer countries and the
richer ones must be the right answer. Meanwhile, a modest reduction in its
rebate might be the UK's contribution to a successful outcome.
Such pragmatism is not enough. The EC's budget needs more radical
rethinking. In a valuable pamphlet for the Royal Institute of International
Affairs, Sir Michael Franklin suggests a corrective mechanism designed to
bring about an acceptable redistributive outcome. Given such a corrective
mechanism, the UK would no longer be a special case. If there were a
redistributional override in the budget, the EC's spending could also be
focused where it would make a contribution additional to that of national
exchequers. Spending that helps integrate the EC economy would be an obvious
priority
The Edinburgh summit must, first and foremost, split the difference between
what the poorer countries demand and what the richer countries feel they can
afford. But it needs more. The heads of government should commission a study
that will suggest ways of eliminating the main anomalies in the present
budget. The aim is clear: the budget must be made both more rationally
redistributive and more demonstrably supportive of the wider economic goals
of the EC.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3982</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Leading Article: Time bombs in the Balkans
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ORGANISATION of Islamic Conference is not normally given to radical or
shocking pronouncements. Communiques from its ministerial meetings tend to
reflect a careful consensus between its 50 diverse member states, and to
sound rather bland. Thus when the organisation's foreign ministers send the
world an angry ultimatum involving the threat of military force, something
unusually disturbing is clearly afoot.
That something is, of course, the Serbs' campaign of territorial
aggrandisement and 'ethnic cleansing' in Bosnia-Hercegovina, and the
suffering of their mainly Moslem opponents. As this week's Jeddah meeting
shows, dismay is by no means confined to Europe or the west; emotions are
becoming inflamed throughout the Islamic world. That adds yet more tinder to
the increasingly combustible mess that is the former Yugoslavia. Inevitably,
it also brings outside powers one step closer to being sucked into the
conflict. The only question is whether that involvement will come by mutual
agreement under the auspices of the United Nations, or whether - as the OIC
communique implies - individual countries will feel obliged to take matters
into their own hands by arming or otherwise abetting the victims.
Things are not as simple as the Islamic foreign ministers would have us
believe. Using force against Serbia - for example, in the form of selective
bombing raids - will not stop what is largely a civil war in Bosnia, and
certainly not in the next 44 days. Nor will it necessarily improve the lot
of Bosnian Moslems.
Fitting response
But western nations do need to think again about how they might more
effectively alleviate the tragedy, even if they cannot end it. Welcome as it
is that countries such as Britain and France have sent troops to escort
humanitarian relief convoys in Bosnia, it was never likely to be enough. As
winter draws on and the prospect of mass starvation nears, a more
far-reaching undertaking to set up 'safe zones' in Bosnia where the Moslems
will be protected as well as fed seems the only fitting response.
Intervention along such lines would be a logical extension of the UN's
current humanitarian mission. Properly implemented, and provided safe zones
did not become the springboard for a Moslem counter-offensive, it might also
begin to draw a line under the Serbs' territorial expansion, and provide a
basis from which to embark on the long and painful task of rebuilding
Bosnia.
Protracted presence
The difficulties in such a course are considerable. It would require a
substantial expansion of forces operating under the UN mandate in Bosnia -
preferably including US ground troops and soldiers from a number of Islamic
countries - and a readiness on the part of public opinion in the countries
concerned to accept there will be casualties. There would be a danger of UN
forces becoming over-identified with one side in the conflict, or of their
presence becoming protracted.
All these objections cannot be lightly dismissed. But the point was long ago
passed in the Yugoslav conflict when the consequences of not intervening
were more serious than the dangers of intervening with force.
The safe zones proposal is only a beginning. It should be implemented in
conjunction with a further tightening of sanctions against Serbia and a
rigorous military enforcement of the no-fly zone over Bosnia. It should also
be accompanied by stronger action to prevent the conflict from spreading to
Kosovo - through strong pressure on Serbia, which controls the province and
is oppressing its majority Albanian population, to allow in a UN observer
force, and failing that through the threat of direct intervention. Civil war
in Kosovo could rapidly drag in other regional powers such as in Albania,
Macedonia, Greece, Bulgaria and Turkey. It must be prevented.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3983</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Roman road to privatisation: The Italian government faces a
bruising battle as parliament begins debate on its sell-off proposals
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Italy is on the verge of its biggest public-sector shake-up since the 1930s,
when Mussolini first gave the state a dominant role in economic development.
The government of Prime Minister Giuliano Amato is planning the largest and
most concentrated sell-off ever proposed in continental Europe. Over the
next three years privatisation is expected to raise almost L40,000bn (Pounds
18.6bn). The figure could be higher if the planned sale of the state's
property portfolio gets going soon, alongside a determined effort to clean
up local government finances via the privatisation of many municipal
services.
'Privatisation on this scale is like pulling away the central stone in the
whole postwar politico-economic edifice,' observed one official involved in
the privatisation programme. 'The political parties have relied on a large
public sector to provide thousands of jobs, especially in the south,' he
added. State control of the economy has been a central element in permitting
the political parties to trade patronage in return for votes, and run the
public sector with political rather than economic objectives.
The privatisation process will begin with a radical reduction in the state's
two-thirds control of the banking and financial system, especially that part
owned by IRI, the giant state holding company. Within five years IRI, which
generates 5 per cent of the country's gross domestic product, could cease to
exist, having sold off its assets or turned its subsidiaries independent.
Sectors previously regarded as strategic and closed to private investment -
including Alitalia, the national airline, ENEL, the electricity authority,
and ENI, the state oil concern - will be partly sold off. Loss-making state
activities in fertilisers, chemicals and ship-building are threatened with
closure if no buyers can be found.
Those with most to lose in the privatisation process are at the core of the
present four-party coalition: the long-ruling Christian Democrats and
Socialists. They are being asked to commit a form of hara-kiri since
patronage has been the main element of their traditional power.
But privatisation also represents a challenge to business and industry in
four main areas:
Italy needs to create more large-scale companies. The strong state presence
throughout the economy has prevented the proliferation of large industrial
groups, which can compete internationally. Only four private groups employ
more than 30,000 people (Fiat, Ferruzzi-Montedison, Olivetti and Pirelli),
an exceptionally small number for the world's fifth industrial power.
Italy must drop its long-standing mistrust of foreign capital if
privatisation is to succeed. No other EC member has maintained such strong
barriers against the entry of foreign capital. Domestic investment at best
can cover only half the amount expected to be raised by privatisation.
A revolution has to occur in Italian savings habits. A combination of
security, high returns and anonymity for the investor has made Treasury
paper the most attractive savings instrument for both the rich and the small
saver. The high demand for Treasury bills (Bots) and the risks of investing
on the bourse have restricted the Milan stock exchange. Trading volume in
relation to gross domestic product is half that of France and a quarter that
of the UK. The so-called Bot-people have to be persuaded to jump ship and
put their money into the shares of privatised companies. Equally, the
public-sector deficit has to be cut to lessen the Treasury's need to produce
such seductive borrowing instruments.
Job security and high redundancy payments conceded by successive governments
to a powerful trade union movement must make way for a more flexible labour
policy. Otherwise the much-needed rationalisation of the workforces in the
companies due to be privatised cannot take place. The unions talk of 150,000
jobs being at risk; depressed regions such as Sardinia and Sicily are likely
to be among the worst affected.
The proposals on privatisation, which parliament began to debate this week,
address all these issues, although the government's intentions regarding job
losses and plant closures remain ambiguous. The programme  - set forth in a
107-page outline, a Treasury green book and four volumes of appendices
running to 2,000 pages - has been prepared in three months. This was an
extraordinary achievement by the dilatory standards of Italian government,
especially since the Treasury has been at the centre of preparing the 1993
budget and coping with the currency problems.
Parliament has undertaken to formulate a response by December 16. The
response will not be binding, since the proposals are consultative; but the
coalition could be brought down if it tried to go it alone in the face of
strong parliamentary opposition from those who see the privatisation
programme as a vote-loser.
'It is going to be a tough battle,' observes Mr Piero Barucci, the Treasury
minister.
In preparation for this battle, Mr Amato has subtly moved the goalposts  -
not once but several times. He began his five-month-long game of political
survival by persuading the politicians that Italy's international
credibility and the stability of the lira depended on their endorsement of
an emergency budget. Next he said credibility rested on their approval for
the 1993 budget and their support for structural reform of pensions, public
health, the civil service and local government. Now his message is that
privatisation is the only way to rescue the disastrous state of Italy's
public finances, and thus it is necessary to the country's continued
credibility. He also warns that failure to back the plan could force the
resignation of the government, lead to a collapse of the lira and raise the
spectre of hyper-inflation.
The underlying goals of privatisation are to increase competitivity, end
subsidies, raise cash and broaden the scope of private ownership. However,
the government believes the state should retain control in areas such as
energy and advanced technology, which require long lead times on investment,
or where strong socio-economic considerations in depressed areas prevail.
For instance, IRI's Finmeccanica is set to become a publicly quoted company
with a controlling state stake to guarantee Italy has a presence in advanced
engineering and information technology.
In practice, necessity is the overriding philosophy. The immediate cash
requirements of the Treasury and the deteriorating financial health of most
state-run enterprises have made raising money paramount. Despite
unprecedented austerity measures, the budget deficit next year will be more
than 11 per cent of GDP - nearly triple the European Community average. Even
if the EC permitted state funding of loss-making industries and continued
high subsidies, the state cannot add to Italy's accumulated debt, equivalent
to 104 per cent of GDP. Meanwhile, the combined debts of those companies
targeted for privatisation or rationalisation amount to L140,000bn.
Divestiture will begin with banking and financial assets which offer high
returns and require the least preparation to sell. The previous Andreotti
government made tentative steps in privatising this sector. Crediop, the
Treasury-controlled long-term lending bank, was sold earlier this year for
L2,100bn to San Paolo di Torino, one of Italy's largest banks, and the
Treasury's 50 per cent stake in IMI, the financial services group, is due to
be sold for L4,000bn, principally to Cariplo, the Milan savings bank.
The Amato government, in contrast to its predecessor, has made a stronger
commitment to banking's privatisation, deciding that the state should no
longer dominate the sector. It has paved the way for a broader sell-off by
converting IRI, ENI, ENEL and INA, the insurance institute, into publicly
quoted companies owned by the Treasury.
The initial proposal, put forward in July by Mr Guiseppe Guarino, the
industry minister, was to reorganise state assets into two 'super-holdings'
 -one involving financial assets, the other industrial and energy assets -
as a preliminary step toward privatisation. This approach was quickly
dropped as being financially clumsy.
The government has since clarified its ideas and pushed Mr Guarino to the
sidelines. In the case of IRI, the holding will keep the proceeds and the
responsibility rests on the management to raise funds. No formal limit has
been fixed on the dilution of state control in any company. Pending
parliamentary advice, the process will be monitored either by a special
commissioner or a four-person technical commission.
INA will be sold off soon as possible. Its sale would unravel many of the
incestuous links within the old system. IRI, for instance, rents its Rome
headquarters from INA at a cheap rate; INA has an 18 per cent stake in Banca
Nazionale del Lavoro, the Treasury-controlled commercial bank, and is
reluctant to contribute to the L2,500bn to L3,000bn of new capital required
by BNL in the wake of Iraqi loans scandal at its Atlanta branch.
The commercial banks in IRI's portfolio - Credito (67 per cent-owned), Comit
(55 per cent) and Banca di Roma (35 per cent) - will be sold off in two
years. With debts of L70,000bn and projected 1992 losses of at least
L2,000bn, IRI is expected to proceed with the immediate sell-off of
companies in SME, its foodstuffs, manufacturing and distribution
conglomerate, plus parts of its telecommunications business. At the other
end of the scale, IRI must find ways to cut losses in steel (ILVA), civil
engineering (Iritecna) and shipbuilding (Fincantieri). IRI will retain the
proceeds from any asset sales.
All proceeds from non-IRI asset sales are due to go to the Treasury, raising
L27,000bn in the next three years. ENI is expected to sell non-core business
such as Agip coal, Nuovo Pignone, the turbines company whose planned
privatisation was announced in September, and parts of its chemicals
interests. Strategic assets such as Agip's oil operations are to be floated
on the bourse. ENEL, much eyed by foreign investors, has been given up to
two years to prepare for flotation, largely because electricity tariffs are
currently frozen.
These are ambitious plans at a time of recession, a free-floating lira and
international financial uncertainty. The political establishment may well
endorse the privatisation programme, though the programme itself is likely
to move more slowly than projected. But the government risks seeing the most
profitable state companies moving into the private sector, while it becomes
saddled with the loss-makers.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
ITALY'S PUBLIC SECTOR SHAKE-UP
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
State groups: Industrial activities
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                  Operating         Profit/
                    Turnover        results            loss
Company            (Lire bn)      (Lire bn)       (Lire bn)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
INA                   69,067            189            -367
ENI                   61,185            623             503
ENEL                  26,823            229             239
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                       Gross            Net
                        debt         assets
Company            (Lire bn)      (Lire bn)       Employees
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
INA                   52,723         33,867         368,253
ENI                   29,938         24,305         131,248
ENEL                  32,610         16,020         109,560
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Privatisation timetable
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                               Capital
Company              Timetable              Sell-off         (Lire bn)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
INA                  Six to eight months    More than 51%        3,635
ENI                  18 to 20 months        Significant share    7,999
ENI Subsidiaries, eg
   Nuovo Pignone     18 to 20 months        Significant share
   Snam, AGIP        18 to 20 months        Significant share
ENEL                 24 months              Significant share   12,126
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Company                            Timetable
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
IRI Banks
    Comit/Credito/Roma             As soon as possible
IRI Industrial
    SME (foodstuffs)               Four to six months
Others, eg
    Finmeccanica,                  Partial flotation
    Stet (telecoms)                As soon as possible
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3984</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Personal View: Why France is afraid
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALLAN BUCKWELL and VERONIQUE COURBOIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The recent EC-US compromise on the agricultural elements of the Uruguay
round of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade has provoked a strong
French response. German Chancellor Helmut Kohl took a conciliatory line when
faced with the possibility of a French veto. He advised us to try to
understand the French problems with the proposed settlement.
What are the problems? Are French fears justified? What are the relative
effects of the reforms of the Common Agricultural Policy, to which the
French government acceded this summer, and the demands of the Gatt
proposals?
It is first worth mentioning some fundamental features of French political
economy and culture. In France, free trade is viewed as an Anglo-Saxon
convenience which, from time to time, serves the interests of the UK and the
US. Postwar French-US relations have often been characterised by mutual
mistrust and French resistance to American hegemony. This creates a potent
mix when it is combined with food and agriculture, the core of much French
culture.
Specific fears aroused by the Gatt settlement concern the threat to exports
of farm products, the incomes of farmers and the future of rural
communities. The most difficult part for France seems to be the requirement
that the volume of subsidised exports be cut by 21 per cent in 1993-99.
France is the world's second largest agricultural exporter, this trade
accounting for 12.7 per cent of its total exports. The farm products
benefiting most from export subsidies are cereals, sugar and dairy products.
These account for 40 per cent of agricultural exports. The potential loss of
exports is thus about 1 per cent (21 per cent of 40 per cent of 12.7 per
cent) of the total over a six-year period. While no doubt unwelcome to those
involved, this does not seem a big threat to the economy.
The three main elements of the Gatt settlement (reducing subsidised exports
and domestic supports and improving import access) will decrease the prices
to farmers and lower their gross incomes. During the 1970s average farmers'
incomes declined. Most of this loss was recovered during the 1980s, during
which average farm incomes rose 25 per cent. However, compared with real
income growth for the rest of the population, farm incomes have fallen
behind. The policy changes induced by the Gatt will thus not alter a
long-established trend.
Given time, farmers will adjust their production patterns, using fewer
inputs, such as fertilisers, machinery and so on, and redeploying resources
to products least affected by reforms. Purchased input prices will be
reduced as suppliers find themselves in a declining market. Land prices and
rents will also adjust downwards. Agriculture will continue to shed labour
but not, in absolute terms, as much as over the last three decades.
Significant relief is provided in the policy measures agreed in this year's
reform of the CAP. This will reduce support prices in the cereals-oilseeds
sector by 29 per cent and cut production of larger producers through a 15
per cent set-aside of arable land. This harsh treatment was made palatable
by the introduction of area payments, which will more than compensate many
farmers, particularly the small and less productive ones, for their loss of
revenue. Calculations by Insee, the French statistical institute,
demonstrate that the effect of the CAP reform is to increase farmers'
incomes by 7 per cent compared with what they would have been under the
existing CAP regime.
The Gatt agreement offers no additional direct threat to farm incomes.
However, it does represent an attack on the use of subsidies to assist
exports. From a French point of view, this is an assault on agriculture and
its right to produce.
The expression of this concern at the political level covers the relative
severity on production levels of the Gatt settlement and the CAP reform.
Analyses demonstrate that the price cuts contained in the CAP reform, which
encourage additional consumption of cereals and reduce production intensity,
coupled with the set-aside, will meet the required fall in export volume.
Thus for cereals, at least, the CAP reform was the tougher medicine.
Why is it that the French government accepted CAP reform, yet rejects the
apparently softer Gatt settlement? The answer is partly political - a change
of minister and an attempt to extract more Community compensation for French
farmers - and partly a signal that extension of CAP reform to the as-yet
largely unreformed dairy, sugar and wine sectors will be resisted.
However, agriculture is not the only economic activity nor the only subject
in Gatt. France is the world's second largest exporter of services and
intellectual property. Liberalisation of trade in services and better rules
and disciplines in intellectual property offer significant economic gains,
which will far outweigh the losses in agriculture. The French government has
more work to do to persuade the nation of this and to find acceptable ways
to compensate farmers for their loss.
The authors are professor and lecturer at Wye College, University of London
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3985</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Arts: Femme fatale of the 18th century art world - The life
and work of the beguiling Angelica Kauffman
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SUSAN MOORE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Why was Angelica Kauffman one of the most celebrated artists in late 18th
century Britain? The current reappraisal of her work at Brighton Museum and
Art Gallery (until January 3), shows that her success resulted not so much
from her skill as a painter than from her choice of subjects.
Did the fact that she was an attractive young woman help? Maybe, but there
was more to her than that. The Swiss-born painter settled in London with her
artist-father in 1766 after spending seven years studying and copying the
old masters and classical antiquities in Italy, and making a name for
herself with a handful of polished Grand Tour portraits. Like the much more
talented Artemisia Gentileschi who came to Britain a century before, she was
a far rarer bird than the average female painter. For she was a history
painter, and as such commanded the utmost respect from her peers.
Her beauty and talent certainly beguiled the art establishment. There
appears to have been an engagement to Nathaniel Dance in Italy, a marriage
proposal from Sir Joshua Reynolds, and impassioned advances from her fellow
ex-patriate Heinrich Fuseli. She was admired by Goethe and Winckelmann, even
seduced by the Revolutionary Jean-Paul Marat - all of which makes her
something of an 18th century Alma Mahler.
Like Artemesia, she received considerable acclaim for her representations of
history and literature's female heroines, though there are none of the
former's vulnerable Biblical Susannas and decapitating Judiths. Angelica
preferred Penelope, the devoted wife and mother who waits patiently for
Ulysses' return, or Andromache and Armida who endeavour to prevent their
menfolk from going to war.
There are affecting tearful reunions, grieving mothers and saccharine
allegories of love. Male painters also chose moralising and sentimental
themes from classical history and contemporary literature, but the poignancy
of having such tender moments expressed by a woman's hand would have been
irresistible.
No doubt it was subject-matter and style rather more than sentiment that
appealed to Sir Joshua. His heartfelt wish was to promote a national school
of history painting and 'improve' public taste with scenes of heroism,
patriotism and familial piety. Little wonder that Angelica Kauffman was
warmly welcomed to Britain and invited in 1768 to be a founder member of the
Royal Academy of Arts, an institution which in its early days showed no
prejudice against women or foreigners.
Brighton's second exhibition gallery is devoted to such academic histories -
but what arid puffs of pomposity they are. They fail completely - rather as
the fashionable conceptual-minimalist art fails today - to move or even to
engage any but the most fanatical. Far from inspiring, they are
unconvincing, formulaic and bloodless.
It is perhaps unfortunate for Angelica Kauffman that Neo-Classicism now
seems one of the least alluring episodes in the history of art. Only the
great Jacques-Louis David could rise above the prevailing tide of sterile
academicism to create cool but never unfeeling tragedies in paint. The
British public, excepting a handful of academicians, critics and the odd
patron like John Parker of Saltram Park, cared far more for her portraits
and decorative works.
At their best, the former have considerable charm. The famed beauty Lady
Elizabeth Foster, later Duchess of Devonshire, with a vista across the Bay
of Naples and Ischia stretching behind her, is one such treat; the
unidentified classically draped lady with a statue of Minerva is a more
typical English pudding. The exhibition selectors have presented this woman
painter primarily as a painter of women. Her portraits of men are far more
sympathetic.
Why hide her direct and intimate portrait of Garrick, say, turning to look
at us over the back of a rustic chair? The only single male portrait here,
of her friend Joshua Reynolds in Van Dyck costume, straining as if to catch
inspiration from the bust of his hero Michelangelo placed by his side, is a
work of real quality and affection.
The final section of the show treats Angelica Kauffman's considerable and
long-lasting influence on interior decoration and the decorative arts, which
was made possible by the numerous prints made after her paintings and
designs. Prints line the walls. Vitrines house Derby, Vienna and Paris
porcelain, enamel plaques, Wedgwood medallions, tea trays and textiles all
decorated a la Kauffman. Coutts &amp; Co, for instance, lend a delightful late
18th century commode decorated with her scenes illustrating Homer's Odyssey.
An essay in the informative book accompanying the show, Angelica Kauffman: A
Continental Artist in Georgian England, edited by Wendy Wassyng Roworth
(Reaktion Books Ltd, Pounds 9.95) finally lays to rest the myth that almost
every pretty Arcadian fancy set into an Adam interior is her work. There are
only two documented instances of her personal involvement; one is her
painting of four roundels in the vestibule of Burlington House, the present
home of the Royal Academy. This is hardly surprising, since she remained in
England for a mere 15 years, before the lure of the classical South proved
too great.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3986</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Arts: Miller directs The Double Dealer - Theatre in Dublin
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALANNAH HOPKIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
When Jonathan Miller directs Congreve in Dublin as part of Trinity College's
400th anniversary celebrations, great things are expected. The play was
first performed at Drury Lane in 1693, and it was admired rather than liked.
Then, as now, the problem lay with the characters of Maskwell and Lady
Touchwood, as great a pair of amoral schemers as ever graced a tragedy. So
what are they doing among the coxcombs and coquettes who form the rest of
the cast of this comedy?
The problem that a director faces here is whether to play up the comedy,
thus pleasing the audience but rendering the tragedy as mere melodrama, or
to focus on the evil (it is not too strong a word) of Maskwell and Lady
Touchwood. Dr Miller, it seems, has taken the second option.
Mellefont and Cynthia are about to be married, but not if Maskwell (who
wants Cynthia) and Lady Touchwood (who lusts after her husband's heir and
nephew Mellefont) have their way. Peripheral to the plot, but essential for
entertainment are Lord Froth,'a solemn coxcomb', and Lady Froth 'a great
coquette', Sir Paul Plyant, father of Cynthia and brother to Lady Touchwood,
and his domineering second wife, Lady Plyant, plus Mellefont's friends,
Careless and Brisk, the latter 'a pert coxcomb'. By now you will understand
why there is a diagrammatic explanation of the characters' relationships in
the programme.
The set, by Mark Bailey, consists of a charcoal grey panelled wall set well
down stage - the 'gallery' of Lord Touchwood's house rendered as a corridor,
off which are four exits. The majority of the stage space is thus hidden
from view, and serves as off stage apartments in which seductions and
intrigues take place. The throne-like chairs at either edge of the set are
seldom used. As the characters parade across the narrow strip of stage in
their jewel coloured frock coats and hooped dresses, one is reminded of the
famous 'serpentine composition' of Hogarth's Rake's Progress and Marriage a
la Mode.
It is a bold and refreshing approach, which eliminates the visual cliches of
Restoration comedy, and exposes the sometimes creaking bones of Congreve's
drama. It is also a disconcerting reminder that this play belongs to the
same century as Webster's Duchess of Malfi. Initially the effect is
exciting, but it soon wears off, as characters busily enter and exit without
leaving any strong impression. The laughs, and there are many in the reading
of the first three acts, are very slow to come, and once one is accustomed
to the staging things start to drag.
Oddest of all is the wildly varying quality of the acting. It matters not
that Congreve is spoken in Irish accents, but silly lines must be allowed to
sparkle, cocottes must flirt prettily, and gentlemen must move with
confidence.
Stanley Townsend makes a plausible, even masterful villain of Maskwell.
Miche Doherty in a flea infested red wig is a delightful Brisk, and Rosaleen
Linehan is magnificently absurd Lady Plyant in the only performance that
provokes spontaneous applause. The rest are a lacklustre lot who do not seem
to know what to make of the lines they are given. Jeananne Crowley acts her
heart out in an embarrassing effort to make sense of Lady Touchwood, but we
are none the wiser about her motives.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3987</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Arts: Levine and the Vienna Philharmonic - Concerts on the
South Bank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAX LOPPERT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The Vienna Philharmonic Orchestra, in its 150th year of existence, has
decided to spread itself more generously around the world. Cities other than
the home base - London, Berlin, Paris, New York, Tokyo - are to be visited
on a regular basis. This should be a cause for wide rejoicing: the orchestra
remains probably the most admired in the world, and in the 19th-century
Austro-German repertory (much of which is the orchestra's native
inheritance) it continues to set a standard - for sound at once broad and
warm in tonal character, mellow in blend, uniquely 'together' in corporate
personality - by which other orchestras tend to be measured.
However, Wednesday's concert at the Royal Festival Hall, which launched the
initiative (and which was transmitted live on Radio 3), was far from
affording a great occasion. James Levine, the conductor, has been absent
from London since the mid-1970s; one wanted to cheer his return, since in
the intervening period he has grown into a figure of weighty significance on
the international scene. It became increasingly hard to do so, since Mr
Levine's direction of of Brahms, Schoenberg and Debussy was so plainly the
reason for the artistic dullness, superficiality and (at times) gross
vulgarity that hung on the evening like a lead weight.
The Brahms was the Third Symphony. The orchestra's seating - violins
opposite each other, violas and cellos in the middle - is the correct one,
and its virtues were apparent in the even spread of beautiful sound, neither
lopsided nor out of balance with the winds. In Brahms performance, though,
beautiful sound is only the starting point: intellectual and emotional
adventure, risk-taking, decisive approach to musical ideas are the necessary
next stages.
This Brahms Three began and ended with beautiful sound. It lacked energy,
inner direction, strength of conviction; it gave the impression of rather
tired imitation, of Vienna Phil re-production. At least, though, the
language that Levine and his performers were speaking was recognisably, if
not interestingly, Brahmsian. Their Schoenberg - the Five Orchestral Pieces,
Op. 16 - was incoherent, with exquisite detail followed by muzziness and
uncertainty (frankly, I wondered how completely the players had mastered the
music).
Their Debussy - La Mer - was simply grotesque: timbres worlds away from
idiomatic leanness, every percussion flicker turned into a slam and a bang
(the close of the first movement came direct from the J. Arthur Rank School
of Debussy Interpretation), not the faintest grasp of how to mould sentences
into paragraphs and thence into whole movements. The language of La Mer
seemed mystifyingly foreign to these executants; their attempts to conceal
incomprehension with regular recourse to inflated gesturing proved
unsuccessful, to put it politely.
Next VPO appearances on February 8, conductor Solti, and May 30, conductor
Muti
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3988</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Arts: London Sinfonietta tours its musical high spots -
Concerts on the South Bank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAX LOPPERT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
In this 25th anniversary season, the London Sinfonietta is making a special
point of re-visiting some of the 100-or-more works commissioned during its
years of existence. The current series is, indeed, a succession of carefully
timed self-back-pats - an entirely forgivable practice, after all, on the
part of a musical ensemble whose record in stimulating lively, enjoyable new
music has been so matchlessly crowded with success.
In the case of Tuesday's Queen Elizabeth Hall concert, conducted by Diego
Masson, it also resulted in a programme full of bounty. The act of reviving
past commissions from Simon Bainbridge (the limpid, witty 1983 Concertante
in moto perpetuo), Jonathan Lloyd (the zany yet richly substantial 1981
Waiting for Gozo), Mark-Anthony Turnage (the punchy, sweet-sour 1985 On All
Fours), Boulez (the luminous 1984 Derive 1) and Xenakis (the highly coloured
and exotic 1984 Thallein) amounted to more than just a tour of Sinfonietta
high-spots. It afforded an apt and refreshing reminder that the British
modern-music scene of the 1980s was neither monolithic, exclusive, nor riven
with doctrinal hostilities, and that it was capable of elating variety.
But the encouragement of the new is not being neglected: the anniversary
series is dotted with premieres. On Tuesday it was Colin Matthews's
Contraflow for 14 players, 12 tightly packed minutes in this composer's
exhilarating new vein of hard-edged discourse. The title Matthews used for
his BBC commission earlier this year, Broken Symmetry, could sensibly have
been used again to suggest the rhythmically pugnacious patterns set up, the
cross-currents of 'voice' and timbre.
Different solo instruments emerge above the fray at different points in the
unfolding to act as a form of traffic-signalling. The personality of the
Sinfonietta - both in its individual talents and their corporate combination
 -seems to have directly impinged on the bracing yet engaging character of
the argument, not to mention the beautifully achieved climactic slowing
toward reconciliation and repose.
Queen Elizabeth Hall: last concert in the current series on December 8
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3989</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Arts: Today's Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ITV's drama series Gone To Seed (8.00) is like a cross between a Dick
Whittington pantomime and a Carry On film, with quieter gags than you would
expect in either. The triplets, played by an impressive cast (Jim Broadbent,
Warren Clarke and Alison Steadman), are now back in their beloved garden
centre, the villainous Wesley has recovered health and nastiness, and Lucy
Lastic (try it out loud) breaks Monty's heart again. This is another drama
set in London's docklands. The incidence of arson in British schools last
year was an astonishing one in eight, the bill being Pounds 75m. Public Eye
finds the motives of the arsonists are little understood. There is only one
offenders' centre trying to deal with the problem (8.00 BBC2). There were
encouragingly few fingers wagged at us in the opening episode of Lynda La
Plante's crime series, Framed (9.00 ITV). Jackson, a young policeman, has
spotted an absconding supergrass in Spain. Now Jackson has been drafted in
to ensure the sybaritic crook is comfortable in his cell. BBC1 shows the
last episode of the excellent drama series about internal police
investigations, Between The Lines (9.30).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3990</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Arts: Docklands Sinfonietta provides competition - Concerts
on the South Bank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MURRAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
While Levine and the VPO performed, Sian Edwards was conducting the
Docklands Sinfonietta next door in the Queen Elizabeth Hall. They are an
excellent band, expert and enterprising, and this was a particularly
successful programme.
Their violins boast a cutting edge - keen rather than harsh, but never
emollient - which in Mendelssohn's Midsummer Night's Dream Overture reminded
us that there is rough, spine-tingling magic in the music, not just
faery-effects. The 'chamber'-size forces were exactly right for it; the
pizzicato violas, for example, told better against the scampering pp violins
than they ever do in big-band performances. Just one quibble: in Bottom's
hee-haws, the 'hee' was always played with a modern, drily literal staccato.
Even in Mendelssohn's time, no ass ever brayed like that, and if I were Miss
Edwards I should have insisted on having at least one violin palpably out of
tune for it.
The scathing DS string-address was electrical in young Britten's Rimbaud
study, Les Illuminations, the better to complement Joan Rodgers' bright and
searching soprano. For a long time, Les Illuminations was regularly smoothed
out to accommodate fluting English tenors; it has needed the rediscovery of
the Britten/Auden Our Hunting Fathers to remind us all that early Britten
could be abrasive, even nasty - but always clever. Here, Miss Rodgers did
eloquent justice nonetheless to the decadent, swooning numbers too.
Miss Edwards kept the ambiguous lines of Ligeti's Melodien lucent and
properly tantalising. In Haydn's D minor Symphony, no. 80, the Sinfonietta's
muscular elegance paid dividends. By comparison, almost any big-band
performance - such as Haydn could never have expected, until his later
London seasons - would seem bland, or too comfortably inflated. The English
Chamber Orchestra, the St. John's orchestra and the Academy of St.-
Martin's-in-the-Fields deserve some thrusting competition; the Docklands
ensemble supplies just that.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3991</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / People: Jones quits Welsh development role
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Gwyn Jones, one of Wales' younger entrepreneurs, is stepping down as
chairman of the Welsh Development Agency so that he can spend more time on
his growing business interests and his role as BBC governor for Wales.
The 44-year-old Jones, who was picked for the job by former Welsh secretary
Peter Walker in 1988, will remain chairman until March 31 1993, or until his
successor is appointed, if earlier. Prior to taking on the WDA job, Jones
had been a successful businessman, having set up, and sold, a computer
software business.
Although Jones had only recently been reappointed as chairman, his decision
to quit is not totally unexpected. Being a small country, Wales suffers from
a shortage of well qualified people to take on the growing number of public
appointments.
It has been known for some time that Jones was keen to lighten his workload,
especially since he took on the job of being the governor on the BBC board
representing Wales.
The WDA has been one of the more successful government-backed regional
agencies in attracting inward investment. Since Jones took over, it has
attracted twice as many projects as it did four years ago and last year
Wales topped the UK regional investment league table.
See Observer
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3992</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / People: Waddell to Shanks &amp; McEwan
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Shanks &amp; McEwan, the Glasgow-based waste management company, has appointed
Gordon Waddell to replace Peter Runciman as chairman at the end of the year.
A Glasgow-based boy who was capped 17 times for Scotland, Waddell went to
South Africa where he married the daughter of Harry Oppenheimer, the head of
mining group, Anglo American Corp. Reversing a more normal course of events,
Oppenheimer hired the persuasive Scot after Waddell had already separated
from his daughter.
In spite of sitting as a Progressive Party Member of Parliament in
Johannesburg for three years in the 1970s, Waddell decided not to settle in
South Africa and returned in 1988 to reacquaint himself with his Scottish
roots.
He is a director at Cadbury Schweppes and, in 1989, became chairman of
Fairway Group, the educational products group. And he sat alongside Peter
Runciman as a director of Scottish National Trust.
He becomes chairman only two months after joining the board, his elevation
apparently accelerated by an illness Runciman suffered 18 months ago.
Runciman, who is approaching 65, is unlikely to lack distractions. He
retains a large shareholding in Shanks, where he was first appointed as
company doctor 12 years ago when the company was capitalised at Pounds 12m
and losing money. Runciman is also a director of Scottish Opera and a
non-executive director of British Steel.
Though on the Environment Council of the CBI, Runciman is likely to increase
his attacks on the local wildlife - and not just on his own river. A keen
amateur of fly fishing, Runciman says he is close to tracking down suitable
stretches of river in Russia, where the sport is apparently hardly known.
See Observer
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3993</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / People: Refit at Austin Reed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Austin Reed, the clothing retailer and manufacturer that in October recorded
its first ever loss in the 28 weeks to August 8, has promoted Colin Evans,
the 48-year-old deputy chairman and director of the retail division, to the
new post of chief executive. At the same time, group managing director Neil
Fitton, is moved back to head the manufacturing side.
'This cleans up the management structure; it was getting a bit top heavy'
says Barry Reed, who explains that he has been 'both chairman, and, without
saying so, chief executive.' Evans (below) and Reed are cousins, both
grandsons of founder Austin Reed.
Reed, 61, says the plan is to put a younger team in place, whilst
acknowledging also that the creation of the role of chief executive
addresses the Cadbury recommendations on corporate governance. Evans has
been director of the retail division for the past two years, but Fitton has
had a much higher profile with the City.
Commenting on Fitton's effective demotion, which surprised analysts
yesterday, Reed explains how he 'came out of manufacturing and has great
ability on the manufacturing side.' Fitton had been group managing director
since 1985. Once marketing director of Chester Barrie, he became its
managing director in 1978 when it was acquired by Austin Reed. 'These are
difficult times. We must try and focus the group on the Austin Reed label.
We are after all first and foremost a retailing business which also has a
manufacturing side' adds Reed.
David Anderson, 61, former finance director and currently commercial
director, is retiring as an executive, but remains a non-executive director.
Jill Anders has been made company secretary.
*****
Roger Camrass, formerly a top consultant with the Butler Cox organisation,
has been appointed a European director of Arthur D Little, the US management
consultants.
Camrass will have responsibility in Europe for the 'high performance'
business initiative, a pet project of chief executive Charles La Manchia,
who is widely credited with restoring Arthur D Little's position among the
leading consultants.
The concept behind the slogan is doing things better rather than the same
things cheaper. It has much in common with the idea, fashionable at the
moment, of business process engineering in which every aspect of the
business goes under the microscope for re-evaluation. Camrass describes it
as identifying the fundamental barriers to progress within an organisation
and seeking ways to remove them.
Now 42, Camrass has been in technology management all his working life. A
Cambridge engineering graduate, he worked for Plessey when it was an
important force in telecommunications before joining Butler Cox, where he
ending up pioneering the consultancy's European operations as head of the
Benelux countries. Butler Cox was sold to CSC of the US in 1990.
Based in London, Camrass will be a member of Arthur D Little's information
management practice board.
*****
Guy Walker, chairman of Van den Bergh Foods, is to become chairman also of
Brooke Bond Foods, both Unilever companies; Peter Johnson, current chairman
of Brooke Bond, will retire in March.
*****
Leonard Magrill, director of strategic planning, has joined the board of
TEXACO Ltd.
*****
Brian Walton has been appointed md of BREVINI UK.
*****
Peter Merriman, formerly a director of Plessey Avionics responsible for
military avionics, has been appointed general manager at JASMIN SIMTEC,
manufacturer of electronic systems such as a nerve gas detection system and
a portable explosives detector.
*****
Stephen Johnson, formerly general manager, has been promoted to md of VOLVO
TRUCKS (Great Britain); he succeeds Bernt Brandtzaeg who has been appointed
vice-president of VOLVO TRUCKS EUROPE.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3994</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Technology: Cashless society in Denmark
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARGARET DOLLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Ole Christensen set off for work in the Danish town of Naestved without a
kroner in his pocket, but still managed to park his car on a meter, buy
lunch in the canteen, phone his wife from a call box and wash his shirt in
the launderette on the way home.
Instead of cash, Ole was carrying a new plastic prepayments card, which can
be used for a wide range of small transactions. His town is the pilot site
for the card, which the operating company, Danmont, claims is the most
advanced in the world. The service should become accessible throughout
Denmark by March. Henning Jensen, managing director, is already receiving
international inquiries.
Danmont differs from existing prepayments cards because it is an open
system, in which a card from any issuer can be used to buy services from any
participating supplier.
Eight banks and the local telephone company, KTAS, have so far issued 18
different designs of card with a value of Pounds 10 to Pounds 30. They
contain a microchip which deducts the value of each transaction and credits
the relevant supplier. Rechargeable cards should be available by 1994.
Henning Jensen says the cashless society is working well in Naestved. Some
4,000 cards have been tested in launderettes, food and drink vending
machines, parking meters and public telephones.
The system is geared to individual transactions averaging under Pounds 1,
which do not require a receipt. Danmont - set up just over a year ago by
KTAS and Danish Payments Systems, the direct debit card company - acts as a
central clearing house for payments.
For the cost of installing a terminal, and a flat fee of Pounds 125 a year,
suppliers get a secure and reliable method of charging which is
vandal-proof. Siemens is supplying the chip used in the cards and several
Danish suppliers have developed terminals.
Singapore will start testing a common stored value card next year, and
Atlanta plans one for the 1996 Olympic Games. Meanwhile, Danish equipment
manufacturers are helping to shape standards for an eventual common European
system.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3995</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Technology (Worth Watching): Season's greetings from festive
PCs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DELLA BRADSHAW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Print your own Christmas card with a festive font pack designed for those
using the latest Windows software. The Winter Holiday font pack produces
snow-capped letters for the verse, not to mention pictures of jolly Santas,
holly, snowflakes and even a turkey. To ensure the Pounds 14.95 package is
not just a one-week wonder, developers Bitstream of the US have also
incorporated a pumpkin for Halloween and hearts for Valentine's day.
Bitstream: US 617 497 6222. Fontware: UK, 0329 822857.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3996</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Technology (Worth Watching): Timesheets go out of the window
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DELLA BRADSHAW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
As the recession continues to bite, professionals who work on a
time-accountable basis - accountants and solicitors, for example - are under
increasing pressure to record accurately the time they spend on each
client's affairs. The ProTem 300 electronic aid has been designed to replace
the traditional timesheet and provide vital billing information.
The pocket-sized time recorder can be used in the office, or on the move,
and has sufficient memory for up to 6,000 client/project combinations. Every
few days the information is downloaded on to the office PC - ProTem works
with all commonly-used database and accounting packages. The gadget is
loaded with data from the PC. When a client calls, the user presses the 'on'
button, enters the name and the gadget does the rest. Pentica
Communications: UK, 0734 792101.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3997</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Technology (Worth Watching): Film makers put in the picture
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DELLA BRADSHAW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
With the eye-piece of a video recorder pressed against one eye it is often
difficult for would-be movie makers to envisage what their video will look
like when completed. That is why Japanese camcorder manufacturer Sharp has
designed a machine which incorporates a four-inch colour TV screen which
shows the user exactly what is being recorded without the need for an
eyepiece.
Although the liquid crystal display screen is on the rear of the camera it
can be swivelled round so that, using a remote control unit, film-makers can
record themselves.
The VL-HL1, as it is called, has just been launched in Japan, and will be
available in the US and Europe next year. Sharp: Japan, 06 621 1221.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3998</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Technology (Worth Watching): Writing on the wall for art
thieves
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DELLA BRADSHAW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A centralised database of works of art has been set up by a Palm Beach
County businessman to help prevent the trade in purloined paintings.
Roger J Mealey believes the database will enable insurance companies and
museums to ascertain whether a work is genuine or stolen. On registration by
the owner, an image of the picture is digitised and colour scanned.
Subscribers to the service then get access to the Sarte Collection records
using a computer and modem. Sarte Collection: US, 407 881 8095.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-3999</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Technology (Worth Watching): Teraflop takes on slower
dinosaurs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DELLA BRADSHAW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
To the uninitiated, a teraflop machine might sound like a dinosaur trap. To
those in the know, it is one of the fastest computers around.
The CS-2, developed by Meiko of Bristol, can carry out 100,000 times as many
instructions as today's most powerful personal computers or workstations in
the same time span. The company envisages that the teraflop machine will be
used for large database applications as well as the more traditional
supercomputer applications such as weather forecasting.
The CS-2 achieves such speed because thousands of processors work in
parallel - unlike conventional serial computers where each bit of data is
processed consecutively. Meiko: UK, 0454 616171.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4000</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Technology: Playing it again - Films on CD may soon replace
traditional videos, but far more is in store for viewers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Humphrey Bogart died 35 years ago, but he could soon return to the
entertainment world as the star of a new film on compact disc.
New developments in digital technology promise to make it possible to revive
past Hollywood stars such as Bogart from old films and put them in new ones.
At this stage, Hollywood studios are cagey about their plans for this
rapidly advancing technology. But by turning Bogart's image from the films
in which he starred into digital signals, which can then be manipulated,
they could make the star of Casablanca do things on CD that he never did on
celluloid.
That, however, is only one of the creative possibilities offered by digital
video. It has the potential to do for images what digital sound on CDs has
done for music - provide random access and the ability to make near-perfect
copies. There will be no need for rewinding to get to a particular sequence.
Nor will repeated viewing mar the image.
Intriguingly, films on digital video could have alternative story-lines, to
be selected according to the viewer's taste, or different characters could
be worked into the story. Imagine your favourite James Bond film with a new
ending.
Whatever surprises emerge, video seems set to move into a new generation.
For most consumers, video means products in analogue form such as cassette
tapes and laser discs. While digital audio has been available to consumers
in CDs for more than 10 years, it is only recently that work to digitise
picture information has approached the commercial stage.
That is because there is so much more information in a visual image than in
a sound recording. After conversion to digital signals, the image must be
squeezed sufficiently for storage on a CD.
'The picture is compressed and blown up again, and the trick is to do this
without people noticing,' explains Simon Turner, head of the interactive
systems group at the Philips Research Laboratories in Redhill in the UK.
Images have a compression factor of 133 compared with one of about four for
sound; so video compression requires far more processing power than sound
compression. At Redhill, where work to convert visual information into
digital signals and compress it (known as encoding) has gone on since 1989,
10 minutes of full-screen video used to take three weeks of continuous
processing with a mainframe computer.
But rapid advances in digital technology are bringing digital video closer
to the desktop and into the living room. Philips, the inventor of the CD,
has been working on the digitisation of video for the consumer market.
Next year, the Dutch group will bring out a device called a full-motion
video decoder to be slotted into its Compact Disc-Interactive machine, a new
type of home entertainment system the group launched last year at about
Pounds 500. It enables users to play with audio, graphics, data, animation
and photographs stored on CDs and viewed on their television TV screen.
When fitted into a CD-I machine, the FMV decoder - which will sell for about
Pounds 125 - will enable digital videos to be viewed on TV, but not to
manipulate them. CD-I sets incorporating FMV will also be launched in the
near future.
The challenge Philips faced in developing full motion video for consumer use
was to provide high-quality digital video at prices acceptable to the
consumer market.
That meant putting the decoding function - the conversion of the digital
signals into full motion video images that can be shown on the TV screen -
on a single chip and reducing the cost of the decoder. That work has been
carried out in close collaboration with Motorola, the US semiconductor and
communications group.
Meanwhile, the encoding time has been substantially reduced and Philips
expects to have a real-time encoding machine next year, which could encode
10 minutes of film in 10 minutes. Once the encoding and decoding hurdles
have been overcome, the manufacturing of digital videos on CD will cost no
more than audio CDs - about 50 pence.
But digital video is only one step towards the digitisation of visual
images. Expectations that moving images will increasingly be digital have
led companies in industries from telecommunications to computers and
semiconductors to join forces in the Moving Picture Experts Group and agree
an international standard for digital video encoding, known as MPEG-1. This
will be followed by MPEG-2 for products with a higher data rate such as
digital TV.
The quality of digital video based on MPEG-1 will depend to a large extent
on the quality of the original source but should be at least as good as
ordinary video tapes. Philips' demonstration videos using high-quality
original source material look considerably better.
But Philips is nonetheless dependent on the studios to come up with software
which does the quality justice and attracts consumer interest. Fortunately
for Philips, Hollywood studios and TV broadcasters are keen to develop
creative applications of digital video as another way to exploit the visual
material they own.
George Lucas, of Star Wars fame, is one of the many producers looking at the
creative possibilities of CD-I and full motion video.
Interest is also strong in the UK, where more than 20 studios are developing
applications. Wildvision, part of BBC Enterprises, is working on a game in
which a particular ecosystem is used as a backdrop to follow the adventures
of animals living there. 'We were immediately taken by the idea of
interactive video,' says Michael Bright, managing editor of Wildvision.
Philips expects to have 15 titles available in the spring with the launch of
full motion video and many more to follow as work at various studios
produces results.
While there are undoubtedly interesting ideas for interactive video, the big
question is whether any will be good enough to spark enough interest in the
new technology.
Without a few hot-selling applications, digital video could prove to be
ahead of its time and the market too slow to produce the dividends Philips
needs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4001</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Management: New breed on board - The Cadbury Committee's
emphasis on the role of non-executive directors
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A ticking timebomb was placed under the tables of corporate boardrooms
across Britain this week with the publication of the final report of the
committee on the financial aspects of corporate governance, chaired by Sir
Adrian Cadbury.
At the heart of the report is a series of guidelines which will require
fundamental change in the significance and responsibilities of non-executive
directors.
But while many businesses and professional bodies welcomed the conclusions,
some are beginning to question whether implementation of the recommendations
will be more evolutionary than explosive.
The Cadbury report places great emphasis on the influence that needs to be
exerted by independent, non-executive directors. If all goes to plan, the
days of sinecure appointments will be banished, as will the era of directors
appearing once a year for a comfortable doze in the boardroom after lunch.
Perhaps the most serious concern about non-executives which is raised by the
Cadbury Committee is whether there is an adequate supply of qualified,
independent people.
Colin St Johnston, managing director of Pro-Ned, an organisation which
promotes the role of non-executives, estimates that 95 per cent of quoted
companies now have non-executives on the board, against 50 per cent 10 years
ago.
Theoretically, there is no shortage of supply of non-executives. Pro-Ned
maintains a list of some 1,600 potential candidates. A number of executive
search firms also fill gaps in the market.
But there is a question over the quality of these candidates. St Johnston
says that while financial skills are well represented, those with marketing
experience or foreign language skills and overseas experience are limited.
More important is the fact that few companies are turning to external
sources to recruit. A recent study by Pro-Ned and the Stock Exchange showed
that most are still appointed via what Pro-Ned disapprovingly called the
'Old Boy Network'. Only about 30 per cent use a formal search process to
identify candidates and as few as 23 per cent have a written job profile to
help in selection.
The more demanding the calls on non-executive directors, the smaller the
pool from which to draw will be. Sir Adrian is confident that there are many
outside the well-trawled members of main boards who could be employed,
including those who sit on divisional boards and individuals drawn from the
public and the non-profit sectors.
Yet many names have remained, unused, on Pro-Ned's lists for years. This may
indicate a disappointingly low turnover of non-executives, a reluctance to
use more objective selection procedures, or a lack of quality of those
currently available.
The Cadbury recommendations clarify the roles of such directors, but a
distinction must be drawn between different parts of the report. One section
gives a code of 'best practice'. All quoted companies will be required to
make a statement in their annual accounts that they comply with the code, or
identify and explain any areas with which they do not.
The code requires non-executives 'of sufficient calibre and number' to
provide significant weight in the boardroom. They should be independent of
management, appointed for specified terms and selected through a formal
process.
But many of the stringent Cadbury recommendations fall into a separate
series of supplementary recommendations on 'good practice'. These include
the much-publicised suggestion that there should be a minimum of three
non-executives on every board.
They also include a number of important points, such as the need for at
least one meeting of the audit committee each year with the auditors and
without any executives present, to discuss unresolved issues of concern.
While some aspects of the formal code will be scrutinised by a company's
auditor to reassure shareholders that they are being followed, many of the
more subjective parts of the code, and none of the good practice guidance,
will come under the auditor's gaze.
That is not to say that many of the recommendations will not be followed.
The code has been designed to reflect existing best practice. A number of
companies are already responding to the heightened interest in the subject.
But one of the most revealing aspects of the final Cadbury report is the
changes which distinguish it from the draft issued in May. The press release
accompanying the report listed a number of changes introduced as a result of
consultation in the last six months, but some important dilutions were given
less emphasis.
Sir Adrian talks about a 'clarification' of the role of non-executive
directors, particularly regarding suggestions that they might be creating a
'two-tier board', rather than forming part of a single, unified structure.
That came in response to complaints from the Confederation of British
Industry and the Institute of Directors about casting non-executives
divisively in the role of policemen of the board.
In fact, there is a substantial diminution of the role and status of
non-executives. Gone from the final version is mention of the need for a
non-executive representing shareholders' interest, for instance.
It is true that all directors have the same liability under the law. But
equally the non-executives are intended to provide some degree of
independent scrutiny. That has to imply the existance of a two-tier
structure and may be no bad thing, as a submission to the Cadbury Committee
from the Institute of Chartered Accountants of Scotland pointed out.
Without this additional responsibility attached to non-executives, the only
external scrutiny comes directly from shareholders - particularly the
institutions - who have been widely criticised for their lack of activism up
till now.
All this suggests it will be many years before Cadbury's recommendations are
in place in the majority of British companies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4002</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Management: Life's compensations
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER LORENZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TUCKED away in this week's Cadbury Committee report on British corporate
governance is a little-noticed paragraph. It reads like a clause from the US
Freedom of Information Act. It concerns board remuneration, and starts: 'The
overriding principle . . . is that of openness. Shareholders are entitled to
a full and clear statement of directors' present and future benefits, and
how they have been determined.'
Barely seven weeks ago a similar declaration was made by the chairman of the
US Securities and Exchange Commission about what Americans persist in
calling executive 'compensation'.
Introducing a set of changes in the SEC's rules on the disclosure to
shareholders of such 'compensation', the commission's chairman said that
disclosure should be 'clear and complete'.
But there the similarities end. For the six-line clause on executive pay in
the Cadbury 'Code of Best Practice' is not only far from full by US
standards, but also somewhat less than clear.
By comparison, the SEC's 'fact sheet' about its new rules on compensation
disclosure runs to three full pages, backed up by a sheaf of charts and
explanatory notes.
The real extent of the yawning gulf between the two nations' interpretations
of 'full', 'clear' and 'complete' becomes evident from the content of the
two bodies' actual provisions.
In the SEC's case, these are fully-blown regulations, but in Cadbury's they
are mere recommendations - albeit reinforced by the threat of bad publicity
and shareholder pressure if companies fail to conform. From January US
companies will be required to include in proxy statements to shareholders a
set of tables, notes and reports. They include:
The 'compensation' of the chief executive, broken down into seven main
categories for each of the past three years: salary; bonus; a catch-all
category of five types of other annual compensation (including perks and tax
payment reimbursements); awards of restricted stock; awards of options and
stock appreciation rights; payouts under long-term incentive plans; and,
finally, a second catch-all category of five other types of compensation,
such as accrued earnings on deferred pay.
Including the itemisation required within certain notes, some
highly-rewarded executives could have to declare a dozen separate aspects of
compensation.
And that is just the start.
Precisely the same breakdown must be shown for the four other most
highly-paid senior executive officers (if they earn more than Dollars
100,000 a year).
All this information must be displayed in a large summary table, with each
of the five executives named. Other more detailed tables are also required,
covering employment contracts, termination agreements, various possible
eventual values of options and stock appreciation rights, plus other items.
The compensation committee must provide a detailed discussion of the
relationship between executive compensation and corporate performance.
I could continue this description at the same length again, but will desist.
Worried parties should contact the SEC direct.
The purpose of its new rules, along with changes introduced early this year
governing voting at company annual meetings, is to give shareholders more
influence over the level and structure of executive pay packages.
In comparison, the pay section of the Cadbury Code looks puny. It merely
recommends disclosure of directors' total 'emoluments' (again, an archaic
word), but as a group rather than individually. As at present, the only
identifiable individuals for whom any detail must be given are the chairman
and highest paid UK director, who are often the self-same person.
The code does say that, for these individuals and for the board as a whole,
a breakdown should be given between salary and performance-related elements
and that the basis for performance-measurement should be explained. But no
level of detail is prescribed for either of these. Nor is the controversial
subject of stock options mentioned in the code.
To anyone other than a self-interested British company director, the obvious
temptation from the foregoing might be to ridicule Cadbury's efforts. But
that would be wrong for two reasons.
First, the committee's recommendations are well ahead of actual British
corporate practice. According to Monks Partnership, a leading remuneration
consultancy, only eight of the companies in the FTSE-100 Index comply wholly
with Cadbury's pay guidelines (which also include an indication of the
existence and composition of a remuneration committee). Barely a third
explain incentive payments in any way; only a fifth show the performance
element in total board emoluments; and only an eighth show it in those of
the chairman or highest paid director.
In other words British disclosure practice is antediluvian compared with
that of the US.
The second factor is that the whole effectiveness of the Cadbury Code - of
which board pay is only a small part - relies on the creation of a consensus
among most companies that its clauses are fair, sensible and practical. At
this stage, to have threatened three or four more directors per boardroom
with disclosure of their individual pay arrangements would not have been
exactly tactful. Later, perhaps, but not now.
Cadbury's 'softly, softly' approach is one of several reasons why companies
which do not conform to the code must now move very rapidly to do so.
Otherwise they will bring on themselves - and everyone else - a much tougher
and regulatory regime.
Since Cadbury issued its draft report in May, the climate of London
financial opinion has begun to swing away from gentlemanly but ineffective
self-discipline, towards official regulation.
In any case, fuller pay disclosure is in a company's interest. The more open
it is, the less room there is for misunderstandings - or for justifiably bad
publicity - when shareholders and the media find out. But time is running
short for voluntary action.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4003</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / The Property Market: Brighter outlook for the
bargain-hunters - Lower values and reduced interest rates have created
opportunities for investors
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Is this the time for investors to move into the property market in the UK?
Counter-cyclical strategists - people who invest against prevailing trends -
can take heart from opinion polls that suggest that confidence in the
property industry has never been so low. At the same time, property yields
have rarely been so attractive compared to those of equities and bonds.
More encouragement can be taken from the impact of interest rate cuts and
the devaluation of sterling since mid-September following its exit from the
European exchange rate mechanism. Since then, property shares, which
anticipate movements in the underlying property market, have risen by 31 per
cent, nearly twice the rise of the rest of the stock market.
The cut in UK interest rates by three percentage points since Black
Wednesday has made many property acquisitions self-financing. Entrepreneurs
have found they could borrow money for five years fixed at, say, 8 3/4 per
cent to buy a good quality property with a yield of 10 per cent.
The cut in interest rates has stimulated a flurry of investment deals,
particularly in the City of London. German investors have been particularly
prominent following the devaluation of sterling. The latest such deal was
this week's Pounds 73m sale of MEPC's office building in Finsbury Circus in
the City to DIFA, a German property fund, on a yield of 8.6 per cent.
'It is the first time for many years that quality property of this calibre
could be acquired at a level which is presently self-financing,' said Mr
John Rigg, investment director of Debenham Tewson Chinnocks, which arranged
the deal.
The case for buying property largely rests on the unprecedented shift in
values in recent years. UK office values have now fallen to half their value
at the peak of property values three years ago.
The gap between property and equity yields, which was negligible in the
early 1980s, has now widened: property yields are now double the yields on
equities. At the same time, yields on property now stand at an unprecedented
1.3 points above gilts, according to the Investment Property Databank, a
research company.
Property yields are also well above short-term interest rates. This has
happened only twice before in the past 25 years. Both occasions - the Barber
boom of 1971 and the recovery from the 1974-75 property crash - were
auspicious for the property market.
A historical view can also provide a case for property as a means of
diversifying pension fund portfolios, which some actuaries believe are now
overexposed to equities.
'Over the past 25 years, property has produced a far better return than
gilts and has not lagged far behind equities. Of the three major media
(property, gilts and equities), returns from property have also been the
least volatile,' said Mr John Hetherington, an associate at Chesterton,
property adviser. 'The underlying reason for avoiding property is that
recent history remains more in the mind than that of the further past.'
But these arguments are not conclusive.
First, property yields are hardly inexplicably high. Property will have no
growth potential so long as supply exceeds demand. Indeed, rents are still
falling. Although investors expect retail rents to bottom out in 1993, they
expect industrial rental values to fall by a further 4 per cent over the
next 12 months and office rental values by another 8 per cent, says IPD.
Second, lower interest rates do not guarantee improved performance. This
point, which is already evident from the market's lack of response to a fall
in interest rates from 15 per cent to 7 per cent since 1990, is underlined
by the absence of a correlation between base rates and the performance of
the property sector over the past 20 years.
Even the striking coincidence between the property upturns of 1971 and 1977
and the decline of short-term interest rates below property yields may be
misleading. Kleinwort Benson, the investment bank, points out that with high
inflation, real interest rates were negative in 1971 and 1977. Real interest
rates are unlikely to fall below 2 per cent in the short term even with a
much looser monetary policy, it says.
Moreover, the decline in short-term interest rates has not impressed
institutions, which unlike more entrepreneurial investors, tend to compare
property yields with gilts. Gilt yields have fallen only modestly in recent
months, thanks to concern about inflation, the public sector borrowing
requirement (PSBR) and a drying-up of interest in UK gilts by overseas
investors.
When IPD conducted a survey of institution investors, it found that hopes of
a widespread and rapid fall in yields had evaporated. 'The average estimate
now is that only retail yields will fall significantly in the next 12
months, by about half a percentage point,' says IPD.
But perhaps the most sobering argument against assuming that falling
interest rates will help the property market is that asset values respond
less to the cost of money than its availability. There is little reason to
believe that the supply of credit to the property industry will expand while
the banks are nursing so many bad property loans.
Moreover, institutions are unlikely to increase their allocation to
property. Property has lost its reputation for stability, it has shrunk to a
minimal share of most pension funds' portfolios and the institutions'
cashflow is likely to be directed to gilts to finance the PSBR.
For all that, there are pockets of demand in the property industry. The
oversupply in the industry coupled with the conservatism of lenders and
investors is funneling demand into the relatively few buildings with good
tenants and long leases. At the other end of the scale, many buildings -
perhaps as much as half the market - are virtually unsellable.
With such a fragmented market, the case for buying property is neither
universal or overwhelming. Nonetheless, the fall in property values and
financing costs has created better opportunities than the market has seen in
years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4004</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / The Property Market: Devaluation, lower interest rates raise
hopes of industry's rescue
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
STERLING'S devaluation and lower interest rates in the UK have raised the
possibility that rising inflation will come to the rescue of the industry,
as it did after the property collapse of the early 1970s. Over the long term
rental growth has matched the rate of inflation, averaging 10 per cent a
year since 1970.
Inflation pushes up construction costs, which has a knock-on effect on
values. It also erodes the real value of debts and reduces real interest
rates, thereby depressing the sale of properties by overstretched companies.
Furthermore, inflation enhances the standing of property compared with bonds
for institutional investors.
But the benefits of inflation cannot be taken for granted. Even if retail
prices rise, this may not lead to asset inflation, which depends on weight
of money moving into property and forcing up prices. The inbalance between
supply and demand is likely to blunt the impact of inflation on rental
values for several years.
Moreover, it is possible that higher inflation will necessitate an increase
in interest rates before the fundamental problems of the market have been
resolved. The risk is that this would stifle occupational demand -
ultimately the only real saviour of the property sector.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
CHANGES IN PROPERTY VALUE
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Properties (%)              Retail                Office
                           Year to                Year to
                       Oct 92   Oct 92       Oct 92   Oct 92
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Rental growth            -2.0     -0.4        -15.8     -2.1
Capital growth           -1.5     -0.2        -14.0     -1.3
Total return              6.1      0.4         -6.2     -0.5
Current yield levels      9.0                  10.3
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Properties (%)          Industrial                    All
                           Year to                Year to
                       Oct 92   Oct 92       Oct 92   Oct 92
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Rental growth            -8.3     -1.3         -8.6     -1.2
Capital growth           -6.8     -0.8         -7.3     -0.7
Total return              2.4      0.0          0.7      0.0
Current yield levels     11.3                   9.9
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: IPD monthly index, Investment Property Databank
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4005</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Venezuela (7): A surge of confidence - Foreign
Investment
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOSEPH MANN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
VENEZUELA must be doing something right.
After years of lacklustre growth, direct foreign investment in this South
American republic soared by a record Dollars 2bn in 1991, from Dollars 440m
in 1990 and Dollars 640m in 1989, according to data provided by the
government and Conapri, a joint public and private enterprise that promotes
new investment.
Last year's foreign investment results were unexpectedly high because of
privatisation of the national telecommunications company, CANTV, which alone
netted the Venezuelan treasury Dollars 1.89bn. Some 72 per cent came from
international companies participating in the consortium that bought a
controlling interest in the CANTV.
As of last month, privatisations in 1992 had not generated any large capital
inflows from international companies. Nonetheless, foreign investment
remained strong. According to Mr Ricardo Hausmann, Venezuela's minister of
planning, foreign investment during the first eight months of 1992 increased
by Dollars 725m - a figure far ahead of 1991 if the CANTV privatisation is
excluded. Foreign investment figures include fresh capital outlays,
reinvestment of retained earnings and, in past years, proceeds of
debt-equity swaps.
This positive trend in Venezuela has several causes. At the start of its
five-year term in early 1989, the administration of President Carlos Andres
Perez ordered a series of important economic reforms aimed at reducing state
intervention in the economy, promoting competition from domestic and
international sources, giving private investment a greater role and
generally moving Venezuela toward a free market system.
The Perez government broadly liberalised its foreign investment code in 1990
with the approval of Decree 727, which eliminated most of the stumbling
blocks which international investors had complained about for years.
In March 1992, the government liberalised its foreign investment environment
even more. Decree 2,095 eliminated most of the restrictions which previously
reserved certain economic sectors for Venezuelan investors, and placed
foreign companies on the same legal footing as Venezuelan companies under
the rules applying to the Andean Common Market (Pacto Andino), a regional
integration group that includes Bolivia, Colombia, Ecuador, Peru and
Venezuela. It also allowed foreign concerns to include trademarks, patents,
and other specialised technology as capital contributions.
This more open environment for international investment - and for private
investment in general - is helping Venezuela to realise the potential for
growth that people have been talking about for years. Investors familiar
with Latin America have long been aware of Venezuela's competitive
advantages, which include:
low-cost energy from abundant hydroelectric power and large reserves of
fossil fuels;
major deposits of minerals such as iron ore, bauxite, gold, diamonds, coal
and others;
the largest proved reserves of crude oil outside the Middle East, plus large
gas deposits;
a modern physical infrastructure;
a young work force and a corps of managers experienced in international
business;
a good location for reaching markets in the US, Europe and Latin America;
a relatively small population (about 20m) with manageable problems.
The biggest share of foreign investment in 1992 came from CANTV, which was
privatised in December 1991 and is under the operating control of GTE of the
US. The CANTV alone reported 1992 investments of Dollars 510m to upgrade
telephone and telcommunications services.
An international consortium headed by GTE bought 40 per cent of shares -
plus operating control - of the inefficient telecommunications concern.
Foreign partners GTE, Telefonica Internacional (Spain) and AT&amp;T (US)
reportedly control 72 per cent of the consortium. Mr Bruce Haddad, CANTV's
president, said that the company plans to invest Dollars 6bn over the next
decade.
Venezuela's petrochemical sector, which is going through the largest
expansion in its history, has attracted considerable international
investment since 1989.
Some of the most important investors in new or continuing petrochemical
projects are Italy's Ecofuel (a unit of ENI); Mitsui (Japan); Spain's
Repsol; and three US groups - Olin, Combustion Engineering, International
Finance Corp, and Dow Chemical.
In mining, Monarch Resources Ltd., a Bermuda-based company, is investing
Dollars 23m in 1992-94 to develop a new gold mine, La Camorra, in
Venezuela's Guayana region.
A number of other companies are also investing in different sectors. They
include: Nestle and Heinz (processed foods), Smurfit (paper); the Grupo Once
from Spain (tourism); BAT Industries (tobacco and agribusiness); Procter &amp;
Gamble (personal use products); Chiquita Brands (bananas), and Iberia
(international air service).
Even Venezuela's petroleum production sector, off limits to private
investment since the oil industry was nationalised in 1976, has opened up.
Japan's Teikoku Oil and a group made up of Benton Oil (US) and Vinccler of
Venezuela signed operating agreements at the end of July 1992 covering the
production of crude oil in so-called 'marginal' oil fields.
The contracts call for the two groups to invest a total of Dollars 280m over
the next decade. The companies will not own the fields where they operate,
but will receive payments according to the volumes of crude oil and natural
gas they produce for PDVSA, Venezuela's national oil company.
Last month, Venezuela's Ministry of Energy and PDVSA called on foreign and
domestic companies to bid on a second series of oil production contracts.
PDVSA, hit hard by a combination of low oil prices and high Venezuelan
taxes, is also looking for international equity partners in areas such as
exploration, production and refining, which had excluded private investment
for 16 years.
Venezuela has been able to make substantial progress in foreign investment
during 1992, even though a failed military uprising in February provoked a
political crisis.
Foreign executives in general remain quite optimistic and give high marks to
the Perez regime for setting conditions for strong economic growth and
removing barriers to international capital.
They also point out that the government, over-dependent on dwindling
revenues from petroleum exports, clearly recognises the need for private
capital from Venezuelan and foreign investors if the economy is to continue
advancing. However, 1993 is a presidential election year and businessmen are
concerned that a populist politician may assume power in 1994.
Traditionally, investors in Venezuela put new projects on hold during
presidential election years as they wait to see what kind of economic
policies they will be facing during the next five-year period of government.
While some foreign investors may be holding back, especially for new
projects that would begin in 1993, most companies expect the next government
to maintain the free-market policies initiated in 1989.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4006</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Venezuela (8): Key facts
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Area                                                912,045 sq km
Population                                  20.3m (1991 estimate)
Head of State                       President Carlos Andres Perez
Currency                                             Bolivar (Bs)
Average exchange rate                     1991 Dollars 1=Bs56.82;
                                      16/11/92 Dollars 1=Bs77.37
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
ECONOMY
                                                      1991     Latest1
Total GDP (dollars bn)                                53.4         na
Real GDP growth (%)                                   10.4        4.22
GDP per capita (dollars)                             2,642         na
Components of GDP (%)
 Private consumption                                  67.2
 Total investment                                     18.7
 Government consumption                                9.4         na
 Exports                                              30.9
 Imports                                             -26.2
Retail prices (% change pa)                           34.2        33.3
Unemployment (% of lab force)                          8.7         na
Reserves minus gold (dollars bn)                      10.7         9.8
Money growth (% pa)                                   29.1        46.4
Govt bond yield (% pa, avg)                           27.1        29.7
Oil production (m barrels/day)                         2.3         na
% of world total                                       3.8         na
Total external debt (dollars bn)                      32.9       35.12
Debt service ratio (%)                                26.6         na
Current account balance (dollars bn)                   1.0       -1.52
Exports (dollars bn)                                  15.1       14.12
(of which petroleum exports)                          12.2       11.12
Imports (dollars bn)                                  10.2       11.72
Trade balance (dollars bn)                             4.9        2.42
Trade 1990 % by value                                Exports    Imports
US                                                    52.0        46.1
Germany                                                5.1         9.3
Cuba                                                   3.4           -
Japan                                                  3.2         3.9
Italy                                                    -         4.8
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
1 = 1992 figures (money growth July; bond yield Aug; consumer prices,
reserves - Sept)
2 = EIU estimate for 1992
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Sources: IMF, Opec, EIU
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4007</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Venezuela (6): Banks braced for tighter controls -
Finance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANN CHARTERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Venezuelan financial sector, so far relatively insulated from the
government's free market reforms, is expected to face foreign competition
and tougher banking standards if legislation scheduled to pass before March
wins congressional approval.
The legislation to modernise the financial system has been languishing in
Congress for the past 18 months. At long last, however, there appears to be
a consensus among the big banks - and therefore an end to opposition from
political parties - to endorse changes which would open the banks to
increased supervision and disclosure requirements, and permit substantial
foreign investment in the banking sector.
Venezuela's financial system is in serious need of reform. The country's
existing banking law is limited in scope and not suited to modern financial
services. Supervision of the banking system, under the control of the
Superintendency of Banks, which is part of the finance ministry, and to some
degree the Central Bank, has been traditionally lax.
According to a foreign banker, some commercial banks, the most important
group within the country's specialised financial system, 'have been doing a
lot of non-banking business' that has contributed to low-quality loan
portfolios. This includes making loans to companies in which bank executives
or directors are themselves investors.
The central bank recently moved to impose more order on commercial banks by
enforcing reserve requirements that some banks had ignored in the past. The
initiative caused liquidity problems at some financial institutions, which
competed for deposits by offering sky-high interest rates, even on savings
accounts.
Although impetus for change has come from some Venezuelan banks,
international developments have helped. Higher capital adequacy standards,
set by the Basle-based Bank for International Settlements, as well as
tougher regulations for foreign bank branches operating in the US, have
pushed the Venezuelan financial sector to endorse higher standards.
'Venezuelan banks are bowing to the inevitable,' said a foreign banker.
The legislation would create a stronger, more independent central bank, a
strengthened Superintendency of Banks with more oversight authority and
independent funding paid by the banks themselves, as well as clearer
guidelines for the financial sector.
The current banking law, a patchwork of legal requirements and prohibitions,
would be replaced by a modern law which specifies those activities banks may
not engage in, but which would permit the banks to carry on any
non-proscribed financial activity.
The law would include rules for financial statements, and degrees of
permitted concentration in loan portfolios to companies wholly or partially
owned by banks or their directors. Furthermore, higher equity/loan ratios
would be phased in. New policies in the latter two areas have already been
issued in advance.
Opening commercial banking and other financial services to direct foreign
investment in subsidiaries, branches or joint ventures has become less
controversial since large foreign banks already play an important role in
financing Venezuelan companies, through 70 representative offices or
investment banking units.
Wholesale banking operations are likely to continue to attract foreign
banks, but it is unlikely that there will be a stampede into the market.
Political uncertainty at the start of a presidential election year would
probably also act as a brake to any new foreign investment in banking over
the short term. However, some Venezuelan bankers are still worried that
their institutions (and power bases), whose stock is often cheap in foreign
currency terms, will be taken over by an international bank; they remain
opposed to opening up the system.
Some Venezuelan commercial banks with large retail networks may welcome a
capital injection from a foreign partner. Initially, the new banking law was
expected to cap the share owned by foreigners at 20 per cent, but the
current legislation leaves the ceiling open to the discretion of the
Ministry of Finance.
Freer access to new equity could be a boon to domestic banks. The president
of Banco Venezolano de Credito, Mr Oscar Garcia Mendoza, said that local
banks need to raise equity to 'grow and solidify the private sector'.
'We are so small that we couldn't even make a Dollars 100m loan to our state
petroleum company, PDVSA. It has to rely on foreign banks for the scale of
funding it requires,' he said.
Improving the Venezuelan financial system should pay other dividends in the
long run, attracting more foreign capital and investment. Even if
Venezuelans repatriated only the annual interest on the estimated Dollars
60bn that they have invested abroad, a big infusion of capital would take
place.
Attracting that capital is crucial to Venezuela's future, because domestic
financial savings have shrunk. According to one foreign bank active in
Venezuela, total financial assets on the balance sheets of all Venezuelan
financial institutions at the end of 1979 amounted to the equivalent of
Dollars 23bn. At the end of 1990 the same assets were Dollars 18bn - a
decline of 23 per cent in nominal terms, but over 50 per cent in real terms.
During the same period financial assets in the hands of Venezuelans abroad
are estimated to have tripled from Dollars 20bn to Dollars 60bn. Capital
fled the country largely because banks fixed interest rates and because
investors lacked confidence in the economy and expected the Venezuelan
bolivar to be devalued. 'Passage of the banking law will be a small but
important step in the right direction,' a banker commented.
A more modern banking system operating at international standards and
attracting new capital could better channel capital to other investments.
With the state-dominated economy now slowly being privatised, increasing
opportunities exist for investment.
'Our private sector is still too small,' Mr Garcia Mendoza said.
'Venezuelans have not saved in Venezuela because there was no place to
save.' The new banking law could well help change that habit.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4008</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Venezuela (9): Refineries open their doors -
Petrochemicals is expanding at rapid speed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOSEPH MANN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
VENEZUELA'S petrochemical sector, in the midst of the largest expansion in
its history, now depends less on capital investment from the government and
is trying to promote increased equity investment from abroad.
The industry is made up of a mixture of state-owned and private companies.
Pequiven (Petroquimica de Venezuela), a wholly owned subsidiary of the
national oil company, PDVSA, coordinates development of the petrochemical
industry.
It owns three large petrochemical complexes and has several plants of its
own. It is an equity partner in more than a score of joint-venture projects
with Venezuelan and international investors, covering plastics, oxygenates
(used to replace lead as an octane booster in motor petrol), industrial
chemicals and other products.
Petrochemical projects currently rank among the most important targets for
foreign investment in Venezuela. Recent projects with international partners
include a 500,000 tonnes per year mtbe plant, now in operation (partners:
Ecofuel, Pequiven and SF Mercantil): a facility for producing ethylene oxide
and ethylene glycol (Olin, IFC, Corimon, Pequiven); a linear-low density
polyethylene plant (Combustion Engineering; Pequiven, Grupo Zuliano and
Latino Soc. Financiera); and a specialty wax plant (Repsol, Pequiven and SF
Provincial).
In 1989-90, Pequiven initiated a programme designed to increase Venezuela's
petrochemical production capacity to around 16m tonnes a year. At the time
the programme was started, total capacity stood at a little over 3m tonnes;
currently, capacity exceeds 5m tonnes a year.
Pequiven, which has worked in partnership with private companies for many
years, has based its expansion plan on the existence of large reserves of
natural gas (more than 3.1 trillion cubic metres at the end of 1991) that
can be used as a feedstock for petrochemicals. While some of the new
facilities are being used to supply the domestic market, most are developed
with export markets in mind.
Until mid-1992, Pequiven was operating under a policy whereby it could hold
equity positions of up to 49 per cent in new joint ventures.
Pequiven's owner, PDVSA, realised, however, that it was being forced into a
prolonged cash-flow deficit, owing to low international oil prices, high
domestic taxes and the demands of a multi-billion dollar investment
programme. As a result, it decided to minimise all direct investments by
Pequiven and to encourage the development of new facilities that are 100 per
cent owed by private investors. PDVSA is also seeking increased foreign
investment for projects in oil and natural gas.
It recently named a veteran oil industry executive, Arnold Volkenborn, as
head of Pequiven. His task is to initiate the next stage of petrochemical
development, whereby Pequiven will be more of a promoter than an investor.
PDVSA also plans for Pequiven to offer some of its own shares to the public,
and to sell part of its stock portfolio in the joint ventures.
Pequiven and the joint-venture petrochemical companies continue to make good
progress. In 1991, Pequiven's fully-owned facilities produced 2.43m tonnes
of products, up slightly from 1990, while the joint-venture partnerships
produced 1.34m tonnes, a 30 per cent increase over the previous year.
Petrochemical plants outside Venezuela where Pequiven holds full or partial
ownership produced 3.5m tonnes in 1991. Pequiven had 1991 sales of Dollars
448m, and invested Dollars 439m during the year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4009</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Venezuela (3): Drawbacks of over-reliance on oil -
The irony of an economy booming in the midst of political turmoil
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN FIDLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
VENEZUELA represents one of Latin America's great puzzles. A country that
for the last three years has enjoyed one of the fastest economic growth
rates in the world is suffering political and social turmoil, two military
coups in the space of a year, all supposedly because of an economic
austerity programme.
Yet there is little evidence of austerity. After growing 6.5 per cent in
1990 and 10.4 per cent last year, the Venezuelan economy will probably
expand this year by more than 8 per cent. Growth from the third quarter last
year to the third quarter this has been 10.6 per cent; in the first nine
months of this year, the non-oil private sector grew by 13 1/2 per cent.
President Carlos Andres Perez's first year in office, 1989, was indeed
tough, with the economy shrinking by 9 per cent. Since then, however, growth
has been impressive and not only to the benefit of the rich.
There is strong evidence to suggest that Venezuela's poor have been
significant beneficiaries too. Sales of processed foods in October were 24
per cent higher than in October 1991, and are predicted to continue to show
strong growth.
Unemployment has dropped by some 100,000 people on the last 12 months, to
around 7.7 per cent of the workforce, ignoring an informal economy which is
also said to be livelier. The government estimates that with the 170,000
people who joined the workforce over the last year, some 270,000 new jobs
have been created, nearly all in the private sector. Real wages have been
rising.
According to the government, far from creating economic austerity, its
economic reforms have unleashed the productive potential of the private
sector. 'Three years down the road you can see the policy is paying off in
generating higher living standards,' says Mr Ricardo Hausmann, minister of
planning.
These reforms - which have included the lifting of a raft of government
controls on prices, foreign exchange, imports and credit - have yielded
other benefits, such as a flow of new products into the Venezuelan market.
Price controls, for example, discouraged pharmaceutical companies from
introducing new drugs into the Venezuelan market. Now, able to set prices to
make a profit, the companies are introducing new products into the country.
Unsurprisingly, there are signs that the economy is overheating. Interest
rates were sharply increased in October to prevent a run on the currency to
levels likely to slow growth next year.
The government is also behind others in Latin America in securing control
over its own finances. This problem is not entirely of its own making, since
it has not yet been able to secure support for tax reform proposals from a
truculent Congress.
A budget deficit of 3-4 per cent this year seems unlikely to be
significantly improved upon next year. Although the government argues that
the state oil company's borrowing should not be calculated as part of the
government deficit, this is a factor which will make it difficult for the
government to bring down inflation from its present level of nearly 35 per
cent.
Part of the problem stems from the country's historical overdependence on
oil, which still accounts for four-fifths of exports and the same proportion
of government revenues. As a result, the country's economic fortunes are too
closely tied to the volatile oil market.
This means, for example, that the government raises only 5 per cent of GDP
in non-oil taxes, the rest coming from Petroleos de Venezuela (PDVSA), the
state oil company. So, when oil prices drop, not only does the current
account swing into deficit but so do the government finances.
In the 1970s, when oil prices were rising, the government used the state oil
company as a milch cow; in the 1980s, it never got out of the habit.
Now, however, it has some hard choices to make. The transfers to the
government required of Petroleos de Venezuela threaten to become too high to
sustain the company's investment programme, needed in part to ensure it is
adequately equipped to meet tougher environmental standards for oil products
in the US and elsewhere.
The government's solution has been to slow PDVSA's investment programme,
encourage more private investment in the oil industry, cut government
spending in other areas and attempt to enlarge its tax take from other
sources.
The government has made some changes to the tax code - such as raising
penalty rates for non-payment - and secured passage of a public credit law,
which prevents the government from giving guarantees to public or private
sector enterprises and stops the military from issuing promissory notes.
Other tax changes (watered down from the government's original proposals)
await approval from Congress, including a sales tax and a business assets
tax. But, even if passed, most private observers say the government's
estimate that the new taxes will raise 3 per cent of GDP next year is
over-optimistic.
It has also introduced other legislation, which would provide for a more
independent central bank and speed the privatisation process, for example by
allowing the sale of enterprises through capital markets.
Government finances should be helped somewhat by the sharp devaluation in
October of the bolivar: since much of its income is related to international
oil prices, a devaluation boosts government revenues in local currency.
However, partly because of the negative impact on inflation and on foreign
investment (which held up remarkably well in the first half of the year
despite the coup attempt), it does not provide a long-term solution.
Ironically, such a solution might be simpler in Venezuela than in some other
countries. Because the non-oil tax take is so low, increasing it
significantly should be quite easy.
Finance officials estimate that stopping tax evasion could almost double
non-oil tax revenues; PDVSA reckons that charging Venezuelans international
prices for gasoline (rather than the 6 1/2 US cents a litre they currently
pay) would raise an extra Dollars 1.25bn a year for the oil company.
The oil company estimates that fuel prices only account for 8 per cent of
the cost of public transport, so the impact on the poor of a petrol price
increase would be limited.
If the impact on social equity was still viewed as important, subsidies for
public transport - along the lines of the successful direct food subsidies
for the poor that have mostly replaced generalised subsidies - could be
introduced.
Such solutions are, however, likely to be politically too hot to handle
before next year's congressional and presidential elections.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4010</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Venezuela (4): Squeezed between rising taxes and
depressed prices - Oil industry tackles opposing pressures
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOSEPH MANN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
VENEZUELA'S national oil company, Petroleos de Venezuela SA (PDVSA), faces
some serious difficulties which are not of its own making.
PDVSA, with 1991 gross international sales of Dollars 22.3bn, is squeezed
between weak oil prices and steep taxes and investment requirements. While
the company remains well-managed, efficient and profitable, the current
situation has produced serious cash flow problems and has forced PDVSA to
acquire nearly Dollars 5bn in debt, having been debt-free only a few years
ago.
It also has been obliged to stretch out its capital investment programme and
seek international equity partners for projects in petroleum sectors that
previously had been off limits to private investment.
Like other major international oil companies, PDVSA is suffering from the
effects of low oil prices on world markets. This year, the average export
price for PDVSA crude and refined products through mid-November fell below
last year's price of Dollars 15.92 per barrel. The export price was Dollars
20.33 per barrel in 1990 and Dollars 17.85 per barrel in 1989.
And, like other big suppliers of refined petroleum products to the US
market, PDVSA - the world's third largest oil refiner - must spend large
sums on upgrading its refining complexes in order to meet tougher
environmental standards for key export products such as gasoline.
PDVSA expects to invest at least Dollars 3.6bn in refinery improvements over
the next several years to meet or exceed provisions of the US Clean Air Act,
and to ensure compliance with environmental regulations in other places
where it sells refined products, especially Europe.
These investments are also aimed at permitting PDVSA's home refineries to
process increased volumes of heavy crude, which is abundant in Venezuela.
(Apart from four refining complexes in Venezuela, PDVSA wholly or partially
owns large oil refining and petrochemical plants in the US and Europe.)
In addition, PDVSA must constantly invest huge sums in crude oil production.
The country's oil fields suffer a potential decline in output of 22-23 per
cent per annum, which means that PDVSA must invest over Dollars 2bn a year
simply to maintain crude output at the present capacity level.
The company is also building new production potential, which requires even
greater investments. Its target is to raise crude oil production capacity
from the current level of 2.8m b/d to 4m b/d by 2002. 'PDVSA must grow,'
said Mr Alirio Parra, Venezuela's Minister of Energy and Mines.
At the same time, PDVSA is being slowly strangled by a heavy tax burden at
home. The company currently pays at least 82 per cent of its operating
profits to the Venezuelan Treasury in taxes and royalties. (The maximum
corporate tax rate for companies outside the oil sector is 30 per cent.) And
since the Venezuelan government relies on oil to provide most if its
revenues (despite years of talking about diversification), a dramatic
reduction in PDVSA's tax burden cannot be made overnight.
Working together, Energy Minister Parra and the president of PDVSA, Mr
Gustavo Roosen, have been able to develop some solutions to the company's
problems, although relief will not be immediate.
The Energy Ministry, which draws up policy guidelines for PDVSA, has eased
the company's tax burden slightly this year by adjusting the export value
system.
Export values of crude and refined products are used as a base to calculate
PDVSA income taxes. The minister also has introduced legislation that would
phase out the export value system on a staggered basis by 1996, and has
changed some accounting rules applied to PDVSA's books and tax declarations.
These initiatives will provide substantial tax savings for the national oil
company in coming years, but will not pull the fiscal carpet out from under
the the government.
Other changes are also being studied to ease PDVSA's tax burden. Taken as a
whole, these measures should ensure that PDVSA will be able to push ahead
comfortably with future investments and continue to generate net profits.
The government itself has proposed new taxes, including a version of VAT,
that will make it less dependent on the vicissitudes of its main commodity,
petroleum.
PDVSA is moving ahead with direct investments in production and refining,
which are necessary if the company is to maintain its international market
share. But it has stretched out some projects contained in its medium term
investment plan, delayed others and is looking to international capital to
develop a variety of joint-venture projects in heavy oil, refining, natural
gas and other areas that were formerly the exclusive domain of PDVSA and its
subsidiaries.
'The most limited resource that the the petroleum industry has today is
money,' said PDVSA president Roosen. 'I don't want things to be left undone
simply because we don't have the cash.' The company's current investment
plan through 2002 totals Dollars 40bn, at 1992 prices.
Of this total, PDVSA will carry out direct capital spending of Dollars 28bn,
while it hopes that international investors - either acting alone or in
joint ventures with the company - will invest another Dollars 12bn. Apart
from newly targeted areas for foreign investment such as oil production and
refining, PDVSA has established - or is negotiating - joint ventures with
Venezuelan and international partners in natural gas, petrochemicals, coal
and Orimulsion, a new fuel that is an emulsion of bitumen and water. PDVSA
is marketing Orimulsion as an alternative to coal in electric power plants.
To save money, PDVSA also has cut its operating and capital budgets this
year, and will continue controlling costs in 1993. Capital spending for 1992
is expected to reach Dollars 3.7bn, about the same as last year.
PDVSA this year opened the door to limited-scale private investment in oil
production. It asked oil companies from Venezuela and abroad to bid on crude
oil production contracts covering a series of old oil fields that PDVSA
itself did not want to reactivate.
As a result, two groups made up of Benton Oil (US)/Vinccler (Venezuela) and
Teikoku Oil of Japan signed operating contracts under which they pledged to
invest Dollars 280m over the next 10 years to develop new production from
marginal oil fields in eastern Guarico state and southeastern Monagas state.
The two groups will not own the oil and natural gas they produce, but will
turn it over to PDVSA subsidiaries and receive compensation according to the
volumes of oil they can pump.
Last month, Energy Minister Parra announced that the government and PDVSA
were seeking bids for production contracts on 73 other marginal fields with
total proven oil reserves of more than 1.2bn barrels.
Heavy oil is an important resource for PDVSA. Venezuela has the world's
largest known deposits of bitumen and extra-heavy crude in the Orinoco Belt,
an area that lies north of the Orinoco River. Heavy and extra-heavy crude
oils contain high levels of carbon, sulphur and metals that must be removed
at high cost before the crude can be processed in normal oil refineries.
PDVSA has two main approaches to developing its reserves of bitumen and
extra-heavy crudes. The first is an international marketing programme for
Orimulsion, a fuel composed of bitumen and water that is made by PDVSA
subsidiaries. The second involves seeking a foreign partner who can provide
technology and capital for developing new production of extra-heavy crudes
and converting them into lighter, higher quality oils (called syncrudes)
that can be processed in normal refineries.
An upgrading plant using Veba Oel technology to produce 131,000 b/d of
synthetic crude oil, for example, would cost over Dollars 4bn. PDVSA has
signed letters of intent with more than a dozen international oil companies
with the idea of developing strategic business associations in heavy oil.
Due to the long start-up period for heavy oil projects of this type, the
government and PDVSA plan to offer investors access to light/medium crude
oils during the first stage of project development. This would give
investors a positive cash flow until the heavy oil processing plant could go
on stream. PDVSA is currently considering offers on heavy oil projects from
Conoco, Veba Oel, Elf Aquitaine, Mobil and Total.
 ------------------------------------------------------------
PDVSA: DIRECT INVESTMENT 1993-98 (DOLLARS BN)
 ------------------------------------------------------------
Sector investments per cent of total
Total maintaining production capacity            13/65
Upgrading refineries in Venezuela               3.6/18
Increasing crude oil production potential        1.4/7
Exploration                                      1.5/8
Venezuelan market                              0.252/1
Support activities and others                  0.182/1
 ------------------------------------------------------------
 ------------------------------------------------------------
PROVED RESERVES OF CRUDE OIL
 ------------------------------------------------------------
(billions of barrels at year end)
  1976     1987     1988     1989     1990     1991
18,228   58,084   58,504   59,041   60,055   62,650
 ------------------------------------------------------------
Source: PDVSA
 ------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4011</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Venezuela (5): Treacly rival to coal and oil - The
potential and pitfalls of a new fuel from the Orinoco
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOSEPH MANN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN the mid-1980s, Venezuela's PDVSA and BP developed a new fuel called
Orimulsion.
Orimulsion, now registered by PDVSA as a trade name, is an emulsion made up
of approximately 70 per cent natural bitumen by volume, and 30 per cent
water, plus a surfactant, or additive to keep the mixture stable.
It is being marketed as a fuel for electric power generation plants and
other industrial facilities that generate power.
The motivation for developing this fuel came from the huge reserves of
bitumen and extra-heavy crude oil that Venezuela possesses in the Orinoco
Belt, the world's largest deposits of their type.
PDVSA has estimated that the Orinoco Belt holds 1.2 trillion barrels of
bitumen and heavy oil in place, and that around 270bn barrels can be
recovered for commercial use.
Orimulsion has been tested commercially in Canada, Japan and the UK, and
PDVSA has signed long-term contracts to supply the product to power plants
in these countries and Spain. PowerGen's Ince B plant is one of the plants
in Britain where Orimulsion is used.
In 1991, PDVSA produced 1.1m tonnes of Orimulsion, four times its output the
previous year. Sales to international clients reached 885,000 tonnes in
1991, up 700,000 tonnes from 1990.
Through its subsidiary Bitor, as well as joint ventures between Bitor, BP
and Mitsubishi, PDVSA is aggressively marketing Orimulsion internationally.
The company's goal is to be producing - and selling - around 41m tonnes per
annum by 1996.
PDVSA is pushing Orimulsion as an economical, long-term alternative to coal
and fuel oil. It can be transported and stored like fuel oil, and, unlike
coal, does not raise dust during transportation.
The company says that relatively small investments are required to adapt
plants that burn fuel oil to Orimulsion. However, some serious questions
have been raised in the US and the UK about pollution problems that might be
associated with this new fuel, including emissions of sulphur dioxide and
nitrogen oxide (the two main acid rain gases), particles and others.
PDVSA asserts that Orimulsion compares favourably with other fossil fuels in
terms of environmental impact.
Citing the results of independent tests and commercial applications, PDVSA
says that Orimulsion produces levels of sulphur dioxide emissions that are
lower than those produced by 2.5 per cent sulphur coal and slightly higher
than 3.5 per cent sulphur fuel oil.
It also asserts that Orimulsion's high caloric value means that lower
volumes will be burned (and thus less sulphur dioxide released) than by
fuels with less caloric value, to generate the same amount of energy.
As for nitrogen oxide emissions, PDVSA states that Orimulsion produces less
than coal and the same or less than fuel oil. The company says that
Orimulsion burned in conventional power stations produces about 20 per cent
less carbon dioxide than equivalent coal-fired stations, and levels similar
to plants burning fuel oil.
Particle emissions, PDVSA states, are 'well within the strictest limits set
by developed industrialised countries", and acid smuts are unlikely in power
stations burning Orimulsion.
In test spills, a high percentage of Orimulsion disperses of its own accord,
the company says.
At the same time, PDVSA's R&amp;D unit, Intevep, has produced a 'second
generation' of Orimulsion that is supposed to be cleaner than the first.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
PDVSA'S PERFORMANCE IN 1991
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Production (crude oil)                                  2.34m b/d
Exports of crude oil and refined products               2.12m b/d
Proved reserves of crude oil at year end           62.7bn barrels
Employees (not counting contracted workers)                54,850
Sales of refined products on Venezuelan market        340,000 b/d
Gross international revenues                       dollars 22.3bn
Average per barrel export price                     dollars 15.92
Pre-tax earnings                                    dollars 9.1bn
Taxes paid to Venezuelan treasury                   dollars 8.7bn
Operating costs in Venezuela                        dollars 4.1bn
Net earnings                                         dollars 441m
Capital investments                                 dollars 3.7bn
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: PDVSA
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4012</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Venezuela (1): A nettle to be grasped - One of
Latin America's most consistent democracies has just witnessed the collapse
of its second army rebellion in 10 months. Stephen Fidler contrasts its
political and social turmoil with its high-speed economic expansion
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN FIDLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
For the second time in a year, members of the Venezuelan armed forces failed
on Friday in a violent attempt to unseat the elected government of Carlos
Andres Perez. The attempted coup reinforced the impression of a country
simmering with political, social and military discontent, of an unstable
society about to boil over.
Since the first coup attempt in February, the government of President Carlos
Andres Perez has been embattled, at loggerheads with Congress and deeply
unpopular in the country at large.
Yet Venezuela is an enigma. One of the continent's longest-standing
democracies, it has been ruled by elected governments since 1958. With its
vast reserves of oil, its problems are, on the face of it, the most
tractable in Latin America.
At the same time its economy has been the fastest-growing in the world last
year, expanding 10.4 per cent, after 1990 growth which approached 7 per
cent. This year growth will probably exceed 8 per cent.
While some of this growth may be down in part to an influx of illegal drugs
money over the country's newly open borders, it cannot be denied that the
poor are benefiting. Consumption of basic foodstuffs has risen
spectacularly. The Venezuela-American Chamber of Commerce, whose membership
has a good grasp of the subject, reports sales of processed foods in October
up 24 per cent on a year earlier.
The government says recent growth has only been possible because the private
sector has been freed by the Perez administration's economic deregulation
programme.
The lifting of controls has had other effects which, in the view of some
government supporters, provides a clue to the political opposition which the
government has encountered and which have blocked further attempts at
reform.
'One of the reasons for the political turmoil is that the economic programme
has made political favouritism a dying industry . . . Price controls, import
controls, exchange controls, credit controls have all gone. That affects a
whole segment of the economy and has a big impact on the patronage that was
oiling a big political sector,' said one minister.
These measures, the government's chronic shortage of money and the
relentless vigilance of an aggressive press have probably reduced
opportunities for corruption, even as the country has become progressively
more obsessed by it.
The government has also alleviated some of the worst effects of its policies
on the poor, through food support programmes which have replaced, for the
most part, generalised food subsidies. The government spends 10 per cent of
its budget on these programmes and plans to increase their coverage next
year.
This is not to say that Venezuelans - whose per capita annual income of
Dollars 2,450 is hardly changed from 15-20 years ago - do not have
legitimate grievances. The president has aggravated these concerns by
appearing aloof and isolated. A man with the political skills to persuade
Venezuelans of the importance of economic reform, he has failed to do so.
The government's most significant failure is its inability to improve much
on the abysmal levels of public services. 'I've doubts about the meaning of
growth,' said Mr Ramon Pinango, academic director at IESA, the leading
business school. 'Public services are getting worse: education is
deteriorating, so is health care, and public safety is getting worse.'
Government utilities - or rather their customers - are suffering from a lack
of maintenance of plant installed in the oil boom years of the 1970s. Large
areas of Caracas, for example, are suffering cuts in their water supply for
days on end.
Some efficiencies can be obtained by improving management of the current
system. There are also signs of a possible way ahead through the
de-centralisation of the political system. In a country where teachers are
regularly found to be functionally illiterate, education standards in some
states have been raised by requiring teachers to pass tests before they are
employed.
Privatisation offers a solution to other problems: private ownership or
management of utilities enables cash-short governments to encourage
investment.
The disaffection within the military is in part another manifestation of the
government's inability to distribute the kind of largesse to which its
citizens and employees became accustomed in the 1970s.
In part, too, it reflects the loss of a sense of purpose and of prestige in
the military, which now faces neither political extremism nor threat from
neighbouring countries.
Unless and until the government tackles the issue of shrinking the armed
forces - allowing it to raise salaries and improve conditions of service -
military unrest looks likely to remain an unpredictable possibility which
future governments (and prospective foreign investors) will be unable to
ignore.
The crisis in Venezuela's public services has arisen largely because the
1970s oil price boom allowed the postponement, by successive Venezuelan
governments, of tough fiscal decisions forced on most other Latin economies
in the 1980s. It was left to the Perez government to attempt to wean
Venezuelans away from their overdependence - financial and psychological -
on oil. In a Dollars 50bn economy in which, even during the bad times, oil
generates Dollars 10bn in export revenues, this has proved no mean task.
Sooner or later a Venezuelan government will have to grasp the fiscal
nettle: it will need to induce Venezuelans to pay the proper price for the
goods and services they receive and to pay taxes.
This should not be as difficult as it is proving. The government's non-oil
revenues are equivalent to a meagre 5 per cent of GDP. Clamping down on tax
evasion - as has occurred in Argentina - could yield big benefits, because
some estimates suggest that only 35 per cent of taxes due are paid. Raising
petrol prices - now the lowest in the world - to international levels would
alone yield 2.5 per cent of GDP, according to calculations by Petroleos de
Venezuela.
Only when the government is in control of its finances can it start - in
conjunction with sectoral reforms - to raise the appalling standards of
public services.
This will involve a recognition - among politicians, trade unionists and the
wealthy and middle-class Venezuelans whose opposition to reform has been
most articulate - that their stake in the country will require them, just
like the citizens of other countries, to pay taxes.
This in turn will require a sense that the political system itself is worthy
of support: a belief that may be fostered by the increasing number of local
and national politicians who will be directly elected in forthcoming
elections.
The government is optimistic that after Sunday's local elections some of the
reforms it has been pushing, including a modest tax change, will be passed.
More fundamental change will probably have to wait until after congressional
and presidential elections at the end of next year.
What will happen after that is a matter for conjecture. Currently, the
country's two most popular figures both reflect a wish for a return to the
past: Lt Col Hugo Chavez, the leader of the February revolt, and Mr Rafael
Caldera, a distinguished 77-year-old former president who represents the
political old guard. Mr Caldera, not yet an official presidential candidate,
is unwilling to be too specific about his platform, but he makes no secret
of his wish to reverse some reforms of the current administration. He would
also seek, he says, further alleviation of Venezuela's foreign debt.
The prospect of a Caldera government worries many businessmen and bankers.
With little prospect of another oil boom, whoever takes office in February
1994 will face tough choices. Perhaps the failure of Venezuelans to heed the
military's call for a popular rebellion last Friday reflects a sense that
even for a society with huge oil reserves, there are no magic solutions.
On the other hand, the rebellion will cast a pall of uncertainty over 1993
and may fatally damage the long-term confidence of investors.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4013</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Survey of Venezuela (2): Jittery prelude to a year of
elections - Lessons of the coups that failed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOSEPH MANN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
VENEZUELA'S political system was pushed into crisis in February by a
military uprising aimed at toppling the elected government of President
Carlos Andres Perez. It is too early to tell whether last week's second
abortive coup of 1992 will further retard - or accelerate - efforts to
restore stability to the system.
The small group of officers who led the February rebellion in the army said,
among other things, that they wanted to eliminate corruption in the
political and military establishments, get rid of a vitiated political
system, end economic policies that condemned most Venezuelans to poverty and
guarantee Venezuela's sovereign rights in dealings with foreign powers.
Last week's attempt suggested the disaffection spread further into the armed
forces than had hitherto been expected, with units of the air force, navy
and national guard joining the army in the rebellion.
The rebels' February statements struck a chord among Venezuelans, but after
the November putsch the public reaction appeared more negative. Many people
appeared to reject military government. The attempted coups, actions not
seen in Venezuela since the days of left-and right-wing violence in the
early 1960s, unleashed waves of anti-government and anti-system sentiments,
and pushed the political parties into crisis.
The military remained uneasy after February and political violence erupted
when a small group of civilians tried to assassinate individuals they
identified as corrupt. Violent street protests organised by leftists and
students caused widespread public concern during the first half of the year,
but tapered off after July. Last week, military appeals for people to take
to the streets in support of the rebels were largely ignored.
President Perez, whose five-year term of office is due to last until
February 1994, has had to fight off public calls for his resignation, and
his administration has been under constant attack for its support of free
market reforms and its failure to make any significant improvements in
public services such as water, health, education, transportation and public
safety.
The two main political parties, President Perez's Accion Democratica (AD)
and the main opposition group, the Christian Democrat Copei Party, have been
wracked by divisions and contradictions.
Sometimes supporting Perez on key issues, the two groups have also attacked
his government on fundamental policies. They have failed either to establish
a clear line of support for the besieged government or to offer a coherent
and credible opposition.
Perez's AD party has been sharply divided over his economic policies since
the first months of his presidency. Only two small leftist parties, MAS and
Causa R, have been consistent in their demand for his resignation and the
scrapping of economic reforms initiated in 1989.
Most people now focus their anger on President Perez, blaming him for
practically everything that is wrong in Venezuela.
Ironically, it is Mr Perez, a product of the old system (where a small group
of AD and Copei leaders controlled most major policy decisions) and a man
severely criticised for allowing widespread corruption during his first
presidential term in 1974-79, who for nearly four years has made the
greatest efforts at reforming Venezuela's economic and political systems.
Public opinion polls taken since February consistently give Mr Perez and his
administration very low approval ratings. (They also received poor ratings
before the putsch.) And to varying degrees, most of the country's prominent
politicians - including the AD and Copei leaders who want to run for
president in 1994 - also obtain poor rankings.
Two figures have remained highly popular since February: Lt. Col. Hugo
Chavez, who led the February uprising, and former President Rafael Caldera,
the founder of Copei who was chief executive from 1969-74. Chavez, who has
become something of a folk hero, is still in jail awaiting a court martial.
Mr Caldera, 77, is widely respected for his honesty and intelligence. His
popularity rocketed on the day of the February revolt when, in an
impassioned speech to Congress, he said it was difficult to ask Venezuelans
to sacrifice themselves to defend a regime that failed to feed the people.
The former president currently is a leading potential candidate for the
presidential race in 1993, in competition with his former protege, Mr
Eduardo Fernandez, secretary general of Copei. Mr Caldera and Mr Fernandez
fell out after the younger politician defeated the Copei founder in a vote
for the party's last presidential candidacy. If Mr Caldera cannot reconquer
his party for the 1994 campaign, he is likely to run as a candidate for the
socialist MAS.
After the February putsch the president promised to install a constituent
assembly to reform the Constitution. But the Congress, dominated by AD and
Copei, ignored the idea and developed a long and controversial list of
amendments it planned to approve this year or next.
These proposals were shelved after the Venezuelan media proprietors started
a public campaign against changes that would restrict ownership of media by
individuals and economic groups, and oblige them to allow a 'right to reply'
from citizens attacked in the press.
Venezuelans are scheduled to elect state governors, mayors and city councils
in elections on Sunday but the outcome is unpredictable. It is already
clear, however, that most Venezuelans oppose the Perez government's economic
policies.
The main uncertainty is how many people will bother to vote. Abstention in
regional elections in 1989 reached 54 per cent nationwide and 73 per cent in
Caracas, despite the fact that voting is obligatory under Venezuelan law. A
high abstention rate would probably favour AD and Copei which are geared to
'get out the vote' for their candidates.
Elections to choose a new president, national Congress and state assemblies
are scheduled for December, 1993. In past years, it was clear by this stage
who the main candidates would be. But now the outlook is clouded by turmoil
within the two main parties.
Venezuela's military, like most of the population, wants sweeping reforms.
For the time being, the rift between middle-rank officers (who generally
want rapid change) and the high command (who have supported Mr Perez and the
institution of the presidency) has not caused problems.
Venezuela's political system, like the economy, is undergoing a transition
that probably will take several years. Despite many efforts to derail his
reforms, Mr Perez has indirectly shaken up the traditional power of
Venezuelan politicians who served as intermediaries for businessmen,
students and other favour seekers under a highly controlled bureaucracy.
By opening up the Venezuelan economy and reducing government interference,
he has dramatically reduced opportunities for corruption, as well as the
power of party leaders and followers to 'get things done'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4014</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Major scorns 'glib' talk of bombing
Serbs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVO DAWNAY, Political Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE PRIME MINISTER defended the government's caution over the Bosnian crisis
yesterday, warning that 'glib' talk about bombing Serbian forces failed to
consider the risks to British troops involved in humanitarian aid on the
ground.
But Mr John Major went on to confirm that international discussions are
under way over how to bolster enforcement of the 'no-fly zone' over
Bosnia-Hercegovina, among other possible military responses.
Officials pointed out, however, that any escalation of military activity,
such as bombing Serbian airports, would have to be approved by the United
Nations and would require a further Security Council resolution.
Amid clear indications that urgent discussions are in progress behind the
scenes, Mr Douglas Hurd, the foreign secretary, and Mr Malcolm Rifkind, the
defence secretary, used broadcast interviews to caution restraint.
Ministers are keen to point out that military engagement by UN forces might
be counter-productive by swiftly embroiling forces engaged in humanitarian
aid and shutting down carefully nurtured supply routes.
The Bosnian question was raised at yesterday's cabinet and continued at a
subsequent meeting of the cabinet's overseas policy and defence
sub-committee. With pressure growing from some MPs on his own back benches
for tougher action against the Serbs, Mr John Major was at pains to
emphasise the dangers of becoming embroiled in the civil war.
At question time, he reminded those seeking a heavier commitment such as
engaging ground forces in would mean committing troops 'to a very long and
very bloody fight' with the certainty of serious casualties. 'It is all too
easy to be heroic with the lives of other people,' he said.
Mr Major also added: 'If further action is need to enforce that no-fly zone,
that is something we would consider with our allies and partners in the
United Nations.'
Alongside mounting public concern at the plight of the Bosnian Muslims,
there is also Foreign Office anxiety that the conflict may spread to the
region of Kosovo and the former Yugoslav republic of Macedonia.
Downing Street pointed out that the crisis will be discussed by EC foreign
ministers on Monday, again at the 'conclave' on Tuesday and at the Edinburgh
summit - before the international conference in Geneva on December 16.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4015</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Bids sought in 'one-stop' plan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LISA WOOD and DAVID OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Michael Heseltine, trade and industry secretary, yesterday invited
competitive bids for a chain of one-stop shops which he said would
revolutionise support for British business.
The shops will bring together the services of chambers of commerce, local
authorities and local enterprise agencies. They will also incorporate
Department of Trade and Industry services to business.
A prospectus seeking bids for 15 pilot one-stop shops is to be sent to
Training and Enterprise Councils, which have been asked to co-ordinate the
bids.
Mr Heseltine has allocated Pounds 3.5m for the shops - which has been clawed
back from Tecs' existing budgets. It is intended that a network of about 200
shops will be established, to be the main local point of providing and
promoting DTI services to business.
Information and advice will include exporting, VAT, standards, single-market
information, and training.
The government hopes a policy will be developed to charge for services, many
of which are now free.
Mr Heseltine said he was ready to consider imaginative ideas about how that
might be achieved, including proposals for co-location and, subject to any
legal constraints, subcontracting of services.
There are about 800 DTI staff in the regions and bids may result in them
being seconded to the shops.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4016</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: MPs worried by invasions of privacy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Commons national heritage select committee yesterday expressed concern
about the threat to privacy coming from easily available bugging devices and
long-range cameras.
Mr Joe Ashton, Labour MP for Bassetlaw, told how the committee looking into
privacy and media intrusion had been briefed in a private session by police
and security experts on the technology of intrusion.
Apart from bugging devices there were telephoto lenses, Mr Ashton said,
capable of taking pictures at a range of 1.6km.
'The technology is now available to tap into anyone, anywhere and at a very
cheap price,' he added.
Ms Patsy Chapman, editor of the News of the World, in evidence to the
committee, said she had never been offered such material although she
conceded it was a potential issue.
The scale of any trouble depended on how many people were prepared to buy
such material and whether a market for it developed, she said.
Mr Gerald Kaufman, the chairman of the committee, said that if the police
wanted to tap people's telephone lines they had to have the authorisation of
the home secretary. Was it proper, Mr Kaufman asked, for newspapers to be
able to publish material that would not be permitted in a court of law
because it was obtained illegally?
'That is why it doesn't happen,' Ms Chapman said. 'It happened on one
occasion that I know of.' She was apparently referring to the case of the
recording of private telephone calls of Mr David Mellor, the former heritage
secretary.
At the committee Lord McGregor, chairman of the Press Complaints Commission
said he was opposed to any privacy legislation. But if there had to be
specific offences such as physical intrusion or electronic eavesdropping
then 'the least objectionable form of legal action' would be civil offences
that applied to everyone and not just journalists.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4017</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: TGWU will cut cash for Labour
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART, Labour Editor and IVO DAWNAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Transport and General Workers Union, the largest union affiliated to
Labour, has increased financial and political pressure on the party by
announcing a phased reduction in the number of members it intends to
affiliate.
The TGWU, one of the historic pillars of the Labour party and which sponsors
38 Labour MPs, said it would cut the number of affiliated members from 1.07m
to 750,000 by 1994.
That will reduce the amount Labour receives from the union from Pounds 1.67m
this year, excluding additional election expenses, to Pounds 1.35m by 1994,
even taking account of an increase in the affiliation fee per member from
Pounds 1.60 to Pounds 1.80.
Mr Bill Morris, TGWU general secretary, said that the money would be
diverted to other political ends, in particular to supporting local
councillors and campaigning in Europe.
He denied that the cut stemmed from irritation with the political direction
of the Labour party. But the union's leadership has been openly dismayed by
the post-election debate about loosening the links between the unions and
the party, and the TGWU's action is bound to be seen as a mark of
disapproval.
It will also serve as a reminder of how financially dependent on the big
unions Labour remains.
Although the unions provide only about 60 per cent of the party's Pounds
9m-plus annual running costs, they also provide almost all election
expenditure, nearly Pounds 8m at the last election. In addition to its basic
affiliation fee, the TGWU probably spent more than Pounds 1m over the past
two years on Labour's election fund.
The cut in funds will not be welcomed by Labour, but some of the money may
be covered by a rise in affiliation fees when the three main public-service
unions merge to form Unison next year.
Although the TGWU last year suffered a Pounds 12m deficit on its general
fund, it is expected to be back in surplus by as much as Pounds 3m this
year. Mr Morris emphasised that it was strategic rather than financial
necessity that had led to the shift of funds away from Labour.
He also pointed out that Labour-loyalist leaders such as Mr Jack Jones and
Mr Ron Todd had cut affiliation by even larger amounts as a result of
falling membership.
Pressure for the wholesale removal of trade unionists from the process of
selecting or deselecting MPs is to be stepped up by a rightwing Labour party
grouping headed by a former leading union official, Ivo Dawnay adds.
The Labour First group, chaired by Mr Brian Nicholson, a former TGWU
chairman, yesterday said it was launching a nationwide campaign for a simple
one-member-one-vote selection system entitled 'OMOV Now'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4018</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Move to ease EC business burden
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A DRIVE to reduce the burdens on business imposed by European Community
directives was announced yesterday by Mr John Major as part of his
government's commitment to deregulation.
The prime minister told a London conference that Britain had been
'over-punctilious' in its implementation of some Brussels regulations,
sometimes adding its own national rules.
He said the deregulation unit set up by Mr Michael Heseltine, the trade and
industry secretary, would include EC directives in its proposed scrutiny of
all Whitehall regulation and licensing arrangements that add to the costs of
industry.
The government planned to involve the private sector in the scrutiny.
Every government department has been told to put forward by the end of this
year suggestions for the repeal or simplification of such rules.
Proposals will be considered by the cabinet in February.
Mr Major said increased scrutiny of the government's implementation of
Brussels regulations would coincide with its efforts at the Edinburgh summit
to give substance to the idea of subsidiarity by identifying EC legislation
that might be repealed outright.
Speaking to the conference on 'Service for the Citizen', the prime minister
underlined his commitment to pressing ahead with the Citizen's Charter, in
spite of criticisms among the 'articulate and the powerful'.
Mr Major said many of the critics were drawn from the privileged few who
were able to ensure that they received the best from public services.
His charter was aimed at those unable to work the system.
Mr Major insisted that those services - notably British Rail - which failed
to meet the targets in their respective charters would not be allowed to
lower their sights.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4019</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Heritage relocation
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Department of National Heritage announced yesterday it would move its
headquarters to 2-4 Cockspur Street, near Trafalgar Square. The department's
staff, who now occupy seven buildings around Whitehall, will move next
spring.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4020</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Minorities in line for legal
appointments
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
AN increasing number of judicial appointments for members of ethnic
minorities as well as for women was envisaged by Mr John Taylor,
parliamentary secretary to the Lord Chancellor's Department, in the Commons
last night. There would be no obstacle to those competent and qualified, he
said.
The Judicial Pensions and Retirement Bill, already approved by the Lords,
was given a second reading.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4021</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: 'I'm a believer in the power of
fear' - Anthony Nelson shares his opinions on financial regulation with
Richard Waters and Ralph Atkins
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS and RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MORE than six years ago, Mr Anthony Nelson, an ex-merchant banker turned
backbench Tory MP who had been passed over for ministerial office many
times, warned that UK investment regulation failed to pay enough attention
to investors.
Now economic secretary at the Treasury and the man in charge of financial
regulation, Mr Nelson's views have hardly budged.
'Many of the misgivings that I expressed in the mid 1980s have come to
pass,' he said yesterday in his first wide-ranging interview since taking
over responsibility for financial services nine months ago. He singled out a
number of examples of how the 1986 Financial Services Act had failed: the
Maxwell scandal, the mis-selling of home income plans, and the market
manipulation a year ago at Fox, the soft commodities exchange.
Given his first ministerial office by Mr John Major - a closer political
ally than Lady Thatcher, the former prime minister, ever was - he has the
chance to make changes.
Mr Nelson, 44 and MP for Chichester for nearly two decades, is also the
first Treasury minister to have responsibility for the City since the
supervisory functions were gathered in the department.
That means, he says, that 'I can see much more clearly the need for change
where it arises and I'm much better able to take action than where there was
a demarcation of responsibilities'.
But there is no radical overhaul of the present regime planned - and no
intention for the government to extend its direct involvement in financial
regulation. 'I believe that while there is much that is wrong, there is much
that can be done within the existing structure to redress that.'
He is unwilling to bring forward new financial services legislation. With no
unanimous view in the City about the way forward, and given uncertainties
about how any legislation might be reshaped as it passes through parliament,
the outcome of any attempt to formulate a new law would be difficult to
predict, he warned.
Instead, the government appears bent on sticking with what Mr Nelson called
'a bit of a statutory fudge' created in 1986, because of the prevailing
'political climate' and City attitudes. He shrugged off any suggestion that
the UK should seek to copy the US's approach to investment regulation.
'I'm not seeking to emulate the SEC. We already have our own background.'
Nevertheless, Mr Nelson clearly envisages a significant shift in emphasis,
with a more aggressive approach to enforcement and prosecution. As he summed
it up: 'I'm a believer in the power of fear.'
He was careful not to pre-empt the review being undertaken for him by Mr
Andrew Large, the chairman of the SIB, but made clear that some changes lie
ahead.
First, the SIB will be expected to use its powers to investigate and
prosecute offences more vigorously. 'I'm not satisfied that those powers
have been adequately used,' he said. 'I want it to be more intrusive,
incisive, where necessary more penal.'
This may lead to a 'slight swelling' of the size of the agency, though the
extra cost is something the City would not complain about, he said.
Second, the self-regulatory bodies will be expected to become tougher. The
interests of investors, rather than the financial industry, should be at the
heart of the system, Mr Nelson said - an argument that he made as a
backbencher when the FSA was passing through parliament.
Third, the fragmentation of the regulatory system, which involves
overlapping agencies pursuing parallel investigations and which Mr Nelson
believes has 'mitigated against a clear line of command', will be reduced,
although not as dramatically as some in the City have suggested.
Mr Nelson gave strong support to the creation of a single Personal
Investment Authority to handle retail investment regulation, while claiming
that his own influence to prompt such a change is only slight.
There will be no attempt to reduce the number of bodies with the powers to
investigate suspected offences, for instance by bringing the Serious Fraud
Office and the SIB together. 'I'm very impressed by what they (the SFO) do
and find it difficult to believe they would do it any better if they were
merged with or became a subsidiary of the SIB,' he said.
While Mr Nelson fends off pressure for a new law on financial regulation, he
is already bent on pushing through parliament a piece of legislation that
has antagonised many in the City.
According to lawyers and investment houses, the insider dealing provisions
in the Criminal Justice Bill could outlaw legitimate City practices in the
financial markets and prevent the flow of information from listed companies
through analysts to the world at large.
That, according to Mr Nelson, is neither the intention nor the effect. 'I
have no intention whatsoever of jeopardising one of the City's great
strengths, its professional and analytical skills.'
City analysts should continue to play a central role in companies'
communications with their shareholders, and large institutional shareholders
should continue to talk directly to company management without greater fear
of prosecution, he said.
Of the links between companies and their shareholders, he said: 'I want, if
anything, to see those strengthened and improved rather than inhibited by
the new law.'
The difficulty with the legislation is that the government has had no choice
but to use it to implement the European Community directive on insider
dealing as it stands.
Mr Nelson has tried to limit the scope of the bill with a new defence for
some legitimate market practices. But he said it was impossible to frame a
law that was precise enough to catch every activity that the government
might want to prosecute while leaving out of the net all those practices it
considered legitimate.
If that gives little solace to professionals in the City, he at least offers
the reassurance that a wave of new prosecutions is not planned. 'I'm not
about to embark on some kind of witch hunt for insider dealers in the City
which will bring fear not only to employees but to employers,' he said.
Guidance on how the government will interpret the new law, due at committee
stage, should also calm City fears, he said.
Where he is less conciliatory is over the interest and other charges imposed
by high street banks on small businesses and others.
He insists that he, the chancellor and the prime minister 'do take
opportunities, and will take further opportunities, to draw very directly to
the attention of major banks these criticisms.'
But, lest anyone should accuse him of being too much of an interventionist,
Mr Nelson sees clear limits to the government's role - he ruled out a public
inquiry - and blamed customers almost as much as he blamed the banks.
'We have moved away a little bit from the reliance people placed in the past
on their own good sense in terms of managing their own funds and savings,'
he says,'and we have to remind people that at the end of the day they must
take a close interest in the management of their own savings.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4022</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Heritage ministry staff to relocate
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Department of National Heritage announced plans yesterday to move its
headquarters to 2-4 Cockspur Street, close to London's Trafalgar Square.
The 66,800 sq ft building will accommodate about 250 people. The
department's staff, who now occupy seven different buildings around
Whitehall, will move next spring. The rest of the 350 staff will be based at
Grove House in nearby Orange Street, which is already used by the
department.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4023</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Gatt 'will not affect farmland
set-aside'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE RECENT breakthrough in the Gatt world trade talks should not lead to a
big increase in the proportion of European Community farmland that would be
set aside from production, Mr John Gummer, agriculture minister, indicated
yesterday, David Owen writes.
Mr Gummer told the Commons the agreed 15 per cent EC set-aside level would
not be radically changed by the oilseed products settlement recently reached
by Gatt negotiators.
That view was disputed by Mr Dale Campbell-Savours, Labour agriculture
spokesman, who said the Gatt deal would result in between 20 per cent and 40
per cent of eligible land being set aside, depending on whether optimistic
or pessimistic assumptions were made.
He accused Mr Gummer of 'persistently denying the truth' on the effect the
agreement would have on Britain's farmers and farmland.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4024</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / City centre combats crime with TV net
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRIS TIGHE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN'S biggest city-centre street surveillance camera scheme, linking a
closed-circuit television network to banks of screens in a police control
room manned round the clock, goes into operation today.
The Pounds 300,000 scheme will monitor the movements of known criminals in
Newcastle upon Tyne city centre and hopes to deter and record crime by
constant filming.
Some traders hope the 16 zoom-lens cameras, supplemented after dark by
infra-red lighting, will help to thwart increasingly audacious professional
gangs.
The network aims to help to reduce street disorder in one of Britain's most
vibrant city centres. Within its central 1 1/4 square miles, Newcastle has
147 pubs, 116 restaurants and nine nightclubs.
City centre businesses, from small shopkeepers to Marks &amp; Spencer, have
contributed nearly half the set-up costs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4025</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Industrialist appointed gamekeeper: Robert Rice meets the
next head of the monopolies commission
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT RICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Graeme Odgers, chief executive of Alfred McAlpine, the contractor, is to
be the next chairman of the Monopolies and Mergers Commission. He will take
over in April from Sir Sydney Lipworth who has been chairman since the
beginning of 1988.
Mr Odgers, 58, will be the first non-lawyer to head the commission. His
appointment was seen yesterday as a mark of the determination of Mr Michael
Heseltine, trade and industry secretary, to bring a stronger industrial
perspective to bear on competition issues.
'The secretary of state was looking for someone with a strong industrial and
commercial background with a perspective closer to his views on
competition,' Mr Odgers commented yesterday.
As well as taking a cut in salary from Pounds 309,000 to Pounds 87,620, Mr
Odgers will have to give up his directorships of Dalgety, the food group,
and National &amp; Provincial Building Society.
He will become a part-time member of the commission on January 4 and take up
his four-year, full-time appointment on April 19.
Mr Odgers brings a variety of experience to the job having worked in
government, the private sector and, significantly, in a privatised industry.
He began his career as a management and financial consultant before moving
in 1974 to the DTI as an industrial adviser. After a period as head of the
DTI's industrial development unit, he joined GEC as an associate director
before moving on to become group managing director of Tarmac in 1983.
After appointment as a part-time director of British Telecommunications in
1984 he became deputy chairman and chief financial officer in 1986 and group
managing director a year later. He moved to Alfred McAlpine in May 1990.
He thus has experience of running a monopoly at BT and considerable
knowledge of construction - a sector repeatedly under scrutiny by the
competition authorities in the 1980s.
'It's vital that the MMC handles all cases on an even-handed basis, without
bias, taking all relevant factors into account. Having said that how an
individual investigation is handled will clearly be affected by the approach
taken by the panel assigned to it.'
Mr Odgers said he believed very strongly that the economy thrived best in a
private-sector environment where rigorous competition applied. Since
privatisation, BT had 'literally been transformed', he said.
There was a significant element of monopoly in all the privatised industries
at the moment, he said, hence the need for regulation. But as competition
came into those industries, the need for regulation would diminish.
'Competition is vital, otherwise there is a natural tendency to abuse a
dominant position,' he said. 'But, equally you have to be careful not to
break down the industry into too small units so it can't compete
internationally. So I will take a pragmatic view of the effects of
competition both in domestic markets and internationally'.
Mr Odgers is credited with having turned McAlpine round in the past two
years by pursuing a 'bottom-up, high wire' strategy under which high quality
standards are agreed between the centre of a group and its individual
operations.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4026</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Doubt on river grading plan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRONWEN MADDOX, Environment Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AN AMBITIOUS scheme to classify up to 10,000 stretches of river in England
and Wales into six quality classes was announced yesterday by the
government.
Water companies warned last night that the proposed statutory water quality
objectives might push customers' bills up higher.
Water companies are committed to spending up to Pounds 45bn to meet
environmental regulations - the water industry has warned that that spending
alone might double customers' bills in real terms by 2005.
Recent government figures show that while the number of serious cases of
river pollution dropped last year, the overall quality of rivers and canals
deteriorated between 1980 and 1990.
The new scheme hopes to shed light on those trends and improve quality.
In a consultation paper on river quality issued yesterday, the government
proposed classifying a trial group of about half a dozen catchment areas
next year.
Eventually most rivers or stretches of river in England and Wales will be
classified into at least one of six categories, depending on their use:
fishing; abstraction for drinking water; agricultural; industrial; special
ecosystem; and water sports. There will be six additional subclasses for
fishing rivers.
Each class will have different permitted levels of chemicals and target
levels of oxygen in the water.
The scheme will replace the present informal one based only on chemical
concentration, not on use.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4027</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Package tours from abroad 'need updating'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SKAPINKER, Leisure Industries Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PACKAGE tours to the UK must be updated to cater for the growing number of
visitors who demand greater flexibility and variety, the Henley Centre for
Forecasting says.
The UK attracted 2.3m package tourists in 1990, about 29 per cent of all
visitors to Britain. Last year's figure was 1.9m, down because of the Gulf
War.
The centre's report says such packages are increasingly unsuitable for
tourists who have visited the UK before.
The report says the traditional low-cost package trip appeals to
inexperienced travellers who lack confidence in dealing with foreign
cultures.
Traditional packages should be used to encourage tourists from new markets
in eastern Europe and south-east Asia.
Experienced travellers with the confidence to discover the country for
themselves need different arrangements, the report says.
Inbound Tourism: A Packaged Future. Henley Centre, 2 Tudor Street,
Blackfriars, London EC4Y OAA. Pounds 50.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-4028</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLDBUAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921204
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  04 DEC 92 / Post-auction bid secures Bacon painting for Pounds 735,000:
Saleroom
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SOTHEBY'S in London had a successful auction of contemporary art yesterday
in spite of a temporary setback when the most important lot, the first
important painting by Francis Bacon to appear on the market since his death
in April, was unsold in the saleroom.
But a Continental bidder, who had been unable to get his telephone bid
through, acquired 'Study of a Nude with Figure in a Mirror' for Pounds
735,000 after the auction, well below the Pounds 1m-plus estimate.
That boosted the take to Pounds 4.2m with only 13 per cent unsold, if the
Bacon is included.
The other star lot was '4 Marilyns', an Andy Warhol silkscreen of four heads
of Marilyn Monroe in bold shades of yellow, turquoise, red and orange. It
sold to a Continental collector for Pounds 610,500, way above estimate.
Another good price was the record Pounds 209,000 for a work by Leon Kossoff.
'Children's Swimming Pool' was painted at Willesden Baths in London in 1969.
'Gran Ocre amb Petjades' by the Catalan artist Antoni Tapies beat its
estimate at Pounds 214,500.
'Elke' by Georg Baselitz, depicting his naked wife upside down, went for
Pounds 165,000, half its estimate, suggesting a desperate seller, while a
painting by another modern chronicler of London, Frank Auerbach, a view of
Mornington Crescent Station, went just below forecast at Pounds 148,500.
Corporate sponsorship of the arts in the UK in 1991-92 rose by 14 per cent
to Pounds 65.4m in spite of the recession and cuts by some significant
supporters, notably banks and the oil companies.
Yesterday's figures, from the Association for Business Sponsorship of the
Arts, show growth in sponsorship mainly from medium-sized companies in the
regions, notably the professions and packaged-goods manufacturers. The media
and privatised industries have also increased involvement.
Nationally, straightforward sponsorship including support for capital
projects rose 28 per cent from Pounds 44.6m to Pounds 57.6m in the year,
while contributions to corporate membership schemes, which are used mainly
for entertaining, fell 37 per cent from Pounds 12.5m to Pounds 7.8m.
That has caused difficulties for organisations such as the Royal Opera
House, Covent Garden, which look to such schemes for much of their
sponsorship revenue.
Mr Colin Tweedy, the association's director-general, said the figures showed
that business was 'cutting back on anything that is non-commercial. This is
proving a difficult year, but the way things are going I would expect a
small increase in sponsorship expenditure in 1992-93.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
